What is your first name?
What's your last name?
This is your adoptive mother. What's her name?
This is your girlfriend. What's her name?
Testing
Beep beep
This is Shauna your best friend. Do you want her to be a female or do you want her to be transgender?
*ALARM BEGINS TO RING*
Oh man I don't want to get up yet. I stayed up too late playing video games with Shauna.
Oh man I don't want to get up yet. I stayed up too late playing video games with Shawn.
I don't have a choice though. I don't want to leave [g1] at the gym alone.
I have around 28 minutes to get ready. I told her I'd be there at 6am. That's enough for a quick shower.
This is the last time I'll be getting out of this bed. Tomorrow night I'll be in a dorm room.
I should be grateful for this moment but all I can think about is how I want to go back to sleep. I have to get up before I give in to temptation.
I usually like to be able to take my time getting ready. Not able to do that today though. Just a quick shower and I'm out the door.
There's a lot I have to do today. I have gym with [g1], then I'm meant to meet Damien, my new teammate. I want to have time to do something with [am]. Then we leave at 10pm sharp.
Speaking of [am] I should wake her up before I leave. For some reason they're making her work on a Sunday.
I need to focus on getting ready. If I'm late [g1] will kick my ass.
A few minutes later.
Okay, that was quick enough. Time to brush my teeth and get dressed.
One teeth cleaning and clothes change later.
All right, I'm good to go. Just have to wake up [am] and I'll be on my way.
KNOCK, KNOCK, KNOCK
Are you in there [mcf]?
Yeah, I'm almost done. Just hold on one second.
Hey mom, you're already up?
Hey honey, yeah.. I couldn't really sleep last night. What are you doing up so early?
I have to meet [g1] at the gym. I told her I'd be there at 6am.
Why couldn't you sleep? Is it about me leaving today?
Yeah.. I knew it was coming but it still feels like it came out of nowhere. I'm just going to miss you.
I'm going to miss you too. It won't be that long though. Just three weeks until you move there with me.
That's three weeks though. We've never spent a night away from each other since you moved in with me.
I know. Tonight is going to be tough. How long do you have to work today?
Just until two. Why? Were you wanting to do something?
Of course. I want to spend as much of today as I can with you.
I was hoping you'd say that. What do you want to do?
I'm not entirely sure yet. How about we figure that out when I pick you up?
Sounds like a plan. Today is going to go by so slow until 2pm.
I hope you have a good day at work. Do you need me to give you a ride?
No I'm fine. Rachael is going to pick me up this morning. I don't want to make you late with [g1].
She would understand if I'm a little late. But if you're good I'm gonna go ahead and head on over there.
Not without a hug you're not. I love you [mcf]
No complaints here, I love you too [am].
I love her hugs. Her skin is so soft and she's such a small and gentle woman but she gives a really firm hug.
She may not be my real mom but she's the best mother figure anyone could ever ask for.
I hope you have a great day today. Tell [g1] that I said hey.
I can guarantee I'll have a great day as soon as 2pm hits. I think I have an idea of where to go. But it's a surprise.
I can't wait to find out. I'll be thinking about it all day.
So will I. I'll see you soon.
See you soon.. Drive safe!
I need to make today count for [am]. Me and her have never spent a night away from each other since my dad passed away.
We found an apartment near WVM but we can't rent until the first of the month. That's not for another 22 days.
That means we won't see each other that entire time and I don't know how either one of us are going to make it through it.
She means everything to me and I hate that we'll be away from each other that long.
All I can do is make sure we have a great day today. There's a necklace I want to buy her that I need to go and pick up. I'll do that after meeting Damien.
Okay, time to head out. It's a quick drive to the gym.
5 minutes later
Thank god.. The place looks empty. Hopefully it's just me and [g1] for a bit.
If I know anything about her.. She'll be stretching in the corner.
Yep.. I called it. Oh wow. She's wearing the black and gold already. It looks great on her.
Hey [g1], I made it on time.
Hey babe, I was worried you were going to sleep in.
And leave you here all alone? Not a chance. I'm really liking the outfit by the way. Already rocking the WVM pride.
Ehhh sure.. You could say that. But I'm wearing it because my man is now the shooting guard for the WVM Nukes and I wanted to show my support.
It looks incredible on you.
I'm glad you think so. I feel a little silly in it. It kinda shows everything.
I like looking at everything. You have a fantastic body.
Thank you. I'm just nervous someone else will walk in and see me in it.
You'd probably make their entire day.
Oh yeah? Did you seeing me in this make your entire day?
You make my everyday, sexy outfit or not. I'm just lucky to be here.
I guess she liked that answer.
Her kisses always sound loud and sloppy but they're the most gentle thing.
Great answer.
It's the truth. So what are we doing now?
Let's get this workout out of the way. I'm already warmed up.
Sure thing, let's do it.
Not just yet. But after I see you workout in it I think my entire week will be made.
Ha, I'm sure it will. Are you ready to get this workout over with?
Sure am, let's do it.
20 minutes of cardio later.
Man, all these exercises are doing wonders for her. She's in shape as can be and her ass is amazing.
Come to think of it. I think this is the most revealed I've seen her yet.
We've been dating for 2 months now and the most we've done is kiss.
I knew she wanted to go slow going into this, I didn't know she meant this slow though.
But I respect it, there's no reason to rush things if she's not ready.
15 minutes of lifts later.
Ow, ow, ow!
What's wrong?
Owwwwww.. My foot is cramping up.
Do you want me to massage it? Or I can go get a warm towel to put on it.
Nooo, I'm fine. It just got really tight for a minute. So much for my stretches.
Are you sure?
Yeah I'm sure, it's already starting to go away. It's just tight. Thank you for your concern though, you're a sweety.
Anytime, are you done for today? Or do you want to keep going?
We're only like halfway through but I think if any day can be a cheat day then it's today.
Plus it's only half a cheat day. Did you drive here or did your mom drop you off?
My mom dropped me off. Would you mind giving me a ride? I'll make up for it.
You don't have to make up for anything. You ready to leave now?
Can I change first? I don't want to be in public in this..
Awhh, I really like seeing you in it.
And I like you seeing me in it. But not other people.. just you.
I don't really want other people to see you in it either. Do you want me to help you over to the locker room?
Yes please. I haven't been carried since I was a small kid.
Damn, you're really light. I could fling you around like an old cartoon character if I wanted to.
Hah, am I really light or are you just really strong?
Let's go with both, now let's get you into the locker room before any other early risers show up.
Didn't even break a sweat, guess I must actually be light.
I'm telling you. All these exercises you've been doing are paying off. You're the perfect ratio of curvy and skinny.
Thank you for noticing. It's all for you. I want to look good for when we uhh... yeah.
Did she just almost say she wants to look good for when we finally do something more than kiss?
What you've been doing is working amazingly. You look fantastic.
You're full of compliments this morning. I like it.
There we go. Do you need anymore help?
No I should be fine, to be honest I could've walked in here no problem but I wanted you to carry me.
Hah, okay. I'll get you back for that. I'll be waiting by our spot.
I'll be out in just a minute.
I wonder what to do next. I don't have to meet Damien for a few more hours.
I could take [g1] somewhere nice. Maybe get some breakfast.
Uhhmmm.. Good morning [mcf]..
Oh hey.. Good morning Shauna. What are you doing here?
Oh hey.. Good morning Shawn. What are you doing here?
Shocked to see me in a gym huh?
Yeah, somewhat. Is everything okay?
After we got offline last night I tried to lay down to sleep but I was too nervous to actually fall asleep.
I'm tired of racking my brain about all the changes happening and I just wanted to leave my room and you told me last night that you were coming here so.. I don't know.
I guess I just want to distract myself right now. I'm sorry if I'm interrupting your plans or anything. I don't mean to cock block.
You're fine. We just got through with our work out so we're free to hang out for a bit.
Awesome!, so where is the pretty lady?
She's in the locker room changing.
This place is dead. Why aren't you in there with her?
Come on.. You know why.
I'm sorry, that was mean of me. So you two still haven't done anything? It's been over a month right?
Yeah it has, actually 2 months.
What's stopping you guys?
When we started dating she said she wanted to take things slow. Do things right. I thought that was a great idea.
But it has barely been brought up recently. I love hanging out with her and everything I just wish I knew what she was thinking about it.
Have you asked her?
Not really. I don't want to make it seem like I'm trying to pressure her to be ready. I want her to be ready when she is actually ready.
You're funny, you know that?
Ha, what makes you say that?
You're this basketball superstar who could have had any girl you wanted from school. I've seen girls literally willing to fight for you who would bend over in a second if you just winked at them.
But here you are. Wondering how to further your relationship respectfully.
That doesn't sound very funny to me.
No, funny was the wrong word. It's cute.
I don't know if that's any better.
Just next time you're alone with her.. Tell her what you told me.
You're not trying to pressure or rush her into anything. You just want an open dialogue about it. I'm sure she'll understand.
Yeah, you're right. I'm making it a bigger deal in my head than it really is. Thanks for the advice.
So enough about my issues. What's making you so nervous?
Awh, come on. I was enjoying talking about someone else's problems not my own.
Come on. You know it will feel good to get it off your chest. I'm a good listener.
Yeah I know you are. Fine, we can talk about it.
I guess I'm just nervous about college. All new people, new living space. What if it goes badly?
You have me and [g1]. It's not going to go badly. It's a new place with new people. A fresh start with better people.
What if they aren't better? What if it's more of the same? You having to constantly protect me and everything. I hate making you do that.
You aren't making me do anything. We're best friends, we always have been. I was there for you then and you were there for me when my dad passed away. It's just what we do.
When you put it that way.. but I still don't want you to have to stand up for me. You have a lot to worry about yourself and I don't want you to get mixed up with my issues.
So please promise me that you'll let me handle my own battles. I don't want you to have to worry about me.
I'll promise to stay out of the smaller ones. If anyone ever threatens you or takes it too far I'm going to be involved though.
Thank you, you're the best [mcf].
I can't promise you that. I'm not going to let anyone treat you poorly. I'm sorry but this isn't something you're going through alone. I'm there for you.
I don't deserve you [mcf]. I already feel a lot better about it.
Awh, am I missing out on a moment?
Oh hey [g1]. Sorry, [mcf] was just helping me work out some nerves about going to college.
You have nothing to be sorry about, I'm nervous about it too.
I am too. I've never liked change and a lot of it is about to happen.
Yes it is. But like you said. We will all have each other to rely on.
Damn right we will. All we need is each other.
So is Shauna hanging out with us for the day?
Yes she is. What do you guys want to do?
How much time do you have before meeting that guy Damien?
Not too long, but I'm meant to meet him at the basketball court behind Shauna's new house anyway, so if you're cool with it Shauna we could hang at your place for a bit.
Not too long, but I'm meant to meet him at the basketball court behind Shawn's new house anyway, so if you're cool with it Shawn we could hang at your place for a bit.
Sure, that sounds good to me. As long as you don't mind the mess. Do you know how to get there [g1]?
She's gonna ride with me.
Oh, okay. Perfect, let's go then.
10 minutes later
Here we are. Mi casa es su casa.
Wait, I thought you said there was a mess?
There is, I haven't vacuumed and my bed isn't made.
Whatever you say, this is clean in my books.
So [g1], how are you feeling about everything with this college stuff, nervous at all?
Of course I am. There's a lot happening. I know I have you there with me though so that helps a lot.
Hey, you have me too.
And you have me. Who knows, we may end up being roommates.
I hope so. That would be amazing.
I wish, that's the part I'm most nervous about. I'm just happy they're letting me stay in the girls dorm rooms.
I'm nervous about it too. Like what if we get complete bitches as our roommates?
I'll beat yours up if you beat mine up.
Ha, deal. Soooooo this is random but I'm curious.
You and [mcf] are really close and I don't even know your history. How did you two meet? If you don't mind me asking.
I don't mind at all, that's one of my favorite memories.
It was in elementary school. I was a shy nerdy kid who got picked on and I was too scared to stand up for myself.
There were a group of kids that would bully me daily. Until [mcf] moved here. His first time seeing it happen he intervened.
He confronted them and told them to stop or else he would do whatever they did to me twice as hard to them.
They stopped for then but when I went to go home that day one of them stopped me and threw me to the ground.
[mcf] came running in and tackled him and punched him a few times and made him apologize. He even walked me home to make sure nothing else happened.
I was so amazed by it. I went years thinking that being bullied was just my role to play. It got normalized to me and I forgot what it was like to feel safe and have someone respect you.
But even after that I was a shy kid with no friends. I didn't know what else to do but cling to [mcf]. I kinda forced my way into his life. I felt safe and I selfishly didn't want that to go away.
I always sat with him at lunch, went to his practices, we hung out after school a lot too.
Awh, that's so sweet. I didn't know that. No wonder you guys are so close.
That wasn't the last time either. In high school I accidentally bumped into a guy and he just started to yell at me. We were in the middle of a crowd and I just felt so overwhelmed and couldn't take it anymore.
At that point in my life [mcf] had helped me a ton with my confidence. So much so that I had the guts to stand up to him and I shouted back. I went too far and ended up pushing him.
Unlucky for me he wasn't having any of that and took a swing at me. Hit me in my left eye.
That wasn't the last time either. In high school right after I decided to start transitioning.. I can't even remember the guys name but he came up to me and just started to berate me. Yelling all kinds of crazy things in front of a lot of people.
At that point I had more respect for myself and I decided to yell back. Unlucky for me he wasn't having any of that and took a swing at me. Hit me in my left eye.
That time [mcf] wasn't around to see it and I didn't see him until lunch. I was scared to tell him what happened to my face but I eventually did.
Right after I told him he took off and I didn't see him again for the rest of the day, I was really worried about what happened.
I tried my best not to show it but that really crushed me. I finally stood up for myself and all it led to was a black eye and some embarrassment. I just wanted to go home and cry.
So that's what I was going to do. I was halfway home before [mcf] came running up to me. He was so calm but I knew something had happened.
His knuckles were red and swollen so I knew he had gotten into a fight with him. I wasn't going to make him say it though.
All he did was ask me if I wanted to go to the state fair with him that night. He knew how I was feeling and knew I needed him.
That was and still is the best night of my life. Just a whole night of nothing but fun with my best friend, just the two of us. He even won me that blue dinosaur over there.
I was going to ask about that thing, that's amazing.
I didn't know you guys had been through that much together, that's really cool.
There's a lot more but those are the two biggest ones.
Now your turn. I don't even know how you two met.
Well that story isn't as sweet as yours.. In fact it's the opposite.
I don't like to admit it but I actually hated [mcf] at first. It was my sister's fault.
You know who my sister is right Shauna?
Isn't she the snotty cheerleader? Isn't she coming with us tonight?
Yes to both of those, I can't stand her.. And before I even knew [mcf] she started to tell people that she and him were dating and doing all kinds of things.
And I believed her, she had never really lied about guys before. Plus it made sense, captain of the basketball team dating the cheerleader you know?
But anyway, that next school year me and [mcf] were put into the same science class.
I avoided him for as long as I could. I thought he was just a meat head jock or whatever.
That was until our science teacher paired us together on a project. He invited me over to his house to work on it and I begrudgingly accepted.
When I went over there for some reason I was expecting him to be childish, like have a race car bed and be in gym shorts.
But it was the opposite of that, I never saw his room so I don't know about the bed but he was wearing a nice formal outfit.
He was a proper gentleman to me, asked me if I wanted water, made sure I was comfortable. All the nice little things.
I saw how he interacted with his mom and how respectful he was.
I never realized how smart he was. I knew he had good grades and everything but he didn't need help on the project at all.
I remember thinking 'how is this guy with my sister?'
It was a great evening until after we finished with the project. It was pretty late into the evening and neither of us had eaten anything so we were both hungry.
He very kindly asked me if I wanted to go get something to eat with him. Looking back on it, it was very clearly a friendly invitation.
But for some reason I thought he was trying to make a move. I think I thought that because I was feeling attracted to him and I felt guilty about it since I thought he was with my sister.
But I snapped at him, went off about how he shouldn't treat my sister that way and that he was wrong and blah blah blah. I must've looked like an idiot.
I left after that and went to tell my sister. She ended up telling me the truth that she had been lying.
I felt so bad, first thing the next morning I ran up to him and apologized profusely. I must've said 'I'm so sorry' at least a hundred times.
I remember I was the only one talking though, he was just standing there with a slight smile on his face. After I was done rambling he just looked at me and said.
Want to get dinner with me tonight?
Hmmhmm, yep. I just stood there shocked that you even still wanted to talk to me. But I ended up saying yes and we had a fantastic meal and that was the start of our relationship.
I didn't know any of that had happened. That's pretty funny, but cute.
It all led to where I am now so I wouldn't change anything about it.
Another gentle but loud kiss. This might be my favorite thing. Shauna doesn't seem too comfortable with it though.
Another gentle but loud kiss. This might be my favorite thing. Shawn doesn't seem too comfortable with it though.
I wouldn't change anything either.
Good, I'm lucky to have you.
So Shauna, we're both really close with [mcf]. But I don't feel like we're that close.
I'm sure we'll grow a lot closer over the course of this next year.
Yes we will. I don't want to make you uncomfortable but are you dating anyone?
You're not making me uncomfy. I'm fine. But no, I've never been in a relationship. I'm waiting until college for a new start. I might try to find someone for me then.
What about you? How many relationships were you in before [mcf]?
None, at least no serious ones. I had like pretend boyfriends in middle school where we would hold hands.
But [mcf] was even my first kiss.
Wow, you two are great together. I still haven't had mine.
I'm sure you'll meet a nice and handsome guy at college. I'll be your wingwoman.
If you say so... Just not right away. I want to get comfortable there first.
That's fair. But when you're ready we will find you your own [mcf].
There's only one of me though.
All right Mr. Cocky. We'll find her the next closest thing.
That's better.
You'll find someone easily as soon as you want to.
I agree. Won't be hard at all.
Thank you guys.
Hey Shauna where's your bathroom?
It's the first door on the left out of here.
I will be right back. Don't go anywhere.
Well actually I was thinking about going ahead and walking down to the basketball court. Just be ready and down there for when Damien shows. You girls are free to join.
Sure, I'll head down there after I'm done.
Hey [mcf] before you head down I want to talk to you about something.
Uhh, sure.
I'll be right back.
What is it? Everything okay?
Yeah everything is good. I'm just not good at expressing my feelings when there is someone else around. I'm still too shy.
It's just talking about all this stuff from the past is bringing up a lot of thoughts.
I don't know where I'd be if you didn't come into my life. I wouldn't be where I am now. I just want you to know how much you mean to me.
You mean a lot to me too. Come here. You need another hug.
You're stronger than you think you are. You give me too much credit.
You're a beautiful young woman with a lot to offer. You just don't realize your worth yet. But you will.
Thank you [mcf]. Now let's go play some basketball.
Sure thing.
I wish she'd give herself some slack. She acts like I'm her angel or something but she's helped me through plenty herself. It's cute how she treats me though. I'd miss it if she stopped.
I'm surprised she's never tried to date anyone before. She has a fantastic body and I'm sure guys hit on her all the time.
Should I take a closer look?
She has a great body. She's changed from that quirky girl I grew up with.
I've been catching myself staring at her more and more lately.
She has a great body, I can't even remember what she looked like before the transition. She looks like a girl, sounds like a girl, smells like a girl. I wonder what's holding her back.
I've been catching myself staring at her more and more lately.
I really shouldn't. Not now anyway.
Here we are, your natural habitat.
You could say that. Can you get us a ball?
Sure thing.
Found one. So what do you want to do?
I haven't seen you shoot a three since middle school. Can you still make one?
Hmm, I don't know, let's make it interesting though.
How are we going to do that?
A simple bet. If I can make one and you can't then you have to do something embarrassing.
Like what?
I don't know yet, We'll come up with it after.
Sure, I'll take that bet. I don't get embarrassed easily.
All right here goes nothing.
Woo! I still got it!
Not to rain on your parade but your foot was totally on the line. I'll let it count though.
Haha, I was close enough. Your turn.
So if I make this you have to do something embarrassing and if I miss it then I have to?
Correct, good luck.
This is a simple enough shot. I could make it if I wanted to. Or I could miss it to see what she can come up with.
And it's in. Really shouldn't bet a man on the one thing he's good at.
So what should I make you do?
It better not be nothing too bad. I was going to go easy on you.
Well give me some ideas.. What were you going to make me do?
I was just going to tell you that you have to slap [g1] on the butt.
That's it? That's not even embarrassing. She's my girlfriend.
Yeah. But it would have been funny to see.
Fair enough I guess. I'll come up with something good later.
All right, bet only lasts for today though.
Oh! So close!
Ehh, can't win them all.
So what do I have to do?
Nothing major. All you have to do is slap [g1]'s butt.
Ha, what's embarrassing about that? She's my girlfriend.
I don't know. I just think it will be funny to see.
Haha, okay... I can do that.
So what next? Any more bets to make?
Nah, I'm too scared to lose. We can make bets later at something I'm good at.
At least you're honest. So no more bets for now. You just want to play Horse or something?
Well actually, you know that thing you do before every game? Where you hang on the rim?
Yeah, my whole pregame ritual. What about it?
Why do you do it?
Honestly it started out as a way to show off that I could dunk. That was back when no one else my age could dunk. I just never stopped because it sorta became tradition.
What does it feel like? It looks like fun.
It's not that different than hanging on anything else. Want to find out? I can lift you up there.
Oh I don't know. What if I fall?
You won't. I'll stay under you and I'll catch you if you slip. C'mon it'll be fun.
Okay, sure. I trust you.
Awesome, get the ball. No point in hanging on a rim if you don't dunk a ball.
Okay, I'm ready.
Is it cool if I pick you up by your hips? That way it will be easy for you to reach the rim.
Uhh, sure. I don't mind.
You sure you're ready? Whatever you do don't panic and shift your weight or else I might drop you.
Yeah I'm good. I'll stay straight.
Oh man, she put the idea of smacking asses into my head. Now I have a prime opportunity to smack hers. Should I take it?
*SMACK*
Hey! What was that for?
You put the idea of smacking butts in my head. I couldn't resist.
Ohh.. Uh. Okay, I guess I deserved it. I'll get you back though.
I'm sure you will, now turn back around and I'll pick you up. No slap ass this time I promise.
Up we go.
Are you on? Do you have a good grip?
Yeah, I think so.
I'm going to let you go now. Don't panic.
So how does it feel? Is it how you imagined?
It's different, not in a bad way though. It's an empowering feeling.
I didn't know the rim and hoop would flex like this. It feels funny.
Yeah, running and jumping then swinging on it feels way different than hanging on it. That flex helps a lot with that.
Well we need to get a trampoline out here so I can experience it.
Can you help me down now? My arms are starting to get tired.
Sure, I got you.
All right, you can let go. I'll just slide you down.
Thank you for that. It was fun.
No problem. Anything else you want to do?
Uhhhhh maybe.
Am I missing out on another moment?
No, not this time. [mcf] was just showing me what it's like to hang from the rim.
Yeah, she asked me what it was like so I figured why tell her when I can show her.
I saw you hanging from it on my walk over here. Looked like fun.
Hey [mcf] can I talk to you for a minute?
Of course. Is everything okay?
Yeah everything is fantastic. Just a few things I wanted to talk to you about.
Uhh.. just practice on your shot for a bit while we talk.
You got it, if I'm third wheeling too hard then I can give you guys some alone time.
No, no. You're fine, I promise. It's nothing like that. We won't be long.
Just let me know if you guys need some time for yourselves, and no rush.
So.. What's up?
Like I said I have a few things I want to talk to you about.
That sounds bad. What are they?
Noooo, they're good. I just have been wondering about something.
What's that?
Uhhhh... How do you feel about us?
Noooo, they're good. First thing is just a question. Why do you still call her Shawn? I thought she went by Shauna now?
Yeah that's something I've been working on. I've known her long before she went by Shauna. I just got so used to calling her Shawn and I don't really think about it.
It's just with us going to a new place and all maybe it would help her be more comfortable if she could shed off the Shawn persona, you know?
You're right. I really need to try my best to drop that habit.
Good, I'm sure she would appreciate it.
I have one more question. How do you feel about us?
What do you mean? I think we're great.
Like, are we doing good? Are you happy?
Of course I am. Like I said I think we're doing great. What makes you ask?
It's just.. A lot of things are going to be different.
Hey [g1], it's me. Just let it out. Tell me how you're feeling. Don't hold back.
It's hard. I feel silly when I say these things out loud but I don't know..
I'm scared of losing you when we go to college.
Why would you lose me?
I don't know. You're going to meet a lot of new girls and maybe they're better than me. Maybe they could make you happier.
Girls are going to go after you, especially with you being who you are.
When I say this I don't want you to think I'm attacking you and Shauna's friendship because I know you two are just best friends.
But when I see you two being close with each other I sometimes imagine you doing that but in a romantic way with another girl and it makes me sick to my stomach.
You changed my life and you are the best things that's ever happened to me. I don't want to lose you.
Wow, you were right.
What do you mean?
You do sound really silly when you say these things out loud.
Ha, you jerk. I'm opening up over here and you're calling me silly.
It's not like that, you're just feeling anxious and stressed out and you're overthinking things.
I'm not gonna go anywhere. I'm the same guy. I had girls coming at me here as well. And I chose you.
You're right but what if they can offer you things I haven't?
Like what? You give me everything I need.
No I don't.....
What are you talking about?
You know....
So that's what all this is about? You're scared you're going to lose me because we aren't having sex?
Yes. That's not all though. I don't even know how I'm feeling anymore. You have been absolutely perfect.
You're everything I want and you've been a perfect gentleman. I started the whole taking things slow thing back when I still didn't really know you or your intentions.
Now I've known for the longest time how much I care about you. How much I want to make you happy. But I still can't.
It's not that I don't want to. I really do. I'm just scared.
What are you scared of?
At first I was scared that my body wasn't good enough. I'm past that now though because of all the sweet things you've said about me and our workouts.
Now I'm just worried that I'm going to let you down. I've never done anything before. What if I'm awful at it? What if you hate it?
What do you think I am? I'm scared to death of letting you down too.
I've barely done anything myself. I just assume that we'll both wing it when we are ready. Figure everything out together.
I didn't really think about it like that. I thought you would have these huge expectations and everything. The more I made you wait the better I thought I had to be.
Not at all, I've just been waiting on you to be ready. I didn't want to rush you into anything.
Also we could start slow when you are ready. We don't have to dive into anything straight away. We could start with something simple and work our way from there.
I think I am ready to start trying things. I'm tired of feeling anxious about this.
I want you to do this for the right reasons. If you're not completely comfortable then it can wait. I promise.
I promise I'm ready. I'm not saying I'm ready to do everything. But I'm ready to start trying.
What do you want to start with?
Well, I really like kissing you. This is also kind of embarrassing to say but I also really liked when you picked me up earlier.
Something about you holding me in your arms really had me feeling a certain way. It was strong but intimate. It's hard to explain. Do you know what I mean?
Well, actions speak louder than words.
Hey! I wasn't prepared for that. But do you see what I mean? This is really intimate and I feel really close to you. It's nice.
It really is. So you said me holding you, but hmmm, what was the other thing?
As a great man once said 'Actions speak louder than words.'
Mmm, her kisses are usually gentle. But there's a fierceness in this one. It's nice to see this side of her.
Oh wow, this isn't like her at all. This is the opposite of her usual kisses. They're usually neat and gentle. This is sloppy and rough and I love it.
She clearly doesn't really know what she's doing but neither do I. At least she's trying.
Woah, where did that come from?
Like you said. I was just winging it. Did you like it?
I loved it.
I did too. Can we do it again?
Hey, I hate to interrupt you but are you [mcf]?
Oh shit, hey. Sorry.. didn't expect anyone to walk up on us. Yeah that's me.
Well shit, it's good to know my new teammate is a casanova at least.
You're Damien? It's nice to meet you man.
it's nice to finally meet you too.
So are you going to introduce me to her or no?
Oh yeah, Damien this is my girlfriend [g1].
It's nice to meet you.
The pleasure is all mine. Can I steal your boy for a few? We have some things to talk about.
Sure, just don't keep him too long. I wasn't done talking to him yet.
I could see that, we won't be long.
First things first I want to apologize for cutting you and your girl off. I tried to be polite and wait but when you two started to make out I knew I had to intervene or else I wouldn't be able to get a word in.
It's fine. It's just that was our first time doing anything more than a simple kiss.
How long have you two been together?
Close to two months.
Two months? And that was your first time making out? Not a casanova after all.
Nope, sorry to disappoint. We've been taking things slow.
Well shit, now I feel awful for interrupting. My girl was the same way at first. If anyone interrupted me and her back then I would've started swinging instantly.
It's not that big of a deal. We'll just continue it later. Is your girl here?
Nope, she stayed behind to help clean out your new place.
She's cleaning out my dorm room?
No, your new house. You didn't know about that?
Wait. What are you talking about?
Do you know who you are?
You're the top basketball recruit coming out of high school this year. And you committed to one of the worst division 1 schools.
Do you know what that does?
I guess not?
To put it simply WVM owes you big time.
Everyone is talking about them now. Fans are hyped that you're coming. There's buzz again.
There's media talking, there's jerseys being sold.
That means investors, donators to the school.
We're getting a whole new stadium, new uniforms, everything. The least they could do is hook you up with a nice place to sleep.
So I'm going to have my own house? Like actually just for me?
I don't know why you're so surprised. I assumed you already knew all of this. The house isn't all.
They hook you up with a car. Free food, a maid, and you don't have to go to classes if you don't want to.
That's crazy. I had no clue about that. Is it a nice house?
Yeah it's really nice. I think it's around six bedrooms so there's plenty of space.
Is there enough room on the RV for one more?
There's room on the RV for twenty more. Want to check it out?
Yeah, sure.. Sorry I'm just shocked about this. It changes a lot.
You're good homie, c'mon let's check it out.
So what do you think? She's a beauty right?
Yeah she's great. Not really a fan of wood paneling but other than that she's great.
You're not offending me, it's not mine. They're just letting me drive it to pick you up. Let's go inside.
See what I'm saying? There's plenty of room for whoever you want to bring.
There's even a bed back there for you and your girl to continue your thing.
Well now that I'm going to bring my mom I don't think anything will be happening back there tonight.
Oh damn, yeah I guess not then. It's hot as fuck in here right now though. I'm stepping back outside.
You want to go back to the court and play a bit? Test each other out?
As much as I would love to. I just got here, and I drove all through the night with no sleep. So I'm gonna go crash at a motel for a few. I'll leave the RV unlocked so just load up everything and I'll meet you here at 10, that sound good?
You don't have to go to any motel, you can sleep at my place. It will be empty for a bit.
I appreciate it, I truly do. But I really don't want to intrude. Plus this way I can sleep naked and take a shower and everything.
Fair enough, I understand that. Offer still stands though. Rest well man.
Will do, see you soon. Nice to meet you again.
He was cool, pretty much what I expected from what I heard about him. I wish we could've hung out for a bit but I get that he's tired.
I can't believe I'm going to have my own place. Mom, Shauna, and [g1] are all going to be ecstatic about it. No more worrying about roommates or being seperated.
I should wait until later before I tell them. That way I can tell them all at once and see all of their reactions.
Boo!
Did I scare you?
Somewhat, I was pretty deep in thought there.
Where did Damien go? We came to spy on you two.
He said he drove here all night and hasn't slept. So he's gonna go to some motel and sleep for a bit.
Why a motel? Why not just crash at your place?
I offered it to him, he said he preferred the motel.
Oh well. At least he'll be awake and alert for the ride back tonight.
You guys want to go back to the basketball court or do something else?
It's really hot out here. But if you guys want to go back then we can.
No, it's cool. We can do whatever. I still have to get another shower and get dressed. I have to pick up my mom soon and I'm gonna take her somewhere and spend some time with her.
Awh, how about we just head back to your place then? Just chill there until you leave to pick her up. That way you can do what you have to do.
That sounds good to me. Can you give [g1] a ride there? There's a few errands I have to do real quick.
I sure can. See you soon.
Bye baby, don't take too long.
I won't. I just have to pick up a few things.
5 minutes later
Time to get [am] the necklace I've been wanting to get her.
This present alongside telling her she can come with us tonight might send her into shock.
How can I help you sir?
I came in here a few days ago and put in an order for a necklace.
Wait, are you [mcf]?
Yes I am. Why?, is there a problem?
Not at all. I'm a huge fan. I've taken my son to a few of your games. Couldn't believe it when I heard you were going to WVM.
Oh, nice. And yeah, I've heard that a lot.
I'm sure you have. I have your order right here but... This doesn't seem right.
What's wrong?
This price tag looks wrong. I think half off would look a lot better for a man like you.
Are you serious? Thank you so much!
No problem at all, just maybe when you make it to the pro league you slide some tickets my way.
I think I could make that happen.
So is there anything else I can do for you? Anything else is full price though, sales are down this month so I can't go half on everything.
That's fine, you've already done more than enough.
I could buy something for [g1]. Maybe a bracelet? I'd feel bad not getting anything else since he just gave me half off.
Uhh, do you have any nice bracelets?
Who is it for?
My girlfriend. I figure I could get her something nice now.
I have the perfect one and you will still walk out of here with more cash than you thought you would.
Well shit, if I still have more I could get something for Shauna.
Should I? I could just pocket the extra and have it for later.
Well shit, if I still have more I could get something for Shawn.. I mean Shauna.
Should I? I could just pocket the extra and have it for later.
What about earrings?
With what you have left I have a nice pair. Nothing that'll blow your socks off but it's a solid present.
Awesome thank you so much.
That will be all for me today. Thank you so much for the discount.
Don't mention it, just don't forget about those tickets.
And good luck at WVM, I'll be watching. Have a great day young man.
Thank you, and I hope you have a great day too.
Time to head home and get ready.
10 minutes later
I'm going to wait until tonight to give [g1] her bracelet. Hopefully me and her have time to continue what we started earlier.
Hey girls, what have you two been up to while I was gone?
[g1] has been bugging me.
Yeah, sounds like her. What about?
Hey! I've just been asking her what she thought about Damien, if he was cute or not.
And I've told her twenty times that he's not my type.
He was telling me about his girlfriend anyway.
That's not my point though. I just want to talk to her about boys.
I've never really had that typical girl friend interaction thing where you have sleepovers and talk about boys.
I mean I'm happily taken but we can talk about boys for her you know. She's not gonna find a boyfriend if she doesn't look for one.
Well if he's not her type then he's not her type. The best things happen naturally, like us. We weren't really looking for it but it happened.
Thank you. I told her I'm more than happy to have that kind of friendship with her but he's really just not my type.
She won't tell me anything about her type!
I told her it's all about personality.
Then how can she say he's not her type? She doesn't know anything about his personality yet.
I'm gonna leave you two to duke this one out. I'm gonna hop in a shower.
Don't leave me alone with this again.
Ha, sorry. I won't be long. Get along you two.
I hope they're done with that conversation by the time I'm out of here.
I'm actually so excited for my little date with [am]. I thought it was going to be a little gloomy knowing it would be our last time together for a while.
I think I'm gonna go ahead and tell her about it, I can't wait to see her reaction.
She's arranged to take a sabbatical away from work. That isn't supposed to start for another two weeks though. I need to talk to her boss about it if I can.
If I can get everything set up before I even tell her then it will make everything so much better.
One shower later
I should be good to go. Just have to get dressed and I'll have some time to hang out with the girls before I have to leave.
*THUD*
What the fuck was that?
Shauna.. What are you doing?
Oh my god...
What the hell?!
I'm so sorry [mcf]. It's not what it looks like, I was just coming to see if you were out yet.
It's fine, can you hand me a towel?
Yeah here you go, again. I'm so sorry.
You scared the hell out of me. Why were you peeking on me?
I wasn't.. I told you I was just checking to see if you were out yet.
So when you saw I wasn't anywhere else and you could hear the water running.. that wasn't enough to convince you I was in the shower?
It's not like that. I don't know how to explain it. I'm sorry.
I'm not mad at you. Only way I will be mad is if you don't tell me the truth. It's me and you, we don't lie to each other.
I wasn't lying about coming to see where you were. [g1] wouldn't stop hounding me about guys and I wanted to get out of that.
I believe that, but that doesn't explain what happened. I know this is emberrassing but we can't just pretend that this didn't just happen.
It's not that simple, there's more to it than I can say.
What does that mean? It's not that hard. Let me guess.
You came in here to see where I was, when you realized I was still in the shower you got curious and took a peek and slipped.
It's not that big of a deal to me. Humans are flawed and we have a ton of weird emotions.
It's more than that. I can't say though.
Why not? It's me. Me and you have been through everything together. Why shut down now?
[mcf].. I'm not shutting down. I just don't know how to tell you this.
Just tell me it. It doesn't have to be a huge thing. Just get it off your chest.
[mcf].....
I.. have feelings for you. I know you're with [g1] and I feel awful about it and this was a huge mistake. I didn't want you to find out like this.
What kind of feelings?
You know.. I think the world of you. You've always been the perfect man and you've never let me down. You've always let me be me.
You make me feel safe. I'm happy when I'm around you and I miss you whenever we aren't together.
When [g1] was asking me about my type I didn't want to say because it's everything that you are.
I know you wouldn't be with a girl like me though. I've tried to get rid of these emotions. But it's not that easy.
Shauna, you should've told me sooner. I didn't know you felt that way.
Really? I should have?
Yes, there's no reason to keep anything from me. Especially nothing like that.
[mcf]... You just called me Shauna.
Yes I did. And I'm sorry I haven't earlier. You know I respect and care about you. I was just used to calling you Shawn and I didn't think about how it would make you feel.
It's okay, I never minded that much. It's just really nice to hear you say it.
Well get used to it. Those days are over.
So.. about all that I just told you. You don't hate me do you?
Of course not. I'm happy you told me. I just want to say that...
You're not the only one with feelings here. I have them too.
We've been through everything together. We've been best friends for as long as I can remember. Of course there's some attraction there.
But there's more to it than that. I've seen you grow into a beautiful young woman and we have everything in common. There's times where I've caught myself checking you out.
I knew there was something there but just like you I didn't know how to handle it and I didn't want to risk hurting our friendship.
I don't know, these are kind of unexplored emotions, anytime I would have these thoughts I would shut myself up.
[mcf].. Are you serious? This is really fucked up if you're joking.
I'm serious. Like I said I think you're beautiful and we've always been on the same page about everything. How could I not be attracted to you?
You don't know how happy that makes me. I've waited so long to hear that. But.. what about [g1]?
Yeah, that's where things get rocky. I really do like [g1]. I don't want to ruin things with her.
I know she said she was cool with us being as close as we are but I think this is crossing many lines.
I'm going to sound like an awful person but what if she didn't know?
What are you saying?
Like you said these are unexplored emotions for both of us. What if we explored them in secret? [g1] would never know.
I don't know. I know what I want to do but I don't think that it's right. If [g1] ever did find out she would be really hurt.
She'll never find out I promise. We'll be super careful and only do anything if we know we are alone.
You do know I would still be in a relationship with [g1] right? Would you be okay with that?
Yeah I'm completely fine with that. It sounds weird to say but it doesn't bother me at all. It actually makes me happy. I love watching you make others happy.
I also know that she makes you happy. I just also want to make you happy.
What if things don't change? What if me and [g1] work out long term?
Then we can keep our thing secret long term. As long as I know I have a place in your heart then I'm happy. I just want to be yours.
If that's all true then fuck it. I'm down to try this.
I can't believe this is finally happening. I've dreamed about this for so long. I never thought it would happen.
You should've told me sooner. Or I should have told you how I felt. We could've started a long time ago.
I know but that doesn't matter now. I'm just insanely happy that it did happen. I should've peeked on you a long time ago.
Ha, yeah you should have. Was this your first time ever peeking on me?
Actually yes. I've wanted to before but this was my first time actually doing it.
What did you think?
It was everything I expected. I'm sorry but can I kiss you? It's all I can think about right now.
You don't have to ask.
I never thought today would lead me to kissing Shauna in my bathroom but I'm fucking glad it did.
I can't believe this is actually happening.
Just remember we have to be careful. We can't do anything we wouldn't have done ten minutes ago in public.
I won't. I promise. Public me won't change a bit. I'm committed to this.
But back to what I thought when I peeked on you. I was shocked.
I've never seen one that big before.
You've seen others?
Like on the internet and stuff, it was my first time seeing another one in person.
I can understand why you don't mind people peeking on you. If I had something like that I don't think I'd ever wear pants.
Can I get another peek?
Uhh, sure. There's no harm in that.
Oh my god, it's even bigger now.
It gets bigger than that.
If [g1] knew you had this I bet she wouldn't make you wait any longer.
You weren't lying. Your dick is fucking huge.
And I know what I want. I want to make you feel good.
But we have to be safe. [g1] will wonder where we are soon. How about after your date with your mom you swing by my place and we can continue this?
I'll be there.
I'm sorry for teasing you.
You'll make it up to me. Plus the best things in life you have to wait for.
You know I'll make it up to you. I think I'm going to head home now. I don't want [g1] to pester me about boys for a while.
That's fair. I'll let her know you left. And I will see you soon.
I can't wait. but I'll be waiting patiently. I hope you have a good date with your mom.
Oh we're going to have a great time. Now give me another kiss before you leave.
Gladly.
I think these were her first kisses. I'll ask her about it when I go visit her.
I'll see you soon [mcf].
Yes you will. I'll be there as soon as I can.
I can't believe that just happened. I always kinda thought Shauna was into me but I didn't know it was like that. I'm excited to go to her place later.
But for now I should go see what [g1] is up to. Hopefully she didn't hear any of that.
I don't know. I don't think I could do that to [g1].
Plus it would set a dangerous precedent for our relationship if we start it out by me cheating. It just doesn't sound like a good idea.
You're right. I'm sorry for suggesting it. I'm just being selfish. I already have the best best friend in the world and I should be happy with that.
Who knows though. Me and [g1] might not work out long term. We're going to a new place and we're both bound to change. I'm not saying we will but if that were to happen then we could explore our feelings then.
I don't want to think about you two breaking up. I love that you two are together. She makes you so happy.
I'm just being selfish. Maybe one day things may change but right now I'm just happy to have you in my life.
I'm always gonna be in your life. Now give me a hug.
Would you like to pretend that this never happened? Just go back to 5 minutes ago?
Yes please. This was really embarrassing.
Is it okay if I go home now?
Of course it is. Is everything okay though?
Yes, I promise I'm fine. I just feel a little silly and want to be alone for a bit.
That's fine. I understand. Is it cool if I come by in a bit though?
You know you're always welcome at my place.
I'll see you in a bit then, okay?
Mhmm, I'll see you soon.
Fuck man, I feel awful about that but what else could I say? All I can do now is wait and go check on her later.
I should go see what [g1] is up to. Hopefully she didn't hear any of that.
I respect you for having the guts to tell me. It isn't easy to lay our your emotions like that.
You know you're a beautiful young woman who will always have me in her life.
And it's not that I don't have those feelings for you at all. But I'm with [g1].
I know. I don't want you to think that I'm trying to get inbetween you two. I love that you found someone who is making you happy.
I never intended for you to find out how I felt. Especially not this way. This was just a stupid mistake and I'm sorry for violating your privacy.
It's completely fine. Don't worry about it. Are we good?
Yes we're good. As long as I have you in my life I'm good.
I'm just happy you're not mad at me. I don't want to lose my best friend.
It will take a lot more than that to lose me. Now give me a hug.
Would you like to pretend that this never happened? Just go back to 5 minutes ago?
Yes please. This was really embarrassing.
Is it okay if I go home now?
Of course it is. Is everything okay though?
Yes, I promise I'm fine. I just feel a little silly and want to be alone for a bit.
That's fine. I understand. Is it cool if I come by in a bit though?
You know you're always welcome at my place.
I'll see you in a bit then, okay?
Mhmm, I'll see you soon.
Fuck man, I feel awful about that but what else could I say? All I can do now is wait and go check on her later.
I should go see what [g1] is up to. Hopefully she didn't hear any of that.
Hey, how was the shower?
It was good, always feels good to be clean.
True, after you leave to pick up your mom I'm gonna go home and take one myself.
You're more than welcome to take one here.
Is that your way of asking if I want to take a shower with you?
No, just saying you're free to shower here. But when you put it that way, what would your answer be if I was?
I told you I'm ready to try things. Taking a shower together seems tame enough.
Good point, I wish I would've known that before taking one.
Well, where is Shauna? She ran away from me earlier.
Oh, uhh she came and told me she's going home to finish packing and make sure she's ready.
How long until you have to pick up your mom?
I think I have like 30 minutes. Why? Did you want to do anything?
I guess I'll take that as a yes.
What do you want to do?
I'm down for anything you're comfortable with.
Well I say we just start and find out how far I'm comfy with because I don't really know.
That sounds good to me, just tell me when to stop and I'll stop.
So how do we start?
I say we go with what feels natural. And I think that feeling is telling me that we have too many clothes on.
Mmm, I think I agree.
Yep, this definitely feels right.
So what do you think?
I think it's fucking sexy. I could get a better idea if I could see both though.
Getting greedy are we?
Yes, yes I am.
Still sexy?
They're perfect babe, I wouldn't change a thing.
Mmm, I like that answer. It's your turn. Take off your shirt.
What do you think?
I think I'm the luckiest girl alive.
What does the luckiest girl alive want to do with the luckiest guy alive?
Let's go over to the couch.
What are you still doing over there?
Admiring the view.
Well come admire it closer.
There we go.
Are you still okay with this? Not feeling cold feet or anything?
No, I'm perfect. You could throw me around and I wouldn't care right now, I feel free.
How about you sit here where I am. There's something I want to do.
I won't say no to that.
I'm sorry it's taken so long for this to happen.
I'm not, I'm happy we waited. Because now we are closer than we would have been and there's more meaning to this.
I agree, I just want to make you happy.
I'm happy with or without this. I mean this is cool and all but I'm with you for you. Not for this.
I think this is a great way for us to grow closer to each other and have fun at the same time, but if you aren't ready then that is fine.
I'm ready, at least for this.
Uhh, is there something in your pocket?
Nope, nothing in my pockets.
No way..
Oh my god [mcf]. You're huge.
It's so warm. This isn't at all how I thought it would be.
How did you think it would be?
I don't really know, just not this.
Is that a good or bad thing?
It's a great thing.
I have to use both of my hands just to hold it.
I'm still not fully hard.
Really? It gets even bigger?
Mhmm, just keep doing what you're doing and it will keep growing.
I can feel it getting harder in my hands. This is crazy.
Holy shit [mcf], your thing is as big as me.
Or at least it's bigger than my entire head.
What should I do next?
Do whatever you want, I'm in heaven right now.
Well you always say you love my kisses...
How does that feel?
It feels great, try kissing the tip though. That's the most sensitive part.
That feels amazing.
This shouldn't be all about making me feel good. It's her first time, I want to make sure she enjoys it.
Climb onto me for a second.
Okay.. Sure.
Was I doing something wrong? Did you not like it?
I loved it, I just don't want this to be all about me. I want to make you feel good.
I can feel her tensing up. It's probably because she thinks I'm about to try something. It doesn't help that my dick is pushing into her ass right now.
Having her get on top of me was a bad idea. I don't want to psych her out of this.
You said I could throw you around right?
Well I meant figuratively bu-
Hey! What are you doing?
You'll see. Can I take these off?
Y- yes. Go ahead..
Wow [g1], your pussy is amazing.
Can I touch it?
Yes you can, you can do whatever. I'm yours.
I don't know if that was an invite to have actual sex with her but this isn't how I want her first time to be. I want it to be special for her. So I'll just keep to this.
I've seen enough videos and have read enough books to know what I'm doing.. I think.
I guess I'll just take my own advice and go with what feels natural.
Holy fuck she is tight, I can feel her muscles clasping down on my finger.
Oooo, that feels funny.
I'll try to go deeper.
Jesus, if her pussy was squeezing my finger any harder it would pop off.
How does that feel?
Oh wow, It feels good. It's strange though.
Does it hurt at all?
A little.. but it's a good pain.
I'm gonna try to fit in two fingers okay?
Okay, we can try.
Damn, her pussy is clenching down onto my fingers.
It's like the tightest hug you could imagine.
How does that feel?
It hurt at first but the pain is starting to go away.
I'm going to rock them back and forth now.
Okay just start slowly.
Ooooo.. Oh wow [mcf]. That feels great.
Does it hurt at all?
No, it just feels good now. You can speed up.
OOOooo! [mcf] keep going! My stomach is starting to feel warm.
Please don't stop! My body needs your fingers.
OOOhhhhhhhhh [mcf]... what are you doing to me? I've never felt anything like this before.
My entire body is getting hot. Please don't stop. I think something is about to happen.
Already? I was just getting started. I want to try something else before she finishes.
[mcf].. Why did you stop?
I don't want you to finish yet. There's something else I want to try.
Okay.. What is it?
Ever since I pulled her panties down I wanted to bury my face in her.
Oh my god.. That feels incredible!
Oh my god! What are you doing?? That's amazing.
That feels even better than your fingers. Don't stop. Please don't stop.
[mcf].. I'm starting to feel funny again. Like there's a pocket of fire in my stomach.
I guess she's had enough. I should speed up and make this an experience to remember.
OOOooooohh! Ho- holy cow! [mcf] something is about to happen. I feel really warm.
OOoohh! Oh my god! [mcf]! I'm hot and tingly all over!! what's happening?
It's okay, that's meant to happen. It feels good right?
Ahhhhhhhh.... It feels amazing, I don't know how else to describe it other than everything feels good.
What did you do to me?
I told you that I wanted to make you feel good. So that's what I did.
Does that happen every time?
It really depends. I hope I'm able to make you feel that way every time.
That was intense. I'm still shaking some.
We can stop here if you want to, Give you time to collect yourself.
Oh no no no, go sit down over there. I'll be fine. I want to make you feel good too.
I won't say no to that.
That was fun. I'm happy I was able to make her finish. I was nervous I wouldn't be able to but that wasn't bad at all.
Are you ready?
Ready as I'll ever be.
Yeah, I think this gives that away.
I hope I can make you feel how you made me feel.
Don't worry about that, just have fun with it.
I just can't get over how big it is, How do you carry this around all day?
It's not that bad, it's only an issue if I get hard in public.
So you're saying I should tease you in public?
Sure, let's go with that.
Can I lick it?
You can do whatever you want.
Oh fuck that feels good.
Mmm, what about this?
Mhmmmm yes, keep going. You're doing great.
Your mouth feels amazing. Just keep sucking on it like that.
You can tell she's nervous and doesn't really know what she's doing.
She's trying her best though and it still feels damn good.
All the excitement from getting her off and this finally happening has me close to the edge already.
Ohhh shittttt! Jesus... Holy... I think I just came a ton.
That was amazing [g1].
Jesus I did cum a lot. You can spit that out if you want to.
Did you just swallow it?
Yep! That was fun. I've heard that it doesn't taste good but I liked it.
I'm one fucking lucky man.
I'm glad you liked it. I was nervous but that was really fun.
I feel the same, I was nervous but that was fun as fuck.
I know you have to leave really soon but can we cuddle for a minute? I just feel really close to you right now and I want you to hold me for a minute.
Of course we can. Climb up here.
I wish we could lay here forever. Just the two of us.
I do too. But sadly life has to go on.
So how do you feel about everything that just happened?
I'm happy we finally did it. I know we still have a lot more to do but it feels good to make progress.
Today was a big leap.
Yeah it's going to take some time before we get used to this. Things will only get easier though.
I'm excited for next time. If you didn't have to leave I'd say we should try something else.
As much as I would love to do that I have to pick up [am].
I know.. What are you two going to do?
I'm gonna take her on a trip down memory lane. I'm gonna take her to our first home and go through some of the more memorable things.
Awh, that's so sweet. Well I don't want to make you late for that. We should get up.
As much as I hate it, you're right.
I would say that if you wanted to you could come over after you're done and we could hang out some more but I have to help my sister pack. I still have a few things to pack as well.
It's okay, we're going to have a very long car ride to hang out.
True, I just wish my sister wasn't going. I know she can find a ride herself.
Come on, it's a big RV. We'll stay on the opposite side of wherever she is. It'd be fucked up not to take her.
Yeah, I know. Is there any private space on the RV?
Are you asking that for the reason I think you're asking it?
Maybeeeeee.
We'll see. If [am] falls asleep we might can try something.
Wait, is [am] going? I thought you two had to wait a few weeks before she could rent a place?
Oh shit, I let that slip without even thinking.
I found a place for her. But she doesn't know about it yet. I'm gonna tell her on our date.
That's amazing.. She's going to be ecstatic. Are you going to be living there too?
I'll tell you more about it tonight. I really need to get dressed.
Okay, go get dressed. I don't want to make you late.
I sure hope I don't smell weird. I don't know if sex smell stays or not.
I don't really have time to worry about it anyway.
There we go, this should do. Now just to say bye to [g1] then go pick her up.
Oh wow, you clean up nice.
Awh, you have your shirt back on. I was hoping to get one more look before I left.
I would but I don't want you to have to carry around that big thing. So let's keep it calm for now.
You're right, these pants are pretty tight so that wouldn't be fun.
I will give you a goodbye kiss though.
I really hope she washed her mouth after swallowing or else this is a little awkward.
Don't worry. I rinsed my mouth out.
What? I wasn't even thinking about that.
Mhmm, sure you weren't.
We'll be at your place tonight around 10. You and your sis going to be ready by then?
Oh yeah, we'll be ready. And I'll be waiting on you. So go tucker [am] out so she goes to bed early tonight.
I'll try my best, see you tonight babe.
See you baby.
15 minutes later
This isn't the usual receptionist. Oh well. I should ask him where [am] is.
What the fuck is he wearing?
How may I help you?
Uhh, do you know where [am] is? She works here and I'm here to pick her up.
Oh yes I was told to tell you that she has a few last minute things she has to take care of.
While you wait you're free to go into the meeting room, there's plenty of comfy seats to sit in in there.
Okay, I'll do that. Thank you.
No problem sir.
Hopefully [am] doesn't take too long. I've never done well when I have to wait like this.
Guess I'll just sit down.
Rooms like this kinda creep me out. It's like I'm not meant to be in them.
It's a weird vibe. This is where they come together to make their decisions. A lot of thought and effort is made in this room.
And here I am just killing time. I wonder if I'd be heading to one of these rooms if I didn't find basketball.
Be taking orders and not having my opinion heard. Just a brainless day one after another.
I should really take a step back and realize how great my life is now. I don't think I appreciate it enough.
It wasn't that long ago I was a kid with no parents and nowhere to go.
Now I have [am] and am off to college. I don't know where I'd be if I didn't have [am].
Uhh, can I help you?
Oh, my apologies. I was told I could wait in here.
What are you waiting on?
I'm waiting on [am]. The guy downstairs said she was almost done and to wait in here.
Oh you must be [mcf]. [am] talks about you all the time.
It's nice to finally meet you. I'm her boss, Rachael.
It's nice to meet you too. I've heard a lot about you as well.
Good things hopefully.
You know [am], she couldn't speak badly about someone even if she wanted to.
Well good. Do you mind if I keep you company while you wait? I was coming in here to take a break.
Sure, I don't mind at all.
So you're the one and only [mcf].
You should have seen [am] today. She could barely work. All she's talked about is how she wants to spend the day with you.
I'm sorry about that, I promised her we would hang out after I picked her up.
Don't worry about it. She's entitled to one non perfect day. She's been nothing but perfect for me for years. I'm sad that she's leaving.
I have her replacement lined up. I doubt she's half the worker your mom is but I got to have someone.
Really? Is her replacement ready to handle the job now?
She's been being trained for the past week. She's doing well. Why?
I found out today that WVM is giving me my own house to stay in. Meaning if it's okay with you. She would be able to come with me tonight.
Wow, that's fantastic news. [am] is going to be so excited. I doubt I'd be able to stop her from going if I tried.
Does that mean that you're okay with it?
Okay is a stretch because I'm going to miss her. But sure. Her replacement should be ready enough.
Thank you so much. You're a lifesaver.
I doubt she would have survived the weeks by herself. You're all she talks about. I don't know how she would function without you.
I have a bit of a personal question. I've heard different things when I've asked. Are you [am]'s son?
Kind of. She's not my biological mom but she has taken care of me by herself for most of my life. So I consider her my mom. That's why we are so close.
What's the story there? Are you two related at all? What happened to your parents?
No, [am] was just a friend of my dad.
My real mom left when I was a toddler. I don't really remember anything about her.
I'm sorry to hear that, why did she leave?
From what I was told, she just wasn't ready to be a parent. She tried for a few years but the stress of it all got to her and she had to leave.
I don't know how much of that is the truth but that's the only answer I've ever gotten.
That's awful, what about your dad? What happened to him? I'm sorry for the 21 questions.
Me and my dad moved to this side of the country after my mom left. He wanted a fresh start for us.
Things were good for a long time. Until one day while I was at school he got into a car accident.
I didn't know about it until I got home from school, [am] and a cop were on my porch. They told me everything.
Ever since then I've been living with [am].
That's awful. I'm sorry for being nosy and bringing it all up.
It's okay. I had a tough childhood but everything worked out. I couldn't be happier now.
Well that's great. It seems like [am] raised you right. You seem like a nice and intelligent young man. If the basketball thing doesn't work out then I will always have a job for you here.
I appreciate that, hopefully the basketball thing does work out though.
Of course, and I'm sure it will.
I have one more personal question. It's about [am] this time.
All right, I'll answer it if I can.
Have you ever seen her with a man? I've tried to hook her up with some of my friends before but she always turns them down. And I've never seen her with anyone else.
No I haven't. She's always been the kind to go to work then come home and just relax. I've never seen her with anyone else.
Isn't that strange to you? She's a hot woman and she should be living her life. Don't you think?
I think she is living her life. If she wanted to be with someone then she would be.
You two aren't a thing are you?
No?, what are you talking about?
I'm just asking. I don't judge. You're both hot adults living together.
It would make sense, is all I'm saying.
No, I don't think about her that way.
Why not? Don't think she's pretty?
She's very pretty. She's probably the most beautiful woman I know.
Then why not? She thinks the world of you and you think the world of her. You two might be meant for each other.
I'm her son. It's not like that.
You're not her real son. Plus you're not a kid anymore. You could still be her boy. You could also be her man now too though.
Living under the same roof. Both of you love and care for one another. All it would take is a romantic movie and some wine.
One little kiss leading into everything else..
Stop it, I don't want to think about her like that.
Come on, you might be that missing piece in her life.
She seems plenty happy how it is now.
But you could be making her even happier, don't you think she deserves that?
You're talking crazy. Can we please talk about something else?
Fine, I'll drop it. I just want to see [am] happy.
I'm just saying If I had a man like you at home.. things would happen.
Do you not have a husband?
Nope, all my free time goes to this business so I've never had time to have anything serious.
I've tried before but I just can't do the whole relationship thing.
What about you? Since you're clearly not with [am]. Are you in a relationship?
Yeah I've been in one for about two months now.
How's that going?
What do you mean? Everything is going good.
Does she treat you right? Does she make you happy?
Yeah, she's great.
Is she good in bed?
What kind of question is that?
It's pretty straight forward? Is she good in the sack?
Come on, we've talked about everything else. Is this where you draw your line?
Fine.. Me and her haven't done anything yet.
A guy like you? Why not?
She wants to take things slow. I agreed.
You said two months right? That's pretty damn slow.
You don't have to remind me.
Ahh, I see. Do you have any side girls? Are you loyal to her?
So far I am.
So far? Does that means you have plans to not be in the future?
Nothing planned. But I'm a realist. I know the relationship is still new and many things can happen. I don't think I'd cheat on her but life is weird.
Fair enough, what do you consider cheating?
Cheating is cheating, what do you mean?
Well she's not providing you everything that you need. Don't you miss being intimate with a woman?
I guess, we actually fooled around a bit before I came here. So things are starting to move.
Good, at least you're not being completely blue balled. Still, nothing beats the actual thing.
Listen, we're stuck in this room for the next 20 minutes. I think you're hot and It's been a bit since I've been laid.
No feelings, no cheating. Just two adults having fun and you can learn from it and be better for her.
What do you say?
Yes I am. I've never cheated before.
What do you consider cheating?
Cheating is cheating, what do you mean?
Well she's not providing you everything that you need. Don't you miss being intimate with a woman?
I guess, we actually fooled around a bit before I came here. So things are starting to move.
Good, at least you're not being completely blue balled. Still, nothing beats the actual thing.
Listen, we're stuck in this room for the next 20 minutes. I think you're hot and It's been a bit since I've been laid.
No feelings, no cheating. Just two adults having fun and you can learn from it and be better for her.
No one will ever know. This would hurt me way more than it would hurt you.
What do you say?
You're a beautiful lady and I'm flattered. But what if someone walked in?
I'm pretty sure we're safe in here but you're right. It's still risky. I could get us in a lot of trouble and I doubt your mom would like hearing about it.
Maybe some other time then.
Maybe, if I'm single.
I'll definitely keep that in mind.
When you put it that way. If it helps me be prepared to give [g1] a good time, and no one will ever know.
Sure, I want to make sure [g1] will enjoy it. Are you sure it's safe in here?
Oh yeah. No one else will come into this room today.
What am I getting myself into?
I've never cheated before, this feels wrong. Is this even cheating?
Fuck me, of course it is. Why am I doing this?
I'm here now though, might as well just enjoy it and learn whatever I can. After all she does have great tits and I'd be an idiot to pass those down.
I can't wait to see them out of that dress.
I can just about imagine what they look like underneath.
Oh yeah. Big tits with puffy nipples no doubt.
Were you just checking me out?
Uhh. Yeah.
That's sweet of you.
How so? I just agreed to have 'fun' with you. Of course I'm going to check you out.
Yeah but most guys will fuck anything willing. It's different to be caught staring at her breasts.
Yeah.. I guess so. So how do you want to start this?
Well we do need to be quick before [am] shows up. Let's just skip all the boring shit and you just fuck me on that table.
Wow, you're not fucking around.
So since that's off the table, what else is there to talk about?
Uhhmmm.. Anything new going on with the business?
Not really. Not with this one anyway.
What other business do you have?
I'm kind of a fixer. Like if someone needs something I have a lot of connections and I make it happen.
Oh wow, what are some examples? Anything illegal?
I'm not a saint but I keep it as legal as I can. It can be anything from getting a good pool guy to setting up high level people. With a whole lot in between.
So you're saying you're a good person to know?
Very much so. If you ever need anything I can probably help you get it. I can't tell you how or where. But I can get it.
Super bowl tickets?
Of course. What seat?
Ha, that was just a test... but that's cool. Seems a bit stressful though.
It can be. Some people can ask for some ridiculous things and be really picky about it.
If you weren't such a nice guy I'd have work for you.
Like what kind of work?
Some crazy shit. I'm talking impregnating hot older rich women.
I know a bunch of women who want kids but either their husbands are impotent or just not what they want their kid to be like. Or they're women like me who don't have time or want to put in the effort to find someone.
Basically they would want a man like you. Handsome and athletic with good genes to give them a baby.
Wow, I can't say I expected that.
Told you, crazy shit. Maybe if you change your mind about your morals we can discuss this again later.
Yeah, maybe.
No, I'm not. Like we've said. There isn't much time. And I could really use a cock.
This silly dress will just be in the way.
Don't you agree?
Absolutely. Can't have it in our way.
So, what do you think? Are they like in your head?
Even better. They're amazing.
Then what are you doing way over there? You're not like [am] in the bed too are you?
As much as I think the humble act is cute, I want a man in the bedroom. Not a pussy.
I'm sure your girlfriend is the same.
Oh she wants to play it like that. I can show her.
Ohhh! There he is!
You want a man in the bedroom huh? You're about to get more than that.
That's a lot of talk for someone who hasn't pulled their dick out yet. I hope it lives up to what you're saying.
Close your eyes. Let it be a surprise.
Nuh uh, you're not there yet. I like to be talked down to. Call me your slut.
Close your fucking eyes you dirty slut.
You're a real surprise. Let's just hope you don't disappoint now.
I hope your pussy is ready for me. I'm through waiting.
It's ready. Shove all of it in me.
I'll start with half
Oooo! Not bad.
That's not a bad cock [mcf]. It's not the longest I've ever had but it's thick as fuck.
Who said I was through yet?
What?
OOOOHH! Holy shit you're in my fucking guts!
What the fuck [mcf]? How is your dick that big? You're making my legs numb just being inside of me!
You said you wanted a man. So I'm giving my slut a man.
I should have known you sooner. A man with a dick like that shouldn't go to waste.
What are you waiting on? Fuck me! Punish your little slut's tight vagina for not believing you.
Ooo! That's it, stretch me out!
You're tight as fuck.
I won't be for long if that stays in me. I've never seen one half this big.
How does it feel?
Your little slut loves it. Every thrust is putting butterflies in my stomach.
I can't describe how amazing it is. I'm about to cum.
I am too. I won't last much longer.
Cum inside of me! I don't mind.
OOOHHhhh!! Hold it there! I'm cumming!
I am too! Holy fuck!
Fuck me it feels like my dick just exploded in you. That was intense.
I can feel your load in me. That was amazing. You made your slut happy.
Did your slut make you happy?
Incredibly. I think this is the most fun I'll ever have in a meeting room.
It's definitely the best thing that will ever happen in here.
Now if you'll excuse me I'm gonna clean myself up a bit.
Where are you going?
I told you. I'm gonna clean myself up.
Won't someone see you if you walk out?
It's just a storage closet with a mirror in it. Get dressed before [am] walks in.
Don't have to tell me twice.
If [am] was to walk in I would be screwed. There's no explaining this one.
Luckily we got through it without anyone interrupting us.
OOOHHhhh!! Hold it there! I'm cumming!
I am too! Holy fuck!
Fuck me it feels like my dick just exploded all over you. That was intense.
I can feel your load all over me. That was amazing. You made your slut happy.
You could have came inside me though.
Instincts took over.
Did your slut make you happy?
Incredibly. I think this is the most fun I'll ever have in a meeting room.
It's definitely the best thing that will ever happen in here.
Now if you'll excuse me I'm gonna clean myself up a bit.
Where are you going?
I told you. I'm gonna clean myself up.
Won't someone see you if you walk out?
It's just a storage closet with a mirror in it. Get dressed before [am] walks in.
Don't have to tell me twice.
If [am] was to walk in I would be screwed. There's no explaining this one.
Luckily we got through it without anyone interrupting us.
Now it's just like nothing ever happened. I'm gonna have dreams about that dick.
So how was I? Think I'm good enough for my girlfriend?
I think she's a very lucky lady. Let's leave it at that.
Phew, all right. Time to act like nothing happened.
So since that's over, what else is there to do?
Uhhmmm.. Anything new going on with the business?
Really? That's what you got?
Have to be safe now. [am] could walk in any second.
Well business wise not really. Not with this one anyway.
What other business do you have?
I'm kind of a fixer. Like if someone needs something I have a lot of connections and I make it happen.
Oh wow, what are some examples? Anything illegal?
I'm not a saint but I keep it as legal as I can. It can be anything from getting a good pool guy to setting up high level people. With a whole lot in between.
So you're saying you're a good person to know?
Very much so. If you ever need anything I can probably help you get it. I can't tell you how or where. But I can get it.
Super bowl tickets?
Of course. What seat?
Ha, that was just a test... but that's cool. Seems a bit stressful though.
It can be. Some people can ask for some ridiculous things and be really picky about it.
In fact I have a few things that you might could help with. It comes with pay.
What is it? Nothing too crazy right?
Depends on your definition of crazy. Now just hear me out.
I know a bunch of women who want kids but either their husbands are impotent or just not what they want their kid to be like. Or they're women like me who don't have time or want to put in the effort to find someone.
Basically they would want a man like you. Handsome and athletic with good genes to give them a baby. I know it sounds crazy but there are a bunch of reasons to do it.
It does sound crazy. I don't want to have to take care of a bunch of kids. I'm still a kid myself.
You won't take care of anyone. They'll all sign contracts saying you're nothing but a donor and that they can't reveal who you are. They're all rich women who can take care of them.
So would I have to fuck all of them? Or do I just send them cum or something?
Well it's very much preferred that you have sex with them. Cumming in a tube or whatever will not be as successful. You'll get paid way less and most girls wouldn't want that option.
You would be helping a lot of women out. Doesn't hurt that you'd make money in the process.
Like I said I have a lot of picky girls. I need someone like you. Are you interested?
Yes I guess I am. After what you did for me and [am] today, with letting her leave early. I owe you this.
Plus I like the idea of being able to help women achieve their dreams of motherhood.
Thank you! You're saving me here. Do you need any more details?
It's gonna sound vain but are these women going to be hot? It would help a ton. Also what is the pay like?
You will only be sent women you approve of. I'll get in touch with you and send you pictures to see if you're interested in them.
And the pay will be around 4 grand a woman. I'll be honest in saying I'll be keeping around eighty percent of the money but that's a finders fee.
I'm also going to be the one paying for their flights and anything else that comes up.
4 grand?! Just to have sex with someone?
Well it may be many times. The whole point is that they want to get pregnant. Well most of them do anyways.
That makes sense. Who is the first girl?
I'm gonna start you out easy. I have a few girls who will be a little intense so I'm gonna start you off with a sweetheart I know that wants a child.
Good, I'd like that. What does she look like?
She's busty with a great ass. I'm actually meant to meet with her tonight. I'll take some pictures of her then and send them to you.
Do you have my number?
You're [am]'s emergency contact so I should. I'll send them sometime tonight. Just be ready to respond. If things go well then I'll send her on a flight to you tomorrow.
I'll keep an eye on my phone.
Thank you again, I'm happy to be doing business with you.
*KNOCK, KNOCK*
There you are!
I've been looking for you. I was told you were in the meeting room on the other side of the building.
I'm sorry you had to wait so long.
That's all right. I had Rachael keep me company. How was work?
It went well. I couldn't stop staring at the clock though.
I'm sorry I couldn't spend more of today with you. We only have half a day left together.
Don't think about it like that. It's not that long.
I know. I'll try my best to not think about it. So where are you going to take me?
You'll see.
You weren't lying about your son [am]. He's a complete gentleman. I'm glad I finally got to meet him.
I know, you two should have met a long time ago.
Better late than never though.
But yeah, he's pretty great. I don't know what I'd do without him.
He said the same thing about you.
I won't hold you two. I know you have a date planned.
I appreciate it, I'll be back first thing tomorrow morning.
Sure you will. Well it was nice meeting you [mcf]. Can I get a goodbye hug?
Sure.
*Whispering* I wish I could see her face when you tell her.
*Whispering* Anyway I'll text you the details about the woman after I get back to my office. If you're interested in her then we'll figure out the rest.
*Whispering* I'm excited to see her.
*Whispering* And I will see you soon myself.
I really hope [am] didn't hear any of that. It's time to get out of here though.
I don't know. That's a bit crazy for me. I don't know how I feel about getting women pregnant.
That's fine. I know it's a crazy ask. Not many people would be interested in it.
But if you ever change your mind then the offer still stands.
I'll keep it in mind. If my mind ever changes I'll let you know.
That's all I ask for. Just tell me if anything changes.
*KNOCK, KNOCK*
There you are!
I've been looking for you. I was told you were in the meeting room on the other side of the building.
I'm sorry you had to wait so long.
That's all right. I had Rachael keep me company. How was work?
It went well. I couldn't stop staring at the clock though.
I'm sorry I couldn't spend more of today with you. We only have half a day left together.
Don't think about it like that. It's not that long.
I know. I'll try my best to not think about it. So where are you going to take me?
You'll see.
You weren't lying about your son [am]. He's a complete gentleman. I'm glad I finally got to meet him.
I know, you two should have met a long time ago.
Better late than never though.
But yeah, he's pretty great. I don't know what I'd do without him.
He said the same thing about you.
I won't hold you two. I know you have a date planned.
I appreciate it, I'll be back first thing tomorrow morning.
Sure you will. Well it was nice meeting you [mcf]. Can I get a goodbye hug?
Sure.
*Whispering* I wish I could see her face when you tell her.
*Whispering* I hope I get to see you again soon.
*Whispering* It's a tiny world. I'm sure our paths will cross sometime.
*Whispering* I hope they do. Anyways have a nice date with [am].
I will, and it was nice meeting you too.
Thank you for picking me up. How was meeting Rachael?
She's nice. She means well.
She wasn't weird to you was she?
What do you mean?
Rachael is a lovely woman but she isn't always so family friendly.
Yeah I noticed. It was fine though. I'm not a kid anymore.
I know, I was just making sure. So how long is this drive going to be?
Not long. Just driving to the other side of town. So buckle up and we'll be on our way.
The old mobile home isn't far. I hope it doesn't weird her out to see it again.
I don't know if her memories of it are as fond as mine.
10 minutes later.
What are we doing here [mcf]?? I haven't thought about this place in forever.
I figured we could take a trip down memory lane. Do you remember this place?
Of course I do. This is the first place we moved into after I got custody of you.
We stayed here for a few years until I got the job I have now. We sure have came a long way since then.
Do you want to go inside?
Do you have the keys?
Yep, I talked to the guy who owns it and it's up for sale and it has open viewings. So the door is unlocked.
Okay, sure then. Let's go inside.
This is insane. I never thought I'd be going back inside of here.
Yeah to be honest me neither. But life is crazy like that.
The memories are all rushing back. I remember making breakfast every morning.
Yeah I remember that too. I used to love waking up to it.
It has been a while since I've made breakfast. Whenever we get our new place I'll need to start again.
I would love that. I remember everything being a lot bigger. I feel like I don't fit in here.
Ha, you have grown a ton since then.
I remember how we had to share a bed because there was only one and we both hated the couch.
I forgot about that. I used to love that to be honest. I slept really well then.
Yeah I did too.
But the reason I brought you here was to show you how much both of us has grown.
We're both strong people and I am so lucky to have you in my life. I don't know where I'd be if you didn't take me in.
It was the best decision I've ever made. I don't know where I'd be without you either.
The original plan was to go through all the places we've been. Show our growth and say that we're going to make it through these few weeks no problem.
I don't think that's necessary now though.
What do you mean?
I got some news today from Damien.
We don't have to look for a place for us anymore. The school is providing us with a house and a car and everything.
Are you serious?!! Are you sure?!
Yes I'm dead serious. Not only that but I talked to Rachael about you leaving early and she agreed. So you're coming with us tonight mom.
[mcf]!! Why did you wait this long to tell me?!
I just found out a few hours ago. I wanted to have a special moment.
You know, open the next chapter of our lives in the first chapter of our lives.
I love you and how thoughtful you are. Am I really going with you tonight?
Yes you are. Damien is getting some rest right now and then we're going to head out.
Are you crying?
I can't help it. I was so sad about you leaving.. I'm just really happy right now.
I've never seen you cry before.
I've never seen you cry either. So if you want to cry right now it would make us even.
Ha, you're funny. So are you excited?
Are you serious? I'm off the rails right now. My heart is flying.
How did you not know about the house?
Damien talked as if it was a given that they'd give me my own place. But no one ever talked to me about it.
They told me things like getting me endorsements from some of the local restaurants and things like that but nothing about a home or a car.
Is the home nice? Do you know?
Damien said it was nice. I don't know though. We're going to see it at the same time.
It doesn't matter. As long as we're together it's nice to me.
Same here. We made this place special so I'm sure we can make whatever it is special too.
I really need to call and thank Rachael. Thank you so much for talking to her for me.
Don't mention it, she was cool with it right away. I didn't do much except ask. 
That's not all though. I also got you a-
Oh my god! I just realized I have to pack!
Come on! We have to go home so I can start packing!
Welp, there goes me giving her here necklace here as well.
Oh well, it can wait until later.
Okay, let's go.
25 minutes later
Here we are. Do you need any help packing?
I don't think I will. I'm just going to start with my clothes so I'll be in the laundry room for a bit. Have you finished all of your packing?
Yeah I finished yesterday. I need to help Shauna finish packing sometime today though.
How about you go do that now? If I need any help I'll call and let you know.
Okay, that works.
I'll see you soon. Drive safe.
Nah, I can't leave just yet. I still have to give her this necklace. I don't want to wait anymore.
I still want to surprise her somehow though, uhhhhhh...
I'll just put it around her neck when she's looking away. That's good enough.
Perfect, she's too busy with this to realize I'm behind her.
Now just to get it around her neck without freaking her out.
almost there.. Just have to latch it now.... Got it!
What are you doing?!
[mcf]! Are you trying to give me a heart attack?? You scared me!
I'm sorry. I didn't mean to startle you.
What were you doing?!
You should really look down.
What do you mean?
Oh my god [mcf]... You didn't.
This is just like that necklace I used to wear all the time.
I felt awful when I broke it way back then. I made a promise to you that I'd get you a new one as soon as I could.
It's not exactly like it but it's the closest thing I could find.
It was my favorite necklace. I had forgotten all about it. Thank you so much [mcf].
How much did it cost you?
You don't worry about that. It's a gift that I promised to get you.
No, seriously. I can at least pay half on it.
No seriously, I don't want that. I know how much it meant to you back then.
I just wish I could have gotten a replacement sooner. You need to get used to gifts.
When I make it big I'm going to give you the world. You saved my life. I owe you everything.
Stop talking like that, we're family. You don't owe me anything.
Thank you so much though. I'm trying my best not to cry again.
It's such a beautiful necklace. I'm going to wear it all the time just like the old days.
Today has been such an amazing day. It's all thanks to you.
We really need to celebrate somehow.
If you didn't have to pack I'd say we should go get some dinner.
Can I admit something?
What is it?
I realized about halfway on the way home that I'm going to have to come back here in a few weeks to sign off on the house and all that. So I really only need to pack a few outfits.
I can get all the rest when I come back. It won't take me long to get what I need packed up. I didn't want to seem stupid for being in a rush.
Don't worry about it. I'm sure your head was really scattered.
So do you want to get something to eat? What do you want?
Going back to our first home and thinking about the breakfast I used to cook made me really want french pancakes and toast.
Breakfast for dinner? I'm cool with that. There's that weird coffee place that sells breakfast all day. Do you want to go there?
Yes! Can I get changed out of my work clothes first? I won't be long I promise.
Sure, take your time.
I'm happy she liked the necklace. I was a bit worried it didn't look enough like the original.
But as long as she likes it I'm happy.
After this little dinner date I really do need to go by Shauna's. After that we should be good to leave. Start a new chapter in my life.
10 minutes later
I'm sorry that took longer than I thought it would. I couldn't find a dress I wanted to wear.
The one you picked looks amazing on you. It goes great with your eyes. You look stunning.
Thank you, you're so sweet to me. Are you ready to go?
Wow, that dress sure shows a lot of cleavage.
[am] really is a beautiful woman, she always has been. I wonder why she never did try dating.
Wait, why am I staring at her cleavage? Didn't she ask me a question?
I'm sorry what?
Are you okay? You kind of spaced out there.
Yeah I'm great. I was just looking at the necklace. It looks great on you.
I think so too. I love it. Are you ready to go?
Yes I am. Ladies first.
Jesus that was close. I can't believe I just did that.
I need to get my head straight. No more slip ups like that.
Just need to refocus. Dinner date with [am] then meet up with Shauna. Let's go.
5 minutes later
This place is cozy. Thank you for bringing me here.
No problem, I was really hungry myself. I don't believe I've eaten anything today.
I haven't either, my nerves were too scrambled earlier to eat anything during my lunch break.
What are you going to get?
Exactly what I usually cook. French toast and a pancake, what about you?
Probably the breakfast steak and eggs. I'm pretty hungry so I need something filling.
Well when we get to our new house how about I cook us all a huge dinner?
That sounds great to me.
Good evening, I'll be your waitress this evening. What would you two like to drink?
We'll have two sodas please. Thank you.
No problem, I'll be right back with those.
Why are you looking at me like that?
I think she has a crush on you.
What makes you say that?
How she acted. Plus I can see her looking at you right now.
She's probably wondering what you're doing here with an older woman, wondering if you're single or not.
Nah, what if she's into girls and is wondering when I'll leave for a moment so she can make a move on you.
Probably asking herself 'How is that hotty with that guy?'.
Haha, sure she is. I don't think anyone is looking at me like that.
Nonsense. You could get anyone you wanted.
You're just being nice.. Thank you though.
Here are your two drinks. Do you know what you two want to order?
Yes, french toast and a pancake for her, and for me the steak and eggs.
I'll get that back to the kitchen right away.
Yep, [am] was right. She just ran her hand across my entire arm.
She's looking at me huh?
Hmmm, you might've been right.
Are you going to talk to her?
No, I'm still with [g1], you know that.
Yeah, I know. I was just testing you. Is [g1] going to be moving in with us?
I don't know. She doesn't even know about the house yet. I wanted to tell you first.
But Damien said it was 6 bedrooms. So I'm going to invite both her and Shauna to move in there. Is that okay with you?
Of course it is. As long as we're both there, then I don't care who else is.
I just have one condition.
What is it?
Can our rooms be close together? I'll feel safer with the man of the house close to me.
Sure, I'd prefer that myself too. We'll decide our rooms once we see them.
Mom, can I ask you something sort of personal? Rachael brought it up to me today.
Uh oh, what did she say?
It's nothing bad. I'm just curious.
The entire time I've known you, I've never seen you date or even flirt with someone. Why is that?
You're insanely beautiful so I just don't understand why you never have.
Well that's a simple one. I have you. There's no way another man could make me feel the way I do with you.
You've always been the most reliable man I've ever known, even back when you were a kid. You've never let me down.
You've always been there for me, you've always protected me and cared for me.
I love everything about you and there's no way anyone else could ever compare. So why even try?
I love you too. But don't you ever feel like there might be something missing from your life?
Not at all. I've always liked being single. Relationships have never really made sense to me.
You spend so much time and effort to learn about the fake them just to have the real them slowly exposed to you. It's weird.
Just trust me when I say I'm as happy as I could be. Don't worry about me.
I trust you. I'm sorry for bringing it up and killing the mood.
It's completely fine. Anything you ever want to know about me, just ask. I'll never hide the truth or lie to you.
I'll keep that in mind. Same goes for you.
I'm sorry for the wait. Our chef was on break.
It's okay, we don't mind a little wait.
Was there something wrong with your drinks? They don't look like they've been touched.
They're fine. We've just been caught up in conversation.
Ahh, I see.
Is there anything else I can do for you two?
No we should be good. Thank you though.
Well after you're finished with your meal would you mind coming and talking to me for a second? I have something I need to ask you about.
Uhh sure I guess.
Awesome, just come find me whenever you finish.
Sure, I can do that.
She could have just asked me to leave.
Ha, that's basically what she was getting at huh?
Do you know her from somewhere?
I don't think so. She does seem familiar though. I think I've seen her at a few of my games.
Ahh, so she's a fan. Makes sense.
Yeah I guess so. But let's eat our food before it gets cold. I'm starving.
15 minutes later
Oh wow, I'm full! That was really good.
What do you mean you're full? You had a few pieces of bread and a pancake.
What can I say? That's all it takes.
Listen I need to use the ladies room so you should go ahead and go talk to that girl. Then we can head home and I can get my packing done.
Sounds like a plan to me.
I'll be right back.
Guess it's time to find out what the waitress wants. Where is she at?
There you are! How was your meal?
It was good. So what's up? What do you need to talk to me about?
I don't know if you remember me but we used to be in the same science class in tenth grade.
Oh yeah!.. You were really quiet in that class. I remember that.
Yep, we both were. But anyway there's really no classy way to say this but I've always had a crush on you.
Really? I had no clue.
Please, every girl had a crush on you in that class.
I was too much of a chicken back then to ever talk to you.
You should have talked to me back then. I was at a weird stage where it took a girl blatantly saying she likes me for me to realize it.
I wish I would have known that. Maybe things would be different today.
Maybe so. Are you going to college?
Yes, I got accepted to my dream school.
That's great. I hope things go well.
Thank you. But back on my original topic. I wish things could be different today.
But you're leaving and I'm going to be going to a college on the other side of the country, so this is probably the last time either one of us will ever see each other.
Basically what I'm trying to get to is.. Do you want to go with me into the bathroom? I'm on break for the next twenty minutes.
Wow, I can't say I expected that. I thought you were an innocent girl.
I am, it's just this is the last time I'll ever see you. It's something I've wanted for a long time.
I used to sit in class and think about it. So when I saw you walk in today I got nervous. But fuck it. Do you want to do it?
I have a girlfriend now... If she found out I did something like this she would be devastated.
Oh, I'm sorry.. I didn't know. It's cute that you're loyal.
I had sex with Rachael earlier. It was under the premise of it being practice for [g1].
I could apply the same logic to this. But at that point am I being logical or just selfish?
Before today I would have said no instantly. Why am I changing from that? Maybe it's just nerves of going to WVM.
If I do this it's to be the best I can be for [g1].
We can do it.
Really? Great! I thought you were going to say no after the whole girlfriend thing.
I was going to. Me and her haven't had sex yet and I want to be the best I can be for her.
Oh... Okay.
Don't get me wrong. You're a beautiful girl and I'm lucky that you asked me.
It's just I wouldn't do it normally.
You don't have to explain yourself. I'm just happy you said yes. So are you ready?
Lead the way.
Hopefully [am] takes her time in the bathroom. Then again there's only one wall seperating us so I'll need to keep it down.
I also need to be quick. If I take too long I'll run the risk of [am] walking in to check on me.
All right, so I'm gonna head into the stall. You stay out here for a second and make sure no one is coming to check on us.
You got it.
Coast seems clear.
If anyone saw us and was coming to see what we were doing they would already have came in.
I think we're clear.
Okay just give me one second. and... okay, come on in.
Wow, you look fantastic.
Thank you, don't get shy on me now. Come in.
I'm so glad you walked through those doors tonight.
Now do you want me to lay down like this?
Or do you want me standing like this?
I think I'd prefer standing myself.
That doesn't matter until you're undressed though. May I?
Go right ahead.
Oh, not bad. Not bad at all.
Damn, she just stuck it in her mouth with no warning.
I can feel my dick growing in her mouth. She's barely reacting though.
Mmmm, how big is your dick [mcf]? It keeps growing!
I've never actually measured it. I'm proud of it though.
I'm sure you are. I would be too. I've never had one this big before.
Can you handle it?
Only one way to find out. How do you want to fuck me?
We have to be quick. And standing seems easiest.
Fuck yeah, show me what I've been missing out on these years.
Your dick is so fucking huge, you're stretching out my tiny pussy!
If it's too much just tell me to stop.
No way! Plant it deep inside of me! I want to feel you as deep as you can go.
If that's what she wants that's what I'm gonna give her.
HOLY SHIT! You're so fucking huge my body is trying to push you out!
Please don't stop. I need more. Fuck me hard, make me your little slut.
This isn't at all the girl I remember, she was quiet and awkward. I got to say I like the new her.
What are you waiting on? Do you want me to beg?
Please fuck me! I've been a naughty girl and you need to punish me with that cock. Ram my tiny pussy with that huge cock. Make my legs go numb please!
Oh fuck yes daddy. Fulfill 15 year old me's dreams.
You like being fucked in a bathroom stall? By a man you'll never see again?
I fucking love it. I'm your whore. Use me.
I will. I'm gonna give you something to remember me by. I'm going to cum deep inside of you.
Yes please daddy! I want all of it. Plant it inside of me.
Oh shit I'm cumming!.
Yes! Give me it all, it's so deep in me! I want every drop you have!
My entire body is pulsing! That was so fucking good! If I had known you were like this we would have been fucking everyday!
Is everything good? Are you okay?
Uooohhhh.... I'm fucking fantastic. I can't describe it. Everything feels good. It's like I'm high on every drug right now.
Thank you for this. You were so fucking good. I love being your little slut.
You can be my slut whenever you want to be. Am I good to leave? I have someone waiting on me.
Oooo... Yeah.. I'll be good. I'm just gonna sit here for a while. Hopefully we'll have the chance to fuck again one day. See you [mcf]
See you. Good luck in college.
What a little freak. That was fucking fun though. Cumming in her was probably a step too far but I just lost control.
On the bright side.. I think I'm ready to impress [g1].
I have to get back to [am] now. I feel bad for leaving her by herself while I was doing this. But that was too good to turn down.
Hey [am], I'm right here.
Where did you go? I was starting to get worried that you ditched me for that girl.
I would never ditch you. I went to talk to that girl and then went to use the bathroom myself.
What did she want? If I can ask.
It turns out we used to be in the same class. She just wanted to catch up.
Awh that's sweet. Did you get her number?
Noo, it wasn't like that. She was just being friendly. Are you ready to leave?
Yeah I'm good to go whenever.
All right, let me go pay and then we can leave.
Don't worry about it. I already paid.
[am].. This was my treat.
You already got me this necklace and a place to stay. The very least I can do is buy dinner.
I guess that's fair. I won't fight you on it. Well thank you for the dinner.
No problem. Let's get out of here. I need to pack now.
Sure thing. let's go.
Yeah, I wouldn't feel right doing this. You're a beautiful woman though. It's just I'm not single.
Okay... That's fine. I respect you being loyal.
Maybe one day we'll meet again and maybe things will be different then.
Maybe so.
Well I'll let you go then. Sorry for this.
It's fine. I'm truly flattered. You're a very hot young woman. It's just if I found out my girlfriend was with some guy in a bathroom I'd go ballistic.
So it'd be pretty shitty of me to go and do it myself.
When you put it that way I really can't be upset. I wish there were more guys like you.
Good luck at WVM [mcf]. It was nice seeing you again.
Good luck to you too. Have a nice evening.
Jesus, what's with girls hitting on me today? I can't go two hours without someone trying to get under my pants.
Is this what it's like to be a woman that constantly gets hit on and cat called? That shit would suck.
I wonder if [am] is out of the restroom yet. I'm ready to leave
Hey [am], I'm right here.
Where did you go? I was starting to get worried that you ditched me for that girl.
I would never ditch you. I went to talk to that girl and then went to use the bathroom myself.
What did she want? If I can ask.
It turns out we used to be in the same class. She just wanted to catch up.
Awh that's sweet. Did you get her number?
Noo, it wasn't like that. She was just being friendly. Are you ready to leave?
Yeah I'm good to go whenever.
All right, let me go pay and then we can leave.
Don't worry about it. I already paid.
[am].. This was my treat.
You already got me this necklace and a place to stay. The very least I can do is buy dinner.
I guess that's fair. I won't fight you on it. Well thank you for the dinner.
No problem. Let's get out of here. I need to pack now.
Sure thing. let's go.
5 minutes later
Thank you for driving me home.
Don't mention it. Do you need any help packing your clothes?
No I should be fine. I'm only going to pack what I think I'll need. Worst comes to worst I'll just get some new things there.
Plus don't you still have to help Shauna? I bet she's stressed trying to pack alone.
Yeah I should go help her. You promise you're good here?
Yes I promise. If I need anything I will call you.
I won't be too long. I'm just gonna go over there and help and then I'll be back here to help you put everything in the RV.
That sounds great. I'm so excited to see our new place. I'm going to barely sleep tonight.
Same here. Late night road trips usually knock me out though. There's a bed in the RV that you can use.
We can both use it. It will be like old times.
Sure, we can do that. I'll be back soon mom. I love you.
I love you too, see you soon.
12 minutes later
Oh man, Shauna must have fallen asleep waiting on me.
She did say she barely slept last night.
She's even wearing something sexy for me. When did she even get that?
That giant dinosaur isn't there anymore. She must be bringing it with her.
Luckily it's a big RV or else we wouldn't have room for a giant stuffed dinosaur.
She seems so peaceful in her sleep. I wonder what she's dreaming about.
Whatever it is it's about to end.
Shaunaaaa, it's time to wake upppp. We have things we need to doooo.
That got her to roll over at least.
That outfit really is sexy. Her boobs are really nice.
She was here waiting for me, probably so excited and ready for me to walk in. But her body betrayed her.
That doesn't matter though. This might be our only chance to do anything for a while, I'm not gonna let that slip away.
*slightly louder* Shaunaaaaa.. You need to get uppppp.
*Yawns* Huh? What's happening?
It's [mcf]. I'm sorry it took so long but I'm here.
Oh my god. I'm sorry I fell asleep. I didn't mean to. How long have you been here?
Not long at all. I just came in a few minutes ago.
Good. I really didn't mean to fall asleep. I was just really tired.
It's fine. If you want I can let you get some more sleep.
No!.. I mean. I'll be able to sleep on the way there. I want to spend now with you.
I was worried that you might have changed your mind. Or that I just imagined it all or something.
My mind hasn't changed at all. I'm sorry It took so long for me to get here. Me and [am] went out to eat after our little date.
How is she doing with everything?
She's doing great, better than you'd think.
Well that's good to hear. I'm worried about her. I know how much you two rely on each other.
I'm sorry but I can't go on anymore without addressing this. Your outfit is sexy as hell. When did you get it?
Oh my god! I forget I even put this on. I thought you might like it but I feel really silly in it and I'm sure I look silly.
You look sexy. I love it.
Really? It's not that silly?
Not in any way. I've always loved fish net. And you know you have a fantastic body. You could pull off almost anything.
You didn't answer my other question though. When did you get it?
All right, now I'll look silly. I went by a store on my way home and I wanted to surprise you with it.
It's definitely a surprise. a much welcome one.
I'm glad you think so. So what do you want to do?
I want you to show off that outfit for me. Let me get a good look.
Like this? How does it look?
I'm not noticing the outfit as much as I am your boobs. I love them.
Awh, you can play with them anytime you want to. They're yours. All of me is.
Turn around for me, I want to see the other side.
How does this side look?
My brain is empty right now. Your ass is so nice that it made my entire brain just stop.
I'm glad you like the outfit. I'm even more glad that you find me sexy.
So what next? You got a good look at me. What do you want to do with me?
I want to do everything with you. I don't know where to start.
Was our kiss earlier your first?
Yes, it was. Was it that bad?
No, it was actually good. I liked it.
Do you want to do it again?
Oh wow!, a simple yes would've worked too.
But actions speak louder than words.
Me and Shauna feel right, It feels like our energies just go together. I feel the same way about [g1] though.
Still good? I really like kissing you.
They're great. I like kissing you too.
Before we do anything else can we talk for a second?
Of course, is everything okay?
Yeah, it's just I have a few more questions and I'm sorry to bring this back up but the thing about me still being with [g1]..
What about it?
Are you sure that you're okay with that? Like today when me and [g1] kissed each other you looked sad.
I'm still going to do those things with her. But I don't want you to feel bad when I do them.
I promise you I'm completely okay with it. If that ever changes I will tell you.
I wasn't sad that you were kissing her. I was sad that I never thought I'd get to do that with you.
I just want to be a part of your life. I want to make you happy and I want to be the person that's always there for you.
You were all of those things before today.
I know, I guess there's some selfish feelings there too, but I promise I'll never feel bad about anything you do with [g1].
I have one more question. How long have you been attracted to me?
Honestly? Since the moment you stood up for me way back when we were kids.
Everything about you was so cool and awesome to me. I didn't even know anything about romantic feelings but I've always felt attracted to you. Like we were meant to be near each other.
As we grew older my attraction grew. With your presence in my life and your unconditional support I've grown a ton and my feelings grew with it.
As I gained confidence I thought maybe one day something might happen between us.
Everything about you was cool and awesome to me. I didn't even know I was into boys yet but I knew I was attracted to you.
As we grew older my attraction grew. When I did finally decide to follow my heart and start my transistion, you were a big reason why.
What do you mean?
Well I've always felt like I was a woman. But a big motivation to actually go through with it was that I thought if I did it..
Maybe there would be a chance that you would be into me and we could maybe end up where we are now.
When you're as beautiful of a woman as you are then there's no limit to where you could end up.
Thank you. I love it when you compliment me. I know you mean it so it really means the world to me.
Are there any more questions?
Nope, that's all I have.
If you have anymore don't hesitate to ask. I want to make sure you know how committed I am to this.
Would you mind if I go use the restroom? I want to freshen up a bit before we do anything else.
I don't mind at all.. as long as you give me another kiss first.
How about a deal? I'll do that if when I come back you're completely nude.
Complete nudity for a kiss? That seems a bit skewed. How about if I do that. I get that kiss and you have to come back nude as well.
Deal.
I'm surprised you agreed to that so easily.
I mean I'm practically already nude.
Fair point, but when you come back you better be completely nude.
Same goes for you. I'll be right back. Don't go anywhere.
I wouldn't dream of it.
Today's been wild. It's almost over though. I'm so ready to go to sleep.
Laying in this bed, it would be really easy to fall asleep right now.
I can't do that though, I need to get undressed. I wonder what Shauna wants to try with me..
There we go. I'm not hard or anything but I'm sure Shauna will be willing to help with that.
a few minutes later
Oh wow [mcf]. I don't think I'll ever get used to seeing your dick. It's just so big.
You'll get used to it, hopefully you will see it a lot.
Every chance we get I'm sure I will.
Why are you standing like that?
Because... I've never shown anyone it before.
Don't be shy Shauna. It's just me.
Are you sure?
Of course I am. I want to see it.
So what do you think?
I'm thinking a lot of sinful thoughts right now.
Really? So you like it?
I love it, it's sexy. Can you turn around for me?
Now this I really don't mind showing you. I know how much you like it.
There's no better ass on this planet. There literally isn't a flaw with it.
That's funny because I feel the same way about your dick. Speaking of your dick, you said you liked my pussy right?
Yeah, it's perfect.
Do you want to try it?
You mean have sex? Do you think you're ready?
I'm ready to try. I'm not a completely innocent girl. I've used toys before. Nothing real and definitely nothing near that big but I want to try.
I'm definitely not going to say no to that.
Because... I don't want to show you mine...
Why?? It's not a big deal to me Shauna.
I know you're into girls..
I am. You're a girl.
But I don't have what girls have. I don't want to scare you away or anything.
Come on, it's just a sex organ. That doesn't change anything about you.
You're still a sexy and beautiful woman and I'm a guy who is lucky enough to be in her bed.
I'm the lucky one. Are you sure you want to see? There's no elegant way to say this but I want you to pretend like it doesn't exist.
I'm sure. What do you mean pretend it doesn't exist?
I don't want you to do anything with it.. I want you to treat me like a girl.
I just care about making you feel good.
Now this I really don't mind showing you. I know how much you like it.
There's no better ass on this planet. There literally isn't a flaw with it.
That's funny because I feel the same way about your dick. Speaking of those two things I want to see if I can handle it.
Are you saying what I think you're saying?
Yes I am, I want to try. I've used toys and things before but never anything real and never something that big. But I want to try.
I'm definitely not going to say no to that.
But before that I want to try something else. I want to see if I'm any good at blowjobs.
I'm more than willing to help you find out.
Ha, I'm sure you are. First things first we have to get you ready.
You have such a nice cock.
Is that your favorite thing about me?
Noo, I love everything about you. It's pretty high up there though.
Then what are you waiting for?
Mwahh, I love that I'm here right now.
I've had so many thoughts and dreams of doing this. On my knees in front of you.
I've even practiced for it.
Really? How so?
I think it's best if I just show you.
Is she about to try and deepthroat me? That would be amazing.
Oh, she's already struggling. It's still further than [g1] made it earlier.
Not to mention it feels really good too. She's swirling her tongue around.
This is more than enough for me.
Ohh holy shit!
How the fuck did she go from struggling to her nose touching me?
That sent a fucking shock through my spine.
That feels so fucking good Shauna.
Oh shit. I grew a lot in your mouth.
That was amazing. Since when can you do that?
I didn't think I was gonna make it.
You did more than make it.
Has anyone ever done that with you before?
What? Deepthroat?
Yeah, has anyone ever done that to you before?
No, not even close. That was incredible.
Good. I started to struggle about halfway and then I thought I was going to disappoint you. I just made the rest happen.
It was amazing when you were just halfway. You're not disappointing me at all.
Can I try again? You grew more in my mouth and it made me panic a bit so I had to stop. Plus I cheated a bit with my hands.
You can do that to me anytime you want to.
Can you lay on the bed? I think it will be easier if you're laying down.
Are you ready? I'm not gonna use hands.
I'm more than ready. But don't force anything.
I won't. Just sit back and enjoy.
Holy shit, it's going to send a shock through my spine every time. She knows what she's doing.
Oohhh! She's fucking amazing. She made it almost no problem. After we do this a few times I want to face fuck her.
She's holding it. This is perfect. Shauna's mouth around me and a beautiful view of her ass. This has to be a dream.
She's not just holding it, she's going crazy with her tongue.
It feels so fucking good. If she doesn't stop soon she's going to make me cum just from this.
Shauna is going to live with me after tonight. Meaning I can experience this every night. My life is amazing.
Oh thank god she's coming up. I don't want to finish yet. I still want to try her pussy. If she can do this then I'm sure she'll surprise me with that too.
Oh thank god she's coming up. I don't want to finish yet. I still want to try her ass. If she can do this then I'm sure she'll surprise me with that too.
Oh fuck. Now she's sucking on the tip. I'm so close to finishing. I have to focus. Think about sad things.
I'm holding every muscle so tight. If I do cum it's going to rocket into her mouth.
Oh thank god.
What? How was that? That wasn't bad was it? You were quiet.
Not at all. You almost made me cum. I had to focus so I didn't. That was fucking amazing.
Really? I almost made you cum from that?
I'm telling you it feels fucking amazing. Added onto the fact that a fucking sexy lady is the one doing it. I was so close to blowing.
You could have came. I don't mind. It's really flattering. I'm glad you like it so much.
Nuh uh, I don't want this to be over yet. You said there was something else we can do.
Yes I did. Are you ready to try?
I'm more than ready.
I'm so happy right now. I can't wait to do this with you every chance we get.
I'm happy too. I'm happy you told me how you felt today. Are you ready?
I've been ready for a long time.
Just go slowly. I've never tried anything near as big as you.
I'll start with just the tip.
You're pussy is so fucking tight.
So tight that it actually hurts a bit. I think that's good though.
Mmmm, try to go deeper.
Ahhhh.. It's so big. It feels so good though.
You're not in pain at all?
A little. But I'm getting used to it. I'll be fine. Keep going.
Ahhhhh! Holy shit.
This is so fucking tight. I can feel her muscles trying to push me out. There's no way she's enjoying this.
Are you okay?
I'm fine. It just shocked me a bit... I promise. Just shove the rest in me.
Are you sure? If it hurts we can stop.
No, no! Trust me, shove it in.
I don't know about this.
AHHH! It's so fucking huge!!
Pull it out!
I'm so sorry. I couldn't handle it. I've never had something that big in me. We can try again. I'll be fine. I just want to make you feel good.
It's okay Shauna.
[mcf]?? Why did you pull out? I'm fine.
You're clearly in pain Shauna.
It's okay. I don't care about that. I just want to make you feel good.
I don't care about how far I can get my dick in you. Especially not the first time.
I care way more about you than I do that. I don't want you to be in pain.
I don't want to disappoint you.
I promise you're not. I'm here with you. I care about you. We could get dressed and play some games for all I care.
I didn't tell you I have feelings for you just to bang you. I truly have those feelings.
Don't get me wrong this is amazing and I'm glad we're doing this. But we don't have to dive into it.
I love you [mcf].
I love you too Shauna.
It wasn't bad at first. I can handle how wide it is. I just couldn't take the length.
It was making all my muscles tense up the deeper you went.
It felt incredible before that.
Do you want to try again? I won't go too deep this time.
Yes please. Can I lay on my back? I think I won't tense up as easily that way.
Yeah, of course.
You ready? Just tell me when to stop.
Yeah, I'm ready.
There. That's perfect. It feels amazing there.
Damn right it does.
You can start fucking me now. Just don't go any deeper than that.
Oooohhhh.. Aaaaaahhhh...
Your pussy feels incredible.
Oooo.. It's all yours. Anytime you want it.
Holy shit your dick is so good.
Ahhhh... am I a good girl?
You're not just that. You're my good girl.
Mmmmmmmmm... Yesssss..
Don't stop [mcf]. You're gonna make me cum from this.
Your cock is so fucking good.
Ahhhhhhhhhhhh mmmmmmmmm........!
Holy shit [mcf]. I've never came like that before.
I'm about to cum too! Where do you want it??
Oh! cum on my face. I want to taste it!
Yes I am. Do you have any lube?
Yeah it's on the counter over there.
Okay, let me put some on.
I'm so happy right now. I can't wait to do this with you every chance we get.
I'm happy too. I'm happy you told me how you felt today. Are you ready?
I've been ready for a long time.
Just go slowly at first. I've never tried anything as big as you.
I'll just start with the tip.
You're ass is so fucking tight.
So tight that it actually hurts a bit. I think that's good though.
Mmmm, try to go deeper.
Ahhhh.. It's so big. It feels so good though.
You're not in pain at all?
A little. But I'm getting used to it. I'll be fine. Keep going.
Ahhhhh! Holy shit.
This is so fucking tight. I can feel her muscles trying to push me out. There's no way she's enjoying this.
Are you okay?
I'm fine. It just shocked me a bit... I promise. Just shove the rest in me.
Are you sure? If it hurts we can stop.
No, no! Trust me, shove it in.
I don't know about this.
AHHH! It's so fucking huge!!
Pull it out!
I'm so sorry. I couldn't handle it. I've never had something that big in me. We can try again. I'll be fine. I just want to make you feel good.
It's okay Shauna.
[mcf]?? Why did you pull out? I'm fine.
You're clearly in pain Shauna.
It's okay. I don't care about that. I just want to make you feel good.
I don't care about how far I can get my dick in you. Especially not the first time.
I care way more about you than I do that. I don't want you to be in pain.
I don't want to dissappoint you.
I promise you're not. I'm here with you. I care about you. We could get dressed and play some games for all I care.
I didn't tell you I have feelings for you just to bang you. I truly have those feelings.
Don't get me wrong this is amazing and I'm glad we're doing this. But we don't have to dive into it.
I love you [mcf].
I love you too Shauna.
It wasn't bad at first. I can handle how wide it is. I just couldn't take the length.
It was making all my muscles tense up the deeper you went.
It felt incredible before that.
Do you want to try again? I won't go too deep this time.
Yes please. Can I lay on my back? I think I won't tense up as easily that way.
Yeah, of course.
You ready? Just tell me when to stop.
Yeah, I'm ready.
There. That's perfect. It feels amazing there.
Damn right it does.
You can start fucking me now. Just don't go any deeper than that.
Oooohhhh.. Aaaaaahhhh...
Your ass feels incredible.
Oooo.. It's all yours. Anytime you want it.
Holy shit your dick is so good.
Ahhhh... am I a good girl?
You're not just that. You're my good girl.
Mmmmmmmmm... Yesssss..
Don't stop [mcf]. You're gonna make me cum from this.
Your cock is so fucking good.
Ahhhhhhhhhhhh mmmmmmmmm........!
Holy shit [mcf]. I've never came like that before.
I'm about to cum too! Where do you want it??
Oh! cum on my face. I want to taste it!
Oh yeah.. Cum all over my face.! Give me every drop you have.!
Ahh!
Damn [mcf] that was a lot.
How do I look?
You look fantastic. There's some left on me though.
I'll take care of that.
Oaaahhh. That's sensitive.
So how do I taste?
Yummy. I don't want any to go to waste.
Mmmmmmmm. all gone.
Did you swallow it all?
Of course I did. I didn't miss a drop.
Mmmm. Good girl.
So how was it?
It was everything I'd hoped it be.
Same here. I'm so overcome with joy right now. Life is great.
So earlier you said that our night at the fair way back then was your favorite night ever. Is that still true?
Nope it's now my second favorite. Tonight passed it by a mile. I don't have a giant dinosaur to remember it by though.
What if I can do you one better?
What do you mean?
I got you something. It's in my pocket. Give me a second.
What do you think?
That's for me??
Yes they are. Do you want to try them on.
Thank you so much! But I can't. I don't have my ears pierced.
Oh, whoops. I didn't know that.
It's all right. I'll get them pierced tomorrow. I love them!
I'm glad. I know they're not the best things in the world...
Stop it. They're perfect. I'll wear them everyday to remember this night. Thank you.
Okay, she just swallowed my cum and now I'm kissing her. Is that a big deal? Or am I just being weird?
She cleaned it up well anyway. I'll be fine.
You have me to remember it by.
True, I do. That's as good as anything else.
How much time do we have before we have to leave?
Oh yeah that's right. We need to get going. It's close to 10. Are you all packed up?
Yes. My boxes are in the living room.
Let's get dressed and then we can head out.
I wish we could stay here a bit longer. I just want to lay with you.
I do too. But I'm also excited to get on the road.
True. Let's get dressed.
I like those pants.
Thank you. They're new.
I like what's under them even more though.
Nope! You're making us get dressed so you don't get to say that right now.
Ha, fair enough. I'll just think about it instead.
Oh shit, is she asleep?
She did say she was tired. She needs to get up for now though.
Shaunaaaa.. It's time to get up.
*Yawnnn* What is it? Who is it?
It's me Shauna. [mcf]. Are you ready to go?
Oh, I'm sorry. I didn't mean to fall asleep.
It's all right. Are you all packed up?
Yes. Everything is behind you.
Okay good. Before we leave can we talk about what happened earlier?
I thought we were just going to forget about it.
After this we will. I just want to make sure everything is okay.
Okay... Can I have a hug first? I could really use one.
Absolutely. Are you okay?
I think so. I felt really embarrassed and silly at first but I'm feeling a bit better now. It feels good that it's no longer a secret.
There's no reason to be embarrassed. I promise.
Are we good? Still best friends?
Without a doubt. You know I love you Shauna.
That's all I care about. I was scared things would be awkward.
Not at all. I was just worried you would be hurt.
I'm okay. I realized how silly I was after I left. I just hit on the most loyal man I know. It was destined to fail.
So we're just going to go back to before that happened?
Yes please. Starting now. I'm ready to put it behind me.
Okay, are you ready to leave?
Yes I am. I'm excited.
Me too. Where are the boxes?
Here they are. All good to go.
I can get these. Is there anything else you need?
Oh! Yeah. I'll go grab it.
I'll meet you out in the car.
I lift heavy things all the time. This shouldn't be much of a problem. Probably just clothes that weigh nothing.
Holy shit this is the heaviest thing I've ever carried. Apparently Shauna decided to bring a fucking rock collection to college.
I'm gonna throw out my back if I don't set these down.
Phew. A few more seconds and I would have been in pain for weeks. I'm getting old. I wonder what she has in there.
Ehh, it's none of my business. Probably just some heavy make up or something? I don't know.
Today has flown by. I figured all the change would happen tomorrow but it happened today. So far so good though.
All that's left to do is pick everyone up and be on our way. I'm ready to go to sleep.
Unlock your door!
You thought I would just leave this?
Ha, I was wondering where he was.
There's room for him right?
Without a doubt. Just sit him in the back and we're good to go.
I'm so excited. I can't wait to see the school. I wonder what my room is gonna look like.
I bet it's better than you can imagine.
I think I'm gonna let it be a surprise to Shauna. When we pull into our new house she's gonna flip.
I hope so.
I'm good to go.
Put your seat belt on please.
10 minutes later
Here we are. Our new home for the next 12 hours.
Our one way trip to the rest of our lives.
Do you need any help with those boxes?
Nah I got them. They aren't too heavy.
Fuck me why did I say that.
Second time was way easier than the first. I think it's because I was expecting it this time.
See. There's plenty of room for him.
I hope my new roommate won't mind this huge guy.
I can guarantee you they won't.
I hope not. Because he's staying no matter what.
*KNOCK, KNOCK*
Oh hey, what's up Damien? Rest well?
Like a baby. I was doing a little inspection before we head out.
Everything look good?
Everything looks great. You good to go?
Let's get it.
Oh hello. Who is this?
Oh that's right. You two didn't get a chance to meet earlier. Damien this is my best friend Shauna.
Well it's very nice to meet you Shauna. Seems like [mcf] keeps good company.
I'll tell you right now I'm coming for that title of best friend though.
Haha, good luck. It's nice to meet you too.
Do you want to join me and [mcf] up front? I'd love to learn about you.
I would but I'm extremely tired. I think I'm going to lay down in the back. Will you two wake me up whenever we have everyone.
We sure can.
Yeah we will. Sleep well Shauna.
Thank you [mcf]. Don't let me sleep too long.
I like you already.
Oh yeah? Why's that?
You seem cool man. You have a cool girl, cool best friend. I bet you have a cool mailman even.
Yeah he's all right.
Ha, so what's the story there with Shauna?
Your girl cool with you having a best friend that looks like that?
Yeah, they're friends with each other too. I've know Shauna since I was a kid.
That's awesome man. I can't tell you how excited I am that you're coming to WVM.
I'm excited too man. I'm ready to get on a court with my new teammates. Get some synergy flowing.
Don't you worry about that. Our coach loves to grind some practices.
Are they going to be there tomorrow?
They are. They would've came with me today if the school would have let her.
It's a shame they didn't. I'm excited to meet her.
I guarantee you she's more excited to see you. You just don't realize how big of a splash you're going to make.
You're gonna be king of this place. You need to be ready for that. As much as I love this humbleness you have to you. You need to realize you're [mcf] [mcl]. You're THE number one recruit going to a last place college.
What you say goes. Don't forget that. I love our players and staff. But if you see something that can be done differently don't hesitate to speak up. We need to get better.
I'll do my best. I've always been one to go with the flow and do the best I can in it.
For both of our sake. Change the flow. This is my last chance to impress some scouts or my dreams are dead. I need you man. We're gonna make waves this year.
Without a doubt.
 That's what I like to hear. We picking up your girl first?
Yeah her and her sister. Then we need to swing by my place for my mom.
Okay then, let's get going.
Speaking of being king and everything. We might need to distract your girls for a few hours when we get to WVM.
Why's that?
There's some people that want to meet you. They'll be at your house sometime tomorrow with my girl.
I'm assuming girls that want to meet me? What's your girlfriend's name by the way?
She's Jasmine. Don't worry you'll meet her soon. But yeah, mainly some of the cheerleaders and some others. You'll see.
I don't know man. I don't think [g1] would be cool with that.
I won't make you do anything shady. How about you just ask her when we get her?
Yeah, I can do that. Are we almost there?
Yeah, about to pull in now.
Here we are. Do you need help bringing in their stuff?
Nah I should have it. Thank you though. I'll be right back.
*KNOCK, KNOCK*
Come in!
Oh, hey Elizabeth.
Don't call me that, I go by Liz.
Where is [g1], are you two ready to go?
She's getting her last few things packed and then we're good to go.
I haven't seen you in a few weeks. Can I get a hug?
Sure, I guess so.
I gotta say I'm a little surprised. I thought you would tell me to fuck off.
We need to get over our past. We're going to a new place so this will be a fresh start.
Come on Liz, let's not do this right now.
What? It's just a hug.
Yeah but with your past. If [g1] saw us it would be a lot to deal with. It's not worth it.
The past is nothing but some harmless flirting. It's not that big of a deal.
It is to her. Listen, we're going to a new place and that will give us a chance to start our friendship over.
I would like that. Maybe you'll realize the girl who has been cheering you on since day one isn't such a bad guy.
I don't think you're a bad guy. I just think you don't realize the effect of half the things you say.
Like what? Give me some examples?
I really don't want to get into this Liz. I'm just here to pick you two up.
That's fine. We're about to leave. Just tell me some examples so I can learn from them or whatever.
You used to flirt with me all the time despite me dating your sister.
I flirted with you way before then.
It should have stopped when me and [g1] started. You also used to constantly mock [g1] about her body.
Saying shit like 'Maybe one day your breasts will grow.'.
Come on, that's just us being sisters. I was just joking.
You're a huge reason why it took so long before me and [g1] did anything.
Oooooooooooooooh... So you two did finally have sex today?
What? What did I say?
You said I was why it took so long for you to do anything with her.
She came home all smiley and acting different. She wouldn't tell me anything though. You two finally banged huh?
No we didn't bang. We just tried a few things.
No wonder she was so happy. I'm proud of her.
Don't tell her I told you. She clearly didn't want you to know yet.
I'll think about it. I got to talk to her about it at some point. I have questions.
Fine, just not tonight. Let's get through this trip in peace.
So how was it? Did she do good?
Liz we're not talking about this anymore.
I could do it better you know. All you have to do is ask.
Liz stop.
You're no fun. I'll stop, for now. I want this to be a peaceful trip too.
Good.. do you need any help with your boxes?
Nah, I packed light. You can get [g1]'s though.
Which ones are which?
These ones are mine.
Not gonna look, not gonna look.
Do you need help with the door?
How are you gonna check out my ass if you're getting the door? Just get your girls boxes.
If you say so.
[mcf]? You're already here?
Yeah, we're actually running a little late. It's already past ten.
Oh, I must've lost track of time. Elizabeth didn't bug you any did she?
No more than usual. Are you ready to go?
Just about. There's one thing I have to do first.
What's that?
This.
Her kisses are different now. There's more her in it. More enthusiasm.
There. I'm all good to go now.
Who else do we have to pick up?
We already have Shauna. So it's just [am].
Awesome. Speaking of [am], you never told me the rest of the story about how you found her a house. What happened there?
I didn't have time to tell you earlier but.. It turns out WVM is giving me my own house to stay in while I'm there.
For some reason no one told me about it. I have no clue why.
It's meant to have six bedrooms though, if you're interested you're more than welcome to stay there too.
Really?! What is the house like? Are you sure you're cool with me living with you?
Of course I am. We spend most of our time together anyways. It won't be that big of a change.
I'm so excited. I can't wait to see it.
So I'll take that as a yes?
Of course it's a yes. I was scared we wouldn't be able to see each other much but this kind of secures that we will. It's perfect.
You didn't answer my question about the house though. What's it like??
I don't know. I just learned about it earlier. Damien says it's nice though.
I'm sure it is. How did [am] react to the news?
Pretty much exactly like you. Super excited. She cried a little bit. You're not crying are you?
I'm close to it. I'm just happy that we'll be together.
Does Shauna know yet?
No, she's already asleep in the RV. I'm just gonna let it be a surprise for her when we pull up to it.
Great. I want to see her reaction. Is she going to live with us too?
I'm going to offer her. I think she will be but it's up to her.
I'm sure she will. This is amazing. I can't wait to see it.
Well the faster we leave the faster we get there.
Here I'll grab those two boxes and you get the other one.
Just one more kiss then we're good to go.
That's good with me.
All right, let's go.
I hope these aren't as heavy as Shauna's.
They shouldn't be. It's just clothes and stuff.
That was way easier. I wonder what Shauna has in her boxes.
Is it cool for me to lay in the bed? I'm sleepy.
Oh, uhh sure. We'll figure something else out for us.
Perfect. Feel free to join anytime you want.
Goodnight Liz.
Goodnight [mcf].
Sorry about her.
Don't worry about it. I'm used to it by now.
So the bed is taken now. Where are we going to sleep?
Either you or [am] can take the little sofa you're on now. I'll probably sleep on the floor.
[am] can have the sofa. I want to cuddle up with you.
Sounds perfect to me.
Hey loverbirds, come up here and entertain me while I drive.
It's good to see you again [g1].
You too Damien.
Did [mcf] ask you about anything?
We're doing this now?
Yes sir, no reason to wait.
What are you two talking about?
Now this was set in motion before I knew [mcf] was in a relationship.
A bunch of the cheerleaders will be at the house. They're there just to greet [mcf]. Team spirit and all that.
Here sit down and I'll explain more on the way.
Is that all? They're just gonna greet him?
I can't guarantee that will be all. I know a few of the girls were planning on something more.
But that won't happen. After they know he's with you they'll stop. And you don't have to worry about him. He already tried to get it cancelled because he thought you wouldn't like it.
You don't have to do that. Team spirit is important and all. I trust you.
Are you sure? I don't have to do it.
You should. Those are the girls that will be cheering you on all year. It would be good to be friends with them. Just keep it at that though.
The lady has spoken. I'll let Jasmine know that it's still on.
Damn, you two live close to each other. We're already almost there.
What are your plans for tomorrow [mcf]?
I'm not sure yet. I know unpacking and doing what Damien is talking about. I want to meet my new coach and whoever else is around.
I can help you unpack. Are we going to stay in the same room?
I think we should have seperate rooms. At least at the start. You're welcome in my room whenever but since we have the space we shouldn't pack everything in one room.
I agree. I've never shared a room before so it's probably best to ease into that one.
We're here already.
Here I'll help you with her things.
Thanks [g1].
Oh [am]. We were coming to help. Are there anymore boxes?
Nope, this is the only one. I've been waiting on you guys. I'm ready to go. I can't wait anymore.
Perfect. We're all good then. Just sit your box with the others and we can be on our way.
Sit down with us for a minute.
It's nice to see you again [am].
It's nice to see you too. I always enjoy when you're around. We don't see each other nearly as much as we should.
I'm sure that will change with us all living together.
Oh, I'm sorry [mcf]. That was meant to be a surprise..
Don't worry. He's already told me.
Yeah I told her when we picked her up. Keep it down though. It's still a surprise for Shauna.
I'll try my best. I'm just really excited about it.
Before we head out I just want to introduce myself.
I'm Damien. I'm one of your son's teammates. I've only known him for a day but he seems like he was raised right.
I think an RV full of beautiful women speaks for itself though.
Nonetheless, I'm excited to play with your son and it's very nice meeting the lady that made it all possible.
You're very kind. It's nice to meet you too.
Are you going to need any help driving there Damien?
No, I'm well rested. I'll have us there in no time.
Just let me know if you need anything.
I wonder what the rooms will be like.
Same here. I hope there's some good food places nearby as well.
Are you and [mcf] going to share a room? I'm cool with it.
No, we're going to keep our things in seperate rooms. I'll be in his room most of the time though.
They're just going to go on about the house for a while.
Now's the perfect time to check my phone.
Excuse me ladies, I have to check my emails real quick.
What if we have a pool? I might actually be able to get a tan if we do.
I don't think they even heard me. Oh well.
Rachael was meant to message me about that girl.
Yep, I have a message from her.
I'm here with Anna. The beautiful woman who wants to see you tomorrow. She's a bit shy about everything but I got her to put on a nice outfit for you. Do you want to see?
Of course I do. Show me her.
There she is. I told you she was curvy.
So what do you say? Is she worthy?
Can she take anymore pictures? I want to see more.
The first one took a lot of convincing. Let me see what I can do.
She has an amazing ass. She's getting shy though. She's not used to any cameras.
Convinced yet?
I want one more. This time of her front.
I'll see if she lets me. She's getting weirded out by it.
You've made her all sad. She doesn't think she's good enough for you.
Please tell me yes or else I'm gonna have to console her all night.
Yes you can send her to me. Do you know where to send her?
I'm gonna book you guys a hotel near WVM. Just meet her there tomorrow night and don't pussy out.
I'll be there.
Since the cameras already out and Anna doesn't want it on her anymore. Here's one of me. Maybe one of these times I'll join along.
Have a goodnight. Treat Anna right, she deserves it.
I don't know. She seems a little too shy for me. I don't want to have to babysit her through it.
Send me girls that are willing to work for what they want.
Anna is very kind and just timid about this. But your decision is your decision. I'll let her know.
I'll contact you later about some other girls. Goodnight [mcf].
Oh, I actually don't have anything. I guess that's a good thing.
Oh well.
Well, with that out of the way I'm ready to sleep.
Hey girls. I think I'm gonna go ahead and go to sleep.
I'm sleepy too. We've all been up since early this morning.
Same here. I'm ready to go to sleep.
Shauna and Elizabeth are in the bed back there. Leaving us with the one sofa.
Me and [g1] were going to sleep in the floor if you want to take the couch [am].
Can I join you guys? I don't do well sleeping in new places and would feel more comfortable.
Of course you can. We'll both use [mcf] as a pillow.
This isn't so bad. The floor is soft enough.
Yeah it's actually pretty comfy. I hope you two sleep well.
I think I'm just gonna dream about what the house will be like and spending time with everyone.
Mine will be similar. Goodnight girls. I love you both.
I love you too. Goodnight.
Love you too baby. Sleep well.
The perfect end to a pretty great day.
In a confined space with all the people I care about. It's nice.
I can't stay awake any longer though. I'm exhausted.
My final day of my old life is over. Tomorrow is all WVM.
8 hours later...
Yo [mcf]. Wake up. We're here.
Huh? Where am I?
You're at your new house. I've been driving for way too long and need to relax some so I'm going to walk to my house for a bit.
Oh.. We're already here? It feels like I barely slept but okay. Thanks for driving.
No problem. Jasmine should still be inside. Go say hey to her and check out your place.
See you soon Damien.
You know it. See ya [mcf].
I'm excited to see the house. I'm going to check it out by myself before I wake anyone else up.
Holy.. This place is nice. Way better than where we were living.
Oh wow... It's not bad in here. It's definitely an improvement to our old home.
I'm noticing a severe lack of furniture though.
I wonder where Jasmine is. I guess I should just explore for a bit.
So this is our new kitchen. Not half bad.
Damien?? Is that you??
Oh shit, that must be Jasmine. She has a nice voice.
Uhh no. It's [mcf]. Damien told me to go ahead and come inside.
Oh wow! Come back here I'm in one of the bedrooms!
Okay, coming.
Wow, Damien has good taste.
It's so nice to finally meet you! I've had to hear about you for weeks!
It's great to meet you. Thank you for staying behind to clean up this place. I owe you big time.
Do not mention it! I was happy to do it. We want you to be happy and comfortable here. So how do you like the place?
I've only seen three rooms but it's fantastic. It's a big improvement from where I was.
Good, I'm very glad to hear that. Do you have any questions?
Just one. Where's all the furniture?
Oh yeah, that. They're letting you furnish it yourself. Just let wherever you go know who you are and they will bill the school.
Really? That's crazy.
The only thing crazy is that you're at WVM. You could have gotten a full ride at any school.
I fucking love that you're here though. Damien has done nothing but talk about how he's excited.
Are you cool with hugs?
Yeah, they're great.
Here then.. I just wanted to say thank you.
For what?
For you being here. I know it has nothing to do with us but you've made Damien so happy recently. That spark is in his eyes again. I can't thank you enough for that.
You don't have to thank me for that. I love that I'm going to have a teammate that's as passionate as I am.
Damien is as competitive as they come. I thought he was going to implode on himself here since they couldn't win anything last year.
I could imagine. Losing every game by more than 10 points must have been soul crushing.
It was. Especially for him. But that's okay because you're here now.
Not to put pressure on you or anything.. I'm just saying you're a big upgrade over his other teammates.
One is named Mackle. He has the talent but lacks dedication and doesn't take the game seriously.
That's not good. What about the others?
There's Lee. He's not much better.
How so?
Well.. Mackle and Lee are in a relationship.
Uh oh.. I assume they're similar to each other then?
Not entirely. Lee isn't that bad. He just can't handle criticism too well.
That's better I guess. What about the fifth?
That would be Ryke.
Ryke? That's an odd name.
His name fits him. Dude is a total asshole. He's the kind of guy to make everything about him and pout when everything doesn't go his way.
Great. So what you're saying is we have a lot of work to do?
Ha.. yep. It's not gonna be easy. But I believe in you and Damien.
Speaking of. Where is Damien?
He drove us here so he was up all night. He said he went to his house to relax for a bit.
Oh okay. I wish he would've told me or at least came and said hey to me for a minute. I haven't seen him in two days.
Hey... Can I ask you something? You can't tell Damien I asked you.
Oh.. I don't know. I've only been here 2 minutes. I probably shouldn't get in the middle of anything.
No, no. It's not bad. I just want to know if he talked to any other girls while he was there.
Hmm, did he?... Other than introductions not really. There's clearly some doubt in her mind though.
I only saw him for a few minutes after all. He could have done anything.
Damien was real cool with me though. I can tell her that I don't know or I can cover for Damien.
Other than greeting the girls that were with me no. He barely talked to them then. He was a perfect gentleman. He was with me for most of the day. There's no way he was with anyone else.
Good. Thank you. I'm sorry for asking.
Is everything good between you two?
I think so. I worry too much sometimes is all. After last time it's hard not to think about it.
What happened last time?
Oh, I shouldn't get into this. Damien probably wouldn't want you to know but he cheated on me. It was in highschool but still... it hurt.
I really don't want to talk about that though. I'm sure nothing happened.
That's understandable. I won't pry.
I'm not sure. I didn't see him much yesterday. After we met he went to a hotel to sleep. I can tell you he was only friendly to all the girls that came with me.
So I really can't say. He could have done anything.
Okay, thank you. I'm sorry for asking.
Is everything good between you two?
Ugh... Yeah. Damien cheated on me in highschool. It was before we were serious but it makes me not trust him sometimes.
Thank you for telling me the truth though.
Come on now. No man is dumb enough to make that mistake twice on such a gorgeous woman.
[mcf].. Thank you but you shouldn't talk to me like that though. Damien told me you had a girlfriend of your own.
I do, but there's no harm in telling your new friend that she's too pretty to worry about what someone else might be doing.
Thank you. It means a lot.
Anyway, before we get too far down that rabbit hole. There's somewhere you need to be.
Oh? Where?
Coach Harper wants to see you. She told me to send you to her right away.
What about everyone else in the RV? Shouldn't we wake them first?
I can handle that. Harper said she was going to be very busy today and to send you as early as possible.
How am I going to get there? Is it far from here?
It's just the next street over.
Okay, I'll walk it then. Can you point me in the direction?
You're not walking anywhere. Come on. Let me show you something.
Damien did mention that they'd provide me my own car. I hope it's nice.
Man, Jasmine has a really nice ass. I need to stop staring at it before I get caught.
Here we are!
Oh my god. That's mine?
Yes it is. You can thank the owner of a local dealership.
Absolutely. Do all players get cars like these?
Think about it. They sent Damien in an RV to get you.
Oh, true. I thought that was just for the space.
Don't get me wrong. They treat us well. Just not a brand new super car well.
Wow, I don't even know what to say about this.
You don't have to say anything. Just enjoy it. I'm gonna go wake up everyone.
Man I wish I could see their reactions to the house.
I know. I'm sorry but Harp told me you had to be there as soon as you arrived. I'll tell you all about how they react.
Thank you Jasmine.
No problem. I'll see you soon.
Oh man this thing is loud.
This blows my old car out of the water. I need to find and thank whoever is responsible for this.
Enough rambling in my head. Coach will be mad if I take too long.
This thing is fucking fast. It takes off so quickly that it's so hard not to speed.
Jasmine said it was the next street over. So I should be just about there.
Here we go..
Coach Harper?
There he is!
*Mumbling* It's Coach Harper.
Sorry, Coach Harper.
Oh! It's you!
It's about time we meet.! I couldn't sleep last night knowing you were coming!
It's nice to meet you coach.
I don't usually hug my players but I can't help it right now.
Are you healthy? Are you ready to play?
Yes to both. I've never felt better and I've never been more eager to get onto the court.
Good, good, good. Practice starts first thing tomorrow morning. Be here in this room by 7am.
7am. I'll do my best to be here at 6:30 instead. I need to showcase myself as a leader.
Yes coach. Do you have a playbook for me to study?
Yes I do. I'll drop it at your house later today.
Perfect. Is there anything else coach?
Well, first thing. You don't have to call me coach so much. It's just us two in here right now. Around other players I want that respect but when it's just us you can relax a bit.
All right, what do you want me to call you?
Harper or Harp is just fine.
Harp it is.
I like you already. You're easy going and talented. That's a rare combo.
Thank you coa-.. Harper.
I'm not one to believe in higher powers or anything but you're a miracle sent to me.
With all due respect I haven't proven anything yet. I've never stepped on a court or played the game at this level.
Easy going and humble. A very rare combo.
Let me put it to you this way...
We didn't win a single game last year. We lost by more than 10 points in every single one of those games.
Not much has changed here. Same coaches, same trainers. Destined to go winless again.
Not much blame goes to the players or the staff. Most on the coach. Nothing but articles of 'Women can't lead teams of men'.
I was thinking about resigning. Mainly for personal issues.
Then one day I turn on my phone, nothing but headlines of 'Shocker! [mcf] commits to no name college!'
Hundreds of emails in minutes. Everyone asking questions just shocked that you're coming here.
So you take all of that and you ask yourself why someone with all that you have going for you. Super talented, athletic, well mannered, smart, and has all the tools necessary to turn into a generational player.
The guy that could have went anywhere. The guy that was the top recruit and it wasn't even close.
Why the fuck is he here? It has to be a miracle.
So, you see where I'm coming from?
When you put it that way I can see it. I just hope I'm able to live up to expectations and help us become winners.
You have my full faith. What do you have to do today?
I'm not sure. Mainly unpack and get settled in. I know Damien was talking about something with the cheer team.
Oh, that. Yeah I heard about those plans. So I'll come by sometime after that. There's more we need to talk about but sadly my day is very busy.
What are the plans?
They'd hate me if I spoiled it. I don't think it's your thing but just be ready for it.
Oh boy, I don't like surprises.
Hey, before I let you get out of here. One of your teammates Mackle is here. I'd like for you to meet him.
Sure. I'd love to.
Great, now he's a good guy. But his heart isn't in basketball. Not yet at least. I need your help with him.
What do you need me to do?
Try to get him committed. He has all it takes to be a good player. He just doesn't try. Can you do that for me?
I'll try my best.
Awesome! Thank you. I'll text him right now to come over.
Sounds good.
Okay, he should be here right away.
Anything I should know about him?
He's a calm guy. He's easy going. Not the smartest.
I don't think he has a mean bone in his body. He just doesn't have a drive for anything.
I'll find something to motivate him with.
How so?
I'm not sure yet. I need to talk to him, see what he likes and what motivates him. Kind of like a feral animal, you see if they're food motivated to see if they can be tamed.
I'm just going to pretend I know what you're talking about right now.
Yo! It's Mackey. Can I come in?
Ha, yeah I went a little off with that one. Just watch. Come on in Mackey!
Woah, it's that guy.
Mackey, treat him with some res-
Mackeyyy! It's nice to meet you man! Come on over here.
Waaaazzuuuup.
Just in here with Coach Harper. What were you up to?
Ahhhhh.. you know. Just listening to some house music waiting to see what was up.
House music? I love house music! What kind is your favorite man?
Deep house mainly, can't forget about progressive house and electro house though.
No doubt. Who's your favorite artist?
Pshhhhttt. Me man! I make my own.
Really? I need to hear some!
I got you! Come with me and I'll let you listen to my whole playlist!
Ahh.. Bummer.. I'm too busy today. Uhh.. The man's keeping me down.
Oh! We both have to be at a practice in the morning! You can play your music through the speakers while we're there.
Ohh! Totally bro! You're gonna love it!
I can't wait to hear it. First thing at 7am tomorrow.
Hell yeah bro! I'll see you there. I'm gonna go make sure they're all good to go. Can I leave coach?
Yes you can. See you tomorrow Mackey.
*Whispering* Wow. That was something else.
That was amazing. You made that look so easy!
Spending most of my life in locker rooms I've sort of just learned how to talk the dude bro language.
It shows. It's like you were a different person.
Pretty much.. Hope you're ready to listen to some house music tomorrow.
Oh I will be. With two ear plugs in and a spare pair in my pockets.
Come on. It can't be that bad.
Better safe than sorry.
You're giving me real hope here. You're everything I was hoping you'd be. Hell, you just got Mackey to agree to come to an early practice.
That's one step of many. Is there anyone else I need to meet?
Nope, not for now. You'll meet the other two tomorrow morning if you don't run into them today.
I don't think I've stopped smiling since you walked through those doors.
I don't want you to stop. You have an absolutely gorgeous smile.
[mcf].. You shouldn't say that to me. I'm your coach.
You said when it's just us I can relax a bit.
True, I did... Thank you [mcf]. You're going to make me smile a lot I feel.
That's the plan.
There's plenty to smile about. It's a new season with new goals. We're not that defeated team anymore. It's a new day.
I'm so excited for this season. Things are going to be different.
Damn right they are. I'm actually stoked for practice tomorrow.
I am too. So much so I don't think I'll sleep much again tonight.
Same, it's going to be a long night. I'll probably study the playbook for most of it.
I'll bring the playbook to your place as soon as I have some free time today.
Sounds good. I'll be there. Come by anytime.
Well not anytime. You still have your date with the cheerleaders.
Oh yeah.. that. Can you really not tell me anything about it?
I'm really not supposed to.
I will tell you this. Go easy on her. She doesn't fully know what she signed up for.
What do you mean?
You'll know when you see it. Just promise me you'll go easy okay?
Of course. I'll go easy. It would help if you could tell me what I'm going easy on but I promise whatever they surprise me with will be gone easy on.
Good.. I'm sorry for not telling you. It's just I really need those girls on my side. You understand right?
Not entirely to be honest. But I'll take your word on it.
What the fuck is she talking about? Why do I need to take it easy on someone?
Thank you. I'll get that playbook to you ASAP okay.
Okay, I'll see you soon Harper.
See you soon [mcf].
Go easy on her? Are they going to have me fight a woman? This all seems unnecessarily silly. I wish I could just skip this.
Oh well. I'll worry about all that later. I wonder what everyone thought of the house. Especially Shauna.
I'm almost there now. At least it's a very quick drive inbetween WVM and home.
I'm not used to this house at all yet. Where is everyone?
Babe?
Oh! [mcf] you startled me.
I'm sorry. I didn't mean to.
It's okay. How did meeting your coach go?
It went really well honestly.
That's great baby. I'm happy for you.
So what do you think about the house?
It's fantastic. It's the perfect size for all of us and I can't wait to see it furnished.
I agree. That's your guys' job though. I'm gonna stay out of that one.
How did the other girls respond to the house?
[am] cried a bit.. Good tears. Luckily that was before Shauna was awake so she still doesn't know. She thinks this is Damien's house.
Really? Great, I at least get to see one reaction to it.
Speaking of everyone else. Where are they?
Jasmine took them all out for breakfast.
Why didn't you go?
She said you wouldn't be gone for long. I didn't want to eat without you. [am] and Shauna both said the same thing but Jasmine talked them into going.
Awh, I appreciate it babe. You could have went though.
Mwah!
All right, I lied a little bit. I talked them into going.
Why did you do that?
Well we didn't get to do anything last night so I thought maybe if you're down we could do something while they're out?
Ohhh. I have the perfect girlfriend.
And she has the perfect boyfriend. Come on we'll need to be quick, they've been gone for a while. What do you want to do?
Well I haven't had my shower for today yet. And we had a certain conversation yesterday about this very topic.
Mhmmm yes we did. I like where your head is at. You want to take a shower with me?
There's nothing I would like to do more than that right now.
Well then follow me.
I wasn't expecting this. Not this early anyway. I feel like trying something new.
I wonder how she would feel about a thigh job. She craves intimacy and that definitely wouldn't hurt.
I still need to give her that bracelet. I think I should take her out somewhere nice tonight if I have time. Just a night for the two of us.
This bathroom isn't very big.
I guess that just means we'll have to be close together.
Mhmmm it does. Want to see a magic trick?
I very much would.
Close your eyes for three seconds then open them.
Nuh uh! No peeking! Eyes all the way closed.
There we go. Keep them like that!
1...
2...
3...
Open!
Tada!
Wow you made a sexy angel appear before me. That's some next level magic.
Haha, now perform the same trick on yourself and join me.
Tada!
Not the same when I do it.
I disagree, I think it's perfect. Are you going to join me?
There's nothing that could stop me from entering that shower right now.
Come on then big guy.
We're vastly different than yesterday morning. We still hadn't done anything but kiss and look at us now.
In a shower together naked. Hundreds of miles away from where we were and living together. Life is crazy.
Yes it is, It's good that we're living together because we have a lot of time to make up for.
True, and especially with [am] being okay with us sleeping in the same room I hope for it to be made up for fast.
Oh trust me, it will be. I've done almost nothing but think about this thing.
What kind of thoughts?
How it felt. How it grew in my hands and how hard it got.
Also the taste of it, how it would feel... inside of me.
I think I want to try having actual sex soon. You deserve it.
Really? That's a big jump from where we were.
I know. But I was just scared. I know I want my first time to be with you so why wait you know?
There's no reason for me to be nervous anymore.
I love that you feel that way but I don't want your first time to be in a tiny shower on a random day. I want it to be special.
Awh, really? Are you sure? It will be special as long as it's with you.
I know, but I want you to have it as a memory that you'll never forget. I want it to be truly special.
Plus there's a billion other things we can do beforehand.
Things like this.
Ahh! Hey!, I wasn't ready for that!
Your body says otherwise. Your nipple is as hard as can be.
Oh yeah? What about this then?
Ohhh.. She's squeezing her hands on my dick. I didn't even realize I was that hard already.
I guess I'm caught red handed.
I guess we're both ready then. What do you want to do with me?
I had an idea. It's a bit weird to explain just do what I say. I need you to turn around and bend over.
Okay.. Did you change your mind about us having sex?
No no. Trust me.
You know I do.
Jesus [g1]. Your ass is amazing. I'm a lucky man.
I could just stare at this all day.
I wouldn't mind that.
But I have other plans. Don't freak out but I'm going to put my dick between your legs.
Ohhh [mcf].. That feels funny. It feels so warm between my legs. It's rubbing against my you know what.
I feel a lot of heat coming from you as well. That's the point though. Just hold your thighs together.
I'm going to thrust and it will feel good for both of us, okay?
Okay that sounds great. I've never even thought about doing it this way before.
Are you ready?
Mhmmm, I'm ready.
Oh wow [mcf]. That feels really good.
I don't know if I'm just horny as fuck or her thighs are this amazing but this is incredible.
God [g1]. Your thighs feel amazing. Your pussy is so wet too that it's making everything so much better.
Mmmmmmmmm. You feel so good rubbing against me.
I'm already about to finish. We've barely started anything.
Ohhhh! Holy shit!
What happened? Did you cum?
Ohh... Mhmmmm. I couldn't hold it anymore. That felt way too good.
Wow, was it really that good?
Big time, yeah. The combination of how sexy the view was and how wet and hot you were. It was too much for me.
I'm proud of myself. That's amazing.
It's your turn now though.
It's fine baby. I don't mind just getting you off.
I'm not selfish. I want you to feel good too.
I feel fantastic. Getting you off like that makes me feel really good. I'm exhilerated.
Plus after what we did yesterday I couldn't function as a human for half the day.
Are you sure? I really don't mind.
How about before we go to bed tonight we do something again?
I still have to unpack so I need my legs to work.
Deal. Thanks for that, it was seriously one of the best things I've ever felt.
Just imagine when we do the real thing.
I have the best girlfriend. I love you babe.
I love you too baby. Now come on. Let's get clean.
15 minutes later
So how would you rate our first joint shower?
Easily the best shower I've ever had.
Ha, same. You know we could really save some water if we do it more often.
Yep, that's why we should do it. To save the environment.
Haha, Exactly. So same time tomorrow?
I'll be here.
Knock, Knock.
Oh, that must be the other girls.
I'm still in my towel. Can you let them in?
Yes I can.
Thanks babe.
I'm excited to see them. I wonder how Shauna is going to react. Hopefully they didn't tell her yet.
[am] is awful at keeping secrets. So I wouldn't be surprised if she accidentally did.
Knock, Knock
I'm coming!
Hey girls, how was breakfast?
As good as it could be without you. Where'd you go?
I had to go meet my new coach. It went really well.
Well that's good. We missed you though.
You were meant to wake me up last night after we got everyone. What happened with that?
I knew how tired you were. Plus we weren't up for long.
What's with the hostility? We're here in our new town. Come, give me a hug you two.
Mmm, you girls smell really nice.
Jasmine took us to a store after breakfast and we tried a few different perfumes. Do you like it?
Yeah, you two smell great.
So what do you think of Damien's house Shauna?
It's nice. Better than any place I've ever lived.
Oh good, she still doesn't know. I don't know how [am] kept that secret.
I agree. I think it's amazing. Wouldn't you just love to live here?
Compared to dorm rooms absolutely. If I had a house like this I'd invite you all to stay in it. That would be amazing.
It really would be. Well I'm gonna go check on [g1].
She's in the bathroom right now.
Well I'll wait on her. Have fun you two.
So what's up? Did you like your coach?
She was really cool. She really answered a lot of questions I had too.
But you said you'd like to live in a place like this. What room would you pick if you did?
It's hard to say. But I usually prefer a room near a bathroom and I prefer smaller rooms.
Really? I think there's one just like it here. Follow me.
Like it?
It's about as good as an empty room could get.
Would you live in a room like this?
Of course I would. There's nothing wrong with it. What's up? You and [am] are acting strange.
I bet Damien would let you stay here if you asked. He seems to really like you.
What if I told you it's not Damien's?
What do you mean?
This is my house.
Really?? That's awesome! I'm happy for you.
Happy for me? What about yourself? [am] and [g1] are going to be living here. I want you to live here too. One big family.
Are you serious!?
Yes! This is our place.
And I can stay here?
I'd be very offended if you didn't.
Thank you! This is amazing. I get to live with you guys!
Also don't worry about the no furniture thing.
We get to furnish it ourselves and WVM will pay for it. Which means you get to decorate your own room.
Meaning no matter what happens. Even if you have a bad day. You get to come here to all of us who love and support you.
I'm in shock right now. I was so worried about who my roommate was going to be. But it's just you guys!
How long have you known??
Damien told me about it yesterday. I've only known for about 20 hours.
This is amazing.. I can't believe it.
No one is watching us. So I'm just going to...
Mwah!
I'm so happy. These past 20 hours have all been so fantastic. We became a thing and now we get to live together. There's no way this isn't a dream.
Well if it is a dream we should make the most of it. This place has a basement we could sneak to for a minute. If you know what I'm saying.
Coast is still clear. You lead the way.
Be quiet and careful. We don't have long before they come looking for us.
Huh, I like it down here. I might just take the basement myself.
It would make it easier for us to do things like this.
True, so what do you want to do?
Well last time you said you almost came just from me deep throating. I want to try it again. I think I could do it better.
There's no such thing as better but you're free to try.
Just wait and see. Nothing ever happened from our last bet but want to make a new one?
Sure, what is it?
If I can make you cum in less than 3 minutes you have to take me out on a date.
You know I would take you anyway right?
That's no fun though. Come on. I make you cum in less than 3 minutes and I get to choose where we go.
You're starting to sound like a porn ad... Deal. I win either way.
Yeah, me too honestly.
You just shouldn't wear pants. It would make my job easier.
Who knows, you've never lived me with me before. I usually sleep nude.
You shouldn't have told me that.
I know exactly what I'm doing telling you that.
Mmmmhmmm. Well I guess you'll be waking up to me soon.
I can't wait.
And I can't wait to get these shorts off of you.
Much, much better. So when does the timer start?
I'll be fair. As soon as your lips touch the timer starts.
Hmmm, okay. Are you ready?
I don't think I'll ever not be ready.
Have to focus... Try not to think about how good that feels..
Damn Shauna.. All she's doing is playing with the tip and I'm already losing my cool.
How is she so good at this?
Mmmmm...
Focus.. Focus.. focus.. foc...
Oh no... There's no way I'm going to make it through 3 minutes of this.
Wait...
Why do I care? I would take Shauna wherever she wanted to go anyway.
I need to drop my competitive side and just enjoy this moment with this beautiful woman.
Ohhh.... Fuck yes Shauna. Hold it right there.
Do you like having that much of me in you?
Mmmhmmmmm.
Oh man, I'm so worked up right now. I don't know if it's because of how amazing it feels or because we could get caught any moment..
I'm gonna take control now. Just stay exactly how you are, okay?
Mmmmhmmm...
Oh Shauna... This feels fucking fantastic.
She's doing that thing with her tongue again. She knows exactly how to get me off.
She's barely even flinching with my thrusts.. She's incredible.
I'm close to my boiling point. I can go ahead and finish or try to hold out for as long as I can. There's no way I'm making it past 3 minutes.
MMMmmm!
Ahhh.. Holy shit!
I just came down her throat without warning her. I hope she's not mad.
Hmmm... Wow, [mcf] that was a lot.
I'm sorry. I should have warned you, I just got so into it that I could barely think.
Ohhh... That's senstitive.
Jesus.. This girl just doesn't stop. She knows all the buttons to push.
Phew.. I didn't think you were going to stop.
Hehe.. There was some left. I didn't want it to go to waste.
You're not mad at me for not warning you?
No silly. I could feel you starting to tense up in my mouth so I knew it was coming.
You're fucking perfect.
So when is our date?
What were you wanting to do? You won the bet. Anything you want we can do.
How about after everyone falls asleep tonight you come get me from my new room? I'll tell you where to go then.
Sounds perfect. As soon as everyone is asleep I'll come get you.
Great. I'll try not to be asleep this time.
Haha, that would be helpful.. Actually. I didn't mind the view I got last time.
What? Of these? You can see them anytime you want.
I'll repeat. You're fucking perfect.
And so are you. We should get back to [am] and [g1] before they get suspicious.
You're right. Let me throw my clothes back on and we'll head upstairs.
I still can't believe me and Shauna are doing this. I know I should feel insanely guilty but I don't.
There's true feelings between me and her.
There's true feelings between me and [g1] as well though. No matter what I'm going to have to let her know about me and Shauna sometime.
She deserves the truth. I just don't know how to tell her.
I'm sorry I didn't tell you sooner. I just found out yesterday and I wanted it to be a surprise.
It's okay! Does [am] and [g1] know?
Yes, I told them last night.
Can we go see them? I want to hug them.
Haha, of course we can. Come on.
I just don't know how to..
Everything is going to be okay.. I promise.
What are they talking about?
Hey guys...
Hey Shauna. Did [mcf] tell you yet?
Yes he did.. We're going to all be living together here!
Awh, you're teary eyed. Come here!
Our first hug as a family.
I'm so happy I'm going to be with you guys.
Isn't the house amazing?
It could be a cardboard box for all it matters. I'm just happy I'm here with you all.
Exactly. Us all being here makes it special.
It's nice to see all the girls I care about getting along so well.
BZZZ, BZZZ
Oh, my phone is vibrating. I wonder who it is.
Hey kid, it's Rachael. Just messaging you to let you know Anna just arrived at her hotel.
She told me to send this to you.
A very plain selfie. She's truly ready to be a mom.
Speaking of her being a mom, when can she expect to see you?
I'll be there sometime tonight. Around 9.
I'll let her know. Are you free tomorrow?
I can't say yet. I should be in the evening though.
Could you handle it if I sent another girl? That is if tonight goes well.
That should be fine. Have any photos of the woman in question?
Not at the moment. I'll send some later today.
I look forward to them. Bye Rach.
Wait! I just want to say to treat Anna right. She's going to be nervous. Use the same charm you had with me and you'll make her feel right at home.
Don't worry about that. I'll make sure she feels comfortable and leaves happy.
Great, I know I can count on you. Bye [mcf].
Was sort of hoping for another picture of Rachael. Oh well. I might ask for one tonight.
Hey! I said family hug. Why aren't you in it?
Sorry, I was just watching all my favorite people in the world be happy.
You're the reason all of us are happy. Without you none of us would be here.
You guys seriously give me too much credit.
And you seriously don't give yourself enough.
If it wasn't for you I would still be at home. Scared of the world and crying in my pillow.
You've brought me out of my shell and showed me what it's like to be loved and cared about.
You're never out of my thoughts. I care about you so much.
You've changed my life and I'm so lucky to have you. I love you [mcf].
I love you too [g1].
I'll go next. You saved my life.
I'll never be able to repay you for all you've done for me. You don't even know half of it.
We've been best friends for as long as I can remember and never once have I ever felt I couldn't rely on you.
There was no one else. You could have disregarded me like everyone else.. but you didn't.
You showed me I have value and it's okay to love myself. You made me human again. And I love you for it.
Wow guys.. I don't know what to say. I love you too Shauna.
My turn now.
How I view it.. My life didn't start until you came into it.
I was just another girl who didn't know what she wanted in life. No real motivations. Then you happened.
It was clear from then that my only goal in life was to raise you into a respectable and happy man.
But it turned out you were already that. You were already mature beyond your years and I'm pretty sure you protected me more than I protected you.
You already being the way you are allowed us to just be each other's friends. I don't think I've disciplined you a day in your life.
Even as a kid you knew how to make me forget about all of my problems.
There's no way for anyone to love something more than I love you. You changed my life in the best way possible.
You may not be mine.. But I'm insanely proud to call you my son.
Jesus guys.. I love you mom. I'd do anything for you.
I love you all. You girls are the three pillars in my life. I wouldn't be able to do this without each of you.
Speaking of family and all.. Where is Elizabeth?
Jasmine said she took off after she woke up.
I guess she's going to get her dorm and everything set up.
Oh yeah. Are we not going to invite her to stay here?
I don't know babe...
I understand, we'll talk about it later.
We need to celebrate. Plus I'm starving. How about we all go somewhere nice. My treat.
KNOCK, KNOCK
Oh hey Jasmine. What are you doing here?
Hey [mcf]. Just picking up the girls. How did meeting coach go?
It went well. What do you mean you're picking the girls up?
I'm taking them to get their nails done.
I told them I would earlier today. I'm going to use your restroom real quick.
I'm sorry [mcf]. If you're hungry I can stay home and cook you something.
No mom, It's fine. Go have a good time. Get pampered a little bit.
Are you sure? What are you going to eat?
I'm sure, I'll find something. Have a good time. You deserve it.
Thank you honey. I haven't been to one of these places in a long time.
Don't eat too much though. I'm going to cook you something tonight okay?
Okay, that would be nice. Just not breakfast again all right?
Ha, fair. I'll get everything I need while we are out. What would you like?
You got it. It will be the first meal made for us all as a family.
I'll see you later honey. I love you.
I love you too, have fun.
You can come with us if you want to.
I don't think I'd enjoy myself too much.
Sounds like someone who has never had a mani pedi before.
True, today isn't my day though.
Are you sure you're good babe? I can skip out and we can go get something to eat.
It's all right. I want to see my girls all glamoured up. What color are you going to go for?
Yellow of course. WVM spirit and all.
Good answer.
I think so too.
Mwah!
Shauna seems less put off by this kiss than yesterday's kiss.
She actually seems like she enjoys it.. Or she's just acting.
I'll see you soon. I love you.
I love you too. Be ready to model your nails for me when you get back.
You'll see plenty of them. Bye baby.
Listen.. As much as I love you and am happy to be here at WVM... My nails aren't going to be yellow.
Ha, that's fine. Yellow doesn't really go with your style. Get whatever you want.
I'll see you soon Shauna. Take care of [g1] and [am] for me.
You can count on me.
Are all the girls good to go?
Yep, the other two are outside.
Can you head out with them for a moment? I need to talk to [mcf].
Oh, uhh.. Sure.
Bye [mcf]. Are you going to be here when we get back?
I can't say. I have no clue.
I hope you are.
I'll leave a note if I go anywhere.
Good, I'll see you later [mcf]. Love you.
Love you too.
Thank you for taking them out Jasmine. They all really deserve some pampering.
All girls do.
So what did you need to talk about?
A few minutes after we leave. Zoe will come inside.
Who is Zoe?
The cheer captain. You're going to see her quite a bit so make a good impression.
That's it. I'm going to head out and take them now.
Final time asking. Can you really not tell me what they have planned?
I think they're just going to do a cheer routine for you and welcome you to WVM. Nothing major.
That's it? What was Coach going on about then?
I'll catch you later [mcf].
Oh! Damien said he's going to come by here soon. So be ready for him too.
Sounds good. Thanks again.
No problem.
Zoe... Hopefully this goes as innocently as Jasmine made it sound.
Just a simple cheer routine and then back to my normal day.
I really am starving though.
Knock, knock
Coming!
Well hello there.
Hey. It's nice to meet you. I'm [mcf].
It's a pleasure to meet you too! I want to speak on behalf of the whole cheer squad when I say that we're so excited to be able to cheer for you this year.
Damn, okay. She seems nice. I was just overthinking things.
The university president has made it my personal mission to make sure you have an enjoyable time here at WVM.
So if there is anything you need just come to me and I'll do whatever I can to help out.
That sounds great. I'm very happy here so far though.
That's great! I hope it stays that way.
Can you do me a favor?
Probably. What is it?
I just need you to go into a room for a minute while we move some stuff inside. It's a surprise.
Uhh... Sure. I guess I can do that.
Fantastic! We won't take long. I'll yell for you when we are finished.
Okay.. Sounds good.
Skrrrrrrrrrrrttt...!
What are they doing? It sounds like they're scraping 1000 nails on a single chalkboard.
If this house wasn't completely empty right now I'd be worried they might be stealing something.
I wonder how many girls are with her. I wonder how many guys are on the cheer team.
Knock, knock
Okay, we're all set.
That didn't take long.
I told you we wouldn't. I wouldn't lie to you.
Now come on. Follow me. It's show time.
Where are we going?
Your basement. It has the most space for us.
Okay, it really is just a cheer routine. That's nice though.
Lead the way.
Oh! Before we head down.
There's someone I want you to meet.
Bailey!! Come up here a second!
Coming!
Oh! Hey there [mcf]. It's great to finally meet you!
It's great to meet you too Bailey.
Please make it to where I don't have to cheer for a winless team and fake a smile on the sidelines like usual.
Ha, I'll do my best.
We have a surprise set up for you. I think you're going to enjoy it.
I'm sure I will.
Shall we go see it?
Let's do it.
'Whispering' Hey [mcf]. Close your eyes for a second.
Huh? Why?
'Whispering' Shhh. Just do it.
And just like that I'm nervous again.
Just follow the sound of my voice.
A few more steps...
And stop. Open your eyes!
Fuck... This doesn't seem like a cheer routine at all.
Surprise! You're going to initiate in all of our new cheerleaders!
Who is that? Why does she seem familiar?
Go ahead! Turn around Elizabeth!
[mcf]??? What are you doing here?!
Elizabeth?? What happened to your hair??
They had me dye it. What's going on?
What's the problem guys?
That's my girlfriend's sister. I need to talk to you and Bailey for a second.
What is she doing here? Why is she nude in my basement?
We thought it would be a good idea to have new cheerleaders be initiated in by you.
What do you mean initiate them? How?
If they pass all other tests then they would have to come to you.
They have to get the greenlight from you by... having sex with you. If they do a good job then they can be on the cheer team.
I thought you would like it. It's just for fun...
This isn't some random fling for fun at college. That's cheating on my girlfriend with her sister.
Well listen here! This wasn't my idea. This came straight from our university president. He said any girl that couldn't make you happy didn't deserve to be on the squad.
So either you swallow your pride and be a man or she's not a cheerleader anymore!
I'm going upstairs.
I'm sorry about her. She's not usually like that. She's just stressed out right now.
She has so many people in her ear telling her what she has to do for you.
She really thought you would like this. We didn't know she was related to your girlfriend.
I understand and I'm not blaming you guys. But this is way too far.
I'm gonna go talk to her. Make sure she's okay.
Okay, I'm going to talk to Elizabeth.
I'm so sorry [mcf]. I swear I didn't know this was their plan.
I believe you. Can you scoot over a bit? I want to sit and have a conversation with you.
Uhh. Sure. You're not upset?
No, not at all. Not at you anyway. I can tell by your reaction that you didn't know what was happening.
I really didn't. I just thought this would be the usual hazing you hear about. You know, like all the spanking and name calling sort of stuff?
Yeah, I thought I was just coming down here to watch a cheer routine.
Haha, yeah. I guess we both weren't quite expecting what we got then.
I liked you better as a red head.
Heh, yeah me too.
Can I ask you something? I don't want to cross any lines though.
I'm naked in your basement. I don't think there's any left to cross.
Good point. How much does cheerleading mean to you?
You have no idea. Cheerleading has always been my outlet.
How much has [g1] told you about her past? Like about our family?
Not much. She doesn't like talking about it. All I know is that your dad hasn't been a great father.
That's quite an understatement. I'd hardly call him a father.
He would call us sluts, ugly, unlovable. Anything mean you can think of, he's said to us.
That led to a lot of anger. In both me and [g1].
I let all that build up and I wasn't a happy kid. That was until I found cheer.
It let me express myself and get rid of a bunch of that anger and hurt.
I remember my first time cheering at an actual game.
I was standing on the sideline. Minding my own business doing my best to look like I belonged. Then out of nowhere a giant comes crashing into me and knocks me to the floor.
I felt so embarrassed. I remember my face getting so hot and just wanting to lay on the ground and try to be invisible.
I'm still sorry about that. I lost my balance diving for a ball going out of bounds.
That's when you picked me up and brought me over to the team's doctor to make sure I was okay.
An act like that to a girl that was in the mindset I was in was nothing short of god like.
After that I fell in love with cheer. I loved being at your games and seeing you win in the ways you have. It's everything I've ever wanted for you.
I know I've given you and [g1] a lot of grief growing up. I don't know why I did.
Well actually I do, it was for attention. Me and [g1] both didn't get much as children. So I guess we just crave for it now.
That explains why [g1] has been acting the way she has the past few days.
That girl loves you. Everytime she was with you she would come home with a huge smile.
I've even caught her reading books on how to be the perfect girlfriend. She even does the thing where you're her phone background and she writes your name all over her notebooks.
She even says your name in her sleep. She's crazy about you and I'm happy she has you to make her happy.
The reason I'm saying all that is because cheer is my you. It makes me happy, I study it, and it's all I think about.
Cheer was everything I needed growing up. It gave me confidence and strength when I had none.
I would love for that to continue here. I want to cheer you on especially. But I understand why you can't do this.
I don't understand. They say they're doing all of this to make me happy but all I want is for you to be able to do what you want to do unbridled by my decisions.
Have you met the uni president?
No, not yet.
The man thinks the world runs on sex. In his eyes sex is the problem and the solution.
He thinks if I can't please you in this way how can I be worthy of cheering for you?
That's completely asinine. You deserve to cheer here. I've never seen you miss a practice or let your squad down.
I had a great guy to look up to in that way.
You shouldn't be nude in any basement. You're a beautiful woman who is better than this.
Cheer is all I have. I don't have any friends and my sister hates me.
First off, we're friends. And about your sister, It doesn't have to be that way. College can be a fresh start.
The things you said about your father, she went through that too. She could have used a big sister like you to help her through it.
You don't have a clue how awful I feel about the way I've treated her.
I'm sure she regrets a lot of things she's said about you too. You two need to sit down and hash it out.
You're family in a foreign place. You should be close not enemies.
You don't need cheer to be your outlet. You would have us.
You're right [mcf]....
Hey... I'm sorry for what I said earlier. I was out of line.
It's fine. I'm sure you're stressed out.
You have no idea. It's been a rough few days.
Couldn't you just tell the president that we did it?
Maybe... I'm here on a cheer scholarship though. If he found out I lied to him it wouldn't end well for me.
It's okay [mcf]. I'll be fine.
So does that mean you're not going to do it?
I'll do it.
Wait, what?
I said I'll do it. You and me might not always get along. That doesn't mean you weren't always there to cheer me on though.
You were always there, every single game. You've worked so hard for it and you deserve this and I don't want to be the reason you can't have it.
If everyone here promises that this never leaves this room, I'll do it.
I promise.
Me too! Lips are sealed!
Liz? What about you?
[mcf]... I'm shocked. You don't have to do this.
I do, we can do this. We will never speak about it and no one will ever know about it. This is a one time thing.
After this you have to promise me that you'll try to patch things up with [g1]. She needs her sister and I think you need her too.
Oh my god thank you [mcf].. I promise.
There is one more thing though.
Oh no.. What?
She has to do all the work. You're not allowed to do anything.
Why?
It's the whole point of it. To see if the cheerleaders can please you.
Okay.. Anything else?
I think that's it.
Okay. Let's do this then. Can we pull the table out from this corner?
Uhh sure, Bailey help them pull the table.
Okay this is good. Thanks Bailey.
Yeah, thank you.
No problem, I'm just happy that this is working out. You guys were giving me anxiety.
So? What are you waiting for? Lay down.
Liz seems a little too happy about how this is playing out.
Okay, I guess it's now or never.
Now I'm not allowed to help you at all. But I think helping take off his shorts will be okay.
I'll get his shirt.
I think he's ready. I can see something growing in there.
Holy shit!!
What the fuck [mcf]?! I knew you'd probably have a big one from seeing you in sweatpants but wow!
Are you sure I'm not allowed to help??
I thought I was jealous of her before! That's crazy big.
Hop on up cowgirl!
Are you sure about this [mcf]?
I'm sure.
Look at that dick, he is clearly sure.
Bailey, pull your tits out for him.
Just lay back [mcf]. I'll take care of everything.
So what do you think [mcf]? Are you more a fan of smaller perky breasts like mine or are you a jugs like Elizabeth kind of man?
Liz's are great. They're fun to look at.
Awh, fair enough.
While Liz's are great, I like perky ones more.
Great. I'll keep that in mind.
[mcf]... I'm going to stick it in now.
Oooh, I want to get a good view.
Yeah, me too.
Ahhhhhhh...
Holy shit, she's taking it like a champ.
How does that feel [mcf]?
It feels great.
Mmmm. Is she nice and wet and tight? Doesn't it feel so great to be in her warm pussy?
Would you like it if I got behind her and licked your balls while you stuff her pussy?
Woah, calm it down there Bailey. This is Liz's turn. You'll get a chance later.
We're going to leave you two to do it.
How will you know we did it?
Well your dick is currently in her.. That's pretty good proof.
How about we leave you two alone and she comes back upstairs with a nice facial.
I'll help her clean it up.
That works with me...
Have fun you two. Come on Bailey.
Your dick feels so good [mcf].
You're not all the way down yet.
I don't know if I can.
There's only one way to find out.
Ahhhhh... Oohh... That's so fucking big.
There's no way I can ride this thing. It's making my legs weak.
Just try your best. This already feels really good.
Okay, I'll try to rock on it.
Ahhhhhhhhhh... Holy fuck [mcf]. You're turning my body into jelly.
Just keep doing what you're doing. That feels fucking great.
You're damn right it does
Liz... I'm about to cum.
Oh! Stand up, you have to do it on my face.
That was great by the way. My legs are wobbly as can be. I didn't think I could hold myself up much longer.
Thank you again. I owe you big time. Now let's finish this and you finish all over my face. Give me all you got. Show them I did a good job.
Ohhhh.. Holy shit!
How the fuck did I still have so much left after doing things with [g1] and Shauna?
How the fuck did I still have so much after doing things with [g1]?
Wow.. Was it that good?
It definitely wasn't bad.
After we walk upstairs and show them. We never speak of this again.
I'm going to have [g1] talk to you and you're going to do whatever it takes to regain her trust.
I would like that very much.
Me too, let's go show them so they know.
Right behind you.
Oh damnnn.. A load as big as the cock it came from. Good job Elizabeth.
Thank you. Where did Bailey go?
I sent her home. She got a little too weird for me after seeing [mcf]'s dick.
I think she's in love.
Can you blame her?
No comment. I will say I did not expect that from this though.
That's [mcf]. He always surprises.
I'm gonna go get cleaned up.
But you look so sexy with all that on you. Fine. I need to talk to [mcf] alone for a minute anyway.
So how was she? Did she earn it?
You saw the proof. She's the best cheerleader I've ever known and you're lucky to have her on your squad.
Now you said it's your job to keep me happy right?
Yes, I did.
I'm happy now, but let me tell you this. If I hear anything about Liz not being treated fairly or harassed by anyone. That will change real quick.
Oooo.. You're feisty as well? You're after my own heart.
I'm not joking. If anything happens to her you're going to answer for it. You got me?
Don't worry, she'll be treated like a queen.
Now I'm gonna call Coach and tell her we're done here so she'll be here soon.
And if you need me I'll be at the court with a few of the other ladies.
See you soon [mcf].
Oh, and go WVM!
Thank god that's over. For now anyways.
I trust that they won't tell anyone. It would hurt them just as much as it would hurt me.
Why are you standing here staring like that?
Oh, I was just thinking.
Are you okay? Are we going to be okay?
Yeah, everything is fine. What happened down there happened. It was just to give you what you deserve.
You don't know how appreciative I am. Thank you so much. I owe you.
Just be ready to cheer for me. That's how you'll pay me back.
That I can do. My legs are still weak.. Can we sit down for a second?
Sure..
I can't... If [g1] ever found out she would hate me.
That doesn't mean this is over. I'm going to talk to the uni president and get this all straightened out.
You don't have to do that.. I'll be okay.
It's the least I can do. If he wants me to be happy then it's the least he can do as well.
All right. I can't say I'm mad at you for that or anything. I guess me and Bailey will head out.
You don't have to go.
There's still a lot we have to do to get ready for the season. I'm sorry that this is how we met.
Yeah, me too. How about we just pretend this never happened and start fresh next time.
Sure.. I would like that. I'm going to call Coach and tell her we're done here. So she'll be here soon.
If you need me for anything I'll be at the court.
Bye guys.. Sorry again.
It's okay, tell Bailey I said bye too.
Bye Zoe.
You should go get dressed Liz. We have to talk.
Okay, I'll be right back.
Hey Liz, I'm going to be in the next room over when you're done getting dressed just come over there.
Okay, I'm almost done.
Man, what the fuck was that? From thinking it was a cheer routine into being bribed to fuck my girlfriend's sister.
I'll get all this cleared up. Liz deserves to be on the cheer squad. I'm sure after i talk to the pres he will agree.
Knock, knock
I'm in here.
So that never happened right?
That's right.
Well, what did happen was you opened up to me about your feelings.
I know you're a sweet girl deep down. Your father might have been an asshole and you nor [g1] deserved that.
But this is your chance to have a fresh start away from all those emotions. You can be your true self.
I know.. I just don't think [g1] will believe me.
I'll convince her. You've put her through a lot. I'm not saying it will be easy or fast. But it's not too late to fix your relationship with her.
Do you really believe that?
With all my heart, I do.
So how do we start?
I'm going to talk to her. Get the idea in her head and see how she responds.
From there we just do what feels right. You're free to stay here by the way.
Is [g1] going to be okay with that?
Don't worry about that. After they get back I'm going to talk to her about everything.
I've known you pretty much my whole life. I consider you family. I'm going to fight for you.
Thank you [mcf]...
Now that also means you're going to have to change as well.
No more calling her names, no more taunting, no more flirting with me.
I promise. I'll be the best sister to her.
Good. I'll talk to you more about this after I talk to her okay?
Okay, I'm excited.
Knock, knock
Come in! We're in here!
Oh hey coach. How are you doing?
I'm doing great. How did meeting Zoe go?
Interesting to say the least.
Ha, I'm sure.
Can I talk to you alone for a minute?
Sure. Liz I will be right back.
Take your time. I have a lot to think about anyway.
So.. I have a present for you.
Is it a shiny new playbook for me to study?
Good guess.
Advanced micropipette techniques for cell physiology?
What? You want it to say in big bold letters 'BASKETBALL PLAYBOOK PLEASE READ'?
No one wants to read this for fun. It's discreet.
True actually, I wouldn't look twice at that book.
Just skim through it, it's nothing crazy. I don't expect you to know it all in one night.
I'll get it memorized as soon as possible. Thank you for bringing this to me.
It was my pleasure. How did the cheerleaders treat you? Did you like their show?
Show? Oh. Their cheer routine?
Yeah, they said they had a special one just for you and that you had to judge the new girl. How'd she do?
Uhh.. She did well.
That's great to hear.
She doesn't need to know what actually happened. I don't think it would help anyone for her to know.
Knock, Knock, Knock.
Oh! That must be Damien. I told him I was headed here.
Come in!
Hey-o! How's it going you two?
As great as can be.
How are you liking life here so far at WVM [mcf]?
Yeah it's going great, feels like home already.
That's fantastic.
Yes it is. Let's hope we can keep it that way.
It's not bad. It's always taken me time to adjust to new places. I'll be good.
Just let us know if there is anything we can do to make you feel more at home.
Yes, please do. Anything you need we are here to help.
I'm fine guys. You've done plenty as is.
I don't want to sound like I'm on a high horse.. But I assumed I'd be meeting a lot more people today.
What do you mean?
Like the president of the college. Or some fans maybe.
Oh you will. No one knows you're here yet. No one outside of school staff and people we trust anyway.
As far as the public knows.. you don't arrive until tomorrow morning. So expect a few people to hound you at practice tomorrow.
The school president is flying back from his vacation now. He'll probably want to meet up with you tonight.
We just wanted you to be able to come here and relax a bit before the media gets attached to you.
Oh okay, cool. I appreciate that.
Honestly one thing that would make me feel more relaxed is if I could get on a court. Shoot some hoops.
Hey, I know I was too tired yesterday but I feel good now. Want to head to a court and play a bit?
Really? Yeah I'd love to... I probably need to study the playbook though.
That can wait until later tonight. I'd like to see you play in person myself.
Okay, I'm down then. Where's the closest basketball court?
Well there's ours. But it's not open until tomorrow morning. They're still finishing some last minute touches on it.
There's the one at the middle school. I can get us in there.
That works with me.
Me too, I don't know where it is though.
I'll drive us all there.
Perfect, thank you.
You're welcome. Let's get going. No use in burning daylight.
10 minutes later
Not bad for a middle school.
That's what I'm saying. Other than the markings.
Yeah that three pointer is pretty much a free throw anywhere else.
Quit being picky you two. It's all we have right now.
No complaints here, it's great. It's bringing back a bunch of old memories.
Good, while you two reminisce I'm gonna change into something more appropriate.
There's usually a ball in the stands, see if you can find one [mcf].
Yep, I got one.
Pass it here.
I can't believe we're finally here. Ever since I learned you were coming here.. I've been waiting for this day.
Well we're here now. Impress me. Hit a full court shot and I'll buy you lunch for a week.
Don't tempt me with easy food. I hit these in my sleep.
All right. Make it and I buy you food for the whole week. Miss it and take the whole team out for lunch after practice tomorrow.
Deal. Now watch this.
If he makes this first try I'll be genuinely impressed.
Damn it! So close!
Welp, egg on my face. Got the ball stuck on my very first shot.
You were close though. It was a respectable attempt.
Don't give me that, I should've made that.
Listen, we'll split the bill tomorrow. How about that?
Nah, a bet is a bet. Enjoy the free lunch.
What did you two do?
Damn, you changed fast. And we already got the ball wedged.
Ha, let's hope that's not indicative of things to come.
If only I had two giants capable of reaching great heights to help me get this down.
I got it. I don't think I've jumped in like two weeks.
Way to make it look easy.
It's what I do.
All right, now that we have a ball. What do you want to do?
I want to see something.
Okay.. What would that be?
I've watched a ton of film on [mcf]. He's the most logical player I've ever seen.
He never goes for a flashy play. He plays with his brain and not his body.
I think I know where this is going. I'll just stand over here.
Now that logical playstyle is great. But this is a new league. We still play other D1 schools.
Everything is faster. Sometimes you don't have time to think, you just have to rely on your instincts.
So I just want to do a little lesson.
But first answer this.. Why do you play?
I love the game.
Deeper than that. What are your motivations? What goals do you have that you can achieve through this?
I want to take care of those that I care about.
Fair, now I'm gonna set a scene. It's the 4th quarter. You're down by 1 and there's only 5 seconds remaining on the clock.
Scouts fill the stands. They're all watching and judging you. This is your chance to lock your ticket for a lottery draft pick.
That means millions of dollars. You'll be able to take care of anyone you want to.
You have the ball, you're driving down the court. Only one man in front of you.
That one man will do whatever it takes to take that away from you.
Everything you've worked for, he wants to ruin. What do you do?
Well.. I think I wou-
No! No thinking! Just do!
If someone was trying to stop me from giving [am] what she deserves then I wouldn't hold anything back.
If that's how he wants it...
5 seconds... No time for anything fancy, just straight ahead.
I already have him on his back foot. All it would take is a little move to the left and he'd be on the ground. I could also just pull up a shot from here.
Oh wait.. I'm not supposed to be thinking.
No brain play is to just go straight through him with it.
He's going straight up. No chance of getting fouled unless he smacks my hand.
Damn Damien, that was quick.
Just because you got a hand on it doesn't mean it isn't going in though.
Easy as ever. Damien did well though.
Damn, okay. I've seen you do that shit on film but it happens even faster in person.
I thought I had you.
It was close.
Yeah, apparently I'm really good at close.
You were quick. I'm impressed.
You were running right at me. I just had to go up with you.
Yeah.. But you kept your balance and stayed straight. Usually I'd have to lean into guys and draw a foul but that wasn't an option.
Sounds like you were thinking in my instincts drill.
It worked out...
Yeah, I guess it did.
That was impressive. Both of you.
It really was!
Huh? Who is that?
Oh wow, when did she show up?
It's always nice to have girls around to see you do something cool.
Come here [mcf]. I want to introduce you to my daughter.
This is my daughter Natalie
Hey, it's very nice to meet you. My name is [mcf].
Trust me, I know who you are. It's great to meet you.
I'll leave you two to get yourselves acquainted.
That dunk was really cool. I hope to see that in a real game.
Ha, yeah me too. I'll do my best to make it happen.
You liking it here so far? Any complaints?
I don't have any complaints. Everyone's been great to me.
That's great. How do you like my mom?
She's cool. I can tell she cares and I don't know. I want to do well for her.
She's talked about you non-stop. I'm just happy that she's happy.
[mcf]??? What are you doing here??
Oh hey Bailey. We were just about to play around a little bit. What are you doing here?
Our gym is closed so I was coming here. Can I watch you guys play?
Well we actually need a fourth.. Either of you ladies want to play?
Sure, I'm down to play.
I'll cheer you guys on. If that's cool with you.
That's very cool with me. Give me a preview of what to expect in real games.
Yay! Focus on the game but look at me when you can!
So whose team am I on?
I have something in mind. Make it fair and fun. Follow me.
How was she?
What do you mean?
Do you like her? My daughter?
Yeah she's cool. Uhh.. I had an idea.
What is it?
Me and Damien vs Coach and Natalie.
That's hardly fair. Don't you think?
Me and you can not cross the three point line on offense and can't go past the three line on defense.
Oooh. That sounds fun. That good with you Natalie?
Yeah that sounds fun. Can I guard [mcf]?
Awh.. Sure. I'll guard Damien.
15 minutes later
Man, Natalie is playing me tight. I assumed she would be kind of awkward or bumbly.
She's basically hugging me as we play.
I guess that's what happens when your mom is a basketball coach.
Me and Damien haven't missed yet. I don't intend for that to change.
I really do want to impress. After all I am a shooting guard.
Natalie lagged behind me there. I should have an easy fade shot.
Yeah she's not making it in time. Now just to focus and hit the shot.
Oh shit, she jumped and is headed straight toward me. I'm already off balance and leaning back.
Woo! Go [mcf]!
Fuck, we're going down. Every muscle in my body wants to turn sideways to protect myself but I don't want Natalie to get hurt.
If I just take the landing and land on my back I'll be fine. It will hurt but at least she'll be fine.
Holy shit!! Aghhhhh!
Oh my god! I'm so sorry!
[mcf]!? Are you okay??
Her knee feels like it was just surgically attached to my dick.
I think I'm gonna throw up.
[mcf].. What's wrong?? Are you okay?
I'm fine. She just landed somewhere sensitive.
I'm so sorry [mcf].. I was just trying to block your shot.
Holy fuck my stomach is in knots from that.
Mhmm.. It's fine. Accidents happen. I just need a minute.
Damien. Help me take him to the nurse.
What? No. I don't need a nurse. It's just a nut shot. I'll be fine in a few minutes.
I just need to lay right here for a bit.
No, you need to see the nurse. What if you're hurt?
The president would kill me if you got hurt the day before practice starts. [mcf], please go get checked out.
Girls, I'm fine. Just give me a minute I promise.
Please [mcf]. I'd feel so awful if you were injured. Please go make sure.
Come on man. Appease the girls. I'd feel better if you got checked out too.
All of you just won't take no for an answer huh? If it will ease everyone's mind, let's go.
I'm so sorry [mcf].
It's fine Natalie. I've been hurt way worse before. It's just a part of the game.
Just maybe next time we play we'll get you some knee pads because those things are dangerous.
I'm sorry, I didn't mean to.. My body just sorta threw my knees up.
I know, I know. I'm just joking with you. Everything is just fine.
It's kind of my fault anyway. I made you fall on me instead of falling to my side. I didn't want you to get hurt.
Oh.. [mcf]. You should've just let me fall...
Not gonna happen.
He's going to be fine. Every guy has been in his spot. It just takes some time.
Nonetheless, let's get to the nurse.
Here we are. Nurse said she'd be here in a second.
What's wrong Bailey?
I'm just worried. I don't want you to be hurt.
You'll see. I'm fine. Thanks for caring though.
Of course. Thank you for coming to the nurse.
Go ahead and lay down on the bed.
Do you need anything? Anything at all?
Yes I do.
What? I'll do anything you need me to do.
I need you to relax and forgive yourself. You didn't do anything wrong.
But everyone is so excited about you. What if you're hurt and can't play?
I'm not hur-.. Mmmmm..
Fuck, my stomach is cramping up. How hard did she land on me?
What's wrong [mcf]?
Nothing, my stomach just cramped some. It's nothing to worry about. It's normal.
Are you sure?
Positive, seriously girls. Stop worrying.
All right.. We'll try.
We're going to be in the waiting room. If you need anything at all just have the nurse get us.
You don't have to wait on me. I'd feel better if you girls went on with your day.
We can stay [mcf]. Seriously.
No, I'm sure you two have plenty to do today. If I need either of you I'll call okay?
Okay.. Is it okay if I come by your practice tomorrow? Just to check on you?
Sure, I'm going to be fine but I don't mind you checking in.
Great, I'll see you then [mcf]. It was nice meeting you.
You too Natalie. I'll see you at practice as well Bailey.
Bright and early. Get better [mcf].
No, I just want you to go home and forget about it. Everything is fine. You have other things to worry about. I don't want to be on that list.
Okay.... I'll see you around [mcf].. It was nice meeting you.
You too Natalie. I'll see you later Bailey.
Bright and early. Get better [mcf].
Well hello there. What brings you here today?
Had a little incident. Just a knee to the groin and they freaked out. Wanted to make sure I was okay.
Well that's no good. How much pain are you in?
It's not too bad. Just cramping in my stomach.
Sounds about right, well I'll give you a minute just to rest a bit and see if it goes away. If it gets worse just hit the button on your bed.
I will. Thank you.
No problem sweety.
It's already easing up some. I'll just lay here for a bit and then let them know I'm good to go.
It was nice of them to worry so much about me. It's silly that I'm here but oh well.
At least the bed is comfy. Man, I'm still tired. Sleeping on that floor wasn't really that great.
I'm here anyway. Might as well take a nap. They'll wake me up in a few minutes anyway.
Mhmm. Just a quick nap.
Zzzzzz...
Agh! Just leave!
Hmm??
If I'm such a bitch then just fucking leave!
What's happening?
Where am I?
Get the fuck out of my house you crazy bitch!
What the fuck?
Get the fuck out!!
Who is that girl?
Oh baby, oh no. Come here.
Baby? What kind of dream is this?
Everything's okay. Mommy and Daddy are just playing.
Mommy? She can't be..
Come here baby boy. Everything is okay.
I love you. No matter what. You know that right?
CRASH!
Dad? Why is he slamming things around?
Uh oh, Daddy is getting a little out of hand again. Go on back to bed and I'll be in there in a minute to tuck you in baby.
I SAID GET THE FUCK OUT!!
Woah.. Oh, I'm back at the nurse.
That felt so real. Was it?
Was that really my mom? Did my dad actually do those things?
Fuck, why did I have to have that dream.
My chest feels so tight.
Oh.. [g1] is here. How long have I been here?
It's crazy how quick her presence can calm me down. Her just peacefully laying on my chest and I'm grounded back to reality.
Psss. [g1].
Hmmm??
Wake up. I'm up.
Hey baby. How are you feeling?
Way better now. How long have you been here? What time is it?
Not too long. Maybe a few hours.
I'm sorry. I just meant to take a nap.
You have nothing to be sorry about. I was very much enjoying laying here with you.
I love you [g1].
I love you more.
Why is it so dark in here? I want to see your beautiful face.
I had the nurse turn all the lights off. Except the one behind you, it wouldn't turn off so I threw a blanket around it.
Here, I'll put it off.
Let there be light. I'll never get tired of seeing your face in front of mine.
You're just so beautiful. Thank you for being here.
I'm always gonna be by your side. I'm just happy you're okay.
Oh! Did you get your nails done? How did they turn out?
Ha, About that...
Damien called Jasmine while I was getting mine done. She said that you got hurt and was here.
So I dropped everything and ran here.
Oh, I feel awful babe. I'll take you right now to get them finished.
Don't feel bad. Nails don't matter. I just wanted to make sure you're okay.
I appreciate that so much, but seriously. Let me take you to get them finished. You deserve it.
But [mcf]. I'd honestly rather just lay here with you.
I don't deserve you. You're perfect.
You absolutely do deserve me. Are you sure you're okay babe? You look a little flush still.
Yeah I'm fine. It's just, I had a weird dream.
What kind of dream?
It's hard to explain. I don't want to sound stupid.
I promise you won't. Tell me please.
It was about my mom.
[am]? What about her?
No, my real mom. I had a dream, I don't know if it's something that really happened or I just dreamt it.
I was in a hallway with her. Her and my dad were yelling at each other.
It felt so real. I felt scared.
He threw a chair at her. When she hit the ground she saw me and told me everything would be okay.
She hugged me and told me to go back to bed. Then I heard a crashing noise and woke up.
I don't know what to think about it. I always thought my dad was a saint. I'm just confused.
I'm so sorry. I'm here for you.
Do you know anything about her?
No, not really. My dad always hid everything about her.
Maybe you should ask [am] if she knows anything.
Yeah, I should. Thanks [g1].
Uhh.. While we're on the topic of dads. Can we talk about yours?
Why??
After you left I talked to Elizabeth. She told me about some of the awful things your father has done.
I'm sorry I didn't tell you.
No, no. Don't be. I understand.
I just didn't want you to think I had too much baggage or something.
What all did she tell you?
Just about some of the things he would say and how he treated you two.
I'm glad she told me. I'm glad you're far away from him and with me. I won't let anyone treat you like that again.
I love you... You're going to make me cry.
I want you to know that you're safe with me. Those days are over. You're a stunning girl with the biggest heart I've ever seen.
There's one more thing. Like I said, I talked to Elizabeth. She wants to try and fix things between you two.
She seemed entirely genuine. And deep down I think you need your sister.
So don't get mad.. but I told her she can live with us as long as she treats you how you deserve to be treated.
Oh.. That's not the response I expected.
So you're cool with that?
Of course. I was thinking about having that talk with her anyway. I was just scared to initiate it.
But you just always seem to know exactly what I need. It's incredible.
I never want to let you go.
Those workouts are paying off. I can actually tell you're squeezing now.
Better watch out. A few more months and I'll be coming for your spot on the basketball team.
I believe it. As much as I love laying here with you. We should head home. Let them know I'm okay.
Ugh.. You're right. They were really worried.
Do you need any help?
No, I'll be good. I'm still sore but I'm fine.
10 minutes later
That walk was actually pretty bad. I'm still really sore. Natalie has some bony knees.
[mcf]! You're home! How are you?
I'm fine. Sorry for making all of you worry.
Where did the mattresses come from?
We figured you'd want to rest when you got home so we went and got mattresses. We have to sleep somewhere tonight also.
Oh wow, these are comfy.
Come join us [mcf].
Uhh. I need to talk to [am] about something first.
What's wrong?
It's nothing. Just a dream I had about my mom.
It just has me a bit confused. I want to see if [am] has any answers.
Sorry for being a party pooper.
No, no. I'm sorry to hear that, I hope she does.
[g1].. Would you mind telling Shauna while I tell [am]?
Sure babe.
I'll be right back.
Mom?
[mcf]! How are you feeling? Are you okay?
I'm completely fine. The girls I was with just overreacted.
Uhh.. Can we talk about something?
That sounds serious.. What happened?
Well.. I had a dream. It was about my dad and biological mom.
I don't know if it was just a dream or I relived a memory.
I just saw them fighing, dad was being abusive.
I guess I'm just asking if you know anything. I'm just really confused about it all.
Uhh... Are you still hungry? I'll tell you everything I know over dinner okay?
Sure, is everything okay mom?
Of course honey. I just wasn't expecting that. You deserve to know all that I do. I knew you'd be curious eventually.
What does she know? That's very ominous.
We went by a cool looking place close by. We should try it out.
Go get the girls and we'll walk there.
10 minutes later
Thank you for taking us here.
Yeah, thanks guys.
Don't mention it. Thank you guys for being here.
Are you okay with [g1] and Shauna hearing everything? We can talk in private if you want to.
No, I want them here.
Okay. what do you want to know?
Have you ever met my mom?
Yes.. But not before your dad passed away. She got in contact with me and wanted to see you.
It was back when we were still in that mobile home. You were at practice all day and came home and fell asleep.
That's when she showed up. She sang to you while you slept. She got really emotional and had to leave.
For a long time after that she would keep in touch. Always check in on you.
She told me she even went to a few of your games to watch you play.
Why didn't she ever let me know?
She didn't want to complicate your life. She saw how happy we were and she still wasn't in a good place.
It hurt her more than you know.
How long has it been since you last spoke to her?
It's been a while. Over a year. I've tried to call her but haven't gotten an answer.
What about my dad?
What about him specifically?
I always thought he was the greatest man to ever live. Did he abuse her?
Oh.. [mcf]. Your father was a troubled man.
What do you mean?
I'm not saying he was a bad person. He had good intentions.
He just had a lot of demons. He had a lot of anger in him and he didn't know how to handle it.
He was a good dad for the most part. He would never do anything to hurt you. He had a drinking problem though.
I understand. You don't have to go into details on that one.
Okay. Do you have any other questions?
Do you think she would want to meet me?
Who wouldn't want to meet you? She's your mother. Of course she would.
No, you're my mom. You've been there for me all of my life. She's stayed away.
Honey, I know she hasn't been a good mom. But you need to realize she did what she thought was best for you.
I love you to death. I don't want you to hurt over this.
I love you too. I'm fine. Just a bit raddled.
I know honey. But none of that affects anything right? You're here at college with three women that would do anything for you.
Nothing will change that.
I love you all. Thanks for being honest with me [am].
I promised you I always would be. Now let's eat okay?
Yeah, I'm starving.
25 minutes later
Thank you for this everyone. I feel much better.
It's what we're here for.
That's right. Anything you need we can do.
Babe, you still look a little out of it.
How about I walk the three of us home and you just spend some time with your thoughts?
Are you sure? I really could use a walk.
Of course. It's not a far walk. Just stay safe.
I'll be home soon. I just need to sort my brain.
Take all the time you need. We'll be waiting for you at the house.
Call us if you need anything. We're going to have the house set up for you to just be able to come home and rest.
Thank you all again. I'll be home soon.
Man, I wonder how long it will be until I just have a normal day again.
I need to decide if I'm going to try and get in contact with my real mom.
She went all of this time without talking to me. Would she really even want to?
I need to stop thinking about it and just decide.
There's no harm in trying.
How do I do it though?
No, if she really wanted to meet she would have met me already. I should just focus on the girls that do want me in their lives.
Oh, a dog. Strange, I don't feel like I've seen one in a long time.
He's looking right at me.
He's a cute little guy.
That's a good boy.
Oh wow, I've never seen him warm up to a stranger so quickly.
I've always been good with animals. Not sure why.
You have a warm vibe. Are you attending WVM?
Yeah I am, what about you?
Sure am. It's nice to meet you. My name is Ruby.
It's nice to meet you too. My name is [mcf].
Wait. Are you that [mcf]?? The basketball player? My dog is pulling me away.
That's me. I'll see you around Ruby.
See you [mcf]!... Wow.
Oh shit, it's close to 9 already.
Rachael said she's a fixer. I wonder if she can find people.
Doesn't hurt to ask.
I'll just try calling her. Hopefully she picks up.
Ding Ding.
Hello?
Hey Rachael, it's [mcf].
I know it's you. Have you met with Anna yet?
No, I'm actually about to head there now. I just had a question.
Okay, what is it?
Could you find someone for me? You said you could do almost anything.
I sure can try. Who am I trying to find.
My real mom.
Oooh. Heavy. Do you have a name?
Uhh. What was her name?
Her name is [m] [mcl].
I'll get right on it. I'll let you know as soon as I know something.
Thank you. How much do I owe you?
Nothing. It's a friendly favor.
Thank you so much Rachael. I'll talk to you later.
See ya kid.
I know it's you. What do you need?
Could you find someone for me? You said you could do almost anything.
I sure can try. Who am I trying to find.
My real mom.
Oooh. Heavy. Do you have a name?
Uhh. What was her name?
Her name is [m] [mcl].
I'll get right on it. I'll let you know as soon as I know something.
Thank you. How much do I owe you?
Nothing. It's a friendly favor.
Thank you so much Rachael. I'll talk to you later.
See ya kid.
I need to head on to Anna's hotel before I'm late.
5 minutes later
Knock, Knock
I'm coming!
Hey there. [mcf] right?
That's me.
Come on in.
Her cheeks are as red as can be. She's clearly nervous.
Those photos didn't lie though. She has a great body.
Hopefully my little groin injury doesn't limit me too much.
So how should we start?
Sit down and follow my lead okay?
Okay..
I need to make her feel more comfortable.
Is everything all right?
Huh? Yeah I'm fine.
You seem a little nervous.
Heh, yeah. A little bit.
Can I be honest with you? I am too.
Really?
Yeah, you're the first woman I'm doing this for. It's a bit intimidating.
You're such a big man though, how do you get intimidated?
All it takes is a tiny cute woman to intimidate us big guys.
What do you say we just play this a little slow and lay here for a minute and feel each other out?
Really? I'd love to.
I didn't expect you to be like this.
What did you expect?
I'm not sure. You to come in and do what we have to do. Then leave. I didn't even know if you would talk to me.
You're a lovely woman. I'm glad to lay here and talk to you.
Rachael told me you were charming.
I do my best. So tell me, what is a girl as hot as you doing here?
Well, like Rachael I was a business woman. Started my own from the ground up.
I've spent many years doing that and it ate all of my time.
It's just now reached a point where I can take a step back and have time for me.
This new free time has made me realize I need something in my life. I want a kid.
I don't want the usual partnership though. I just want my kid with no strings.
I'm not getting any younger and I want my baby to be safe so it has to be now.
What about you? You seem a little too nice for this.
Rachael offered it to me. I don't know. I want to help people with their dreams.
I also like the idea of a bunch of little versions of me all around the planet.
Today is your first day here right?
Yes ma'am. It's been good so far. I had a little accident earlier though.
What happened?
I was playing basketball with a group of friends. Long story short, a girl fell and kneed me in the groin.
Oh my. Are you okay? Does it hurt?
I'm fine and yeah, it's still a little sore.
I'm sorry to hear that.
Are you sure you want to do this? If it hurts we can wait a day or two.
No, I want to be here. A little pain won't stop me.
Maybe I could help with it.
You're free to try.
You feel pretty healthy to me.
What can I say? You have a magic touch.
Do you mind taking your clothes off?
Not at all.
Wow [mcf]. No wonder Rachael picked you for this.
What next?
Can I touch it?
Without a doubt you can.
Damn Anna. That feels great.
Sorry, I don't mean to tease. I just feel really hot right now.
Also, I like it when I'm not in control.
Is that so?
I think it's time to flip her over.
Oh wow [mcf].
She's spilling out of her clothes. She's actually really sexy.
I guess the clothes are just in the way now.
Much better.
I'm ready. Put a baby in me [mcf].
Oh wow, I can feel myself tightening in anticipation.
Please don't tease me, stick it in.
AHhhh!! That's such a nice dick.
How do I feel?
You're tight and wet. It's perfect.
Keep going, give me it all.
Ahhhh.... That's so big..
I won't be tight at all after you put a baby in me. Go ahead [mcf], ruin me.
Is this the same girl that opened that door?
Nonetheless, she doesn't have to tell me twice.
Ahhh... Just like that. Go slow. Build a big load to fill me up with.
This feels so fucking great. Scoot back, let me climb up there and change the angle.
Good god [mcf]. My pussy can barely handle you.
You're such a man. Put that baby deep in me. Give me every drop you have.
Give me a boy and let him be at least half the man you are.
Damn Anna, you feel even better at this angle.
Ohhh... So do you...
Keep fucking me just like that...
I'm at my boiling point. I've held out as long as I can to build up the biggest load I could.
Time to fill her up.
Hnnnggg!
Oh my god [mcf]! That feels like so much!
Uhh.. Uhh huh.
Pull it out. Let me see.
You fucking filled me up. That was perfect [mcf].
You did a great job.
It's a two way street. You're sexy as hell and you felt amazing.
Thank you. Uhh.. I'm gonna be in town for a few more days. I know you start school tomorrow but would you like to meet up again sometime tomorrow?
I'd love to. I'll come by here sometime after school.
Great! I mean I can't wait for it.
I look forward to it too.
I'm not sure. I'm going to be pretty busy tomorrow and I'd hate to say I can when I'm not sure I'll have time.
I understand. If anything changes I'll be here.
I'll come by if I can.
Well, there's a bunch of things I need to do to maximize my chance of getting pregnant, and I'd really rather you not see me like that..
I understand. I'll leave you to it.
Thank you [mcf]. For everything.
Mwah!
I'll see you later [mcf].
See you Anna. Have a great night.
I already have. Get home safe.
Wow, that was something. I wonder if that was enough.
What do I do now? That really helped me get my mind off of things. Do I just go home?
Bzzzzzzz
Oh, that's my phone.
Damn kid! What did you do to Anna? She just called me to let me know how it went and she gave you a raving review.
She's not an easy woman to please. Good job.
Thanks. It was fun.
I bet so. I wish I was there.
So about the other girl. Do you want to see her?
Of course. Send me something about her.
She's an athlete like you. A bit more intense than Anna as well.
Also don't ask for anymore pictures, she's not the kind to look for acceptance.
So.. Should I set a date?
She's hot. Set it up.
I knew I could count on you! Same time tomorrow night?
Maybe later, but yeah. Sometime tomorrow night.
You got it kid. I'll let you get back to your night.
I'm sorry but she doesn't sound or seem like my type.
Are you sure? She was excited about meeting you.
Yeah, no offense to her but I'm just not into her.
If you say so. I'll let you get back to your night.
Wait, I miss seeing you. Have any photos of yourself you can send me?
Oooh. I was hoping you wouldn't forget about me. Give me just a moment big guy.
There I am. My hand doesn't compare to you though.
I wish I was there to take over.
Oh trust me, I wish you were too.
Maybe I'll just fly myself over there.
You're more than welcome anytime.
Have you ever had a threesome before?
No, do you have something in mind?
The next girl I have in mind has tried to fool around with me before. I can fly both of us there the day after tomorrow.
I'll send you pictures of her tomorrow for you to confirm.
Anyway it's getting late. I'll talk to you tomorrow.
Sleep well Rachael.
You too kid.
A threesome? The girl would have to be a wreck for me to say no to that at this point.
All right, I'll talk to you soon. Sleep well Rachael.
You too kid.
Bzzzz
Huh? Someone else?
Hey [mcf]. It's coach!
Hey coach, everything okay?
I was calling to ask you that. Last I saw you was when you were heading to the nurse.
Oh, yeah. I was fine. I just rested there a bit and then went home. I'm fine now.
Great, are you busy?
No, not really.
The school president just got in town. He wants to meet you.
I want to meet him too.
I'll send you the address. Don't forget practice at 7am. Media will want to meet with you after and then you have your first classes.
I'll see you bright and early coach. Sleep well.
You too [mcf].
Well, I knew it was likely happening today. Time to go meet this guy. How Elizabeth talked about him I don't know if I'll like him.
Either way I have to have a talk with him not to fuck with anyone I care about.
Time to head that way.
10 minutes later
There he is, he's actually a pretty big dude.
Hey, sir.
There he is! It's great to finally meet you! I'm Charles.
It's nice to meet you too Charles.
How did your first day here go? Everything you dreamed it would be?
It's been a very nice first day.
Well what are we doing standing out here? Let's head inside.
Nice place, I guess this is what being a president of a college nets you.
Sit, sit. We have things to discuss.
You excited for tomorrow?
Yeah, I'm ready to start practicing. I want to meet my other teammates too.
Oh yeah. Not that though.
Oh, I'm sorry but I don't know what you're talking about then.
We're holding a pep rally for you. Intoduce you to the school and all. Media will be there and everything.
Oh.. I don't know. That's not really my thing.
Come on. You'll love it.
When is it?
Right after your classes tomorrow, just show up when they're meant to be over. It will help all the students after a stressful first day.
What do I need to do? Am I meant to give a speech or anything?
You just need to show up and have a smile. Be you.
There's going to be plenty of girls there. All ready to meet you.
Speaking of that, how'd you like my surprise? How was she? Did she make the squad?
Fuck, I was hoping I could bring it up before he said something to piss me off.
We have to talk about that.
That girl was Elizabeth. My girlfriend's sister. She's family to me.
Every girl that came with me is off limits. They are to be treated exactly how you would treat me if not better.
If you truly want me here. And you want me to be happy. Elizabeth will receive a call saying she's on the cheer squad. Am I understood?
Woah, woah, woah. I didn't know. I just thought it would be a fun thing for you.
[am], [g1], Shauna, and Elizabeth are never to be another part of any 'fun' thing.
If they are, I will not hesitate to transfer. I just want that to be clear. Man to man.
Of course. All of them will be entitled to everything you are. If I had known she was family to you that would not have happened.
I don't buy that he didn't know.
I need you here. I don't want anything to jeopardize that.
In fact. That's why I brought you here.
What does that mean?
This is a nice place right?
Yeah, what about it?
It's yours kid.
What? What about the other house?
It's a decoy. That's the address on record for the school. People wouldn't really like it if they knew we were letting you live here. So this has to stay on the down low.
Wow. I don't know what to say.
Now when I say down low I mean it. Only those you fully trust can know about this place. If it ever gets out we'll have to move you somewhere else.
Yes sir. No one outside of family will know.
Good, good. Now you're going to have people following you, It's just what happens when you're as big of a name as you are.
Meaning you'll have to come here incognito.
Enough about that though. Let's take a tour.
This is the second floor. It has your kitchen and dining room. There's also a pool on the balcony.
There's also a bathroom and here is a bedroom.
It's pretty spacious. Feel free to decorate it however you want to.
This is the third floor. Mainly just a little office space.
Let's have a seat.
You didn't say much. You like it?
Sorry, it's just not everyday you're shown two amazing houses and told it's where you live now.
It's just the start of a long list of things you'll have. I heard you're a small town guy.
Yeah, you could say that.
Stuck in your morales and hard work ethic. You need to learn to have fun.
I want us to be friends. I want to show you what life can offer you.
I'm a decently powerful man. I can get a lot of things.
I'm not really into anything sir.
You haven't experienced anything is what you mean. Here walk me out.
We'll change that about you. There's many things to experience.
I'll show you what life is like for men like us. Women, money, drugs. Well none of that last one for you. We can't have you failing any tests now.
I appreciate it but I think I'm good Charles. I'm just here to play basketball and learn.
Wait, are you actually going to go to classes?
You know you don't have to do that right? We'll just act like you did.
If anything was to happen to me I would need another skillset to fall back on. So yes I will be attending classes.
You're free to do whatever you want to. I'm going to get out of your hair now. You need to settle in and get some rest.
I'll be at your practice tomorrow morning. I won't be in the way. Just observing from the side. We might be making a coaching change.
Coach Harper? No, I like her. I'll need to show that she's the one to lead this team.
Cat got your tongue?
No sir, I just was thinking about some things.
If it's about the girls in the other house they're already on their way. Jasmine is bringing them.
Really? Do they know about the house?
Nope, I'll leave that to you.
See you first thing in the morning. Enjoy the house. If you want to take a swim there's a bunch of bathing suits already here.
Thank you sir. I'll see you tomorrow.
Man, I'm curious about that pool. Let me go check it out.
Damn, this house is so much better than the first.
And I was crazy excited for it. I never expected something like this. I was expecting sharing a small room with some stranger just a day ago.
I want to jump in so badly but I'll wait on the girls.
10 minutes later
Oh, looks like they're here.
Honey.. How are you?
I'm happy to see you. That's how I am.
I'm happy to see you too. Did the walk help clear your head?
Yes it did. I'm good now. I'm sorry for bringing that stuff up. It just rocked me a bit.
I understand. That's your real mom. If she was mine I would want to know about her too.
I've already said it but I'll say it again. You're my real mom. I love you.
I love you too [mcf].
So what are we doing here? Jasmine just said you wanted us to come here.
Head inside for a minute. I want to tell everyone at once.
All right honey. Is anyone inside?
No, just us. I'll be in there in just a second.
Okay, I'll have a look around.
Hey there [mcf].
Hey Shauna. How are you?
I was going to ask you that.
You scared me back there. I've never seen you look lost before.
I'm fine now. I'm sorry about that.
Don't be sorry. I'm sorry I wasn't able to help. I didn't really know what to say.
You didn't have to say anything. Your presence helps keep me calm.
I'm the same with you. I'm glad to hear that. So why are we here?
Head inside with [am]. I'll let everyone know at once.
Knowing you we're going to magically live at this house too.
Haaa... Wouldn't that be something.
Haha, that would've been crazy. I'll see you inside.
Oh hey Elizabeth.
Hey [mcf].
How are you doing?
I'm good. Me and [g1] had a talk.
How did that go?
Honestly, it went great. She told me that you talked to her and that you wanted us to fix our issues.
I told you I would. I truly would love to see you two grow close.
Well we had a great first step earlier. I think I'm gonna take her somewhere just me and her some day.
That's a great idea.
Hey, I talked to the school's president. Nothing like that will happen again.
I thought we weren't meant to talk about it anymore.
I just wanted to let you know and if he ever tries to make you do anything. You tell me.
Thank you [mcf].
Don't mention it. You're family now. Head inside, I have news for everyone.
Okay...
Hey, so about the cheer stuff.
I talked to the school's president. You're on the cheer team now. You should get a call soon.
Really?? You didn't have to do that!
Yes I did. He won't bother you again. If he ever does you let me know and I'll handle it.
Thank you so much [mcf]..
Don't mention it. You're family now. Head inside, I have news for everyone.
Okay...
Babe! Are you okay?
I'm great. Come here.
Mwah!
How was your walk?
It was good. I'm doing great now. I'm happy to have all my girls around me again.
Can't handle it without us huh?
I wouldn't want to.
Speaking of us. I need to tell you something about [am].
Huh? Is she okay?
Yeah, she's just a little emotional after our dinner earlier. She feels bad that she never told you about your real mom.
She shouldn't. I understand.
I know you do, but she doesn't. It's not really something you can just say is okay either.
She just feels a little guilty is all.
Which brings me to my point. As much as I would love to cuddle up with you tonight I think you should spend the night with [am].
She could really use some alone time with you to make her realize that everything is okay.
You're right. That's a good idea. Where are you going to sleep?
I don't know. We'll figure that out later.
Okay babe, everyone else is waiting on us so we should head inside.
Okay. Lead the way.
Wait, where's Jasmine?
She said she's going out with Damien tonight so she just dropped us off and then was on her way to meet him.
Oh all right. Oh well, Come on.
What are you doing mom?
Oh, nothing. Was just thinking about how long it's been since we've just relaxed and watched a movie.
It has been a while huh? How about we do that tonight?
I would love to. We don't have a TV at our house yet though.
Little does she know.
Where did Shauna and Elizabeth go?
I'm right here. So what's up? Why'd you bring us here?
Wait, what about Elizabeth?
I saw her go upstairs. I don't know.
All right, we've all already been through a lot today. I know we all still have nerves about tomorrow.
So I'm not going to sugarcoat this, I'm just going to say it.
This house is also our new house.
I called it!
Really? What do you mean?? How?
What about the other house?
We technically can use both. The other house is where people will think we live. This house is not meant to be spoken of and no one is meant to know we live here.
I know we've all been through these emotions today already.
But this house is awesome. And mom, we have a pool now.
So what do you girls say we just celebrate by taking a nice swim before it gets dark?
I don't even know what to say [mcf].
I know it's a lot. It's just one of those days where nothing stops.
That's one way to put it.
It's about to slow down though. There's bathing suits in the bedrooms. You girls go get changed and I'll meet you at the pool.
How big is it?
You'll see. Just get dressed quickly. Last one to the pool is a rotten egg.
I think you're already a rotten egg for using that line.
Sounds like the talk of someone who is going to be last.
Psst. I'll see you out there.
I'm so excited to swim. I've always wanted a pool!
Me too, I'm just shocked by everything right now. I just want to jump in the pool now.
I'll see you ladies out there.
Where did Elizabeth go?
Ehh, she'll pop out soon. Time to get my swim trunks on.
5 minutes later
All good to go.
Oh! Looks like Shauna is last!
Called it.
Hey, I wasn't far behind!
Says the rotten egg.
Says the rotten egg.
Although for a rotten egg you look great in that bikini.
Thank you.
Did any of you see Elizabeth while you were changing?
Yeah, I saw her walk into one of the bedrooms when I went up the steps.
I'm gonna go see what's up with her.
What about the pool?
I'll be back. Just gonna check on her.
Bedroom on the second floor.
Guess it's the same one Charles showed me.
BUMP
No one in the room. But I just heard a thud in the closet.
Liz? Are you in the closet?
.....
Yeah, I am.
Is everything okay?
Yeah, everything is great.
Liz... What happened?
What are you talking about?
Your makeup is all smudged. Why were you crying?
Ohhh... Don't worry about that.
What happened Liz?
Nothing. I'm just being dumb.
You're in a house with people that are here to support you. Why are you crying in a closet alone?
I didn't want anyone to know I was crying.
Come here.
You don't have to tell me anything. I just want you to know that I'm here.
Whatever emotion you're feeling we can talk about. I'm sure it would help.
Can we sit down?
Yeah, of course.
Can you promise not to tell anyone?
Whatever you tell me right now, no one else will ever know.
Like I said, I'm just being dumb. I'm emotional.
Why? I mean there's plenty of reasons with all the recent changes but why can't anyone know?
I don't know. I just feel like I fucked up. I feel like life could be very different if I wasn't such a bitch.
I pushed all my friends away, I pushed my sister away, I pushed you away.
I just feel stupid. You've been nothing but a complete saint to me. I could've had this from you the entire time.
You're not stupid, you just made a few mistakes growing up. What matters is that you realized them and we're fixing them.
I know that, but what if it's too late?
What do you mean?
What if I can't find someone like you?
You don't need to, I'm already here.
Not like that. Like what you and [g1] have. I want that.
Ahh, so that's what all this is about.
I've always liked Liz. Until she decided to act out anyway.
If she didn't act out back then and I didn't have [g1] then there's a good chance me and her would have been a thing.
I think she realizes that.
You're everything to [g1]. You make her so happy. I can see it in her eyes when she's around you.
You make her a better person. When you two kiss I can tell she puts all of herself into it. She's yours.
I guess I just want something like that.
[mcf]?? What are you doin..
There's no way this decision doesn't come back to bite me. I just know that this is what she needs.. And I kind of want it too.
Woah, talk about putting all of yourself in a kiss..
What are we doing?? [g1] would kill us!
Just a heat of the moment thing. We're both emotional right now.
I'm sorry. I shouldn't have told you all of that.
I'm glad you did.
Oh, I think I'm getting my smeared makeup all over your shoulder. I'm gonna go clean that up real quick okay?
Yeah, sure.
I'm not that rare. You'll find that guy.
I hope so. I love that I'm part of a family again, I just don't feel whole right now.
I understand. It's gonna take time to adjust.
Oh, I think I'm getting my smeared makeup all over your shoulder. I'm gonna go clean that up real quick okay?
Yeah, sure.
I wonder how the girls are liking the pool, hopefully I'm in it soon.
3 minutes later
Hey..
Wow, you don't have any makeup on?
You don't have to beat me up while I'm down.
No, no. You look great. You should wear less makeup more often.
Ohh... Thank you [mcf].
The bathrooms here are so nice.
Yeah about those. Get used to them.
Why?
We live here now.
What?? What about the other house?
We live there too. I'll answer all of your questions later. We're about to hop in the pool.
There's a few bathing suits around. You're more than welcome to join us.
Oh okay. Sure...
I know it's a lot. I promise to answer everything later.
Nah I've got my answers. This is all a dream.
Exactly, I'll see you at the pool.
I'd actually like to avoid questions about Elizabeth. She doesn't want them to know she was crying.
A good way to do that is a distraction. A quick cannonball should do.
CANNONBALL!!
There he is!
You scared me!
Haha, sorry. First time getting in this thing.. It had to be a cannonball. It's chilly in here.
Ha, fair enough and you get used to the water quick.
How are you liking the pool mom?
I love it! You guys can have the rest of the house. Just give me the pool.
It is great, having a pool is awesome.
Let's just all relax and enjoy it.
Agreed.
30 minutes of swimming later
Tired yet?
A little bit. I didn't think I would be after my nap at the nurse.
It's been a big day for you. I'd be exhausted.
Ehh, it's not that bad.
That bathing suit looks great on you by the way.
I'm glad you like it.
I still like what's underneath it more though.
I was just thinking the same thing.
This house has many rooms. We could sneak off into one and fool around.
You're naughty.
We have two new houses. We've already broken in one of them... So...
Mwah!
You don't even have to ask..
For like the tenth time today. You're perfect.
I'm going to tell [am] that we're going to hop out.
I'm right behind you.
Hey there.
I'm happy that you're having such a good time.
I really am. I love this pool. I might just lay in it all day tomorrow while all of you are at school.
You're free to be in it whenever you want to.
Are you still wanting to watch a movie tonight?
Yes! We haven't done it in so long!
Perfect, me and [g1] are going to head inside and get cleaned up. After that we can pick a movie out.
Okay honey, I'll see you in the living room.
Man, [g1]'s body never ceases to stun me. I wonder if she realizes just how hot she is.
Huh, I just realized Elizabeth never came to the pool. She's not in this room anymore though.
I think [g1] is waiting on me to make a move.
I'm not one to make my woman wait.
She has such a firm ass. It's so nice to the touch.
As much as that's true, I want her on that bed and the quickest way for that is to push her onto it.
Ohhh... You seem like you're really into this.
You don't even know.
Go ahead and lay back. I think I can help with that.
Nuh uh, earlier today I told you tonight was about you.
We'll get to that. Just trust me. Lay down.
Ohh..... That's nice.
I thought you might like this. I think you'll like this even more.
Is she about to do what I think she's about to do?
Oh damn. She's so fucking sexy.
I think she's going to try and go all the way with me right now.
Ugh, I want to so bad but I have something else planned for that.
Her sitting on me nude right now is very tempting though. If she doesn't move I might just give in.
Oh, I know what to do.
There we go. Both problems solved.
Ahh...!!! [mcf]...
Oh wow, even after the pool she tastes so fucking good.
I think I'm about to go crazy here.
Ohhh... I wasn.. I wasn't ready for that.
You're so good at it though...
Ahh.. Ohhhh.... Ehh... Right there.. Keep going......
At this point she's just riding my tongue.
She's speeding up and is starting to tense herself. I'm not done playing though. Time to flip her again.
Ohh.. [mcf].. I was close.
I know you were. I'm not done playing yet though.
Mwah!
I'm not done either.
It's your turn now though.
Nope, this is still your time.
Plus, you can't really go anywhere right now.
That may be. But I can always take a play out of your book.
What do you mean?
There we are.
Damn, I'm surprised she could move me like that.
No words huh?
I'm just trying to figure out how we got here.
Don't worry about that. Just enjoy what's about to happen.
Oo.... That feels great. There she goes again with the serious face.
She's so cute like that. You can tell how hard she is trying.
This does feel way better than yesterday though.
Aaaooohhhh! Damn babe. Where'd that come from?
Hmmm ashhaammm...
Guess it's pretty hard to talk with that in your mouth.
That feels fucking fantastic. I didn't know you could do that.
Mmm...Wa..tch...Thi.mmm..sss.
Holy shit, that's so much better than before.
She's definitely more confident doing this now compared to yesterday.
I'm about to finish [g1]..
Mmmhmmmmm..
She's not stopping..
Hnnnngggg... Holyyyyy fuck..
Jesus, she didn't even flinch or react at all.
Ahhhh...
For the eleventh time. You're fucking perfect. That was so great that you deserve a reward.
Kind of like this.
Ohhh!... I'm still worked up from a minute ago.
Aohhhhh... Your tongue feels great.
Ahhhh.... [mcf].. Just like that..
It feels even better than last time.. Ohhh...
Just keep going like that..
Ahhh!... [mcf].. You're gonna make me...
AOooooooouhhh! Oooooooh......
Man, I must've done something really well. She's kicking like crazy.
Oh my god [mcf]... That was much more intense than yesterday.
I can see that. Are you okay?
Oh yeah. That was... Mmmmm.
You look so cute all flustered on the floor.
Give your cute girl a kiss.
Mwah!
I thought yesterday felt amazing. That was something else.
You were great tonight too. I think it has a lot to do with us being more comfortable.
Yeah, this did come a lot easier than yesterday.
True, and it will keep getting easier and better. Now let me help you up.
Yes please.
Thanks babe. My legs are weak again.
Hey, at least this time you don't have to move from this bed.
Very true, I wish you didn't have to either.
Trust me, I'd love to just lay in here with you until we had to leave tomorrow.
But I really need to spend some time with [am].
I know, she could use your company. You're really great at changing someones mood just by being with them.
As long as that applies to you too, then I'm happy.
You have no clue.
You should go to her now, we've been 'getting clean' for a while now.
Yeah you're right.
Do you want me to wake you up when I get up?
How early is that?
Probably around 6am. I won't leave until around 6:30-6:45 though.
Wake me up before you leave please.
Sure thing.
Mhmmm.. Aren't you forgetting something?
I would never.
I can't stress how different her kisses are now. I thought they were great yesterday.
But now she has more attitude with it, they're more her than anything now. If that even makes sense.
I love you. I'll see you first thing tomorrow.
I love you too. I'll try to find you after practice tomorrow before classes start.
Good, I'll be looking for you. Goodnight baby.
Goodnight.
Now just a few things left to do before today is over with.
Wait a second...
Liz is still in that closet.. How much of that did she see?
Fuck, I never even realized she never came to the pool.
I don't know how to rescue her at this point, she's just going to have to wait until [g1] falls asleep.
Well no, I'm sure [g1] will go to the bathroom soon, or something. She won't be trapped much longer.
Fuck, I feel like an asshole just leaving her in that closet after the day she has had.
Although she has caused me and [g1] a lot of grief. It would be a good way to get even. At least a little bit.
Psssst.
Oh hey Shauna.
Hey yourself. What are you up to?
About to go watch a movie with [am]. Would you like to join?
I'm going to pass. I know you two need to spend some time together.
Plus my makeup is all funked up. I need to fix it.
Oh okay. You're free to join though.
Are we still going to hang out tonight?
A bet is a bet. After [am] falls asleep we can do whatever.
Well then I will be waiting patiently upstairs.
Great, I'll be up there as soon as I can be.
Damn Shauna. This isn't exactly the safest spot.
Oh well, it's safe enough.
Sorry, I just couldn't wait any longer.
It's fine, I'll never be upset at a kiss from you.
We need to be a little more careful though.
Yes. I know.. All right. Back to normal.
I'll see you soon, I'll be upstairs.
I'm pretty tired. I think I'm just going to call it a night.
All right.. I guess I'll see you tomorrow then.
You absolutely will.
Hey, before you do that. Could you do me a favor?
Of course. What do you need?
It's going to sound strange but all I need is for you to wait like two minutes.
Then knock on that door and get [g1] out of the room for a bit.
Hmmmm...
Let me guess. You and [g1] were fooling around and Elizabeth had to hide somewhere?
Uhh.... Yup. Weirdly accurate.
I've known you most of your life. You get easy to read over time.
Really now? I guess I'll have to change it up.
No, no. You're perfect the way you are.
But yes, I'll help her out. Go watch your movie.
Thank you Shauna.
Don't mention it.
See you Shauna.
You most certainly will, enjoy your movie.
Time for this movie, hopefully it's an entertaining one.
Either way I need to use this time to ease [am]'s mind. I hate making her worry.
Movie time!
You're ready? Where are the girls?
Oh, they were tired. They're going to bed.
So it's just us then?
Is that a problem?
No silly. As much as I love those girls... Don't tell them but you're my favorite.
I think they know. Come on, let's treat this just how we used to.
You mean it?
Yes ma'am. Let's lay down.
I feel like we went years without cuddling and being this close. I forgot how much I loved it.
Me too to be honest. This makes two nights in a row now.
Would three be too many?
I don't think so. We'll see how tomorrow goes though.
Hey, before we turn this movie on can we real quick talk about today?
I thought we went through it all. I'm sorry but there's not really any more I can tell you.
It's not about that specifically. I just was shocked by the whole thing. More about my dad than my mom.
I always thought he was a great guy. I wanted to be like him, it just hurt to know he had that side to him.
Anyway I just wanted to tell you...
I don't blame you at all for not telling me about it sooner. You made my life great and you were everything I needed.
But if I was still young and found out I might have wanted to know her then. It could have negatively impacted my life.
The point is, I'm here with you on this couch. In a nice house full of the women I love. I wouldn't change a thing.
You're going to make me cry again [mcf].
I don't meant to. I just don't want you to feel like you've done anything wrong.
I love you to death mom.
I love you to death too honey.
I have a strange question. Hypothetically speaking, is it weird for a mom to kiss her 18 year old adopted son?
Heh, it's cute that she's trying to play around it. It's nothing but an innocent loving kiss. Nothing weird about it.
I don't think so.
Huh, I don't know if it's because of our relationship with each other or the fact that I've never seen her kiss anyone but she doesn't seem to know how to kiss.
It's definitely not bad or anything, it's just a friendly peck after all. It's kind of cute though.
That was nice.
Yes it was. With that, let's put all of that stuff today behind us and enjoy this movie okay?
I would like that. I already picked one out. It was supposed to be something all of the girls would like. I feel dumb for picking it now.
Ehh, a chick flick can be nice every now and then.
Oh wow, she's squeezing me pretty tight. What I said to her tonight must have worked.
Now, just to hit play.
Yep, definitely going to be a chick flick. Oh well, I'm just enjoying this time with [am].
The girls are pretty hot at least.
Inaudible chatter
Man, I really can't pay attention to this though. They're saying a lot but it's just not sticking with me.
I know this is the part that's meant to endear me to the characters but I just want it to jump to where the action is.
They seem like they like each other. That hug was probably a pretty charged moment that would have meant something if I paid attention.
Someone probably sat down for days thinking of the perfect way to word the dialogue and here I am just absent-mindedly waiting for the next cool thing to happen.
I'm sorry, I didn't know it was going to be a more adult movie.
What? Was that adult? Did I miss something?
It's fine. I'm an adult now after all. Doesn't bother me.
Good, I was worried you would be weirded out by it watching it with me.
Nah, it's no big deal.
What did I miss? They must have been talking in a raunchy way. Damn, kinda sad I missed it.
30 minutes later
*Whispering* [am]? Are you asleep?
....
Yep, she's out. She's always fallen asleep quickly anytime we've cuddled.
I'm going to give her the world one day. She deserves it.
Now just to slide out from under her without disturbing her.
Slowly....
That went well. She's still sound asleep. Time to go see Shauna.
Hopefully Shauna isn't asleep like yesterday.
Nice, she's still up.
Pssst. Shauna.
There you are! I feel like I've been waiting forever.
Sorry, I came as soon as I knew [am] was asleep. Is everyone else asleep?
There's no need to apologize. I'm just impatient. Also yes, I just checked and everyone is asleep except us.
I missed you.
I missed you too.
Mwah!
I don't think I need this on anymore.
Woah, woah. Slow down, I want to talk with you a bit first.
I'm sorry, I've been thinking about this ever since we were in the pool.
I'm horny...
Well when she puts it that way.
There is one thing I've wanted to do..
I've never sucked on someone's nipple before. I don't even know if this feels good but it seems like it's doing something.
Ahhh, [mcf]. You must be horny too.
Can you blame me?
No, no I can not.
What do you have in mind now.
Well first..
These shorts have to go.
That ass will never not amaze me.
I know why she turned away to undress though. She's still shy.
I know a way to fix that.
Smack!
Ahh! What was that for?!
Because you were trying to hide this.
Holy fuck she's so wet.
I know, I'm still a little shy.
There's no need to be. It's just me.
You are why I'm shy. But I'm fine. I love you.
I love you too.
Want proof I'm fine?
You should uhh.. Lay down on that table.
I like where this is going.
I thought we had a talk about this whole wearing pants thing.
I'll think hard about my actions going forward.
I think something else is already thinking hard.
I hope you don't mind if I...
Ohhh shittt... I wasn't ready for that.
Sorry, I don't mean to tease.
Yes you do.
You know, there's something we could try from this position if you turn around.
Do you mean.. Like put my thing on your face?
Ha, yes. Put your 'thing' on my face. I promise it will feel good.
You trust me right?
Hmmm..
Fuck, what a view this is.
No time to waste.
Mmmm.. She tastes.. great. She didn't waste anytime either. She's already got her lips around my dick.
I'm making her moan and she's just moaning as she sucks me. The vibrations from it feel euphoric.
Time to speed up.
Ohhhh... Her fucking tongue again. This was meant to be a way to warm her up but she's trying to finish me off already.
God damn she's going crazy with it. She really must've been horny.
I want to go further though, and I know just how to accomplish that.
Just have to slide out and stand up, her ass will be up and on the edge of the table.
That went surprisingly smooth.
What was that about? What are you doing back there?
Actions speak louder than words.
Ahhh!!
Oh shit, that was kind of loud, hopefully no one heard that.
So this is how we're doing this huh? You get me in my zone and then slide out from under me?
I think you're ready for something else.
Yeah, I think I am too.
Ahhh... Slowly...
Slowly, slowly, slowly is so hard when this is the view you have and every muscle in your body wants you to go all out.
Shhhhit, so far this is way easier than yesterday.
Mmmmm.. Keep going.
Aaoohhhhhhh!!..
Holy shit!.. Ahhhhh...
Are you okay?
Yeah, yeah. Just give me one second.
.....
Okay, I'm good. Sorry, I just didn't expect that to send waves through my body.
It feels great, honestly. Really fucking good actually.
Are you ready for me to start moving again?
Yeah, just start slow please.
Ohhhh... [mcf].. That feels so good.
You're so fucking tight Shauna.
Mmmmmm, fuck me harder [mcf]. Fuck me as hard as you can.. I'm ready.
AAAOOooohhh!! That's so fucking good!
Keep going! Just like that! Mmmmmmmmmm...
AAAOOOHhhhh!!! I'm cumming!
I'm about to cum too...
Ohhhhhh... That was so fucking good.
Uhghhhh!!..
Holy shit..
Did you cum inside me?
Yeah.. I did.
Uhghhhh!!..
Holy shit..
Oh wow [mcf]. That feels like a lot.
Yeah, I made a little bit of a mess.
That was great! We didn't have as many complications this time!
True, it all comes with becoming more comfortable with each other.
Did you still want to talk?
Of course I do.
Can you help me up? My legs are a littly jelly like right now.
I sure can.
There, that should be a step in the right direction.
[mcf]... What are you doing??
Yesterday you were shy to show me. It's also why you turned away to undress.
You said you were afraid you were going to scare me away.
Do I seem scared?
I know you don't want me to do anything with it, you're not into that.
That's fine, but I need you to be more comfortable with me.
You're right, it is why I turned away.
I'm sorry. I should know with how amazing you are that you won't care. It's still just hard..
There's an easy joke to make right now but it's not a good time for it.
We'll work through it, I just want you to know that it doesn't matter what you have. I love you for you.
I love you too.
I trust you. I'll do my best to not think about it, I'm comfortable.
You should uhh, lay down on that table.
I like where this is going.
I thought we had a talk about this whole wearing pants thing.
I'll think hard about my actions going forward.
I think something else is already thinking hard.
Fuck! She stole my joke.
I hope you don't mind if I...
Ohhh shittt... I wasn't ready for that.
Sorry, sorry. I don't mean to tease.
Yes you do.
Hehe, are you ready for the next part?
I'm ready for anything.
Are we about to do what I think we're about to do?
Yes sir. Any objections?
None whatsoever.
Here we go, yesterday she couldn't handle all of it. I wonder if like [g1] she'll be improved today.
Ahhhh....
Phew, that's not bad.
Ahhh.. That feels so good. I'm going to start riding now.. Okay?
I'm ready.
Ohhh... Ohhh..
Damn Shauna...
Aooohhh... This feels so fucking good.
I need more...
Ufffhh... You're going to make me fucking blow.
Ahhh. AHhh... AHHHH!
OOOooahhhh!!!...
Holy fuck, I made her cum from this again.
Ahhhh..... That was so fucking good.
Oh my god [mcf].. Ahh.. I didn't mean to.. You know on you.
It's fine, I'm about to cum too.
Aghhh!...
Oh wow, I can feel it running out of me.
That was great Shauna.
Mhmmm, and now it's time to clean up.
Oh... You naughty girl.
Damn, she's not missing a drop.
My legs are so weak, I didn't know if I was going to make it through it.
It was fucking great.
Mwah!
Yesterday I would've flinched if she tried to kiss me right after that. Today I don't mind at all.
Did you still want to talk?
Of course. How about you sit in my lap and I hold you for a bit?
Yes please. Can you help me move over there?
I sure can.
Thank you.
So how did that feel compared to yesterday?
Uhh. Honestly? More real.
Yesterday still seems like a dream. Today does as well but less so.
It's starting to actually hit me that we are a thing. It's crazy.
Yeah, it is. It felt weird having to hold back at times today when I wanted to say something to you though. It's weird.
How do you feel about that? We felt more distant than ever today. Except for the parts where we were alone.
I don't know. I've been hiding feelings for years. I guess I'm just used to it. It has been harder though.
Just knowing that we had this planned tonight made me so happy. Knowing that we could have our time.
Wouldn't it be nice to not have to hide it though?
I mean, of course. But you and [g1].
Plus this is more than I need. Just knowing there is a place for me in your heart is everything I need.
I know we're both about to be busy, we might not get to do this very often. But that doesn't matter, I'm just happy we are where we are.
Don't you think so?
Of course. I love this. I love exploring all these feelings with you. They're so strong and it's crazy how much I care about you.
But.. I still feel the same way about [g1]. I'm not good at lying to people. It's eating me up a bit.
Oh... I understand...
Hey, hey... I'm not saying anything like we're about to stop. I love you too much for that.
I was just thinking. What if we told her?
No, no, no, no...
What if she hates me? What if she breaks up with you? I'd be so mad at myself.
She's not going to hate you. If anything she would hate me. I just can't look her in the eyes and act like nothing is happening anymore.
I don't want to hide us and I don't want to lie to her anymore.
I don't know [mcf]..
You won't have to do anything. Plus it's [g1]. She's one of the most understanding girls I've ever met and she knows how close we are. She's even told me she doesn't mind us being close.
Maybe if I explain it well enough to her, and give it some time. Maybe she'd be okay with it.
I'm scared [mcf].
Don't be. Everything will be okay.
We haven't exactly been safe as is. We're bound to get caught and it's going to be much worse than if I tell her.
I guess that's true. I just don't want her to get hurt.
I don't either. That's why I have to do this.
But we'll be okay. Just think about it, what if we didn't have to hide? Just focus on that.
We could hold hands walking down the street. Me on one side and [g1] on the other.
Yep, we could go anywhere we wanted. The three of us.
I don't know how I'm going to tell her. There's not really a good way to.
Get dressed and we'll head to a room okay. We're a bit exposed here.
Sure, just give me one second.
3 minutes later
I'm going to ruin [g1]'s first day of college aren't I? Fuck me I'm an asshole.
Thank you for everything. I hope tomorrow goes well.
Do you mean first day of college or the thing with [g1]?
Both, I'm optimistic.
I am too. Do you want to lay down for a bit?
I think we're pushing our luck today. We should play it safe until you tell her.
Yeah, that's very true.
I love you though.
I love you too.
Now go cuddle up with [am].
Maybe after tomorrow we'll be able to cuddle up.
I think I just found out what I'm going to dream about tonight.
I'll see you in the morning Shauna.
See you [mcf].
Man, all things considered that was awesome. Now to rehearse how to tell [g1] for the next 16 hours.
Oh good, she's still out cold.
I should be able to just slide back into place.
Easy...
I'm actually exhausted. I'm also extremely comfortable right now. If I just close my eyes for a second...
.....
.....
Huh? Where am I? Why is it so dark?
What the fuck? How did I get over here?
.....
Hey there honey.
Mom??
What is it? You look like you've seen a ghost. Are you feeling okay?
Uhh. Yeah.
Well you don't seem like it. Are you sure?
[am]?? What the fuck is happening.
I know what can make you feel better.
How about we go to the park for a bit? You can play basketball with all the other boys.
Uhh... Sure..
[mcf]. What's wrong?
You can tell me all about it.
Uh....
Did you take a late nap? Come on, we need to leave soon.
Plus you're going to make your sister sad if you don't go.
Sister? I don't have a sister?
Pleaseeeee [mcf].
We haven't went at all this week.
Plus last time we went you spent the entire time playing basketball. Can we do something else? I don't want to play alone.
Sure...
Yay! Can we go now mom??
KNOCK, KNOCK
Uh oh.
Mom...
We'll go tomorrow kids. [mcf], take your sister to your room and lock the door okay?
Uhh, sure mom.
Come on bro, we got to go.
I'm coming.
AHHHHH! [mcf]!!
....
....
Oh, my fucking head. The room is spinning.
What happened? Did my dad hit me?
Did he hit my mom? My sister?
I'll kill the asshole. Run my family away and then die on me.
Just have to turn around...
There he is, he must have hit me. Fucking asshole.
His back is turned. This is my chance.
Made me believe you. All your lies.
You ran my family away, by being a drunk abusive asshole. Then lied to me about it for all of my life.
It was you. It was always you.
Agh!!
Augh!!
You deserve this..
Wait... That isn't my dad... Who the fuck did I just knock out?? What the fuck is going on?!
Aghh..
My fucking head, my vision went blurry again.
Who just grabbed me?
What the fuck? Sis? This can't be real.
Wake up, wake up, wake up. Let this all be a dream.
When I open my eyes I'll be on my couch.
Stop it!!
Fuck... This is real.
Where am I? What happened?
Oh! You're actually awake. Are you okay?
Yeah, I think so. My head is pounding though.
Lay back down, give yourself a minute to recoup.
Uhmmm okay. Good idea.
Hey, hey, hey.. Slowly.. Let me help you.
Is that better?
Yeah it is, thank you.
So what happened? Where am I and how did I get here?
Uhh.. What's the last thing you remember?
I was falling asleep on my couch, next thing I know I'm on a sidewalk somewhere.
But just for like a brief moment. Then I was further down the sidewalk.
Then it felt like I was replaying a moment in my past. Next thing I know I'm here hitting that guy.
Was that real? Is he okay?
Yeah, that was real. Don't feel bad though, he hit you first.
Ugh.. I'm so confused. Can you just tell me exactly what happened? From your perspective?
Okay, so I was staying at a motel for the night. I couldn't really sleep so I went out to my car to get a few things.
That's when I saw you walking. It felt like something was wrong so I tried to get your attention.
You didn't respond so I walked up to you and that got your attention but you were still out of it.
You were saying things but none of it really went together. That's when that guy came up.
He tried to help me for a second but you took a step toward me and he punched you.
It was totally uncalled for. He didn't have to do that.
I probably would have done the same. Well maybe not punch but I get why he did it.
No, it was too far. I didn't feel threatened or anything and it came out of nowhere.
Then we brought you here, this is his place. His idea.
He had a spare bed, and a couch he could have laid you down on.
Instead he insisted we put you down here on the concrete. So honestly don't feel bad, he deserved it.
Well then, I'm lucky I had you. Thank you.
You're very welcome.
Can you help me sit up? I think I'm good enough now.
Are you sure? You can lay there for a bit, it's no big deal.
Yeah, I'm sure.
All good?
All great. Oh! What time is it? I have to be at practice by 7am.
Don't worry. It's only 6. You still have time.
Thank god. So uhh.. What do we do with him?
I say we do what he was going to do to you. Seems fair to me.
Can we do that? Shouldn't we report this or something?
Listen, he hit you first and put you in his basement. I'm on your side, so his word wouldn't mean much.
Come on, help me slide him over.
Fuck, why couldn't this just be part of a dream too?
Sounds like he was just trying to play hero and bring the girl home.
Although the pain in my head is making my conscience feel less guilty.
Perfect, just how things should be.
Well this wasn't how I expected tonight to go.
Yeah, I guess I kind of ruined your night.
Nah, not like I had anything better to do. Plus now I have a unique story my future kids will hear about one day.
Ha, I guess that's a good way to look at it.
Let's get out of this basement. I need some fresh air.
I just realized, we haven't even exchanged names yet.
Well, my name is [mcf] and it's nice to meet you.
It's very nice to meet you [mcf]. I'm Stacy.
I like that name, it suits you.
Thank you. I'm happy you woke up when you did. That guy was starting to get weird.
Almost as weird as talking to a stranger in the middle of the night that seems deranged?
You didn't seem deranged, like I said I could tell you needed help.
But he was weird. I was scared he was going to try something. He kept forcing compliments, calling me cute and sweet.
I mean, he wasn't wrong. It takes someone very sweet to do what you did for me. The other half wasn't wrong either.
Oh.. Uhh.. Thank you!..
I didn't expect that.
It's not creepy when I say it is it?
No, that guy was just saying it trying to get something out of it. I don't think you are, that felt genuine.
Good, because it was.
Yeah, the story you told me made me think he was going to try and make a move on you.
Who knows how far he would have went, I'm just glad we're out of there.
How far away is your motel? I don't really know where we are.
It's not far away at all. So you said you had practice this morning? What for?
Basketball, it's my first practice here.
Oh! You're that [mcf]?? I'm sorry I don't really follow sports so I didn't realize.
That's me.. and I don't mind that you didn't know. I sort of prefer it when people don't.
I'm going to WVM too, I'm a freshman as well.
Oh really? Great, it'll be nice to have a familiar face around.
Ha, Yeah. If you go into any more trances I'll have your back.
I think I'm done with those. Though it is nice to have a safety blanket.
Have you ever had them before?
No, nothing like it. I think it's just stress.
That makes sense..
Do your classes start today?
Yep, in about 4 hours. I'd be a liar if I said I wasn't nervous.
What makes it worse is the dorms not being open until tonight. My motel isn't exactly a luxurious place and I think the water is out.
Meaning my first day of college may not be my cleanest day.
Well you can come to my place to take a shower.
Uhhh... I don't know. I don't want to be rude or anything but after tonight I just want to be somewhere I'm comfortable for a bit.
I understand.. But let me try to sell it real quick.
I live with 4 other girls. They'll have everything you need to get cleaned up.
No moves will be made, you'll take a nice warm shower and then I'll walk you to your motel on my way to practice where you're free to relax before class.
Feel free to say no, I just would like to do something nice for you since you went out of your way to help me.
So I assume you're going to WVM for a career in sales?
Please don't finish that joke. That's too corny for this early in the morning. Let's get going.
Haha, just follow my lead until you recognize where we are.
12 minutes later
Is this the right address??
Yep, this is it. It's not mine, they're just letting me and my family stay in it.
Wow, that's crazy. I wish I had that sort of deal going on.
Yeah it's amazing. No one is meant to know I'm staying here, for my privacy and all.
I won't tell anyone I promise.
I know, I wouldn't have offered you to come here if I thought you would tell people.
Head on inside, just try to be quiet. I think everyone is still sleeping.
I'll be as quiet as a mouse.
So where's the bathroom?
Uhh.. That's actually a great question. I haven't used one yet.
Oh.. How long have you been here again?
Just last night. I think I know where one should be anyway.
Yep this is it.
Awesome. Thank you again [mcf].
I should help strangers more often.
Yes, but no. At least not in the middle of the night.
I'm just going to be right up the stairs. Just let me know when you're out and I'll take a quick shower then we'll leave.
Okay, I'll be quick.
That made me realize how badly I need to piss. Time to find another bathroom.
Please, be one.
Oh shit, my bad [g1].
Oh! [mcf]. I was just sitting here thinking about things. I wasn't.. you know.
Did you have to use the bathroom? I'll step out.
Yes please.
Sorry, can we talk before you get ready for practice?
Sure babe.
I'm ready to piss and get out of these swim shorts.
One bathroom trip and hands wash later.
Okay, moment to catch myself. Weird ass night.
I don't know about that dream. Surely I would remember if I had a sister.
Why would I dream that though?
My head still hurts. I just want to go to practice already and put this morning behind me.
Are you good babe? Everything okay?
Yeah, just in my thoughts.
I must be rubbing off on you then. I'm always in my own head.
I guess you are rubbing off on me. I'm not a huge fan of it.
What's got you worried? You're going to do great today.
It's not that, I had another dream.
Oh.. I'm sorry...
It's okay, I'm fine now.
Are you sure? What happened in the dream?
It's not really what happened in the dream, it's what actually happened.
What do you mean?
Uhh.. Can we sit down for a minute?
Yeah... Is it that bad?
No, everything's fine. It just sounds bad.
Okay.. Tell me...
I fell asleep on the couch with [am]. It felt instant but I remember being on a sidewalk. Then I saw my mom again.
She was on the sidewalk?
No, she was in a kitchen. Just a casual conversation but [am] kept popping up in her place.
Then I dreamt I had a sister. It felt real but I would remember having a sister. Plus [am] would have told me about it.
What if she didn't know?
She said she was in contact with my real mom since I was a kid. Surely she would know.
Maybe not though. But wait, what happened? You said it was more than the dream.
Well, that bit about the sidewalk. I guess I was sleepwalking.
There was a girl, Stacy. Who saw me and tried to help.
Then a guy came up and tried to help her. Long story short he ended up punching me.
Babe...
It played out in my dream though. Like I was talking to my sister and my dad hit me. In reality I was talking to her and that guy hit me.
When I woke up I was so out of it that I thought he was my dad. I attacked him, hit him a few times until I realized what I was doing.
That's when she pulled me off of him.
I don't know what to say [mcf]...
I know, it's a lot. It won't happen again.
I have so many questions. Just promise me you're okay.
I promise. I think it was just the stress of everything that made me do that. As soon as I'm back on a court all the nerves will go away.
I hope so..
Don't worry about me, everything is okay. Today isn't a day to worry about anyone but yourself. You have enough going on as is.
That doesn't matter. I care about you. I want to know that you're safe and sound.
I am. [g1], I love you. I want you to focus on yourself today okay? That's the best thing you can do for me.
Okay... and I love you too jerk.
Hah, I'm a jerk who cares. We can talk about it more later. I kind of just want to accept that it happened and get on with the day.
I understand that, it is a busy day. One final thing though.
What happened to the Stacy girl?
Uhh.. She's downstairs taking a shower. I can explain that.
She went way out of her way to help me. She made a comment about her motel not having water. So I offered her to come here and take a shower.
I believe that. That's exactly what you would do.
She won't tell anyone right? About this place I mean...
I don't think so. She seems trustworthy. I might regret that but I don't think I will.
Well if you trust her then so do I.
Mwah!
I needed this, [g1]'s sloppy kisses.
You're sleeping with me tonight by the way. So I can keep an eye on you.
Mmmhmm. No ulterior motive there?
I never said there can only be one reason. There's many motives.
I see. Well then I say we satisfy those motives once.. then again.. then again.
Mmmmm.. How much longer do you have before you have to leave?
Not enough, I'm glad I was able to get her mind diverted off of my night trip though.
Uhh.. [mcf]??
Oh, Stacy. What's up?
Fuck, how much of that did she hear? That's awkward.
I'm sorry for bugging you. I was a bit of a klutz.
I couldn't figure out the shower and ended up splashing water on my clothes. Do you have a dryer I could use to dry them off real quick?
No need. You're going to need a uniform anyway. You can just borrow one of mine for today.
Really? Thank you very much.
Go on and take your shower babe. I got her.
You're amazing [g1]. Thanks.
10 minutes later
There's no being early today. I'll be on time though.
I should wake up [am] before I leave. She can help the girls through any nerves they may have this morning.
Psttt.. [am].
It's time to wake uppppppp....
*Yawn*
Good morning honey.
Good morning, how did you sleep?
Really well until you left me. I woke up and you weren't here anymore.
It's okay though. It was nice of you to spend the night with me until I fell asleep. I know living in a house with your girlfriend will make you want to spend all your time with her.
No, it wasn't like that.
I can't tell her the whole truth. She'll just worry all day.
I went out for a walk. Nerves got to me and I needed fresh air.
[mcf]... You haven't been here long enough to go out that late by yourself. You could've gotten lost.
I didn't go far. I was as safe as I could be.
Fine. But next time wake me up. I'd be happy to go on a walk with you.
You got it. Late walk tonight it is.
Really? That does sound fun. Are you ready for today?
More than ready. It's all finally starting. No more waiting and wondering how it's going to be.
I'm glad you think that way. Do you need me to do anything today?
Just make sure the girls are doing okay this morning. Help keep them calm.
That's my specialty, you can count on me. Are you about to leave?
Yeah, just going to say bye to [g1] then head out.
Good luck honey. Show them all what you were born to do.
After the kiss last night this just feels normal. Like we've always done it.
Mmmm. Have a great day today.
I'll see you soon. Don't hold anything back today.
I never do. Love you mom.
Love you too honey.
Time to say goodbye to [g1] and take Stacy home.
Hey there [mcf].
Hey yourself. Is that the uniform?
Yep, sure is.
What do you think? Looks good?
Looks great. I didn't even know about them.
I didn't either until a few days ago. Apparently they had some scandal with students and now they're overcorrecting with a lot of strict rules.
That blows. I assume that means I'll have to wear one too.
Sure do. It's nice though. You'll look handsome in it.
Are you about to leave?
Yeah if I don't I'm going to be late.
MmmmmmmMmmmm.. Have a great day today. I'll be at the rally. Will you look for me please?
Of course babe.
I'll give you guys a moment. I'll be down there waiting. Take your time.
I'll be right down.
Mwah!
Please, please find me at the rally. I want to talk to you again before classes.
Don't worry. I'll hold up the entire rally until someone brings you to me if I have to.
Oh, also. Can you wake up Shauna and Elizabeth for me?
Yes I can. They don't need to be up for a little bit. I'm sure they'd enjoy getting the rest.
Have fun out there.
Are you not going to tell me good luck?
I would if I thought you needed it. I know you're going to do great.
When you put it like that, I can't say I disagree. I'll see you soon babe, I love you.
I love you too.
You good to go?
As ready as ever.
So that was your girlfriend?
Yeah, we've been together for a few months.
You two are cute together.
Thanks. Do you have a special someone?
Nope, my mom was strict. No boys allowed. Then she sends me off here out of nowhere.
That's strange. This isn't exactly the place a strict parent sends their kid.
Welp, it appears we're at our break off point.
Yep. Are you going to the rally today?
That's not really my thing. I might see you sometime today though, who knows.
Hopefully so. Also you have an open invite to visit our house anytime. Don't be a stranger.
Really? Awesome. I uhh.. It was nice meeting you.
Nice meeting you too Stacy. Have a good day.
Now, finally time for practice.
Still the first one here it seems, besides Harper who is passed out.
Harper... You need to wake up before others see you sleeping on the jobbbb...
Hmm, nothing.
Coach Harp. You need to get up before someone sees you.
Huh?? Oh. I'm sorry [mcf]. I didn't mean to fall asleep.
I don't mind. I'd be asleep if I was in this room by myself this early too. I just didn't want anyone else to see you sleeping.
All right, you're starting to freak me out.
Ha, what makes you say that?
You're too much. You're kind, respectful, insanely talented, intelligent. I can't find any character flaws.
Which means you have to be hiding something. Hmmm, what is it.
Tax fraud. That's my flaw.
Aah, so your true flaw is that you tell terrible jokes. I see.
Ha, I've been caught.
Are you ready for practice? We have a brand new practice gym ready to go.
I'm excited to see it. I'm just ready to play basketball again.
Good, good. Oh, how are you feeling? You know, after the incident yesterday.
I'm completely fine. It really wasn't bad.
That's great. Natalie was worried all night about it.
Speaking of, as your coach. We're going to have to teach you a thing or two about an escape dribble.
Come onnn... We were playing casually and I had like 4 steps on her. I didn't expect her to jump.
Whatever helps you sleep at night big shot.
So what do you think about Natalie?
She's cool, she seems like she'd be a great friend to have. She was caring and very kind to me.
That's great to hear.
Yo, what's up guys?
Hey Damien. How's it going?
A bit anxious. Just ready to get out there and get started.
Guys, I will be right back. There's a few things I have to check on. [mcf] can you wait in here? Charles wanted to talk to us both.
Yeah sure.
Awesome, be right back.
So, you and coach? Getting close huh?
Yeah, not like that though. She's cool.
I'm just saying. I played for her all last year. We never got as close as you've gotten with her in a day.
She's easy to talk to man, that's all. Why?
Hah, nothing. I'm just happy you're happy.
Yo, [mcf].
What's up Mackey?
I'll meet you guys on the court.
Listen. We have to talk man to man. I know you were bullshitting yesterday. So was I.
What? Why?
It's an act. People think I'm dumb and no one expects anything from me.
Okay, why the act though?
I'll give it to you quick. My family is filthy rich. To get a cut of that pie they told me I had to finish college.
You get it?
Why join the basketball team then?
Parent's wishes. I did enough to make the team and now I'm coasting. You deserve to know that. I don't want to bullshit you all year long.
I know you're probably thinking 'Wow, he's actually an idiot for telling me'.
I'm not, because you'd be an idiot to say no to this deal.
You help me coast through this and you can expect my company to sponsor you once you make it to the league.
What even is the company?
Uhh... Gravel or some shit. I don't know.
That's not the important part. The sponsor checks are.
Just think about it man. See you out there.
I have a feeling all that was acting on top of his acting.
Hey, it's nice to meet you. I'm Lee.
It's nice to finally meet you too Lee. I'm [mcf].
I'm excited you're here. We need a guy like you.
Me and Damien tried to carry things last year. Wasn't enough though.
And about Mackey, you just have to give him some time. Things don't always come easy to him.
I'll try but I'm not very patient.
That's fair, just know that he doesn't mean half the things he says.
Anyway, I'm here to work. Whatever you or coach asks of me, I'll do.
Thanks Lee, keep that attitude and we're going to get along just fine.
Good to know, I'll see you out there buddy.
All that's left to meet for the starters is Ryker. I can't say I'm very excited to meet him.
Good morning!
Oh, hey Charles.
How was sleeping in that house? The beds are like clouds in heaven.
I actually fell asleep watching a movie on the couch.
Hey, the couch isn't that bad either.
Where's the coach at?
She had some things she had to check out. Said she'd be back in a second.
Christ, she can't even make it to a simple meeting. We won't have to deal with her too much longer.
What? Why do you say that?
We're in the process of getting a new coach. Her days are numbered.
No, no. Harper is my coach.
[mcf].. She couldn't even win a single game last year. She's not the answer.
Sir, I know we need to keep a certain professional relationship together.
So I'm going to say this as respectfully as I can. There's only about three positives going on here and Harper is one of them.
Kid... That's cute, you're loyal and all that. But let the adults handle the business side of it.
Is that what adults do? Find a scapegoat for their shortcomings?
Shhh kid, shhh...
You could give the greatest coach to ever walk the earth the sorry ass team you gave her last year and they wouldn't win a game.
Be a fucking man, realize your shortcomings and fucking work on them. You're sitting there calling me kid when you're acting like a child.
There's many to blame, starting with you and probably ending with your recruiters.
They got you didn't they?
They got me? You think this was my school of choice?
You run a shithole. This school is a joke. Do you know how much shit I've gotten for coming here?
That's not because of Harper. That's because they have an insecure buffoon running the ship.
But even insecure buffoons get lucky.
If you have a single working brain cell you'll realize the only play here.
You keep Harper. Tell the other coaches to fuck off. Then I'll stay.
You keep your investors, you get the credit, you get the power.
You don't step a foot around here. This becomes Harper's team to run.
Understood?
.......
Come on Charles, you know this wasn't the product of your recruitment. I had to come here.
Harper isn't the issue. I can promise you that.
If you get rid of Harper then you're getting rid of me.
With that goes all the shiny new things. Investors will be gone, sponsors will get out of their contracts.
So I implore you to realize that Harper isn't going anywhere. This is her team to run.
No more behind her back moves. You excuse yourself from whatever role you play in this team.
You keep your investors, you get the credit, you get the power.
That sounds fair to me.
.......
Oh shit, she was behind me that whole time. No wonder Charles tried to shush me.
Holy... She's squeezing me tight.
I don't even know what to say.. You didn't have to do that.
But damn [mcf].. Thank you so fucking much.
You're my coach Harp. I stand up for you just how you'd stand up for me.
I believe in us. We can turn things around here. I couldn't let Charles get in the way of that.
It feels so good to finally have someone on my side. I won't let you down.
I know you won't.
Come on, they must be waiting on us to start practice.
Right behind you coach.
Don't forget, it's Harp when it's just us two.
You got it Harp. Let's go.
Guys! Over here!
Looks like it's just us four for the start.
Nothing new there.
Let's just start with some laps around the court to get warmed up while we wait for the others.
Yes coach.
How are there only 3 people here? There should be at least 12.
Maybe they'll all show up, they just got lost or something. Right?
[mcf]!!
Oh hey, what's up Bailey?
Just waiting on Zoe. Uhh, how are you feeling?
You know, down there?
Hah, I'm fine. I just stayed there for a bit and took a nap and went home.
Good. I was worried about you.
I appreciate the concern. But me and my down there are totally fine.
Oh yeah? Look down at my feet.
Damn, these floors are reflective.
Yeah, I know right! Can you see anything?
Just legs. Not enough light for anything else.
The perfect thing to tease you with.
You know everyone can see that right?
Yeah but I'll be selective. I only want you to see.
Hey Romeo! We're running laps, you should join us.
Ha, right behind you.
Well, I have to get back to running. It was nice seeing you Bailey.
You too [mcf]!
Many laps and stretches later
Everyone feeling good to go?
Yeah.. Don't we need more than three though?
Hmmm. I wonder where they are...
I'm going to go look for them. Just stay warmed up guys. I'll be back.
Hey, this is my bad because I should've told you sooner. But this is our average practice.
What? How?
We usually just do drills. The kind you can do with just a few people. We watch film for the ones that need more.
Where's the bench players?
Charles didn't let them practice with us. He said they made us worse.
What the fuck.
Told you, this place has problems. We need someone with leverage to step up for us.
I think I already have.
How so?
I had a little spat with Charles after you left. He told me he was going to get rid of Harper and it just ticked me off.
I told him if she goes then so do I. Also that he doesn't get a say in basketball decisions anymore.
Damn, I thought it would take longer to get that side out of you.
Charles has a way with words.
Ha, yes he does. Did you tell Coach?
She heard it all, she was behind me and I didn't even know.
Damn man, major brownie points there.
I can tell you today is going to be a wash. She'll be back soon and we'll do some dribble exercises and shit like that.
And hopefully we have new teammates tomorrow. For the moment just grab a ball and let's play a bit.
[mcf]!! Over here!
Come here! I want to introduce you to someone.
Uhh sure.
[mcf], this is Emiko.
It's nice to meet you.
Mhmmm..
She's a little shy. She wanted to meet you though.
There's no need to be shy. I won't bite.
...
Okay... Not much of a talker is she?
What are you up to? Where's the coach?
She went looking for Ryker and Mackey.
So she's not coming back?
She'll be back, probably by herself but she'll be back.
We were just going to shoot around for a bit.
Ooooh. Can we play?
What do you want to play?
I don't know. Free throw contest?
I'll warn you.. I make about 9/10 of my free throws.
Well then there's a 1/10 chance that I can beat you.
Math checks out, come on let's play. You too Emiko.
What about me?
You're invited too Bailey.
Awesome, let's play.
All right, simple. Make as many as you can and we'll see how we match.
Okay, simple enough.
There's no way any of them come close.
That's one.
Okay, that's too easy.
Come on Bailey, let's make it interesting.
Free throws are easy. But what about if a crowd was going crazy and the game was on the line?
You drown it out.
Well, let's practice.
I don't see a crowd anywhere.
It's about the pressure. Feel any now?
We're not doing this Zoe.
Come on Bailey, help me convince him.
I don't know Zoe...
What are you two doing??
Just helping out.
Mmmhmmm. I'm sure. Can you all please go to our meeting room?
Come on Zoe, See you [mcf].
See you girls...
Jasmine seems pissed.
Jasmine.. Is everything okay?
Why don't you ask your best buddy over there?
Hey.. Wait..
What happened?
Damien ditched on me last night. I'm over it.. If he doesn't want to hang out with his girlfriend then I won't force him.
Did he give a reason or anything?
Nope, he just said he wasn't going at the very last second.
So after I brought [g1] to her loving boyfriend I had to go wait to be told that mine doesn't even want to hang out with me.
Hey, I'm sure it's not that. Let me talk to him. See if he will tell me anything.
You would do that for me??
Sure, you would do the same for me.
Now don't worry about boys today. It's the first day of college, there's bigger things at play.
You're right... Thank you [mcf].
No problem, I'm happy to help. I'll catch you later.
Ayyyy, Romeo. You done playing with the girls already?
Yeah, they had to go do their own thing. Where's Lee?
Bathroom. So what's up? Want to do anything?
Uhh, I just have a question first.
What's going on with you and Jasmine?
Awh man, not you too.
I'm just curious, she told me you ditched her last night.
Ehhh. Kinda. I just haven't been into it man. My mind isn't on her. I'm worried about basketball right now.
I understand that. But Jasmine doesn't seem like the kind of girl to wait around.
Just be careful there my guy.
Yeah, I know. She's told me plenty these last few days about how she won't wait forever.
I'm just no good on dates. Never been my thing.
How about a double date then? Me and [g1] with you and Jasmine. You owe me a lunch anyway.
Yeah, that could work. Instead of lunch how about a pool?
After you get out of classes we could hit up a pool here. It doesn't open for a few more days but we can get in.
I'm down. You let Jasmine know and I'll tell [g1].
It's a date then.
Good, so... Is Harper coming back?
Couldn't say. I've never seen her leave a practice.
Should I go look for her?
It's not like we're going to be doing anything else this morning.
True. If I don't see you again then I'll catch you for our date after class.
Wouldn't miss it.
3 minutes later
Where would she be? The teacher lounge maybe?
Oh shit Natalie. You scared me.
You scared me too! At least I didn't fall on you this time.
Hah, true. What are you doing here?
I told you I would check on you. How are you doing?
I'm perfectly fine. Thanks for caring though.
Of course. What are you doing out in the halls?
I was looking for your mom, have you seen her?
Yeah, I just got done talking to her. She's in the lounge just down this hallway.
Great, did she seem okay?
Okay?? She seemed better than that. She told me about what you did. What you said to Charles.
I think she really needed that. Thank you [mcf].
You're a really awesome guy. I'm really glad you're here.
That's incredibly nice of you to say Natalie.
I mean it. I'll get out of your hair now. I hope to see you again today.
I hope so too. See you Natalie.
Uh oh, that's not a good sign.
Harp? Are you okay?
[mcf].. What are you doing here?
I came to check on you. Why didn't you come back?
It's just me. You know I'm on your side.
You stood up for me, told me you believed in me. Then I held a practice for three players. It's embarrassing.
No one said this was going to be easy. In fact everyone has said the opposite. We just have to take it day by day. At the rally today I'll announce try outs for the team.
That should bring people into practice. We might find one or two decent players out of it.
Then we just go from there. It's your team but I'm here to help you every step of the way Harp.
Everything's going to be fine. It's just a bad first day. We can only go up from here.
Mhmmmm...
Ahemmm!
Lauren? What are you doing here?
Charles has me on an egg hunt for Mr. [mcl] here.
Oh... Go with her [mcf].
Come on young man.
Hey, that's not what it looked like back there.
I don't care what it was, students aren't allowed in there.
.....
Why was she crying?
She was? I didn't even know.
She's had a rough start to her day. I was just trying to console her.
Charles said some things and then our practice didn't go well. I was just trying to help her through it.
There's a rumor going around that you told Charles off. Is that true?
Yes ma'am. He said things I disagreed heavily with.
About fucking time someone spoke up to him. He can't do anything about you.
Good job kid.
Uhhh. Thank you? A second ago you looked like you were going to chew my head off.
Sorry, things are weird here now. We've had so many allegations and scandals that everyone is so scared of everything.
So when I see a child cuddling a coach in a restricted part of the school. Let's just say it's enough to concern me.
It's pretty obvious you were just being kind now though. So I apologize.
Apology accepted. I apologize that you had to hunt me down.
Ehh, I wasn't doing anything better.
I'm noticing a theme here. Almost everyone dislikes Charles.
Including me for now. I do need to talk to him about the guy I knocked out this morning.
What all do I have to do today?
It should be meeting Charles now, then the rally. Then classes will start. Today's going to be a long one.
Thank you Lauren. So [mcf]. We need to talk.
Yeah, I assumed we did.
Now I want us to be friends. We're going to have to work together on that.
Sir, if you want to be my friend then you're going to have to stop with the unnecessary stuff.
The houses and everything like that, I'm extremely grateful for. Thank you.
But I'm here to play basketball. I'm not here to live a luxurious life and kick back and relax.
I have to do this for a year and then I can declare for the draft. All I'm asking from you is to let Harper do her job, that will put me in the best place to succeed and that will make everyone happy.
She will. If you believe in her then I'm inclined to give her another shot.
And as a show of good faith I'll even honor your wish of me stepping back from the basketball program.
It's Harper's to run uninhibited. That is until we start losing. Can we agree on that?
Yes sir.
Good, now one more thing.
You are not to disrepect me like that again.
You may disagree with me but you can not speak to me like that.
Understood?
Understood.
Good. I'm glad we're on the same page then.
I could tell you were holding yourself back from what you really wanted to say earlier.
I respect a man that can control himself. Even if I may disagree with him.
It shows you want this to work as much as I do. Which is incredibly valuable to me.
Anyway, your rally is starting soon. About 30 minutes.
I have a few people I have to talk to so I might be a little late for the start of it. Feel free to hang out in here and look around while you wait for it to start.
See you sir.
Well, might as well have a look around.
I'd put a thousand dollars that Charles has never read a single word out of that book and it's just there for show.
It's strange. I feel like he really does just want to make it work for me here.
Me and him are just opposites.
Knock, knock
Coming!
Who could that be? Maybe it's just Charles and he forgot something.
Oh, hello. Uhh, Charles just stepped out if you're looking for him.
I'm not looking for Charles.
I'm looking for you.
Oh, fuck...
Wait, is this a bribe from Charles?
I can't take any bribes, not after today.
Fuck me, she has fantastic tits though.
But this isn't right. What if this is being recorded somewhere? What if he would try to blackmail me with this?
Cat got your tongue? What do you think?
Uhmm. I'm flattered but I can't do this.
Why not? What's wrong?
Many things. I hope you have a good day.
Wow, okay. Be like that then.
Apologies, this just isn't my thing.
Get out of here then asshole.
Not much of a talker, are you?
Tell me no and I'll stop.
.....
That's what I thought. Now schooch on back against the desk.
So what? Boobs come out and suddenly you can't speak?
.....
Hmmm, I know a way to make you talk.
Tell me how sexy I am right now or my entire tongue is going in your mouth.
.....
Have it your way kid.
Damn, she wasn't kidding. She isn't holding anything back.
If this is a bribe, she's selling it very well.
I'm going to surpise her and suck on her tongue a bit.
Mmmm. There he is. So you are alive.
Down here isn't though. Not yet anyway.
I can fix that. Go ahead and lay down. You know you want it.
Mmmmmm. You're one big man. Does the dick match?
Find out.
Oooh. He speaks. You don't have to tell me twice. Get these clothes off of you.
Nice chest.
I could say the same.
Yes you most certainly could. Do you like my tiny hands on your cock? Is it going to grow for me?
Am I going to need two hands?
Ohhh, I think I'm going to need both.
That's all it takes for you huh? A pair of boobs and a hand to get you really going?
I bet you're already close to climax. I bet you're laying there tensing up trying to hold it back.
Not even close, barely starting. I want to see how far she'll take this though.
I don't think you could take anything else.
Can you handle a little lick?
Hmmm, not bad. But what about this?
Damnnn, this woman knows how to use her tongue.
Not enough then? Need more?
Greedy, greedy boy.
A woman like me throws herself at you and you don't have the decency to splatter her tongue with your cum?
No more words huh? Well since you don't want to use your tongue that way maybe we could try something else.
No funny ideas kid. We're not fucking... not today.
I'm just going to turn around and we're going to please each other.
Damn, she has a nice ass. Cute little asshole too.
She's going to be disappointed though, I have no intention to eat out a stranger.
AhhhhMmmmmmmm..
Hmm.. She's not wasting anytime.. 
Mmmm.. you like that?
...
Still not enough? What about this?
Agghhhhh.... Hmmm...
MmmmHmmm, Tha-gghh what I thought...
KNOCK, KNOCK, KNOCK
Oh fuck someones at the door. Please, please, please don't walk in.
We're fucked if they do.
Mmmgh.. Shhhh.. Get up kid.
Yes? Can I help you?
Oh, it's you Katie. Is [mcf] in there?
Yes he is. We were just going over what he needed to do today.
Good. Let him know the rally is starting soon.
Will do, thank you Lauren.
Fuck me that could have been so much worse.
That could have been anyone. Even [g1] or Shauna. Why am I in here doing this?
Welp, fun times over. Get dressed kid.
I never would have done this a few days ago. If I don't stop [g1] is going to get seriously hurt.
God, I'm an idiot. A pair of boobs come out and I lose control.
I have to come clean. Maybe this is what caused those dreams? I'm stressed from trying to hide my cheating.
[g1] doesn't deserve this.
All I can do now is go on with my day and tell [g1] everything I have to tell her when I can.
Guess that starts with getting dressed.
Sorry for the blue balls kid. I wanted to get my rocks off too.
We'll finish this later.
Maybe not Katie.
Listen, I know getting interrupted sucks but I didn't choose that.
I know, I just can't keep doing this.
Whatever you say kid. See you around.
See ya Katie.
As quickly as she came, she went.
Boner is gone, that's good at least. Let's finish getting dressed and get the hell out of this office.
That was weird, all around. I can't dwell on it though. Too much to do.
What's Emiko doing out here? She looks sad. Should I talk to her?
Hey Emiko, is everything okay?
.....
You don't need to be afraid or shy around me Emiko.
You don't even have to talk around me, I just saw you over here looking sad and wanted to see if there was anyway I could help.
.....
All right, I won't bug you. If you need anything just let me know.
Wait... I'm sorry I'm just nervous.
What's got you so nervous? You seemed chirpy this morning.
I'm scared I won't like my class. There's some mean girls in it.
Mean girls? Have they said anything to you?
No, it's my first year. I've heard stories from the other cheerleaders..
They were probably just messing with you Em. Plus if anyone's mean to you they'll have to answer to me okay?
You're going to beat them up for me?
Ha, not exactly. I'll talk to them. But if they don't stop I know some girls who could rough them up.
So boom, problem solved. Anything else?
Can we sit down?
Uhh sure.. Where?
Right here.
Is everything good?
Yeah, my legs are just a little shaky..
I thought we solved those nerves. What's got you nervous still?
You..
Me? Why am I making you nervous?
You're very tall. It's spooky.
Haha, true. Am I less spooky when we're on the ground?
Yes sir. I don't feel like I'm too tiny anymore.
I'll keep that in mind. Hey.. Do you know where the rally is going to be at?
No, sorry. I'm new here too.
Oh right, well I need to go find out where it is before I'm late to it.
Can I have a hug before you leave?
Sure, I don't see why not.
Thank you.
No problem. Don't forget, if anyone picks on you tell them they have to answer to me.
Okay, thank you [mcf].
Anytime, I'll see you soon Em.
Okay, time to find where this rally is.
Hopefully someone up here can point me in the direction.
I also told [g1] I would find her before this thing starts.. That might be difficult.
Of course, no one is here. Just my luck.
[mcf]??
Harp, what are you doing here?
Come over here and find out.
What's with the shirt?
Lauren made me put it on, said my top was too revealing.
Ahh, fair enough.
How did your meeting with Charles go?
It went well. He told me he would back off as long as we can win.
He shouldn't bother us, well at least you anymore.
You're actually a miracle worker.
I knew you coming here would help. I didn't know it would be like this and this quickly though. You're amazing.
Thank you Harp. I'm just trying to do what I think is right.
I truly believe that. We really need to work on some flaws for you to have.
It's weird how much I like... Uhh.. Being your coach.
And I like you being my coach.
Mom? [mcf]?
Oh, what's up Natalie?
I was headed over to your rally. Why aren't you at it?
Honest answer? No clue where it is.
I can help you find it.
I would very much appreciate that.
Hey, I just had a great idea. You should come by our house for dinner sometime. Let me and Nat cook you a meal.
Yes, he should. He just shouldn't expect great food. But I hear the company is fantastic.
I would love to. Just tell me when is a good time and we'll make it happen.
You free tonight?
Uhh.. Tonight may be tricky.
No big deal. If you're free then swing by.
Yes, you're welcome to come by anytime you want to.
I'll definitely swing by if I have a chance.
[mcf]!! There you are!
Hey babe. I was about to search for you.
You girls look great in your uniforms.
You girls look excited. What's up?
We got good news.
Hey girls, it's nice to meet you both. I'm [mcf]'s coach. You can call me Harper.
It's nice to meet you Harper. I'm [g1].
Yeah, it's nice meeting you, I'm Shauna.
So you two are the ones responsible for this man?
Depends, if he's been good then yes. If not then it wasn't us.
He's been great. You girls have no idea.
Are you [mcf]'s girlfriend [g1]?
Yes ma'am.
I just got done inviting [mcf] for dinner one night. I'd be estatic if you would come with him.
Pssst, [mcf]..
Sorry to interrupt. But you should probably change into your school uniform before the rally.
You're right Natalie. I don't think I have a uniform yet though.
It should be in your locker. Do you need help finding it?
I can help him find it. We passed the locker rooms coming here.
Yeah? Sounds good to me.
Hurry back.
We won't be long. Let's go [g1].
You really do look amazing in that uniform.
Thank you. I'm sure you'll look great in yours.
But you'll always look better out of it anyway.
Mmm. I could say the same to you.
Mind if I watch you change?
Hmmm. I'm recalling me carrying you to a locker room and getting told to leave so you could change.
Heyyy... We weren't where we are now. That's not fair, so...
Phlbbbbbbttt!!..
Oh man, this is a perfect opportunity to catch her off guard. A little tongue sucking action.
Hmmmm..?
Someone's been chewing gum, her tongue is all minty.
Wow, your cheeks are red.
Did I embarrass you?
Shut upppp, I just didn't expect it. I liked it.
Can we do it again?
Soon, let's get out of this hallway before we get yelled at for PDA.
Hmmm, I don't think I'm meant to be in here.
Probably not, but it's fine.
Do you know which one is yours?
Yeah, they gave me the code and everything in an email.
Well, are you looking for it?
Oh, I'm looking.
That uniform is going to drive me insane. She looks so curvy and she's actually showing off her legs.
I can't resist, got to have a touch.
She has such an amazing ass. Perfect amount of firm but still some jiggle.
Oh... Babe.
Babe, I don't think we have time to fool around..
No, we don't. I just had to sneak me a grab of you.
No sneaking required. It's yours to play with whenever. At least when it's appropriate.
Don't forget you're sleeping with me tonight. Plenty of time to have a grab or two then.
I'll hold you to that.
Or you could just hold me down. Now go get changed before I make you late.
Damn, [g1]'s really coming out of her sexual shell.
Maybe tonight will be the night. I'll give her the bracelet. We'll have a nice evening together and then we'll finally go all the way.
Wait no, I have to tell her about Shauna. I doubt she'll be in the mood after that.
I'm really not looking forward to that.
These shoes are weird. I feel like a clown.
Oh well, it's the only ones here.
Wow babe, you look fantastic.
Good enough to sneak a grab?
Absolutely, how about a kiss for now though?
Mwah!
Are you ready?
As ready as I'll ever be.
Damn, these shoes are really bad. I feel like I'm on my way to a clown car.
I need to buy some new ones tonight.
Oh shit, Shauna. What's going on?
Uhh.. I was just seeing if you two were still in there.
Spying again? Nah, she probably was just seeing where we went.
Well we're here. What's up? You mentioned good news earlier.
We talked to Charles on our way in.
Oh fuck...
He didn't say anything out of line did he?
What? No, he told us about our classes.
Oh... What's the good news there?
Charles said he changed all of our classes.
He said you wanted to be with us so he moved us all to a communications class.
It's meant to be a great jumping off point for us after this year and for you if you decide to go back to school after this year.
Really? That's great!
I just wish Charles would have asked first, but this is something I want.
I can't get a read on that guy. I can't tell if he's genuinely trying to be my friend or there's something else there.
Oh, I'm so happy that my two best friends will be with me through it all.
I am too, it really helps alleviate a lot of the stress.
Tell me about it, We have [mcf] to protect us now.
Girls as much as I love this moment we need to go, rally has probably already started without me.
You're right...
Hey... Sorry for eavesdropping, I didn't mean to..
You're good Shauna. I don't mind.
There you all are! You're just in time. I was worried you got lost.
Nope, just wanted to make you worry.
Mission accomplished.
Now come with me, I'll sneak you through the side and we'll be right on the stage.
It's going to be dark so everyone stay close together.
WOOOOO!!
Damn, that's loud.
That's for you. We're walking right next to where all the seats are, just behind the wall.
This is a new year! No more being the laughing stock!
We're no longer the nukes that blew up on themselves. We're the WVM Stars!
WOOO!!!!!!!!!
We're almost there. Just up these steps.
Here we are.
We can be proud again! We can shine brightly like the stars we are!
Pssstt. Lauren!
Welp, guess it's time. I've never really had stage fright before but I'm feeling it a bit right now.
Go out there and be there star babe. Give them what they came for. You got this.
And without further ado, here he is! [mcf]!!
WOOOOO!!!!
They're warmed up for you.
Thanks Lauren.
Those lights are really bright, try not to look up too much.
Fuck me, I can't see anything other than the edge of the stage.
How many people are there?
SPEECH!! SPEECH!! SPEECH!!
Uhh. Hello students and staff of WVM. I'm honored to be on this stage today.
[mcf]!! [mcf]!!
Oh fuck, I have no clue where to go from here. It's one thing to be in front of so many people. But to not be able to see them is so much worse.
[mcf]!! Look!
He can't see it's too dark.
Use your phone, put the flashlight on them.
[mcf]!!!
What? Where??
Oh... Damn, that's one massive pair of fake titties.
WOOOO!!!
Have my babies [mcf]!
Me next! Over here!
And that's one big ass with a butterfly tattoo.
Let me suck your cock!
Jesus, these girls are insane.
Fuck, [g1] and Shauna are watching this too. Did they see all of that?
Fuck... [g1] really doesn't like this.
Just need to focus and get through this.
Lauren is right. This is a new year.
This is not the same team, we have higher aspirations and we intend to achieve them.
We're going to need your help. We need you to fill up the crowds and cheer just as loudly as you are now.
WOOOOO!!!!
We need help in another way too. We have some open spots on the team. If you think you're ready. We will be holding try outs soon.
There will be more information for that in the coming days. Just contact either me or Coach if you're interested.
Finally, I'm going to give this school everything I've got. Go Stars!
WOOOOO!!!! [mcf]!! [mcf]!!
Take off your shirt!
Look over here!!! Please!
Not bad, you handled that well.
Thank you, do I need to do anything else?
No that's all. You should head on to class before students start filling the hallways.
Good job [mcf]. The crowd uhh, really liked you.
That's an understatement.
Yeah, I'm sorry about that girls. I didn't know they'd go that crazy.
I'm proud of you babe. Good job.
Natalie, would you mind showing us to our class? I'm not really sure where it is.
Sure, just follow me.
4 minutes later
Oh wow, I like it.
Yeah me too. Pick us out a section girls.
Thank you Natalie. You've been a great help today.
It's the least I could do after I sent you to the nurse yesterday.
Maybe I'll see you tonight?
Yeah, maybe.
I'll keep an eye out for you. See you soon [mcf].
See you Natalie.
Front row? Since when are you two teacher's pets?
Since today. Come on, it's a good spot.
And you get to sit between your two favorite girls.
Now if you two will excuse me there's something I want to do.
Hey [g1]. Are you okay?
Yeah, I'm fine. Why?
That rally, what some of those girls said.
I mean I didn't like it but I knew it was going to happen. I didn't expect them to flash you right away but..
It's not like you asked for it.
Yeah, I just don't like seeing you sad like that.
Well, I have a smile now.
What is Shauna doing?
Ayyyyyy. Come on. come dance with me.
What? Don't tell me you don't want to.
Can I join?
Ohh.. I'm sorry ma'am.
Well hello there.
Hi, it's nice to meet you. I'm [mcf].
And I'm Veronica.
I'm not going to have to worry about you am I?
I don't believe so, why?
Well, this is meant to be a female only class.
Wait, really? Why?
Scandals have made us take extreme actions. Like splitting up the entire school.
It's that bad?
Yep, so behave please. I'll hold these two girls accountable for you.
I'm going to go greet the rest of the students. It was nice meeting you all.
Sorry if I embarrassed you two.
I know what Shauna was trying to do, she was trying to reset the mood after that rally.
Embarrass us? All I'm saying is we're signing you up for some dance lessons.
Hey! Jerk... Let's see you try it.
Haha, I couldn't do any better to be honest.
Mr. [mcf]. Come up here please.
Oh, sure.
Since you are the only male, you should greet the girls with me.
Just so they know and there won't be any questions about it. Sound good?
Sure, that's good with me.
Great, come on.
We should have a minute before they start showing up.
So you're the new basketball guy right?
Yeah, that's me. Why?
My nephew is a huge fan. He told me to tell you that.
Well that's nice. How old is he?
12. He joined his basketball team this year and says he wants to be like you.
Wow, that's crazy. I'd love to meet him sometime.
Really? He would flip. I'd be the greatest aunt ever to him if I told him that.
We can make it a surprise. There's a middle school gym near here. Tomorrow or any day after class you should bring him there. We can play a bit.
Wow, okay. I'll talk to his mom about it tonight. Thanks [mcf].
I didn't think you'd be the nice type.
I get that a lot.
I was nervous when I heard you would be in my class. Especially after that rally.
You were there?
Yep, I was next to the girl with the butterfly on her back.
That was crazy. You weren't the one that held a flashlight to it were you?
Haha, can't say I was.
Okay, I think we'll get along just fine.
So do I.
I hear footsteps. Meaning it's showtime.
I'm going to let you take the lead.
Hmm, okay. I got this.
Oh hey Zoe and Bailey. Looks like we're going to be sharing a class.
That's funny, last time I checked you had a dick.
Charles put me in this class. I don't think that would be hard for you to believe after yesterday.
Definitely not, I'm happy you're here. Now I'll have something to look at.
I'm happy too. I like it when you're around.
Thanks Bailey.
Can I sit with you?
Uhh, I'm sitting with my girlfriend and bestfriend. But you can sit behind us, that way we'll still be close.
Okay, awesome. See you in class.
Okay, not bad. So far so good.
Two more coming.
Hey Jasmine and Emiko. I'm going to be your classmate.
Really? Awesome! Now I won't have to tell you about if anything happens. You'll already be here.
True, So you're cool with it?
Absolutely. I'm happy about it. I'll see you in class.
What about you Jasmine?
After everything I've been hearing about you, I'd be mad if you weren't in our class.
Thanks Jasmine, I'd be mad if I wasn't either.
Cool...
It's not an issue is it?
No...
What about you Jasmine?
I know [g1] must be happy. Shauna too.
Yeah, they are. But what about you?
I'd be lying if I said I wasn't.
Thanks Jasmine, I'll see you in class.
Two more coming.
Hello, it's nice to meet you two. I'm going to be your classmate.
.....
Sorry about her, she's shy.
Oh, all right. Well, it's nice to meet you. I'm [mcf].
We've met already, I'm Ruby. You pet my dog yesterday.
Oh! That's right. I'm sorry. I was a bit out of it then.
It's all right. So you're in our class?
Yep, is that cool with you?
I don't have any problem with it.
Awesome. Well then I look forward to sharing a class with you Ruby.
It's nice to meet you too. I'm Ruby.
Is it any issue that I'm your classmate?
Why would it be? I don't mind.
Good, well then I look forward to sharing a class with you Ruby.
I do too [mcf]..
Another two..
Hey girls, my name is [mcf]. I'm going to be your classmate.
What's up dribble?
Nicknames already? I don't even know your name yet.
Willow.
Well it's nice to meet you Willow.
You have a girlfriend?
Yeah, I do.
That's too bad. See ya.
Okay then?
Hi. You're tall.
Hey, is that a bad thing?
I don't think so. I'm Rainn by the way.
It's nice to meet you Rainn. You don't mind if I'm in this class do you?
Are you a creep?
I don't think so.
Then I don't mind.
Great, I'll see you in class then Rainn.
Only a few more left.
Hey there, it's nice to meet you.
....
Another shy girl it seems.
Hi there, excuse me.
Okay, she didn't care about me at all.
Hey, nice to meet you.
Right back at you.
See you in class [mcf].
So she knows my name but I don't know hers. Cool.
Phew, that was a lot.
You did great though. You seemed to already know quite a few.
Yeah, mainly through the cheer team or running into them randomly.
Are we done?
Uhh. There should be one more but there's usually a few absent.
Oh, there she is.
Oh, Stacy. You're in this class?
Yeah, sorry I'm late. I ended up falling asleep after I got home.
Yeah that's my bad.
I'd do it again though.
Don't worry about it. It's the first day.
Wait, are you in this class [mcf]?
Yeah me and [g1] both.
Wow, that's great. Can I sit with you two?
Uhh, we have a third. Her name is Shauna...
That's fine, you can pull an extra chair up. As long as you all pay attention.
Oh wow, thanks Vic.
No, thank you for helping me greet everyone.
I'll see you inside [mcf].
Hey, seriously. Thanks for the help. That was more of a test than anything to see how you would interact with them.
Did I pass?
Let me put it this way, I'd let you date my daughter.
Do you have a daughter?
No, but if I did. You'd have dibs.
I'll take that as a compliment.
As you should. Now let's get this class started. Go have a seat.
How did it go babe?
It went okay...
With how some of these girls were talking you'd think it went better than okay.
Here, sit between me and [g1].
You sure everything is okay?
Yeah, I just have to get used to people talking about you like I'm not around.
At least I had the years of my sister doing it to prepare me.
It will calm down, they're just getting it out of their systems.
What about you Shauna? Not nervous are we?
Maybe a little, still feeling silly after getting caught dancing.
It was silly, but that's a good thing.
'Whispering', Hey. Who is the red head?
She's Stacy, it's a long story and I promise to explain it to you later but for now just trust me that she's cool okay?
Yeah, yeah. I trust you.
Attention please students.
What's our greatest tool as humans? What sets us apart from all the animals?
Thumbs?
Our ability to speak and communicate in complex and detailed ways.
Oh..
It's a tool many take for granted, but this class aims to sharpen that tool so you can use it to the best of your abilities.
What feels like forever later
Man, I forgot what class feels like. Sitting here for this long and trying my best to pay attention..
'Whispering' So that's his girlfriend??
She's ugly and has weird hair, why is he with her?
She must be a freak in the bed or something.
What the fuck... Who is saying that? It's one thing to say some shit about me but it's something entirely different to talk shit about her.
Damn it, she must've heard it too..
I have to say something..
Whoever said that, cut that shit out.
You can say whatever about me, but you do not speak about her. Ever.
I didn't [mcf]. I swear..
Three shocked faces and one licking her lips. Fucking Willow.... She's going to be trouble.
Hey! What's going on over there?
Please, take your seat...
I guess I've said what I have to say. I want to say more but it's not worth it.
Yes ma'am, sorry for interrupting.
Thank you..
I'm sorry babe, they don't mean it. They're just jealous.
...
Oh, she grabbed my hand.
I forget how much larger my hand is than hers sometimes. It's probably why we don't hold hands much.
Though we should. This is nice.
The rest of class passes by
Hey, good job today guys.
What happened back there?
Just a girl looking for attention saying some things she shouldn't.
Do you need me to talk to anyone?
No, it should be fine now. Hey, don't forget to talk to your nephew.
Oh trust me, I won't. Thanks again.
No problem, I'll see you tomorrow Veronica.
Yes you will. Have a nice evening.
Hey, [g1]. Do you want to talk about it?
It's fine, girls are going to say some things. I'm just happy you were there with me.
I am too.
[mcf]!
Jasmine! What's up?
Are we still on for our double date?
Oh.. I'm sorry out of all the hectic things happening today I forgot to ask [g1] about it.
Would you like to have a double date with Jasmine and Damien? We're just going to sneak into a pool here.
Of course. I'd love to.
Awesome! You guys are the best.
Hey, what about us?
Uhh.. Triple date?
I'm just messing with you. Have a good time.
Wait, how are you going to get home?
Walk. With my two legs.
That's not safe, let me take you home first.
I'll walk with her. We'll keep each other safe.
Okay.. Thank you girls. And Stacy feel free to relax at the house for as long as you'd like. We'll be there in a bit.
Okay, I will. See you soon.
Yep, see you [mcf].
See you girls, stay safe.
Come on, I'm ready to get out of this uniform and into a pool.
Yeah, same here.
Somethings up with [g1]. She's had that same smile since the rally. I think she's just putting on a brave face..
Here we are. Nice isn't it?
Yeah it's great. I didn't really bring any swimming trunks though.
There's some in the rooms on the side and don't worry they are new.
There's only two rooms though so you two get one and I'll take the other.
All right. Damien on his way?
Yeah, I just texted him.
Cool, cool. Let's get changed and into a pool then.
Agreed.
You excited to get in some water?
Mmhmmm.
You sure you're good? You're not acting like yourself.
Yeah, I'm fine.
Babe, don't lie to me. If there's something bothering you then please let me know.
Ever since that rally you've had that same smile despite some fucked up things happening. You don't have to put on a brave face for me.
I'm sure your intentions are good but I promise you if you aren't truthful about your feelings then only bad things can happen.
Babe... It's not like that..
Then what is it like?
It's just hard. With everything you're going through.. I don't want to add onto it with my small problems.
[g1], you're never going to be a burden on me. What's bothering you?
It's silly. It's really not worth adding onto everything.
Please tell me? Just get your feelings out. It will make me feel a lot better knowing you're happy.
I am happy. I'm too happy... I'm still just scared I'm going to lose you.
I know you're going to say I won't. But you can't promise that.
You're this larger than life man who has every girl in this school going crazy for him.
And I'm just the dork who was lucky enough to be your science partner.
I might make you happy now, but what if we get into a fight? What if one day you just don't feel the same?
You'd have endless options to go to. I feel like I'm holding you back.
Like who am I? Why am I the one who gets you?
And I feel awful that I feel this way.
I know I should just be happy and ride along. But you're my everything now.
You're my best friend, my family. You're the outlet to everything that makes me happy. I've completely invested myself in you and I love the hell out of you.
But the more and more I think about it, the more I realize that eventually, something here is going to break.
Whether it be you getting bored of me, or me driving you away because I can't stop worrying.
[g1]..
I love you. I don't want to lose you. I know I'm a very flawed person.
And when I see these beautiful women offer you something it took me months to offer... I know there are better options for you.
And when I finally was ready to.. You know. You told me not yet.
[g1].. I just want your first time to be special. It has nothing to do with any of that.
I know, it's just in my dream world you wouldn't have been able to resist. You would have wanted me so bad that you'd be willing to do it anywhere.
And last night when I tried, you pulled me off of you. I know you want it to be special.
But I just want you. It could be anywhere. Our first kiss was special and I think about it everyday and it was just on your couch after school one day.
I love you and how thoughtful you are. But I really, really just want you. It could be anywhere and it would be special.
Fuck.. I thought I was being a good boyfriend doing that. I didn't know it was hurting her. But she did say she was ready for anywhere..
Hmmmph.. [mcf]...
The truth is I don't care where it happens either. I hope this is what she really wants though.
This uniform has had me going all day.
Babe.. Are you sure?
Come on, help me get this off of you.
Fuck me... You're so damn sexy.
We don't have to do this.. I'm just being silly again.
Getting cold feet?
No.. I just don't want to make you do anything you don't want to do...
[g1], you have no clue how badly I want you. You have no clue the lengths I would go to make sure you were happy.
That's why I've held myself back. I thought what was best for us was to have it be a magical moment.
I didn't know I was hurting you. Trust me, I want this, badly.
And if you truly do too. Then turn around.
..Mhmmm.. Okay...
She's definitely nervous now, I'm going to have to warm her up.
You have such an incredible body. I don't know how you could think I wouldn't want this.
I catch myself thinking about doing this all the time. Now it's finally about to happen.
Oh wow, she's practically shaking. I don't think she expected this to happen.
I love grabbing you by your hips. You're curvy in all the right places.
I also love how your panties really show off and amplify how round your ass is. Sadly they have to go.
I can feel the heat coming off of her. She wants this as badly as I do.
She's probably been thinking about this for days, it's probably why she's been so easy to get off.
She thinks about it all day and by the time it happens she's already close to finishing.
I wonder what she's thinking right now, maybe she's thinking I'm about to penetrate her.
I bet she's so worked up and ready... I want to look her in her eyes when I take her though. I know she likes intimacy, I do too.
I can't help myself though, I want to tease her a little more.
She tastes so sweet, that added onto how her pussy is quivering already... It has me ready to go crazy right now.
Even down to the smell, it's so entrancing. It has me diverting back to a caveman brain where everything is telling me to plant myself as deep as I can in her.
Aaaoohhhh! Ba..be.. I thought you were going to do something else.
I had to have a taste, I couldn't resist. There is something else I can do though.
Ahhhh....
I've only ever seen this in porn before. It's not how I thought it would be exactly... But she has such a cute little asshole though that I couldn't pass this up.
[mcf].. What are you doing??
Do you not like it?
... I just didn't expect it.
Okay, okay. I'm done teasing. Turn back around.
Mmmmmm.. You have such nice thighs. Them in stockings is not fair.
And up we go.
Ohhh! Babe? What's going on with you?
You're just too fucking sexy not to play around with. Now hold on tight.
AAHHhhhhh!!!
Her moans, her scent, her taste. Everything is about to make me go insane on her.
Aaaaooohhh! Ahhhhmmmmooooooohhhhh.....
Huh? Did she? I was just about to start.
Ahhhhh.. Babe...
Did you just cum? I wasn't done yet.
You're too much... Teased me too much...
I'm sorry..
Sorry? Why? I'm just playing with you. I'm happy to make you finish.
No.. Sorry for what I said. You've done nothing wrong.. and I said some things I didn't mean.
Babe, it's okay. We've talked about this, there's so much changing so quickly. There's going to be some bumps but we just have to stay strong and stay by each other's side.
I love you so much... But it's something else. Ever since we first fooled around. I've just felt different. All I can think about is you and me doing more.
It's making me act weird. I don't understand it.
So what you're saying is that you're horny all the time now?
Yes...
Ha, what do you think about?
Everything. Me and you doing everything there is to do. I feel guilty because I can't think of anything else.
We're going to do everything babe, I promise.
Did you still want to.. You know.. now?
Do you not feel it poking you right now?
I don't think I can wait anymore. I'm too close to stop. Do you want it?
Yes! Yes please. I want it. I want you to take me. I want it to be you and only you.
I'll never love someone else like I love you. I want to be yours and only yours.
Please, please, please give it to me.
I fucking love you [g1].. Are you ready?
I fucking love you too. I'm more than ready.
Here we go, caveman brain is still active but I need to control myself until she's comfortable.
Ahhhhhhhhhhhhoooo.....
Baby.. You feel so fucking good.
Ahhh.. It's so much bigger than your hand...
Does it hurt?
No, it's perfect baby. It's everything I wanted it to be. I'm ready. I promise.
AAAHHHoooohhhh!! Holyyy...
Jesus Christ she's so fucking tight. I don't think I can go any deeper.
Ahhhhmmmmmmmmmm.. That feels so good baby.
How do you feel?
Like I'm in heaven. I'm so happy. I'm finally yours, every nerve in my body feels better than it ever has right now.
Is it all the way in?
No, but it's as far as I can go at this angle.
Oh... You can start baby. I'm ready for it.
Ahh fuck me... It's so gooooood....
Mmmoooaaahhh.. How am I? Is it good?
Ahh.. Mhmmm.. It's everything I was hoping it would be.
Ahh... Am I yours?
You're all mine babe. And you'll always be.
Mmmmmmmmm.. This feels so fucking good..
I'm close to finishing again.. Fuck me faster baby.
AHHHH! OH FUCK! AHHHHMMMMMMM.
KEEP GOINGGGGG! i'M GONNAAA.....
OOOHHHHMMMAAAAHHHHHHH!! I'M CUMMINGGGG....
Holy fuck she's shaking and flailing her legs like crazy. I can barely hold her up.
MMMMMHMMMMMAAAAOOO!
Oh fuck she kicked off the wall and I lost my balance.. We're going down.
My dick is still in her, please no Natalie 2.0.
Ahhhhhhmmmmmmmmmmm... Baby. That was... incredible.
Damn right it was... Holy shit.
She landed on my dick and it's now all the way in. I thought she was tight before...
It feels so fucking good though and she doesn't even seem to realize.
Mwah!
I love you so much.
I love you too.
Uhhh.. Did you finish?
No, I was getting close. But you seem a little spent, we can finish in a different way.
No baby, I'm fine. I'm more than fine. I just can't really use my legs right now.
I want to make you cum this way our first time. Please baby?
Make me cum a third time.
OHhhhhh.. Fuck yes baby.
Fuck my tight little pussy! Make it yours..
Ahh fuckkkkk...
I'm getting close again..
Ahhh. Keep going just like thattt...
MMMMMMM.. Fuck me [mcf]!
AGGGHHHHH I'M GONNA CUM AGAINNNN!!
Fuckk... I'm gonna cum too..
AAAAAOOOOOOOOooooooooommmmmmm!!..
Ohhh.. my god [mcf].
Ohhh! Fuck...
I couldn't pull out with her on top of me.. I just came a shit ton in her.
Ohhhh... [mcf].
That was so fucking good.
Did you cum inside of me?
I'm not on a pill or anything.
Yeah.. I couldn't pull out...
Mwah!
You didn't mind?
Of course not. I just didn't think you would... I don't mind at all if you don't.
Just.. What if I get pregnant?? That felt like a lot.
Yeah, it was. If you were to get pregnant.. How would you feel about that?
I'm sorry, I couldn't hold myself up anymore.
And I.. I would be happy. I always wanted to have kids.. It's a little early in my life..
But if it was something you wanted, with me. I would love it.
I want a kid. I want to be the dad I never really had.
I think it's pretty crazy we're having this talk right after having sex for the first time..
Everything about us is crazy.. And I love it.
That's very true. I don't know. We're still both incredibly young and our lives aren't going to calm down anytime soon.
My life really isn't that hectic. I just go to classes and by the time I would have the baby. You'll already be drafted to a team and I'll be free to be a mom.
Are you serious about this? It really is crazy.
It might be crazy, but if it's something we both want. Then fuck it. Let's be crazy.
How about this.. We just keep doing what we're doing. Nothing planned but if it happens then it happens.
I'm ready for anything you are [mcf]. Any journey you want to take I'll be right by your side.
I would love nothing more than to be the mother of your child.
All right. If it happens then it happens.
But babe.. There's something we need to talk about.
Yes, there is. Can I go first? I've been meaning to talk to you about it for a few days but haven't been able to.
I really should have before we did this..
Babe. What is it?
Okay.. I don't really know how to say it.
So I'm just going to do what you taught me, just throw it all out.
And please let me finish what I have to say.
You're scaring me babe, but okay. I'm listening.
I want to start this by saying how much you mean to me, and nothing will ever change that.
Now, back on our last day at home before coming here.
I was trying to talk to Shauna about boys remember?
She eventually ran off and I followed her.
That's when I saw her go into the bathroom where you were showering. I heard her confess her feelings to you.
Babe..
Hey, hey. You said you would let me finish.
I'm not mad. I heard you tell her exactly what you would tell me. To get it off her chest.
You made her feel safe in the most uncomfortable position. But.. I didn't realize that at the time.
I was too scared to hear what you would say to her. So I ran back to your living room.
I knew she had to have feelings for you. After how she talked about you and everything. I wanted her to tell me that. That's what I was trying to get out of that boy talk.
I was just scared because in that moment I was afraid she would take you from me.
I told your mom everything. She was the only one I could talk to about it.
She helped me realize a lot of things.
You love me and want me to be happy right?
Of course I do.
You would never do anything to intentionally harm me?
No, I wouldn't.
And I'm your girlfriend?
You're more than that.
Then what would it matter if you did want to be with Shauna?
She's a beautiful girl who loves you as much as I do, and I don't think she would ever do anything to hurt you.
And you could make her really, really happy.
I'm lucky enough to be yours. You come home to me at night.
But I know I'm not perfect. There's plenty of girls who can do things better than me.
But no girl will ever want to see you happy like I do.
So what I'm getting at is... You should be with Shauna too. And more.
[g1]. You have to drop this notion that you aren't everything I need.
It's not just that. Other girls need you. You have this uncanny talent for being exactly what someone needs.
Your mom helped me understand that.
[am] told you that we should be in a poly relationship?
Not exactly, but that's what I realized was right. Shauna needs you [mcf].
Others girls do too, so I'm giving you a deal.
You're free to be with anyone that deserves you. Girls that are kind and sweet and want good for you. Like Stacy.
You don't have to tell me about them, I'd prefer not to know.
But if you ever develop true feelings for them and want them to be a constant part of your life, I'd like to know and I would like to have a say in it.
I don't even know what to say babe.
I know it's a lot but it's what I truly want. I was just a dork with a laundry list of problems before you came in my life.
You've not only fixed all of those problems, you made me a better person and you've made me fall in love.
You're too good of a man for one girl.
And even if you really don't want to be with anyone else. I want you to at least be part of their lives.
Can I talk now?
Mwah!
We can talk about this more tonight, after we talk to Shauna.
Let's go to Harper's house and have dinner with them tonight. Natalie is one of the girls I think may deserve you.
Then we can come home and tell Shauna and then we can discuss everything further with her.
All right, I can't even wrap my head around this right now. I never thought you'd be the one to be into an open relationship.
Me neither. But I am now. And just to clarify, I'm only yours. No other man can ever compare to you.
But we should really head out soon, Jasmine and Damien probably think we ditched by now.
Yeah you're right.
Just think about everything I said... and uhh.. Can you help me get changed?
Ha, I sure can babe.
3 minutes later
You really had to pick the most revealing bathing suit huh?
Actually that was the least revealing.
But you do look damn sexy in it.
I hate to sound needy, but can my big strong man carry me out there? I don't think I can walk yet.
Was it that good?
Oh my god yes.. It was really, really, reallyyyyy good.
Ha, then I will carry you with pride. Come on babe.
Is Damien out here?
I don't see him anywhere. It's just Jasmine.
Oh no... Poor girl. Lay me down next to her please.
Jesus, that bikini leaves very little to the imagination.
Jasmine... Are you okay?
No... He's not coming..
Did he say anything to you?
No, he hasn't replied to anything or answered any of my calls.
Maybe he just got busy, he'll be here when he can.
No... He's not coming. I don't even want him to anymore. He's an asshole.
What the fuck Damien? Where could he be?
I can go look for him, maybe he got caught up somewhere.
Please no, I don't want to hear any more of his excuses. I just want to be over it right now.
'Whispering' Are you thinking what I'm thinking?
Probably not..
She needs you right now.. Be who you are.
Babe, she's in a relationship with my teammate.
I'm not saying do anything with her. She's feeling unwanted right now, make her feel better. Please.
Yeah, I'll try. It's just a bit awkward. Me and her aren't that close yet.
This seems like the perfect chance to get close to her.
Come on, she's a beautiful girl and she needs you.
I mean... you're right, just help me out if things go wrong.
Jasmine.. It's going to be okay. Damien is probably just going through something right now.
He told me that his head is in basketball right now, it's hard for him to be what you need him to be right now.
How can you do it then? You're in the same boat he's in but you're here.
In fact you're in even deeper. He's been here for a few years already, he knows what he has to do and it wasn't that big of a deal the other years.
I have to sit here and watch Mr. and Mrs. Perfect while he's out doing whatever he wants to do and he's not even thinking about me.
Jasmine...
I'm sorry. I didn't mean that, I love hanging out with you two. I'm just a little jealous.
I understand Jasmine. I know it must be hard to feel like you're giving something your all and the other person isn't even trying.
Exactly.. Why am I putting in so much effort and pain when he can't even respond to me?
Have you told him that?
I would if I could.. I just feel worthless.
Hey.. Don't say crazy things like that. You're beautiful and any man would be lucky to have you.
If Damien doesn't get his act together he's going to lose you. And he'll feel like the biggest idiot of them all because he'll realize how great the woman he let slip away is.
Plus we don't need Damien to have a good time anyway. Two beautiful ladies, a handsome man, and what looks like a very relaxing pool. Sounds like a great time as is.
Thank you guys. I don't know what I'd do without you.
I'll try my best not to think about it from here on out.
Good, now let's hop in that pool. I need to cool off.
I couldn't agree with you more.
Jasmine is sexy as hell. What the fuck is Damien thinking not being here?
I have to figure out what's up with him.
Pssst..
See? In a matter of minutes she went from the saddest girl alive to happy.
That's not so much me being anything special. She just has two friends that were here for her.
Whatever you say.
Can you swim? Or are your legs too weak still?
I can float, probably not much swimming though.
I'm gonna carry you over to the pool then.
Thank you babe.
How's the water Jasmine?
Lovely, you should find out for yourself though.
Don't mind if I do.
You coming?
I'm just making sure you're good. Also taking in the view.
Well come get a look from inside the pool.
Haha, sure thing.
Oh man, this is nice. I can feel all the stresses washing away.
Tell me about it.
Hey, do you two want to race? I used to be on the swim team in high school and want to see if I still have it.
You two race, I'll be the referee.
Come on [mcf]. Race me, or are you chicken?
Oh, you're on. I'm not much of a swimmer but I think I can take you.
Want to put a bet on it?
Like what?
Blank check bet, we make it up after it's over. But there's no saying no to whatever we decide.
Sounds interesting. I'm in.
Rules are simple. First one to touch the other side wins.
Are you two ready?
Ready.
Ready.
3... 2... 1... Go!
Holy shit, Jasmine's launch was like a torpedo.
I could probably catch her if I gave it my all though. I think she needs a win today though.
Jasmine wins!
Fuck, she's fast. I actually probably couldn't have caught up.
At the end of the day I feel like the winner now since I have this view.
I won! I thought for sure you were going to beat me!
I told you I'm not much of a swimmer, plus you were fast as fuck.
You didn't let me win did you?
Honestly no, there was no way I was catching up there.
Wow, I'm surprised... Hey, since we're over here alone for a second. I have a question.
What is it?
Come closer.
Did you and [g1] just have sex in that bathroom?
Ha.. Uhh.. No point in lying, I assume we were pretty loud.
Awhh. I'm so happy for [g1].
And yeah. There was no hiding that.. I was out here hearing her scream and now she can't walk. It's pretty obvious what happened.
I'm sorry though, if I had known you were out here alone, we wouldn't have.
No, no. I'm honestly happy for you two. I know how big of a deal it was to her.
You two have talked about it?
She asked me for advice. I couldn't give her any though.
Why's that?
I'm in the same boat she was. Me and Damien haven't done anything.
Really? How long have you two been together?
A long time. Everytime I think I'm ready he pulls something like he is now.
The more and more I think about it. The more I realize I need someone like you.
Just someone that cares and wants me to be happy. Everyone I've seen interact with you has left happier than before they did.
I just need to get lucky and find your clone or something.
Well Jasmine. I think you deserve someone who can make you feel like the beautiful and strong woman that you are. And nothing less.
You're too kind to me [mcf]..
Do you think I should break up with Damien?
It's hard to say Jasmine, but it doesn't seem like he's making you happy anymore.
I don't know your two's relationship, I don't know how deep it goes.
But you have to ask yourself if this is what you want, if he is what you need.
I don't think he is.
Yeah, you're also angry at him right now. I would say to have a conversation with him. Tell him if things don't change you're done.
That way things may work out, or you'll know for sure that he's not the one for you.
But... I live with him. Where would I go?
We have a house with plenty of space. We would be happy to have you stay with us.
Really??
Come on Jasmine, you've been nothing but a great friend since we've been here. I'd be completely happy to have you around.
Okay wow, I'll keep that in mind. Thank you [mcf].
I know Damien hasn't been what you need right now. But you two have been together for a long time.
I don't think you should throw something like that away, it's going to come down to if he can change.
Obviously if he isn't able to change or is unwilling, yes you should break up.
But I think he really cares about you and can change. I'll be here for you either way it goes.
Thank you [mcf].
No need to thank me. Now let's hop back in the pool before [g1] gets lonely.
Haha, sure.
30 minutes of pool time later
Phew, that was fun... but I'm spent.
Yeah it was.. I think I'm done too though. My legs are uhh.. A little sore.
It's a long walk home. Hey Jasmine, is my car still in that garage?
Yeah, you're the only one with a key.
What car?
Oh that's right, she hasn't seen the car yet.
You'll see babe. I'm gonna get dressed and run and get the car. You two just get dressed and wait for me.
The school's parking lot is closed now but there's one right beside it we'll be at.
All right, I'll be back soon.
Drive safe babe.
Mwah!
I will, you two be safe as well.
8 minutes later
Oh man, I'll never get tired of this thing. I can't wait for [g1] to see it.
3 minutes later
There they are. That's the face I wanted to see.
Come on in!
This is yours??
It sure is. Hop on in, it's even better on the inside.
I'll see you two later.
What? Where are you going?
It's a two seater. Plus I...
[g1] can sit in my lap. It's a very short drive.
Come on Jasmine, you're having a bad day and shouldn't be alone. At least let me drive you home.
Okay.. Fuck it, why not.
Do you like it babe?
Like it? It's awesome!
You haven't seen anything yet. Just don't get scared.
I'm in your lap, I could never be scared.
*Cough* This car even has a third wheel.
Oh sorry Jasmine. We'll tone it down. Also you're not a third wheel.
That's debatable. Uhh.. You don't have to take me home. I'd like to hang out with you two some more. If you don't mind.
I don't mind at all. I'm gonna drop you two off at our house. Then I'm gonna go buy me a new pair of shoes.
But after that we can do whatever.
That sounds good with me.
Okay, buckle in girls.
4 minutes later
Wow [mcf]! This thing is fast!
Yeah? You want to drive it sometime?
Aha, I like us being alive so I'll leave that to you.
Thank you for bringing me here [mcf].
Don't mention it, I'll be back soon.
I'll await your return.
Bye baby, drive safe!
Finally some alone time with my thoughts, I never expected that from [g1].
Especially not her trying to hook me up with Jasmine.
This is obviously going to affect our future together but...
She seems to really want it though. I can't say I understand it but I can at least give it a shot.
It's a weight off of my mind with Shauna. We can finally be together openly.
I really can't wait to tell her.
Shauna is going to be happy. I don't know how far this is going to go but it will be nice to be close to Shauna again.
I'm excited to tell her. I don't know how she'll react.
I'm ready for a normal day to happen already though. Seems like something crazy is happening everyday now.
But there's nothing crazy right now. Just me in my really nice car.
Okay, now to get some shoes.
One shoes trip later
Got my shoes, and now is a good of time as any to see if I have any messages.
Hmm, nothing from Rachael on my mom. That's strange, maybe she just hasn't found anything yet.
Hmm, nothing from Rachael about any girls..
I can't remember what I told Rachael about the next 'customer'.. Did I agree to meet her?
There is a message from a woman named Keyana saying to meet her at a park in an hour.
That must be the girl Rachael showed me yesterday.
There's nothing from Anna. She did offer me to hang out today. Should I message her?
Hey Anna, were you still wanting to hang out today? I'm free for a bit.
Oh [mcf]. I'm sorry... My replacement has been calling me all day asking a million questions and I'm busy helping her.
I haven't even been able to eat anything yet. I'm sorry.
It's all right. Focus on your job. I'm sorry you're having a bad day.
Nah, I'm a little too busy today and have too much on my plate already.
And just a message from Bailey saying she hopes to see me soon.
Hmmm, that's it.
Man, I'm hungry. I know me and [g1] are meant to go to Coach's for dinner. But I need something now.
My phone says I'm right next to a little restaurant. Perfect.
Damn, it's empty in here.
Is that the shy girl from my class?
Ahem, excuse me..
Oh! I'm sorry. Can I help you?
Yeah, I just wanted to order a hamburger.
Oh, Anna said she hasn't eaten anything today. I could surprise her with a burger too.
Actually make that two.
Sure, coming right up. You can sit at any booth while you wait.
Thank you.
This place is pretty close. Hopefully the food is good and it could become a regular spot.
[mcf]??
Oh hey Bailey, what's up? I got your message.
Hey! I swear I'm not stalking you. This is our hang out spot.
The cheerleaders hang out here?
What? No. Can I sit with you for a minute?
You sure can.
You don't think I'm just a cheerleader do you?
No, it's just all I've seen you as so far.
I don't think you're a lot of the things your first impression gave off.
I'm not. I'm actually the opposite. Zoe talked me into all of that.
She also told me to tease you as much as I can.
Is that something you want?
Not at first. That's not the kind of girl I am.
What kind of girl are you?
I think I'm a good girl. I'm from a small town, I love progressive rock and I try my best to take care of my friends.
How did you end up as a cheerleader?
Zoe, Rainn, and I are all from the same town. When Zoe joined she convinced me to aswell. I like it though.
So.. Was that your girlfriend in class today?
Yeah, her name is [g1].
She's pretty. You two make a good couple. Is she doing okay? After what was said in class.. I felt awful.
She's good. She was sad for a little bit but everything is fine for now.
Also I know it wasn't you that said those things. So don't worry about that.
Phew, good. I can tell you who did...
I already know, she didn't exactly try to hide it. Willow right?
Yeah...
I'll handle that later.
So uhh.. You were saying this is your hangout spot?
Yep, this is where the losers hang out.
I'll fit right in.
Hah, please. But this is where Rainn and me spend most of our time. Penelope works here so it works out.
That's her name? I haven't gotten her to talk to me yet.
Yep and you should. I know she wants to.
I will, she kind of seems like doesn't want to though.
She's just shy. I'm sure she'll explain why if you engage the conversation with her first.
But yeah, we're here pretty much everyday. I'd love for you to come by as often as you'd like.
I most certainly will. Especially if the food is good.
Hi.
Rainn, how's it going?
Just about to leave. What about you?
Just grabbing a quick bite to eat.
I'm going with her. Would you mind walking us out? There's sometimes a guy who can be a jerk.
Sure.. I can do that.
I don't see any guys around.
Lucky day. Will you be in class tomorrow?
I sure will. I hope to see you two.
You will. See you tomorrow.
See you [mcf]. I'll try to find you before class starts.
I'll look for you. See you tomorrow girls.
I hope my food is ready by now.
Oh.. Looks like it is. I should try talking to Penelope too.
Hey...
Hi... Your food is ready.
Thank you. Would you mind if we talked for a minute? I'd like to introduce myself.
Ohh. Yeah. I was going to ask you the same. Here.. Sit down.
Wow, she looks like a different girl without her glasses.
My name is Penelope.
I'm [mcf]. It's nice to formally meet you.
Yeah.. I'm sorry about earlier. I wasn't expecting to see you that early.
I can understand that. I promise I'm not scary though.
I know, I can be a little strange at times. I'm really happy that you're here..
I had brothers who were big fans of yours.
Just your brothers?
I mean I was too. I just don't know anything about basketball.
When I heard you were coming here. I did some research on you. Wait, that sounded creepy.
No, I know what you're saying.
I found some interviews about your life. I know that you were adopted. I was too, into a foster family.
Other ones talked about your friendships and about Shauna.
I know that she was bullied growing up and you protected her. I was too, but I didn't have anyone like you.
I'm sorry to hear that Penelope. You'll have me for protection now.
I know that she was bullied for being trans but you protected her. I was too, but I didn't have anyone like you.
You're trans?
Yes, I am...
That's awesome. And you'll have me for protection now.
You and Shauna should hang out sometime.
Yeah, totally. I'd like to hang out with you also.
How often do you work here?
Most days. But we're never busy so if you're ever around we could hang out a bit here.
I think I'll be around.
Good, now I'll let you eat your food before it gets cold.
I'll see you in class tomorrow. I'll introduce you to Shauna.
I'm looking forward to it. Have a nice night.
You too Penny.
All right, back in my car. No new messages. Let's eat this burger then get on with the day.
One messy meal in a very expensive car later
I should take this other burger to Anna before it gets too cold.
Man, parking in cities is not fun. I'm here at her hotel though.
Hopefully she's cool with this and hopefully she likes burgers.
Knock, knock.
Coming!
Oh! [mcf].. What are you doing here?
Don't worry. I'm not here to distract you. You just said you were hungry so I figured I would bring you some food.
I hope you're cool with burgers.
That is so kind of you. Come on in.
I have a free minute or two.. Come, keep me company for a bit.
So how was your day?
Pretty good honestly. I can't complain.
Mine hasn't been. It's just one big headache.
That sucks.. You're a very beautiful woman without makeup.
Awh, thank you. Where did that come from?
Couldn't help but notice. I'm sorry you're having such a bad day..
It's getting better. Would you be a doll and hand me my laptop off the table behind you?
Sure..
I'm so happy you came by...
Oh... Damn Anna...
What? Be nice to a girl and some things can open up..
Sadly I do have to respond to a lot of emails.. Take off your clothes... and just lay my laptop down on that desk and sit down in that chair..
I like the sound of this.
You ready for me?
Is that even a question?
Ohhhh... It feels even bigger than yesterday..
Mmmm, her juicy ass slamming against me.. This is the life.
I can't resist. I have to get a handful of her.
Ohh! [mcf]... Your hands feel so nice..
As much as I like you grabbing me.. I need to work. So just sit back and enjoy okay?
No promises.
Hehe, try please.
She has such a nice figure. I wonder what our kid will look like...
Ohhhh... Your cock is sooo nice.
I can't wait to feel your huge load in me again...
It's all I could think about, you pinning me down and cumming deep inside...
Ahhhh.. I can't even read the words on my screen...
Your cock is just.... Mmmmmmm...
Ahhhh. Fuck meeeee.. [mcf], I'm getting close...
Ahhhhhhhoooo... Give me all of your cum. Fill my pussy...
Give me my baby.. Ahhhh! I'm gonnaaa..
Fuck.. I am too!
AHHAhhhh! Fuck yes [mcf]!!...
Oh fuck Anna... I think you got your wish..
Let me see. I can feel it already!..
Jesus, you filled me up... It's pouring out of me and there's even more on your cock..
I think you were born to breed.
I'm so glad you came by. I think you filled my tummy in two different ways.
Did you manage to get any work done?
None at all. All I could focus on was your cock going in and out of me..
Yeah, I was pretty focused on that too.
Do you want me to head out so you can focus on your work?
Mwah!
I don't want to be rude but yes please.
I know if you stick around I'm going to jump your bones again and I won't get anything done.
Ha, all right Anna. Thanks for the good time. Have fun with work.
I won't. But thank you [mcf]. I'll see you soon. Message me tomorrow.
I will. See you Anna.
Well, that went better than expected.
It's around the time to meet Keyana in the park.
It's not far from here.
5 minutes later
Yep, there she is on the bench down there.
Fuck me, I'm nervous. Here goes nothing.
Hey, are you Keyana?
Holy shit, you're actually him.
Here, sit down..
So.. Uhh..
What's wrong? You're not shy are you?
No, it's just..
Hey, it's okay.. I'm not scary. You have nothing to be shy about.
You don't seem at all how Rachael made you out to be.
Oh boy, there's no telling what she said.
It wasn't bad. Just that you'd be aggressive and stuff like that.
Haha, she would say that. She likes messing with me.
That's why we're in a park. I didn't know if she was going to end up sending me a midget or something as a prank.
She would do that?
Without a doubt. But no, I'm not aggressive.
I can see that. You seem kind.
Thank you. So no being shy.
All right, I have a few questions.
Are you healthy?
Yes, very.
Any illnesses or defects that run in your family?
Not that I know of.
I don't mean just health, I mean mental as well. Any anger issues or substance abuse?
I'm not sure. I was orphaned pretty young and don't know my family that well. I think my dad might have had some issues.
Oh.. I didn't know that about you. I already knew the answers.. I just wanted to see if you'd be honest.
It's fine. I can't control any of that, so it just is what it is.
That's right. Now stand up. I want a good look at you.
I like your features. You're obviously athletic, strong, you seem kind and goodhearted.
I think you're perfect for this.
I pass all your tests?
I believe you do. Now I just have to tell my wife that we're good to go.
Your wife?
Yes. You won't be impregnating me. I have too many competitions coming up. I can't be pregnant.
She was a little too shy to meet you today. But I'll tell her that everything is a go and we'll meet up tomorrow to make it happen.
Oh.. All right..
Awh, you seem sad.. I'm sorry.
Nah, not sad. I just was excited to mess around.
Oh we will. You'll have both me and my wife. I would play with you some now.. but I told her I wouldn't do anything without her.
But.. To make you a little excited..
Me and her are both very.. very flexible.
All right, yep. I'm excited..
Haha, you should be.
I'm excited myself. I haven't been with a man since I was in high school.
What about your wife?
You'll be her first man.. Take pride in that.
I'm gonna get out of your hair now. I'll message you when we're free tomorrow.
Sounds good Key. I'll be ready.
See you soon.
Man, I'm dissapointed I don't get to do anything tonight, but fuck me if I'm not excited for tomorrow.
I'll be thinking about you.. Rest well tonight and stay hydrated. We're going to wear you out tomorrow.
I wouldn't want it any other way.
See youuuu.
Bye Keyana.
Welp, guess it's time to head home.
10 minutes later
Welp, guess it's time to head home.
I wonder what all the girls are doing.
Honey? Is that you??
Yes it is. Did you miss me?
Miss you? It feels like you've been gone for weeks!
You mean that in a 'Time went so slowly without you way' right?
Of course I did. How was your first day?
Eventful to say the least. It's going to be a long year.
That bad??
No, not bad. There's just a lot that needs to be done.
Well if there's a lot to do then you're going to need to be ready. That all starts with what you eat.
Are you hungry??
Oh.. I kind of promised my new coach that me and [g1] would go over to her house for dinner tonight.
If you're hungry I can pick you up something while we're out.
Tsk, here one day and already forgetting you have a mom at home waiting to take care of you.
Hey.. It's not like that.
I'm just teasing you honey. I hope you have a good time at her house.
I know you are. I just don't like hearing you be sad.. Do you want me to get you anything while I'm out?
I'll be fine, there's plenty to eat here.
Ahh, the true mom answer. Where's all the girls at?
Well, the new redhead Stacy is asleep on the couch. [g1] and Shauna are upstairs. Elizabeth is in her room and Jasmine left a little bit ago.
Oh, Elizabeth. I never saw her at school today. Did she go?
No, she said she wasn't feeling well. She wouldn't come out of that room.
I'll check on her. Me and [g1] are going to head out soon. Are we still on for that walk tonight?
I was hoping you would ask. I would still love to.
Great, we'll do that when we get back. I love you mom.
I love you too sweetie.
Yep, Stacy is out cold. She was late to class because she was tired and now she can't even stay awake through the day.
I feel bad that I made her stay up so late.. I wonder how I can make it up to her..
A good start would be putting her in an actual bed so she gets good rest.
Wow, she's either that tired or just an insanely heavy sleeper. She didn't budge at all when I picked her up.
I'll put her in the room down here for now.
Hmmmm?
Hey there sleepy head.
Hmmm.. Where am I??
You're at my house. You fell asleep on the couch. I'm moving you to an actual bed so you can rest.
Sleep as long as you want to. You're welcome here for as long as you want to stay.
Thank you [mcf]...
No, thank you for helping me last night. Giving you a place to sleep is the least I could do.
When we get up we will hang out some okay?
Mhmmmmm.. I'd like that..
I look forward to it. Sleep well Stacy.
Time to check on the other girls.
Oh man.. I wonder if [g1] has said anything to Shauna.
Both of these girls can openly be mine after tonight...
Hey girls.. How's it going?
There he is!
Oh babe, are we still going to Coach's house for dinner?
Yeah, I would like to.
Perfect! Let me go grab my shoes and then we can go.
Sounds great babe.
Hey [mcf].. Can we talk for a minute?
You know you don't have to ask me that Shauna.
I know, it's just.. Are you going to talk to [g1] about us today?
Yeah, I am. Is that still what you want?
Yes.. I really do. I'm just nervous. I don't want [g1] to get hurt.
Come here.
She's not going to get hurt. I think everything is going to be just fine.
Just try to enjoy your night and not think about it. It's going to happen after we get back from Harper's house.
And if you do think about it, just think about what life will be like after tonight. You'll be my girlfriend and we won't have to hide anything.
And you'll be my boyfriend...
Exactly. We could go on actual dates and instead of exploring in secret, we could just be our true selves.
I love you [mcf].
I love you too Shauna. You look amazing in those pajamas by the way.
Heh, thank you... I love it when you compliment me.
You're going to hear plenty more. Trust me.
I know, it's just.. I don't feel like we're as close as we were.
You feel that way too?
Yeah, ever since I told you about.. You know..
I just need my bestfriend. I miss joking around with you and not feeling strange when I try.
Come here..
I need my bestfriend too. I miss the connection we had. I don't know if it's because of anything you told me or if it's just because of how busy we've been.
But I know that I want us to be where we were. You mean so much to me and I don't want to lose that.
Oh [mcf].. You will never lose me as your bestfriend. You couldn't even if you tried. I just don't know how to fix it..
I do.. I think everything will get better after tonight.
What makes you say that?
I don't want to tell her without [g1]..
We're going to spend more time together starting tonight. If you want to. When me and [g1] get home we're going to all hang out and do something okay?
Really? Of course I want to. What do you want to do?
It's a surprise. You'll have to wait and see.
Jerk, I'll be here. Waiting..
Hey, have you seen Elizabeth? Like at all today?
[am] said she was sick. She's in one of the rooms just resting.
Damn, that sucks. I should check on her.
Well, I'll see you in a bit [mcf].
You sure will. See you Shauna.
I hate that Liz is sick. She seemed to be fine last night.
I'll just peek in and see if she's awake.
Mmmmmmhmmmmm....
Mmmmm.. Right there [mcf]...
Oh shit, this is kind of awkward... Uhh. She seems healthy to me.
I'm going to leave her to it. Just going to find [g1] and head out.
There she is.
Hey babe, everything okay?
Everything is great. Just looking for my shoes..
You can't find them?
Not the ones for this dress. They might still be at the other house.
No big deal, you don't need any shoes. We're just going to their house.
I want to look good though.
Oh trust me, you look fantastic. I would change one thing though.
Oh really? And that would be?
Close your eyes.
Ooooh, a surprise. Okay I'll close them.
I've been meaning to give this bracelet to her for days. The plan was to do it after a really nice date. But if today has shown me anything.. That's not needed.
It does look nice on her. I hope she likes it.
All right, you can open your eyes.
Oh my god.. Babe! This is mine?!
It sure is. I know it's not the greatest bracelet ever..
It's perfect.. Thank you so, so much!
You shouldn't have...
I should have sooner. I bought it the day before we came here.
It was the only black and yellow bracelet they had.
I love it baby. Thank you. I'm happy I'm on your mind enough for you to get it.
You're always on my mind. Now who needs shoes when you have a new bracelet?
Not me. Are you ready to go?
Not yet, one quick thing.
Mwah!
Now I'm ready. Let's go.
Are we taking your car?
Yep, do you want to drive?
I can't say I do.
I'll get you to drive it one day.
10 minutes later
Is this the right address?
It's the one they sent us. Apartment 704.
Well, here goes nothing then.
Knock, knock, knock
Come in!!
Oh my god.. [mcf] and [g1]! You made it.
I told you if I had time I would be here didn't I?
I thought that was a polite no to be honest. I'm so happy you're here.
Natalie! [mcf] is here!
Really?! That's fantastic!
Come, let's all sit down on the couch.
You two look fantastic.
Please, I'm lucky to be in the same room as all these beautiful women.
Oh please... What were you two wanting to eat?
I'm up for anything really.
Same here. I'm not picky.
Good, me and Natalie were talking about just ordering a pizza tonight. I know that's not really a dinner though..
We came here for the company and not the food anyway. Plus pizza sounds great.
We're happy to be your company. Is pepperoni good with you two?
Sure is.
Same here.
Great, I'm going to go call it in. Natalie, stay with them and make sure they don't run off on us.
Will do mom.
Actually, do you have a bathroom I could use?
Absolutely, come with me. I'll show you where it is.
Thank you Harper.
So... Hey.
Hey yourself. How is your night going?
It was pretty good, just a plain old night. It's better now..
Yeah, mine is too. I hate to be nosy.. But is it only you and your mom living here?
Yep, just me and her.
Oh.. How long has it been like that?
Since I can remember really.. Anyway.. What would you like to talk about?
She wanted off of that topic pretty quickly.. I won't badger her on it.
Uhmm. A ton of things, I'd like to get to know you more. Tell me about yourself.
Uhh.. I'm pretty boring to be honest. Just your average student.
Any hobbies? What do you do for fun?
I draw, I play video games. Pretty much whatever entertainment you can have inside your house. I'm all about.
Oh really? I didn't think you would be a homebody.
What makes you say that?
It doesn't fit your look. Don't get me wrong. I'm a homebody myself.
What does my 'look' make you think I would be?
Honestly? Cheerleader type.
What? No, no. You're way off.
I'm just saying. You could pull it off.
Haha, totally. Go WVM! Beat up the... other guys!! Woo!
See. Perfect cheerleader.
Haha, hey! Take it back! You'd make a better cheerleader than me!
You want to play like that??
Aah! [mcf].. Haha, Let me go!
No chance. Not until you admit that you would make a great cheerleader!
You're so silly! I'm not going to say it.
I'll just sit right here and wait you out...
Yeah, that's not going to work for me.
Aha! [mcf]! Let me go!!
Say it.. That's all it takes.
Ahah, fine. I'd be pretty good if I was your cheerleader..
Ahh, the magic words, and now you're free!
Oh, haha! [mcf]! What's gotten into you?!
Mom!! Help! [mcf] won't let me go!
Snitching? Uh oh, looks like we're going to have to ramp things up..
No, no! Fine, I'd be pretty good if I was your cheerleader..
Ahh, the magic words, and now you're free!
Sounds like you two are having fun.
Define fun... [mcf], I think it's someone elses turn..
I think you're right Natalie.
My beloved boyfriend would never.. Plus, I could take him if he tried.
Sounds like a challenge [mcf]..
Are you sure about that!?
Aha! I take it back!
It's too late now.. Here it comes..
[mcf]! Come in here for a second!
Ahh, rescued by the coach.
My savior!
I'll get you soon. I know where you sleep.
I'm coming Harp!
Uhh huh. He's right here.
No, he just came over for dinner.
I'll talk to him. I'll call you back.
What's going on Harp?
That was Charles. What happened this morning?
With Charles? I thought you heard all of that?
I did. Not that though. There is a guy accusing you of assaulting him this morning.
Oh fuck, that. I can explain.
I'm not sure why but last night I ended up sleepwalking out of my house.
There was a girl, Stacy. She was trying to help me, that guy accusing me saw her and thought I was trying to harm her or something.
He ended up punching me and I woke up in his basement shortly after.
Woah, [mcf]. Are you okay? Sit down.
I promise I'm completely fine. But when I woke up I was angry. Mainly from my dream.
I knocked him down and punched him twice. He was out and I was going to be late for practice so Stacy and I left him where he was going to leave me.
This Stacy girl, will she support that story?
Yes, she already told me she would. It's how she convinced me to leave him there.
So he hit your first? Was it warranted?
Maybe from his perspective... Stacy says it wasn't.
And your head is okay?
Better than ever, at least good enough to still call Charles on his bullshit.
Hah, true. I need to call Charles back and let him know what you told me.
You'll probably have to meet with him sometime tomorrow about it.
Do I need to bring Stacy?
I'm sure it would be helpful.
But wait. Stay in here for a minute. I don't have to call him back right away.
Sure thing Harp. What would you like to talk about?
My daughter. I just wanted to thank you.
Thank me for what?
I could hear you in there making her laugh. As her mom it feels so good to hear that again.
She seems like a happy person. What do you mean?
Around you she is. Ever since her dad... She went through a pretty rough phase.
She shut everyone out. Hid in her room. This was for years.
She's only been around you for a little over a day and I can already see her head poking out of her shell.
I don't know what you've said to her or anything. All I do know is, whatever you're doing... Please keep doing it.
I will. I don't even know what I did... But I won't change anything.
I think it's just who you are. There's no real way to explain it.
You show up and you just fix problems. The amount of stress you've lifted off of me is insane.
It's already to the point that I have no idea how I functioned before you.
Harp, I haven't done much of anything..
Stop it. You've done so much.
Most of all, you've changed my outlook on life.
Before, I was just going through the motions. You know, wake up and do what I have to do and then go to sleep.
The only emotions I had were worry and stress. Worried about getting fired and not being able to provide for my daughter, things that you've already fixed.
But now I'm excited. When I go to sleep I'm excited to wake up and tackle the next day. I'm excited to see you again. I'm excited for my future.
Just once, admit that you're fucking amazing.
Not yet. I'll admit it when we win some games. How about that?
Deal. Hopefully it's sooner rather than later.
Yeah hopefully. This is random but... I didn't realize you had such long hair.
Yeah, it's pretty long. Do you like it?
Yeah, I really do. Do you usually wear it down?
Not usually. I'm feeling a little more free lately though.
I think my hair is my favorite thing about myself.
That's saying a lot. There's plenty to like.
Like what?
Personality wise, you're a strong woman who very clearly cares very much about the people in her life. You wear your heart on your sleeve.
That's really only towards you. I'm a pretty closed off person most of the time.
Still, it's something I respect.
When it comes to looks... I don't want to be too specific since you're my coach... But there isn't anything to not like.
You're just being nice...
I'm really starting to show off my mom bod.
Huh, I just realized her outfit looks really familiar.
You call that a mom bod?
Oooh.. [mcf].
You have a great body. All firm and fit.
Ahh.. [mcf] you probably shouldn't...
Oh, sorry...
No.. I don't mind. Just... Nevermind.
What is it Harp?
I'm just not very used to being touched anymore. Especially my stomach, I'm a bit self conscious.
You've got nothing to be worried about.
Maybe. I'm just not very confident anymore. I haven't exercised in a long time. I used to go for jogs every morning.
Would you like to again? I'd be down for going jogging with you.
Really? There's a park nearby that I used to jog at all the time.
Tomorrow morning before practice. Meet me there?
Okay... Sure. I would like that.
Awesome. I'll need to set an alarm but I'll be there.
Knock, Knock
Oh that must be the pizza. Would you be a doll and answer it? It's already paid for. I just have to call Charles back.
Yeah, I can. Have fun talking to Charles.
How could I not? Haha.
Oh... Hello. Is this pizza? I mean... Is this pizza yours?
I believe it is. Thank you.
And here's a tip for you.
No.
No? Why not?
Uhh.. I'm sorry. I have to go.
Oh, all right... Have a nice night.
I will and you will do... Fuck.. I'm sorry. Bye.
Geez, she was practically breaking down talking to me. She's the girl from my class.
I need to find a way to talk with her.. without whatever this was.
It's pizza time girls. Is there a table for me to sit this on?
Don't worry about it, we usually eat on these couches anyway.
That works with me.
There's not going to be another attack while I eat right?
Nah, you're safe for now. Wouldn't want you to choke.
How thoughtful.
Hey babe.
Yeah? What's up?
Can I have a kiss before we get all greasy?
You know you don't have to ask.
Mwah!
Also I wouldn't mind greasy kisses either.
Noted...
*Whispering* You're doing a great job with Natalie. I can tell she really likes you.
You should try to initiate some contact with her.
I think I already did that.
Not wrestle. Something soft. Put your hand on her leg or something.
Yeah? I can try.
Just don't be weird about it. Make it natural.
Don't make it weird? There's not really a way to do that.
Best I can think is to just do it and be confident about it.
Just not too high, gently on the middle of the thigh... Here goes nothing.
Okay, no immediate reaction other than she stiffened a bit.
Oh fuck, is she going to pull my hand away? Fuck.. That'll be awkward.
...
Oh, she's just holding my hand... I guess she likes it.
What's that about?
Do you not like it?
I didn't say that...
Good. Because I like it too.
You have really big hands... I guess you kind of have to though.
Yep, comes with the job.
I don't know babe. I don't know if I want to give off those signals just yet.
That's fine baby. I'll never make you do something you don't want to do.
Ahh, finally free from Charles.
How did the call go?
As well as it could go. After practice you'll need to go see Charles.
All right. I'll do that.
Good, So... It's time for some pizza!
One pizza pie later
Whew, I'm full.
You ate like 1 and a half slices.
That's all it takes.
I wish that's all I had to eat.
*Inaudible whispering*
Hey! No secrets, no whispering.
*Inaudible whispering*
Haha, I know right?
I'm really not a fan of this.
It's okay babe, we can do it too.
I don't actually have anything to say... So hey.
Hi. We need something to talk about? I got that covered.
That dress looks so fucking good on you. It hugs your figure so well.
It also shows off your legs and your yummy thighs. If Natalie and Harper weren't here. I don't know what I'd do.
Mmmm, baby. I like it when you talk like that.
Hey! You two can't whisper! That's our thing!
What are you two saying?!
Tell me what you two were saying first and I'll tell you.
Never! Get him Natalie!
Did you not learn from last time?
Hah, she said that not me! Get her instead!
It's too late now!
Ahh! Mom! Help me!
There's a simple way out of this! What did you two say?
[mcf]!! I can't!
It's all it takes and I'll let you go. Or else you're just going to be stuck here.
Ehhh.. Okay. We said...
I'll help you honey!
Let my daughter go!
Haha, it's going to take more than that.
What about you Harper? Would you like to tell me what you said? You can free your daughter.
Never! [g1], help us! Jump on him!
I don't think you realize who is on your side Harp.
Sorry baby...
Girl power!
Ahh, I've been betrayed!
I've also lost my balance.. Oh fuck.
Oh! Are you okay babe??
Other than feeling betrayed... Yes.
Haha, no injury like yesterday right?
Nope, it was a clean landing... You girls all okay?
Yeah, we're fine. Let's get off of him... Let him breathe.
Ahh. Everyone but you. You trying to suffocate me?
Maybe, it's what you get for not telling me.
Told you. You tell first and I'll let you know whatever you want to know.
Grrrr... But that was fun.
Yeah, it was. We need to do this again soon.
Awh, are you about to leave?
Yeah, there's still a few things I have to get done tonight.
But... What if you two came to my place tomorrow?
Yeah?
Yeah. My mom has been itching to cook a big meal. She's a great cook. You and Natalie should come by and keep us company.
I'd hate to impose.
You're not. I want you there and I'm sure my mom would love to meet you.
Okay, we'll be there.
Great. We still on for a jog in the morning?
That's a hard maybe. If I can get myself woken up in time. Then absolutely.
Just message me if you're up okay?
If I don't see you then, I'll see you at practice. Thanks for tonight Harp.
No, thank you. I can't wait to see you again. Have a good night.
You too Harp.
Did I hear you say you were leaving?
Yep, I have a few things I have to get done tonight.
That sucks. I wish you could stay longer. I was having fun.
Yeah, I wish I could too. But hey, what if we hung out some other time?
What do you mean? Like with you and [g1]?
We could do that. Or we could spend some time with just the two of us.
I think we're going to be in eachother's lives a lot this year. So we may as well grow close you know?
Uhhh.. Mhm...
Are you interested?
....
Yes! She is.
I'll bring her to your house tomorrow for dinner. Then I'll leave you two to do whatever. Sound good?
Sounds great to me. Natalie?
Mhmmm..
Great, it's a date.
Goodnight [mcf].
Goodnight Natalie, Harper...
That wasn't too much was it?
What? No! That was great. Good job baby.
Mwah!
I love seeing you make others happy.
I just told your mom that you two should come to my house tomorrow. So we'll hang out again very soon.
Okay... I look forward to it.
I do too. I'll see you tomorrow Natalie.
See you [mcf].
That was sweet. She wants to spend more time with you.
You could have asked her to hang out sometime you know?
Yeah, I just... I'm not used to this yet.
I understand baby. Don't do anything you're not comfortable doing.
Mwah!
I love seeing you make others happy.
Speaking of making others happy. I'm meant to go on a walk with [am] tonight.
It's pretty late already...
I know. It's meant to be a late walk.
Is it okay if we hold off on telling Shauna until after our walk?
I want to be able to tell her and spend the rest of the night with you two. I don't want to have to leave after.
I'd want you to be around too. Yeah, we should wait.
We won't be out too long, I promise.
I'm not in a hurry. I'm just a little anxious to tell her.
I am too. I want to see her face when we tell her.
Well come on, the sooner we go home the sooner we'll see it.
Very true, let's go.
Thank you for taking me with you over there.
You're my girl. I'd take you anywhere.
Hehe, I love you.
I love you too.
I'm going to tell [am] that you're out here waiting on her.
Thank you. Can you check on all the girls for me? I haven't gotten to talk to them much today.
Yes I can. Have fun on your walk... See you soon.
See you babe.
15 minutes pass
Damn, where is [am] at? I should just go inside and see.
Oh wait. I hear footsteps coming this way.
Hey honey, I'm sorry I took so long.
It's fine mom. Are you ready to go?
Sure am. How far is it...?
Not far at all. Come on.
a few minutes later
Hmmm, it's a little chilly out here.
Oh, I didn't realize what you were wearing... Isn't that [g1]'s?
Yes... She convinced me to wear it. I feel a little... Exposed in it.
Yeah, it looks great on you though.
Really? It was so hard to put on.
Wow.. That's a nice... Nope, that's my mom. Can't have those kind of thoughts.
[mcf]?
The other side is pretty damn good too... She has a cute little belly button.
[mcf]?? Are you okay??
Huh? Yeah, yeah. I'm fine.
You had me worried for a second.
Sorry, it's just I was a little speechless for a second.
Why? What had you speechless?
You did. Sometimes I forget just how great of a body you have because you don't show it off much.
You should though... You got a lot to.. show off.
Really? You mean that?
Have I ever said anything different?
No... I just don't see what you see in me.
I see the best mom in the world who just so happens to also be a beautiful young woman.
Oh [mcf]... I love you.
I love you too mom.
Can we sit down for a minute?
We just got here? But sure.
Is everything all right mom?
Yeah.. It's a bit embarrassing.
Come on. It's just us out here.
I'm a little cold... and I don't like the dark...
You're scared of the dark?
Hey, no laughing.. I'm being serious.
I'm not laughing... Come here. I'll keep you warm and safe.
My hero. Thank you honey.
Feel better?
Much better... So, how was your day?
Not bad. Started out pretty rough and got better throughout.
Will you tell me about it?
Yeah absolutely, after I got to practice. There was a man named Charles who threatened to fire my coach.
He's the president of WVM. I ended up telling him that if he did. I would leave.
Dang, making waves on day one huh?
Hah, yep. He ended up agreeing to let her stay. Then we got into practice where it was only me and two other guys.
How does that work?
It didn't. I hope that tomorrow there will be more. Since I talked about try outs in a rally today.
How did the rally go?
Pretty hectic. There were some girls, doing and saying some dirty things and [g1] heard and saw it all.
Awh, poor thing.
Then after that we all got put in the same class. Which was great at first until a girl made fun of [g1].
I stood up for her and called it out. I felt awful for her.
That really is awful. You did the right thing though.
After class is when things got strange. Me and [g1] went to a pool near WVM.
Without me?
Sorry, you're invited for next time. But everything was fine until me and her went to change.
There's no good way to ask this... Did you tell [g1] that she should let me be with other girls?
She did that?
Yeah, she said that I should be making other girls as happy as I make her.
That's not what I told her... She uhh.. told me about Shauna.
I just told her that she knows that you love and care about her and would never do anything to hurt her.
I might have also talked about how great you are and that you're both lucky to have eachother.
I appreciate you helping her. But yeah, she wants us to talk to Shauna tonight.
Are you going to do it?
Yeah, Shauna has always been my bestfriend. I asked [g1] plenty of times if this is what she really wants and she seems adamant about it.
After Shauna confessed her feelings. It made me realize that I had some of those feelings too. I don't know how far this will go but I'm excited for it.
That's so great honey. Those two girls are like my daughters now so it's so nice knowing that they both have you.
I didn't think you'd react like this..
Why not? Shauna is a beautiful girl who has been by your side always. You two should be a thing.
I'm glad you're on board. I don't want any weird feelings if this happens.
None at all from me. Just happy for you.
You're the best mom.
Mwah!
Honey... What do you say we go home? Try a walk again tomorrow but in the day time?
Sure mom. That's fine. I'm pretty excited to tell Shauna anyway.
Just.. there's one thing I need to ask you.
What is it?
So, I didn't tell you the whole truth this morning. I had another dream about my biological mom.
It went very similarly to how the last one did. Except this time I had a sister. Do you know anything about that?
I don't honey. I promise I would tell you if I did. She never mentioned a sister to me.
So you mean there's a girl out there that's just like you?
Maybe, but it was just a dream. It could just be my mind making stuff up to try and fill some blanks.
What if it wasn't? What if there is a girl out there that's in the same position you were in?
What if she needs us?
Then we'll find her.
Don't worry [am]. If she's out there, we'll find her and she'll become part of our family.
I'm not sure where to start. But I promise I'll try.
I love you [mcf].
I love you too mom. You still ready to go?
Just a minute... I want to sit here just like this for a minute.
You know we don't have to come all the way out to a park to cuddle right?
I know, it's just the cool breeze, your arms wrapped around me, and the scent of your cologne. This is really nice and soothing.
Fair enough, we'll stay right here for as long as you'd like.
No, you said you wanted to tell Shauna. I don't want to take up all of your night.
It's fine mom, a few minutes isn't going to make a difference.
I know... but we'll have plenty of time to cuddle up later.
Yes we will... but for now let's head home.
That went well. All that's left to do is tell Shauna.
Today has been a long day, after not sleeping well last night. I'm ready for bed.
Is it okay if I hop into the ladies' room real quick?
Sure, I'll stand guard out here.
Thank you honey.
Well, this is a good as time as any to check my phone again.
Damn, still nothing... Something must be up.
*Leaves rusting loudly in the distance*
What was that?
Ehh, probably just a squirrel or something.
After [am] said she was scared my senses have been on alert. I'm sure it's nothing.
Are you ready honey?
Oh, that was quick.
Yep, I was a little spooked in there by myself so I rushed.
Haha, fair enough. Let's go home mom.
Thanks for the walk, sorry I ruined it.
You didn't ruin anything. I had a blast.
I'm going to take a shower before bed. I'm going to check on you three when I get out.
So... Don't be doing anything you wouldn't want your mom to see.
I won't mom, have a fun shower.
Ayyy, [mcf]!
Ayyy, Sleepy head!
Hey, we need to talk for a minute.
What's up?
I'm going to need your help. That guy from this morning tried filing assault charges. I need you to come with me to clear it up tomorrow morning.
Sure, I told you I have your back.
Thanks Stacy, you're awesome.
Thank you. You're pretty cool yourself.
Is it okay if I stay here tonight? I'm a little worried to walk back to the dorms.
Absolutely. I'd feel better if my guardian was here to make sure I don't go for any more walks
Haha, deal. I'll barricade the doors.
Are you going to be able to sleep any tonight?
Some I'm sure. Probably not a lot after I've slept so much.
I'll probably just hang out and watch TV. I also need to call my mom but she's not answering for some reason.
She probably just fell asleep early or something.
Yeah, probably. It's not like her though.
Hmmm. What is she like?
Typical mom, there for you when you need her and also when you don't.
What about dad?
I wish I could tell you.
Oh, I'm sorry. I didn't mean to snoop too far.
Don't worry. It's a very common question. I don't mind.
Good, so... Is it cool if you just come with me to practice tomorrow? That way it's an easy transition to meet with Charles.
Plus, I'd like to have you there.
Sure. I'm down. Just wake me up like an hour before we have to leave if I'm asleep.
Will do Stacy. Thank you.
I could say the same to you. You heading to bed?
Yeah, I'm pretty tired.
Well, then I'll see you in the morning. Goodnight [mcf].
Goodnight Stacy.
Oh man, finally going to get to tell Shauna...
Oh! [mcf], you startled me.
Sorry Liz. I didn't mean to...
I haven't seen you at all today. How are you feeling?
I'm feeling better now, was pretty bad this morning.
I'm glad you're feeling better. You going to go to classes tomorrow?
Yeah, I think I'll be good enough to go. How was your day?
Pretty eventful to be honest. I'm about ready to go to sleep.
I'm pretty much the same, on the sleepy part anyways.
Have you talked to [g1] any today?
A bit when she got back.
I heard something about a certain thing that happened in a bathroom today.
She told you?
Not exactly, she was telling Shauna and I could hear them.
I talked to her about it afterwards though.
I'm happy for you two. It sounded like fun.
Thanks Liz. So you and her are still getting along well?
Yeah, things have really been looking up.
Good, what are you about to do?
I told Stacy I would watch some TV with her. There's a show we both like that's about to come on.
Oh, all right. I won't make you miss any of it then.
Thanks for caring [mcf].
You know I do Liz. Have a goodnight.
You too.
Jesus... [g1] and her outfits today. Is she looking out for me?
That's sweet. She really is anxious.
Looking for someone?
Aah, there you are! I didn't see you come in.
I don't know what to tell you. Other than it's time for an eye appointment.
Haha, maybe.
Are you ready baby? To tell Shauna?
I don't know. I kind of want to keep checking you out in that outfit.
Heh, you like it? I thought you would.
It looks best when I'm walking towards Shauna's room.
Ha, let's go tell her babe.
First things first.
Mwah!
Okay, now we can.
Lead the way..
Did you tell me to lead the way so you can look at my butt?
Yes.
Well, at least you're honest.
Shhh. She hasn't noticed us yet.
What room is this? I haven't seen it yet.
It's Shauna's game room. She set it up and everything.
Wow, why are we whispering again?
Because I know you... you like to pull little surprises when people don't notice you.
Ha, very true. I'll go easy on her though.
Hmm. Feet in the air...
Easiest thing would be just a quick surprise foot tickle. Here we go.
Gotcha Shauna!
Aaah! [mcf]!!
Let my foot go! Haha. It hasn't done anything to you!
Fine, fine. I won't go for too long.
That was a mistake. Because now it's my turn and I'm angry!
Oh yeah? Bring it on!
Ohh, I'm going to get you.
Woah, woah. Calm down you two. We have to talk before you two can wrestle.
What is it [g1]?
It's all right. [mcf] will explain. Don't worry.
You want me to tell her?
Yep, if you don't mind.
[mcf]? What happened?
Well... Me and [g1] had a talk today. She told me a few things.
Long story short.. Two days ago when you told me how you felt. [g1] heard what you said.
Oh my god [g1] I'm so sorry!
I promise I was never going to tell him! I was going to keep it a secret.
Don't be mad at him. Be mad at me please...
Hey, hey. Calm down Shauna.
Everything is okay. No one is mad at anyone.
You're a beautiful girl with a big heart Shauna. You've been [mcf]'s best friend ever since you two were kids.
I've only had the pleasure of knowing him for these past months and I'm already deeply in love with him. I can't imagine how you must feel.
It's bad [g1]...
I'm sure it is.
I don't want you to be hurt... You've been such a great friend to me these last few days. I don't want to stop.
It won't. If anything it'll get better.
I want you and [mcf] to be a thing. You both deserve each other.
Oh my god [g1]... What about your relationship?
Nothing will change. Me and [mcf] will have our relationship and you will have your own.
Is that what you want [mcf]?
Awh, Shauna don't cry. I haven't seen you cry since we were kids.
I can't help it. I don't even know how to feel right now. There's so many emotions...
Come here Shauna...
We've been through everything together. Me and you.
Let's go through this together too.
Ohhh. She's squeezing me really tightly.
I love you [mcf]...
I love you too Shauna. I've seen you grow into a stunningly gorgeous woman.
No matter what you went through in life, you would come out of it stronger and with a smile on your face.
There will always be a place in my heart for you and I'm lucky as hell to call you mine.
The same goes for you [g1]. The fact that you are willing to let this happen. It shows just how amazing of a person you are.
I love you both to death and I hope to be the best boyfriend I can be to both of you.
I love you too baby.
Mwah!
Did you two just kiss over my shoulder?
Yes we did. He's a really good kisser. Want to find out?
Ehh, she kind of already knows. Definitely not the time to bring that up though.
Can I give you a kiss Shauna?
Mhmm... Of course you can.
Mmm.. Kissing Shauna while [g1] watches and smiles.
3 days ago... We were all pretty much doing our seperate things. And now we're all here on this couch. In a relationship.
How was it? Good right?
Great. I want to do it again...
You can. But first there's a few more things we need to talk about.
Okay, what are they?
Well, what if it was more than just us?
What do you mean?
What if we let [mcf] be with more than just us?
You know who he is. You know how great of a man he is and you know how happy he makes us.
Yeah...
So don't you think we should let other girls experience that?
What about girls that don't deserve him?
I don't know if that's up to us to decide. I told him if he wants them to be a permanent part of his life. That I would like a say in that.
I would too. But what about girls that we wouldn't want him to be with?
Who do you have in mind?
That bitch that said those things about [g1] in class today.
Trust me, I don't want anything to do with someone like her.
Good.
Anyone else? What about you babe?
Well yeah. I wouldn't want you to be with anyone that would hurt me or Shauna. But I don't think you ever would anyway.
What about your sister [g1]?
Oh... I don't know. I didn't think about her...
If you don't want me to do anything with her babe. You can tell me.
No, it's not that. She's a good person deep down and she's starting to show it.
Well then. I won't do anything with her until you feel she's done enough to earn your trust back.
Okay... Thanks baby.
So is that everything settled? Everyone happy?
Very, very happy.
Me too.
So... Do me and [mcf] have to hide anything?
Nope... You two are a couple now. Do whatever you want to do whenever you want to do it.
What if someone asks? What do I tell them?
The truth. Say we're both dating him. If they find it weird then that's their problem.
Can we go on a date??
Of course we can. Where would you like to go?
It's kind of silly..
What is it?
I've always had this dream about you taking me to an arcade. Winning me another big stuffed animal.
Really? We can do that tomorrow. Us three go dominate an arcade. I'll win you the biggest stuffed animal they got.
That is.. if you get rid of these tears. I can't take them.
Mmm.. Am I your girl?
You're my girl Shauna. Now go get those tears cleaned up.
I'll be right back. Don't go anywhere!
We won't.
That was great baby.
You're not regretting anything are you?
Not at all. Watching you make other girls happy is kinda... hot.
Really?
Mhmm.. Can you hold me for a minute?
I can do better than that.
I can pick you up and hold you. I love you baby.
I love you too.
Will you promise me that if you're ever uncomfortable with anything I'm doing you'll let me know?
I promise baby. Right now I'm just enjoying seeing you make everyone happy.
I don't think I ever want to see you making any one else happy. That may be hypocritical but I can't help it.
You never have to worry about that. You're the only one for me.
Mwah!
Mmm, she's not getting away with just a peck this time.
Mmm.. [mcf]...
I wonder if she's okay going further than this right now..
Baby, baby.
I don't want to get you all worked up. I don't think I can do anything right now.
Why? Is everything okay?
Everything is great. In fact too good. I'm still a bit numb and sore from earlier...
I didn't hurt you did I?
No baby. It was very, very good. I wouldn't change a thing about it.
It was just a lot for my first time and my body is letting me know about it.
It's not a pain or anything, I just don't know if I could handle anymore tonight.
I'm sorry babe. That's fine. We don't have to do anything.
You could ask Shauna...
No.. Not tonight. I just want to snuggle up with you two and go to sleep.
Tomorrow, if you're feeling better. We should definitely give it another go.
Absolutely... I wish we could now.. It's just.
I know babe. It's okay. You've given me more than I could have ever asked for today.
I am pretty awesome huh?
Yes you fucking are.
Am I missing out on a moment?
Only a little bit, just talking about how awesome [g1] is.
Oh I could talk about that for hours.
You girls about ready for bed?
Yes, I'm very sleepy and I'm excited for tomorrow.
Same here.
I'm going to go tell [am] goodnight then we can lay down, okay?
She's on her way up here. I ran into her in the hallway and she told me that.
Oh, well then that works.
Knock, knock
Is it safe??
It's safe mom, Come in!
How did everything go? No hurt feelings?
Nope, everyone is happy.
That's amazing you guys. I'm happy for you.
My two girlfriends and the best mom in the world. I've been blessed with the best three girls to ever exist.
And we've been blessed with the greatest man to ever exist.
What she said. There's no one better.
I view you three as my kids now. I couldn't ask for anything better.
Let me stand up and give my mom a hug goodnight.
Sure baby.
I raised a little chick magnet huh?
It seems that way. Guess that's what happens when you're raised by a chick herself.
Was that meant to be a compliment?
Ha, yes. Sounded better in my head.
You on your way to bed?
Mhmmm. Is it okay if I sleep in the room next to this one? I'd feel safer being close to you.
You can sleep with us if you want to.
I don't want to get in the way of anything.
Nothing is happening tonight mom.
Still, I'll be fine in the room nextdoor.
If you say so. Just come get me if you need anything.
I will honey.
Mwah!
I love your hugs sweetie. They're so tight
I love you mom.
I love you too honey. Sleep well tonight.
You too. Do I need to wake you up again?
Yes please.
All right, I'll see you bright and early then.
Man, is Shauna asleep?
I can't have that. Not yet.
Shauna... We never got to wrestle earlier. If you don't get up... We're going to have to.
Aah! I'm up, I'm up!
Are you sure?
Yes! I'm sure. See? Eyes wide open.
What do you think [g1]? Was she trying to fall asleep on us?
Yes, but she's one of us now. So go easy on her.
You heard her Shauna... Are you ready?
No, no, no...
Mwah!
Ohhh... I thought you were going to tickle me or something. I like that.
Nah, you're my girl now. Means a lot of kisses.
I'm happy with that.
I am really tired though. Can we go to sleep?
Yes, we can. First I have to use the bathroom. [g1], can you keep her awake for me?
I sure can.
Great. I'll be right back.
Phew, I've been holding this in for hours...
*Loud moaning coming from the other room*
What the hell? That's the room Liz is staying in. She's not masturbating again is she? I thought she was watching a show with Stacy.
After what we did together. It wouldn't hurt to have a little peak would it?
Ohhh... [mcf].. Split me open with that big..
Ahh.. Put it deep, Cum in me this time...
*Clears throat*
Ahh!! [mcf] what the fuck??
You ever hear of knocking before??
I don't mean to spy Liz. I could hear you moaning from the kitchen.
Oh.. How much did you hear?
Uhh.. Enough. It's actually the second time today I've caught you.
What? What two times?
Its been more than two?
It's been like.. 11.
11? Damn Liz.. Is that why you didn't go to school all day?
Yes...
What's gotten you so worked up?
What we did yesterday.. And seeing you with [g1]. I know you saw me in the closet.
That made you masturbate 11 times today?
Yeah.. I don't know why. I just can't think about much else.
You could stay with me for a little while...
I'm sorry Liz. I don't have time tonight. But I'll tell you.
Keep doing what you're doing. Get close with [g1]. Things might can change then.
What do you mean?
You're just going to have to trust me on this one.
Okay... I do.
I have to get back upstairs. I'll see you in the morning okay? No skipping class tomorrow.
Yes sir. Goodnight [mcf].
Goodnight liz
I really shouldn't peak in on her again.
Just a quick piss then it's time for bed.
One piss later
Oh, good. [g1] managed to keep Shauna awake.
Sadly she didn't notice me come in. That means I have to do something.
Shauna did mention that she wanted to see me slap [g1] on the butt. It works with me.
Oh, Shauna sees me but isn't giving me away. I think she knows I'm about to do something.
Sorry [g1]. I won't spank you too hard.
Smack!
Haha!
Baby!! What was that for!?
It's the panties babe, I had to have a feel.
A spank isn't a feel! I don't mind feels..
Is that so? I don't mind them either.
Nope! Not after the spank!
Oooh. I'll keep that in mind.
Maybe you need a spanking...
I probably deserve one. But I think what we all deserve is getting some rest.
Aah, fair enough. Me and Shauna will surprise spank you some other time.
I'm sure you will, but just not tonight.
How do you two want to sleep?
With my two girls on top of me. Is that okay?
Yes.. I would like that.
You first [g1].
Comfy?
Mhmm. I'm perfect.
All right, Shauna climb right on.
Is that okay? Are you comfortable?
Just like [g1]. I'm perfect right now. I love you girls. Goodnight, I hope you both sleep well.
I love you too. Goodnight, sleep well.
I love you too [mcf]. Goodnight..
Today was a good ass day. I'm ready to tackle whatever tomorrow brings. Hopefully I don't have anymore dreams...
Not like I could go anywhere with these two on top of me anyway..
Zzzz...
Many hours later
Hmmmm... Where am I?
Oh yeah, on a couch with my girls. This is much better than waking up in someone's basement.
Might have been nicer if I woke up in an actual bed, but I'll take it.
I wonder what time it is... I never did set an alarm. I can't really get up to check without waking them up.
*Clears throat* Ahem..
[mcf]?
Shauna? Are you awake?
Maybe, what's up?
What are you doing up? Could you not sleep?
I went to sleep just fine. I had a dream about going to the arcade though... It woke me up and I've been too excited to fall back asleep.
That, and I had a lot to think about.
I'm sure you did. I think we need to talk. I know you, there's a lot of emotions you're not comfortable showing in front of [g1] yet.
So while she's asleep we should talk about everything.
Yeah? Can you get up if I do?
Should be able to, I'll just have to slide out from under [g1].
Or I could just lay here and enjoy the view.
Hehe, come on. I really want to talk.
Just have to get out from under [g1]. I can't believe this girl.
Everything me and her did yesterday, from the sex in the bathroom to telling me I can be with other girls.
Hell, it wasn't even just telling me I could be. She basically tried to throw me at Natalie.
I just hope this is what she really wants and its not her being afraid of losing me. I feel like I could tell if she wasn't being genuine though.
The question now is what do I want?
I've cheated on her... The girl who has given me everything I want.
She said she doesn't want to know if I did cheat. I don't know if that's something I can keep a secret forever.
What would the point be in telling her though? To make me feel better and to hurt her feelings? She doesn't deserve that.
I'm going to need help figuring out how to handle this. Only one I can go to with this is [am]. I hope she understands.
I haven't been with anyone else and it would have been easy for me to. Do I really want to be with others?
I love Shauna and I'll call her my girl until the day I die... but do I want to be with her in that way?
All I can do now is just go with it. I need to let Shauna know my intentions though.
The very last thing I want is for either of them to get hurt.
It hurts me to even leave her like this. I just want to hold her and make all her worries go away.
Me and her have never even had an argument, outside of her thinking I was cheating on her sister. She's been nothing but perfect.
Sure, she didn't want to have sex at first. But that made that moment yesterday special. I've never felt as close to her as I did then.
That makes me feel like me and Shauna could have missed a special moment like that.
We were both excited and rushed into sex. It was great and we've been building to that moment since we were young but part of it felt wrong.
I think that's because we didn't give our actual relationship time to grow first.
Maybe me and her should reset. Take this opportunity to do that and go slowly this time. Ease into everything.
I hope me and her continue to grow closer together. I hope introducing other girls into our relationship doesn't pull us apart a bit.
I just need to continue to make sure she feels loved and cared for. After I make it in the league I'll be able to show her just how much she means to me.
Are you okay [mcf]?
Yeah, I was just thinking about how much I love you two girls and how lucky I am to be here right now.
Awwwh. You mean that?
Of course I do. I know you don't always feel like it but you're fucking beautiful Shauna. So is [g1]. The fact that you're both mine is insane.
Can we stay in this room? I don't want her to wake up and us not be in here.
Thank you [mcf].. I never know how to reply to your compliments.
And yes we can. Let's just prop up against the wall.
Sounds good with me.
So do you want to start or should I? I have a lot to say.
Then you should go first. You already know what I'm going to say but..
Let it all off my chest?
Exactly. It's gotten us to this point hasn't it?
Hah, true. We wouldn't be here if you didn't make me tell you about how I felt.
So I'm just going to start by asking... Am I your girlfriend?
Of course Shauna, you're my girlfriend. What's got you asking that?
I spent all night overthinking everything. I just needed to hear it out loud again.
You're my girl Shauna. You're more than that though, you're my bestfriend. I don't want these new emotions to take over the old ones.
I want to be able to take you on dates and I want you to get all dressed up and be cute for me.
But I also want to be able to just cuddle up and watch a show together. I want that fun loving goofy girl that was all about bets and pranks.
I want us to play games and just be the bestfriends we have always been. But add all these new feelings onto it.
Does that clear things up a bit?
[mcf]... That's exactly what I want. I've never been in a relationship before, I don't know if I'll be good at it. I know I can be a good bestfriend.
I know you can be too. You've been the fucking best. There isn't a thing I would change about you.
I wouldn't change anything about you either [mcf]. I've told you a million times but I'll say it again. You're the reason I am the girl I am today.
Everything? Are you sure about that?
Are you talking about what I think you're talking about?
Yeah...
You should know that I don't care about that. I love you the same as I would if you didn't have it.
You're not just saying that?
You know I wouldn't do that.
What if people call you names for being with a girl like me?
Don't talk about yourself like that Shauna. You're a girl and I don't care what anyone has to say.
I get to come home and be with you two girls. They can say whatever they want to say but I'm living in my own personal heaven.
I love you [mcf]... I was just the kid that got picked on before you came into my life, everyone's punching bag.
Not only did you stand up for me way back then, you let me be your friend. You didn't have to.
You were the star back then too. You could have had anyone as a friend. While I'm so fucking grateful, I'll never understand why.
I thought about that a lot back then. Like what if you were just being nice to me as a prank?
There were girls throwing themselves at you, asking you out on dates and what not. Yet you would always spend time with me instead.
You're the only person in my life that has never made me feel inadequate. You've always been there to pick me up when I fall down.
I fucking love you [mcf], badly. I have for years.
Shauna, I love you too. But you make it sound like I was doing charity work. I loved being around you. You were always there for me and you knew how to make me laugh.
Those other girls were vapid. You had personality and charm. I was doing what I wanted to do.
Yeah? I'm just happy you saw that in me, I didn't back then.
There's another thing I need to talk about and I'm scared it might dissapoint you.
What is it?
I know we've fooled around behind [g1]. I regret it now.
I do too.
We also rushed into everything. While what we did was amazing. I mean that, it was fucking amazing.
What if we started over? Did things right this time. I didn't know before last night that I wanted all the dates and bonding time and all that.
But I do. I want to build our relationship up on emotion and not on sex. You didn't do anything wrong. I probably wanted it more than you did.
I'm sorry [mcf] but I think we shouldn't do those things again until after we grow this relationship.
Haha... That's strange.
What? I'm sorry.
No, no. Don't be sorry. It's just funny because when I was getting out from under [g1] a second ago I had the exact same thought.
We jumped straight into it and while it was amazing, I think we should start over too.
I know I teased you about [g1] and how she made you two wait.
But I think I want that too. I'm sorry.
Yeah? That's perfectly fine Shauna. I was completely fine waiting until [g1] was ready. I have no problems doing the same for you.
We've been bestfriends forever but this is different. We have a chance to really build something special.
This can be whatever we want it to be. We can take it as slowly as you want to.
[mcf]... I love you so much. This is everything I've ever wanted. I don't know how to put it into words.
I just want to be the second best girlfriend in the world.
Second best?
I don't think I can beat [g1]. She's something special.
You're something special too Shauna but yeah. [g1] is amazing.
I never thought she'd be okay with something like this.
Me neither, like at all. Do you think she really wants this?
I can read [g1] pretty well. I think this is genuinely what she wants.
She brought it up on her own. I've never mentioned other girls to her.
She also kind of tried to throw me at Natalie yesterday.
Haha, what do you mean by that?
Telling me to grab her thigh, just things like that. Trying to get me to win her over.
Damn [g1]. Yeah, I'll settle for second best girlfriend. I'm not catching up to her.
Hah, it was different. Even though she was encouraging it... I still felt guilty.
It will probably come with time. It's still new.
What about you though? Are you cool with me being with other girls?
Honestly? At first I didn't know how to feel about it. After [g1] explained her mindset on it. I'm okay with it.
I can't say I'm super excited about it. I know the impact you're going to have in these girls lives and that's more important than if I get a little jealous.
I told [g1] this last night but it goes for you as well. If you're ever uncomfortable with something I'm doing. Just tell me.
I will, I promise. I don't think I'll ever not be jealous.
It's not a bad jealousy like I wish you weren't doing it. It's more of a 'I wish you were doing it with me'.
That's completely reasonable. I know it's completely hypocritical but I don't think I'd ever want to see you with someone else.
There's other people? I could've sworn it was just you.
Ha, I know how I sound. I just don't ever want to see you with someone else.
I wasn't joking. You're the only one I've ever had feelings for. You never have to worry about me. I'm yours [mcf].
Fuck... I want to kiss you again.
You know there's nothing stopping you right?
[g1] isn't awake...
She doesn't have to be? We're our own couple.
I know. Part of me is just worried that she'll wake up and feel differently about everything.
So I don't want to do anything until she's awake and says it's okay.
Okay, that's fair. I truly don't think anything will be different but if you want to wait then that's fine.
Hey, uhh. Do you know what time it is? I'm meant to go on a jog with Harper this morning.
Don't worry. It's early. It's probably a little past 5am.
Yeah? Good. I still have time to take a shower then. I'll be right back Shauna.
Take your time. I promise I won't peek this time.
Hah, I wasn't going to bring it up.
It was embarrassing but we wouldn't be here right now if I didn't do it. So I'm happy it happened.
Me too Shauna, I'll be back.
Oh, Stacy is still awake. I guess she didn't sleep last night.
Part of me wants to mess with her since she doesn't know I'm here but... I don't want to scare her away.
Good morning Stacy.
Oh, good morning [mcf]. Why are you up so early?
I'm going on a jog with my coach.
Oh, right. I should've known. With you being an athlete and all.
Have you slept at all?
Here and there. I've slept enough, thank you for letting me stay here.
You didn't have anymore dreams last night did you?
I don't think so. I don't remember any at least.
Good. Hopefully they're gone for good.
Yeah, hopefully. Are you still good with going to practice with me this morning?
Of course. Basketball isn't really my thing but I told you I'd help so I'll be there.
Thanks Stacy. Do you want me to ask the other girls to go? That way you'll at least have someone to spend time with.
Do you think they would mind?
I'm sure they'd be okay with it.
I'm going to hop in the shower now. Just be ready to go whenever I get back from my jog okay?
You got it, have a fun shower.
Ugh, my back kind of hurts. Why the fuck did we sleep on a couch?
No one even questioned it. We were all probably just out of our comfort zone and willing to go with whatever.
Anyway, I hope practice goes better today. I need to try and find out what is up with Damien.
Actually there's like 20 things I need to do today. It's going to be a fun one.
One morning routine later
You look nice this morning. The shower helped.
Ha, Thanks Stacy.
You're looking good too. You changed your makeup?
Wow, I'm surprised you noticed. I was just messing around with it since I got a bit bored last night.
It looks good. You should keep it like that.
Yeah? I like it too. Thanks [mcf].
Mhmm. I'm going to go say bye to the girls then head out. So you should get ready soon. Sorry for hammering that home, I just don't want to be late.
I understand. I'll be ready.
Thanks Stacy.
Now just to tell at least Shauna bye.
Who knows... maybe [g1] is awake. I hope she is. It's weird to say since she hasn't gone anywhere but I miss her right now.
Nope, she's still asleep. Why is Shauna sitting like that?
Shauna? What's wrong?
Shauna??
Hey, it's okay. I'm here. What happened?
It's just...
Gotcha!!
Oh you asshole... Haha, that's fucked up.
You said you wanted me to stay the same girl that loves bets and pranks.
Yeah, yeah I did. Fuck me, I actually thought something was wrong.
Sorry... That one was probably too far.
Just a little bit. It's okay though. I'll get you back.
Fuck... I'm sure you will. Haha
What are you two up to?
Oh babe, I didn't mean to wake you. I'm sorry.
It's okay, I want to be up.
How did you sleep?
Peacefully. Way more so than the night before.
Good, you're so cute when you're sleepy.
Well give this sleepy girl a good morning kiss.
Mwah!
Just what I needed. So what were you two up to?
Just talking about things. Expectations and what our relationship will be like.
Can I know about it?
Yeah, we basically just decided to handle it similarly to how me and you did. Take everything slowly.
We want our relationship to be as strong as our friendship.
It worked for us.
Damn right it did. Also Shauna had some concerns.
Like what?
She was afraid that you would wake up and change your mind about everything.
Awh...
She was too afraid to kiss me because she wanted to make sure it was still okay.
Shauna. Come sit on this couch please. You too [mcf].
Okay...
So Shauna, what is he to you?
What do you mean?
If someone asked you what you and [mcf] were. What would you tell them?
He's my boyfriend?
Mmhmm. Exactly. You don't need my permission to kiss your boyfriend.
I just... wanted to make sure.
I know Shauna. This is me telling you I'm sure. This is what I want.
I think it's awesome you two want to build up your relationship but if you think it's necessary because of me. It's not.
Me and [mcf] have our thing and you two have your thing. Whatever you two want it to be.
Now that you know what I want, what do you want?
I want to kiss him.
Mwah!
Don't let her off easy [mcf]. She needs to know this is what we want.
Do the tongue thing you did to me yesterday.
Mmmmm... Oh yeah, that'll do.
He's great at that isn't he? Makes your heart fluttery and knees a little weak?
Yeah, everything you said...
Now don't be afraid to do that whenever you want to Shauna. Whatever makes you happy.
I love you and you deserve this.
Thank you so much [g1]. You've made all my dreams come true. I love you too.
I'm still a little sleepy. I could fall asleep like this.
Mmmm... Me too.
I want in on this girls. I feel left out.
Nuh uh, no one gets left out.
Can we stay like this forever? Please?
She said please [mcf]. Means we have to do it.
Bzzzz Bzzzz
What was that?
It's my phone. I think Harper is trying to call me. I'm about to go on a jog with her.
Awwwwh. That's no fun.
Oh, girls. Would you mind coming with me to practice this morning? Stacy has to go and it would be awesome if you two could keep her company.
Of course we can babe.
Yeah, I want to go. I want to see you practice.
Awesome. Thank you girls. I won't be gone very long and when I get back we'll head there, okay?
Okay baby. Have a good jog. I love you.
Don't get outran by Harper too badly. I love you [mcf].
I love you too girls. See you soon.
a few minutes later
There's Harp. Looks like she's getting warmed up.
Harper!
Oh! Thank god you're here. I was starting to worry you weren't going to show.
If I'm being honest, I did forget to set an alarm but I got lucky.
I'll take it. Hey, are we still good to come by your place later today?
Yep, I'd be offended if you didn't come.
Don't worry. Me and Natalie will be there.
I probably shouldn't tell you this but Natalie was so excited you asked her to hang out.
Really? That's great.
She was all smiley and giddy. I even woke up in the middle of the night and I'm a mom so I went to check on her.
She was reading an article about 'How to behave on a first date'... at like 3am.
So thank you for doing that. I hope you two have a great time.
You have an awesome daughter. I'm just happy she's happy to hang out.
She's incredibly happy to. But I have to be a mom for a second.
Now, I know you're a good guy but I have to say a few things.
My daughter is the most important thing to me.
She's a wonderful kid with a big heart. She can be a little too trusting at times.
I won't give you a long speech. Just please don't hurt my daughter.
I understand Harp. I'm not going to do anything to harm her. We're just going to go somewhere and have a good time as friends.
Promise me?
I promise Harper.
Okay, killer eyes mom is at bay.
It's scary how you can flip it like that.
It's the power every mom has.
We're both excited, do we need to bring anything?
No, no. Just bring yourselves.
That we can do.
You ready to jog? We don't have very long so let's get in as much as we can.
Oh, I like the spirit Harp. Let's get it.
One cardio exercise later
You're slowing down Harp!
Hey! I'm not doing bad for a middle aged woman who hasn't ran in a long time.
Ha, true! Hey, does this mean I can skip laps at practice?
What do you think?
Damn... It was worth a shot.
Can we rest for a second?
Yeah, sure.
Phew... I'm not used to that.
It gets easier quickly.
Do you want to do this again?
Yeah, I'm down. I enjoy early mornings and I enjoy spending time with you.
I enjoy every second with you as well [mcf]. That being said... I don't know if I can jog anymore.
That's fine. You definitely shouldn't overdo it.
I might have already, my legs are sore.
Ha, Harp. You should've told me that you were tired.
I know, I didn't want to seem too old though.
It's not an age thing. You just haven't ran in a while. Your body isn't used to it.
Yeah, maybe. I messed up though... I walked here.
It's okay Harp. I can give you a ride home.
Really? That would be amazing [mcf].
Yeah, do you need help getting to my car?
No, it's not that bad.
This is your car??? Damn [mcf].
No, not exactly. Some dealership owns it and they let me drive it.
It's something Charles set up.
It's not in your name? They didn't give it to you?
No, I just drive it.
And Charles is the one who is letting you?
Yep... why?
So you're telling me you stood up to the man offering you cars and homes for the coach who hasn't won a game?
Damn right I did. I'd do it again too.
I like you more than the car anyway. I'd give it back if it meant you would continue to be my coach.
But why [mcf]?
I've had a lot of coaches. Very few did I feel deserved to be where they were. Very few cared about the game or the players.
I can tell you care. I know you're going to give it everything you've got.
I respect the hell out of that. I want to see you succeed and I want to be a part of it.
Thank you [mcf]...
That starts with practice though so let's get you home.
I'm just shocked that you talked to Charles the way you did for me.
I can't really offer any cars...
I don't need cars Harp. I need a good coach. That's why I stood up for you.
Thanks [mcf]...
Let's get going. I'd hate for us to be late to practice.
Thanks for spending your morning with me.
Don't mention it Harp. Any time you want to do this just let me know.
I think my legs will be a bit sore tomorrow. But if they're not would you want to tomorrow?
Yeah, just give me a call.
Awesome.
Oh Harp. I'm bringing Stacy to practice like we talked about... but is it cool if I bring [g1] and Shauna too?
Of course it is! I'd love for them to be there. As long as you don't get distracted.
I won't. I promise. I just want them there so Stacy has someone to talk to.
I understand, yeah that's totally fine with me.
Thanks Harp. You ready to go?
Sure am,
A few minutes later.
Thanks for the ride. I'll see you and all the girls soon.
See you Harper. Tell Natalie I said good morning.
I will. Drive safe.
A few minutes later
Back home. I barely broke a sweat so I won't need another shower.
Babe? Is that you?
Yeah. Where are you?
The shower. Can you come in here for a second?
What is up with this door to a door shit. This house may be nice but being broke made more sense.
Babe?
Ahh! *Smack*
Haha! Told you I'd get you back for spanking me!
Ha, fuck... you got me.
I'm surprised you could hide behind that wall.
What's that supposed to mean?
It means that you have hips that I absolutely adore.
Good save. How was the jog?
It went well. Harp got a little tired so I took her home.
Did you see Natalie?
No, I just dropped Harp off.
Oh... Hey, I found a cool room in the basement. Do you want to see it?
Wait... this place has a basement?
Haha, yes. You should really explore a bit.
But there was a door that was jammed, I got it open. Want to see what was inside of it?
I'm a little worried.
Don't be. Come on.
It's this door here. Just head inside.
You betrayed me once yesterday. I'm not about to get Snow'd am I?
Only one way to find out.
Ha, okay. I think I can take you so I'll take the risk.
What the fuck. A home theatre?
Yep, the other girls don't know about it yet.
It's awesome. We definitely have to use this room.
Babe...
Oh... Damn [g1].
Come here baby.
Are you not sore anymore?
No, I still am. But there's other things we can do.
But... can you just hold me for a minute?
Of course babe.
I like this. I know I'm sharing now... but it's nice to just be held by you in a room no one else knows about. Just us.
We can have that babe. A place where only me and you can get in. I don't think it should be here since we could use this room.
Yeah, I know this isn't a long term spot. It's just the spot right now.
You know there's still the other house. That could be ours.
Oh, you're right. We have our own house. Just the two of us.
You and Shauna should have a spot too.
Let's not talk about Shauna right now. I love her too but right now it's about you and me.
Mwah!
My only real worry that was left is that you might forget about me a little bit.
That will never happen babe.
I love you to death. You'll always be my girl and I'll never not give you the attention you deserve.
I love you to death too. Are you ready?
What do you want to do?
I want to give you another blowjob. I think I can do even better than last time.
There is no better babe.
Can I try?
You absolutely can.
[mcf]?? Are you in there?
Yeah mom! I'm in here. Don't co-
Ahh! Oh my god! I'm so sorry!
Get your towel back on babe.
It's okay mom. You didn't mean to.
I feel so embarrassed... I'm so sorry. I'll leave you two.
No mom... wait.
I'm sorry... there goes our spot.
I don't even think she realized what this room was.
I didn't mean to tease you.
You didn't tease babe. You know we could still do it?
I just flashed your mom... We probably shouldn't try this right now.
I understand. You just want to head back upstairs and chill until it's time to go then?
Yes please.
Oh, Shauna must still be getting ready.
Hmmmm...
Do you want to try in here?
Huh? What if Shauna walks in?
Then we'll stop. It's different than if your mom walks in.
I agree with that... but I feel like we were safer in the theatre room.
Yeah... but I just felt a little embarrassed in there.
Now come on. I feel bad for teasing. Sit down.
This is kind of familiar.
Yeah, you thinking of our first time?
Yep, I was so nervous. I'm a lot more confident this time.
I was nervous too.
I'm still not great... but I had no clue what to do with this.
You did pretty damn good.
I winged it.
Well, just keep winging it. Hey... can we try standing up this time?
Sure baby. Stand up and I'll get started.
Oh fuck...
She's immediately going crazy on the head... sucking in, creating suction and she's going crazy with her tongue still.
She has that serious look she gets every time she does this. It's cute how seriously she takes this.
I want to call her on it but I don't want to potentially shake her confidence, it's just really cute.
Holy shit babe... Just like that.
She's definitely more confident now. She's using her hands and just having fun with it.
gl... help.. glk.. me babe...
Help you? Like push you down further?
Mmmmhmmmm...
Glllk...
Ohhhh.. Damn... You're getting so much better so quickly.
Glll.. Further..
Further? Are you sure?
Mhmmm.
Aaaahhhh... You're fucking amazing.
Mmmm... You can... Start.
Start? Like you want me to thrust right now?
Fuck... Communicating like this isn't easy.
Mmmmhmmm.. Fuck my... mouth...
This fucking girl, she can be so sweet and cute and innocent. Then she can hit you with something like that.
You sure you're ready?
Mmhmm..
Glllk.. Glllk...
God damn baby... You're doing so fucking well.
You've grown so much these past few days. At literally everything.
You're like a whole new person.
Glllk.. Faster baby..
Faster? I don't want to hurt you or anything...
Mmmm... Faster.
Gllk.. Gllk..
Jeeeesus.... When did you learn this?
Fuck baby... I'm getting close. Your getting too fucking good at this.
Ahh!
Oh fuck... Sorry Shauna.
Nice outfit though.
I'm so sorry you two. I didn't mean to walk in on you. You should've told me...
It was last second. That's our fault Shauna... not yours.
Sorry baby. Just wasn't meant to happen this morning.
It's okay babe. We'll do it again some other time.
Mwah!
Thanks for all the kind things you said... I couldn't really say thanks then.
I'm just trying to be the best I can be for you.
You keep surprising me baby. I don't think anyone could be any better and then you just one up yourself.
I have a few more things in mind. I'm not done one upping yet.
Oh really? I'm excited and can't wait.
Me neither. We should get dressed so Shauna doesn't have to stand there awkwardly.
True, although she does deserve it after something she pulled this morning.
She told me about that... Hehe, that was messed up.
One awkward... boner stuffing clothes change later
We're decent Shauna. Sorry about that. I'm going to go put on my school uniform.
I'm sorry [g1].
I didn't mean to...
I promise it's fine Shauna.
You must hate me right now, first I tell you I want to wait and then I cockblock you.
I don't hate you at all. We knew it was risky. [am] caught us right before you did.
Really? God, that sucks.
It's not that big of a deal. It's not like we won't be able to finish later.
You look really sexy in your underwear by the way.
Thank you [mcf]
Mwah!
Hey, look at you. Kissing without permission.
Ha, shut up...
I'm going to head downstairs. After you finish getting dressed we'll go ahead and go.
Okay, I'm almost ready. I'll be down in a second.
Damn, [g1] got dressed fast. I guess after flashing two people you'd really want some clothes on.
Hey girls, you about ready to go?
Yep!
Yeah, I'm ready whenever.
Great, where's Elizabeth?
She's up. She finished her shower before I got in.
Awesome, what about [am]?
I saw her head outside.
Outside? Huh... I'll go check on her. When Shauna comes down just head outside.
Sure thing babe.
Mom? Are you okay?
Oh honey... I'm sorry.
It's fine mom. Shauna caught us right after.
That's even worse. I just feel stupid.
I saw you two sneak down there. I should've known. I just wanted to tell you good morning.
Good morning mom.
Good morning honey.
Now don't worry about it. Me and [g1] are fine.
What are your plans for today?
Probably just tidy up the house and relax a bit. Maybe try the pool out again.
That sounds like fun. Hey, I forget if I told you yesterday but my coach and her daughter are going to come by later.
I figured you've been wanting to cook a big meal. Would you mind tonight?
Yes honey. That sounds great. I'll finally get to make you what you told me the other day.
I look forward to it mom. Now head on inside. We're about to leave.
Okay sweetie. I hope you have a good day.
Mwah!
I'll see you soon mom, I hope you have a good day too.
I hope you have a good day too mom. I'll see you soon.
Bye honey. You have a few girls waiting on you.
Huh?
Oh... Hey girls.
Where's Liz?
She said she would be right behind us.
Hmmm. She's being weird. You girls go ahead and just walk slowly. I'm going to check on her and we'll catch up.
Okay, we won't be too far ahead.
Fuck, I hope everything is good with her. I don't even think I've seen her interact with anyone.
Oh... [mcf]. I thought you guys just left.
They did, I stayed back to make sure you're okay.
What do you mean?
Honestly? You don't feel real. I don't mean that to sound harsh. I know you're trying your best but I've barely seen you talk to anyone.
[mcf]... You know I'm not used to this.
I'm just confused with you Liz. We had all of our issues. Then we have that talk before we left our hometown. Then you're in my basement... Ever since then you've made a complete flip into wanting to be a good girl.
I don't want to question your motives. I just want to understand your mindset right now.
Fuck... That's not something I can just jump into talking about.
Can you try?
It's... we have a history. I'm not proud of where it went.
I'm just going to be completely honest with you. I've already told you about mine and [g1]'s father. Well that led to some confidence issues.
Anyway... back when I used to cheer for you. Back before you and my sister were a thing. I had a huge crush on you.
Fast foward a bit and a girl was mocking me for not having a boyfriend. I stupidly told her you were my boyfriend to shut her up. That led to her telling everyone.
Which led to my sister thinking we were together, which led to you two becoming a thing.
Fuck [mcf]... I was jealous. Out of nowhere my sister had what I wanted even after all my years of cheering for you.
Don't get me wrong. I'm happy for you now. I see the effect you've had on her.
But I was pissed... at first. Then I realized acting that way got your attention. So I kept doing it.
Then it felt like that's just who I had to be. That was my new role.
And when I was in your basement and I saw you. I thought you were going to be so pissed... I got really scared.
But then you told me everything was going to be okay. That you didn't blame me and that it's not too late to fix everything.
I needed that [mcf]. I'm still trying... I find myself getting mad for no reason and I don't want to blow it so I try to stay to myself.
Liz... You should've told me all of this sooner. Things didn't have to go like this.
I know. I was dumb.
It's not dumb. You were just mad and scared. I wish I could've been there for you. I would've been.
Yeah, I'm realizing that now too.
Here I was thinking it's because you switched to being a blonde.
Joking right now? Ha, I hate the blonde. I miss my red.
I like the blonde but I miss the red too. Was that a Charles decision?
Yep. Sure was.
He doesn't make those decisions anymore. We should see if you can get it changed back. If you want to.
Yes! Please.
Come on. Let's keep this talk going but we need to start walking so we're not late.
So... what's the plan?
Plan? Didn't even know those existed.
I'm being serious Liz, what's the next step?
I'm not sure [mcf]...
Well then let me help. You have to put yourself out there.
You can't hide from us anymore. Nothing is being solved this way.
But what if I fuck up?
Everyone fucks up. What matters is that people know you're trying. Tell [g1] everything you told me.
Tell her how much you regret it and how you wish you could change things.
Also tell her that you are still battling some issues and that you might act out every now and then.
[g1] is one of the most understanding people on the planet. If she knows you're trying she'll support you all the way.
And so will I. You don't have to be perfect Liz. You just have to give this your best shot.
That easy huh?
You really think [g1] feels the same way you do?
[g1] is blowing my mind everyday. That girl doesn't have a spiteful bone in her body.
As long as you're honest... [g1] will have your back.
Thanks [mcf]... I'm still nervous about it all. But this helped.
I promise I'll talk to her about it.
Good... and if you ever need an outside opinion or advice on anything. [am] is great at that kind of thing.
She's never steered me wrong.
I'm not that close with her though.
It doesn't matter. Just be honest with her. She'll help you in any way she can.
I don't know what to say...
I in no way deserve the way you're treating me. I've been nothing but a bitch to you for years and you're here giving me 3 different support outlets.
I'll say it again, you're family Liz. Just because you made some mistakes doesn't mean you deserve to be ousted.
I see the potential in you. I see the girl who used to blush and look away when I looked at you.
I see a girl who deep down knows she's not the bad guy. I want to help that girl find who she truly is.
That girl is lucky to have you in her life.
So we're agreed? No more hiding?
Yes, no more hiding. I promise.
Even though I really wasn't hiding yesterday... you know.
Haha, I wasn't going to bring that up. I bet you slept well after all of that exercise.
Yeah, real well. After the 13th time.
13? Damn Liz. That's... impressive.
Haha, we shouldn't talk about this though. If [g1] heard us she'd be pissed.
She's still a bit ahead. But you're right.
Are we close to the school?
Yeah, not far at all.
a few minutes later
Hey, I'm gonna go try and find the other cheerleaders.
Okay, they should be in the gym.
It's nice to see [g1] and Harp interact and get along. I feel like Harp is going to be huge part of my life this year.
I'm really starting to care about her as well. I want this team to do well for her.
Haha, and when you jumped on him and we all fell down. That was the highlight of the night.
You girls discussing the biggest betrayal of my entire life?
It's the biggest betrayal until the next thing we have planned.
What's the next thing planned?
You'll find out... soon.
Sorry... it wasn't really a fair fight without me adding to it.
And to be fair she probably thought the big bad basketball star could hold up three dainty girls.
*clears throat* two dainty girls.
Babe... play nice.
What did he say? I couldn't hear him.
He was just being silly.
She started it. Plus we're working on it. She did really well on the jog this morning. 
I'm gonna get out of here before you get attacked. See you out there.
I heard that one... hmmm. I could make you run laps until you're dainty yourself.
I'm just joking around Harp. You know you're fit.
Mmhmmm, tone changes when you think you're going to have to run laps huh?
I'll run the laps. I have quite a few more in me.
I'm just joking around too. My legs hurt too much to even see anyone else run.
That bad?
A little bit. I'm a big girl though I'll be okay. Come on, let's head out.
Shouldn't we wait on everyone?
They'll find us. Come on.
Oh damn Liz. Wasting no time in interacting with [g1].
I never thought I'd see them stand side by side again without being forced to.
Oh! We have a new guy coming today.
Oh yeah? Who?
Ayden. He was one of the guys who asked to tryout. He was tall and said he used to play so I told him to go ahead and come to practice.
Hell yeah, I'll take it.
The actual tryouts will be tomorrow morning. I want you to help.
What do you need me to do?
Just help watch them, see if any of them could help us.
Yeah, sure. I can do that.
Thanks [mcf].
[mcf]!
Damien, what's up?
Tired as fuck. You?
Nothing much, just waiting on everyone.
So, uhhh. What happened to you yesterday?
Sorry about that, stuff came up. I heard you three had a good time though.
No, that's not good enough Damien.
I had to console your girlfriend twice yesterday. Where the fuck were you?
You told me you'd be there too. The least you could have done is let one of us know ahead of time that you wouldn't make it.
I told you. I got busy. That's all you need to know.
That's true. That is all I need to know. But Jasmine?
She was on the verge of tears over you man. I care about you but I care about her too. She didn't deserve that.
All she wanted was to spend time with you. Yet you treated her like she didn't even exist.
She almost cried?
Yeah dude. It's fine that you got busy with... whatever. But the fact you didn't answer anything of hers was way too far.
Me and [g1] did our best to make her have a good time but you could tell she just wanted you.
Fuck... thank you for taking care of her.
I told you. I care about her too.
And hey, we're all human. She just needs to know how you feel.
Yeah, I've been fucking up. I'll settle things.
Good. I'm going to wait on the new guy but you should go ahead and get warmed up. I think we're skipping laps today.
Thank god... Yeah, I'll be over there.
That went about as well as it could have. Damien didn't take it too harshly and he might be able to fix it all.
At least that's over with.
Oh shit...
Jasmine?
Thank you.
You heard all of that?
Mhmmm.
I didn't mean to. I was just walking in when I heard you two talking... and I couldn't help but listen.
Hopefully it helps.
Maybe, I don't know if I care anymore. But... I care about you too [mcf].
We should hang out sometime. Maybe go swimming again.
Yeah maybe.
Fuck, I like Jasmine but I can't do anything with her if she's with Damien.
I have to head to the cheer room. Get everything set up for Liz. But I hope to see you in class.
I'll be there. I'll see you soon Jasmine.
Have a good practice.
Damien, listen...
Is everything okay with you? Jasmine really missed you yesterday.
Yeah man, just busy.
I won't pry. But I'm here for you man. I don't know what you're doing that you have to be secretive about...
I just don't feel like you're being the real you.
Hey, I appreciate it. I'm good though.
I'll explain everything to you and Jasmine soon.
Jasmine sooner than me. She needs to know where you're at.
I know...
Good... I'm going to wait on the new guy but you should go ahead and get warmed up. I think we're skipping laps today.
Thank god... Yeah, I'll be over there.
No closer to anything. Damien still just being strange. I'll assume he has his reasons though.
[mcf]?
Oh, good morning Jasmine.
Good morning. What's up?
Just trying to get everything straight. I feel like ever since I came here everything is slightly off.
I think I know what you mean... 
I have to head to the cheer room. Get everything set up for Liz. But I hope to see you in class.
I'll be there. I'll see you soon Jasmine.
Have a good practice.
[mcf]!
Bailey! How's it going?
Everything is ehh. Not really feeling it today.
Any reason for that?
No, not really. Just feeling a little off.
I hate days like that. Come here.
Oh... [mcf]. This is our first hug...
First hug? Is that a thing people keep track of?
Wait... We hugged when we first met didn't we?
Oh... yeah. I guess you just feel like a different person since then.
Yeah, you feel pretty different too. So fuck it, that was our first hug.
Hehe, good. I should get to the cheer room...
Yeah, probably should. Are the other girls here?
No...
That fucking Willow bitch.
Woah Bailey, what happened?
After school yesterday in the bathrooms...
Well something happened between Willow and Emiko. Zoe stepped in for Emiko and they got into a shoving match.
I think that's all that happened but they got caught. So they can't come to cheer practice or class today.
Damn... Poor Emiko. She talked to me about being worried about mean girls. I told her I'd make sure they wouldn't be mean to her.
Fuck...
No... Emiko started it. She went after Willow.
What? That 5 foot nothing shy girl went after Willow?
Yeah... I don't know what happened though. You'll have to ask her.
Where is she at?
I think she's at Zoe's house. I can send you the address if you want to visit.
Please do that. I want to check on both of them.
You're sweet [mcf]. I'll see you in class.
See you Bailey.
They were right behind me. Should be here any moment.
Cool. I hope you all have a good cheer practice.
Thanks, I hope you have a good practice too. Ours should be easy today. Just have to catch Elizabeth up to everything.
Be good to her. She's a great cheerleader.
I will. I promise.
I'll treat her like family. I'll see you in class [mcf].
See you Bailey.
How cute.
Oh hey Zoe.
And hey Emiko, you're looking great today.
Hehe, thanks.
And what about me?
Not too bad yourself Zoe.
Emiko go ahead and go to our cheer room. I need to talk to [mcf].
Okay...
See you Emiko.
So, what's up?
I was thinking of throwing a party tomorrow night. Would you come if I did?
I might would. I don't know what I have to do tomorrow yet.
Well... I'd really like it if you could come. It's not going to be a big party or anything.
Just the cheerleaders and some of the girls from class.
No guys?
Guys ruin parties. You're the exception.
I'll be there if I can Zoe.
Great, I hope to see you then and I'll see you in class.
See you soon Zoe.
Yo!
Yo!
Are you Ayden?
I am. You're [mcf]?
That's me. It's good to meet you man. It's good to have you on the team.
It's good to be back in a gym. I haven't played since high school.
That's fine. What made you quit on basketball in the first place?
Knee injury, I have a kid back home. He was still in his mom's stomach when it happened.
Had to make a decision. But he's older now and what better way to come back than beside one of the greatest in the country?
Damn... and what a great come back it will be. Is your son here with you?
No, he's back at home with his mom. They're not too far from here though. I visit them on the weekend.
Are you and the mom still together?
Oh yeah, we're engaged. You should meet her sometime.
I'd love to man.
Awesome. It's great to finally meet you.
Babe...
I'll leave you three to it. I'm gonna go say hey to Damien.
Sorry for interrupting... Is it okay if we go back to the cheer room with my sister?
That's perfectly fine. I'm happy you two are getting along.
It's all thanks to you.
Mwah!
We'll be in there if you need us [mcf]. Have a good practice.
Where do you think you're going?
Huh? I'm going with [g1]?
Not before this you're not.
Mwah!
[mcf]!!
Damn, Shauna's face almost matches the color of her hair. That one really got her.
I'll be in the cheer room.
Oh... yeah. Everyone else saw that.
I guess Shauna wasn't ready for it to be out there. Or at least not like this.
All three of them look completely shocked. I guess what we're doing is pretty... out there.
Was that too much?
No, she might be embarrassed for a moment but she'll appreciate how quick you were to show everyone.
I wasn't even thinking about it. I just wanted to kiss her.
That's good. Not caring about how others will view it is exactly what will make this work.
Yeah, I guess that's true.
There's no going back on this now... everyone will know about it.
Good. Everything is going exactly how I wanted it to babe.
I hope you have a good practice. I love you.
I love you too [g1]. I'll see you soon.
We're going to have to talk about that...
But for now go ahead and head over to Ayden and Damien.
Yes Coach.
Both of them?
Yeah... About that...
I'm not one to judge. If you're happy, you're happy.
Anyway... go ahead and head over to Ayden and Damien.
Yes Coach.
What's up guys.
Just seeing what Ayden knows.
How is he?
Best in the world.
Yeah? How's your jump shot?
It's money. Watch this.
Oh fuck...
How can someone jump that high but stay that low?
Buckets!
Completely awful jumpshot, but if he makes it then at least we'll have something to work with.
Fuck...
How long did you say it's been?
A few years... I guess I'm a little rusty.
A little rusty? More like you're a bike that's been left out in the rain for 20 years.
Yeah, I've got some work to do...
We'll get you back in shape man, don't worry.
Okay, I'm ready for whatever I need to do to get there.
Good morning everyone.
It's okay man. No one expects you to come in here and be perfect right off the bat.
The only thing we need from you is to listen and do what we say. Do your best to improve.
You have my word, I'll give this everything I've got.
Good morning everyone.
Good morning Lee. Oh, good morning to you too Mackey.
Good morning.
Who is ready to play?
[mcf]. Talk to me for a moment.
Is Mackey being here a thing you did?
Honestly no, I haven't had the chance to actually talk to him yet. But I'm happy he's here.
Me too... huh. Every positive thing that happens now, I immediately think it's because of you.
And even this probably stems back to you in some way.
Come on Coach. This has a lot to do with you. We went from 3 players to now 5.
And when Ryker shows up we'll have 6.
I forgot about him. Is there any word about where he is?
No, he didn't go to classes yesterday either. Not like he ever did anyway... but still.
Well then maybe he shouldn't be on the team.
It's not that simple...
Well, we can work with what we have here. Hopefully after tryouts we can get a good bench going too.
I think everything is going to work out just fine Harp... I mean Coach.
You really think so?
Yeah, I want to play and see exactly how good these guys are... but I think this is a good start.
Well then go ahead. Test them out.
Yeah? I can do that.
Part of me thought I'd never see Mackey out here. I wonder what changed.
His size will help a ton, if we can keep him coming here. I know Damien can play...
This new guy Ayden has a lot of work to do... but there's some promise there. He has the size and he knows where he needs to be.
Lee is great from the perimeter, he needs to work on pretty much everything else though.
Damien plays a lot how he talked a few days ago. All instinct and no brain.
He just relies on his athleticism. If he learned the nuances of the game he'd honestly be dangerous.
Like right now, he's charging at me and I could do whatever I want. I could make him look silly.
Get him to bite this way, then...
A quick cross should get him off his feet.
Damn, he went down kind of hard. I just meant to shake him a little bit...
Hahaha...
Oh fuck... Jasmine saw all of that. I guess Damien deserves it a bit... but damn.
[mcf] come here.
I could probably get him to slide a bit but there's no need for that.
A quick cut against the way he's leaning should be enough to teach him...
Oh Jasmine, what's she doing out here?
[mcf] come here.
What's going on?
Charles just called. Lauren was coming to tell you but I told her I would tell you for her.
He's at some bus station close to here.
Bus station? Why?
Some emergency something. He has to catch a flight so he needs you to meet him there to have a meeting or something.
Apparently he needs a bus to go to the airport. I don't know.
Oh okay... Thanks for telling me.
No problem. All the girls say hi by the way.
What's going on you two?
Charles is going on some flight and needs to see me now.
Oh... well I guess there's not much of a choice.
I'm going to get back to cheer.
See you Jasmine. Thanks again.
Well... practice is still a bit dysfunctional huh?
I'm sorry. This should all be cleared up and then I won't be a distraction anymore.
Hey, it's okay. I know you want to be here.
Plus you're going to need to be here earlier tomorrow morning anyway. So half an hour off today for an extra hour tomorrow.
Tryouts are that early?
No, but there's some stuff I have to do and I need your help.
I got you Harp. I'll be here as early as you need me.
Good, now go ahead before Charles gets antsy. I'll see you after school.
Yes you will. See ya soon Harp.
Time to find Stacy.
Oh, she's already out here.
You ready Stacy?
Oh hey, yeah I'm ready.
I'm sorry we didn't watch you practice...
It's fine. I know you hate basketball.
I don't hate it. There's just some bad memories.
Oh, I didn't know. I thought you just weren't a fan.
No, I actually like to play. It's just... yeah.
Do you want to talk about it?
You'd want to? Well, maybe.
Not now though. Maybe tonight.
Whenever you want to Stacy.
Okay, yeah. Tonight then. Now let's go. We have to go to some bus station right?
Yep, I know where it is though... it's not far. So just follow me.
5 minutes later
Yep, there they are...
Both of them give off this completely creepy vibe.
Charles...
Ahh, there they are.
Here we are. So what do you need to know?
Woah, what's with the edge? We're all friends here.
That's what this is? I get accused of assault by the guy who hit me and put me in his basement and we're all friends here?
That's not what this is about son.
Fuck... something about him calling me son got me instantly pissed.
I have to stay cool.
That's not what this is all about. We're just here to make sure everyone is okay.
This fucking guy is just staring down Stacy. I don't even think she notices.
How about me and you go talk and leave them two to sort out their side of it?
Oh... I see. This was all a way for this asshole to meet back up with Stacy. She did say he was acting creepy.
Nah, I'm not leaving her with him.
Whatever needs to be said can be said between all of us.
Right Stacy?
Uhh... yeah sure.
[mcf]... Work with me here.
It's okay old man. We're good here. The kitten doesn't want to play fetch.
I no longer regret knocking this guy out... at all.
Are you sure?
Yeah this is a waste of our time. I'm out of here.
[mcf]... can you not help me out sometime?
Charles... What are you talking about?
That was my nephew. His whole plan was to get you here to ask about her.
Then you brought her here so I thought everything would go smoothly.
Charles. She doesn't want to be around him. She said he was creepy and she helped me so I'm helping her out by keeping him away from her.
It has nothing to do with you. I came here to clear this up and now it is. Nothing else.
Okay...
Fuck, I knocked out Charles' nephew. I must really mean a lot to this place if that doesn't get me in trouble.
Charles seems genuinely upset that I'm not being a bro with him. I think he might actually just be a bit dumb and not some evil guy.
Okay Charles. Look, we've been stepping on eachother's toes. There's a simple solution to this.
Our involvement needs to be just us. You keep trying to effect those that I care about. If you want to be friends we can be.
But it will never come at the expense of others. We should hang out sometime. Just us two, no one else and hash this all out. Agreed?
Fine, yeah. That sounds like a good time. I'll talk to you when I get back about setting that up.
Fuck... that mood change was instant. This dude isn't all there. He can't be.
Bye Charles.
What happened [mcf]? I couldn't understand what you guys were talking about. Are you going to be in trouble?
No Stacy. That guy was just being a creep.
He had me bring you here so he could talk to you again. That's all this was.
But I wasn't going to let that happen. That guy is too much of a weirdo.
Really? But it could've gotten you in trouble...
Stacy, do you really think I'd throw you at them just to save me a little headache?
I don't know...
Well I wouldn't... ever. You helped me out when you had no reason to.
That means a lot to me. You have a kind heart Stacy. I'd fight them both if it meant you'd be safe.
Oh... Damn Stacy you're choking me.
Oh, sorry...
I just... thank you [mcf].
I was so nervous about coming here to this school... not knowing anyone. I was afraid someone would try to take advantage of me.
That's what people will do to those with kind hearts. You have to be careful.
But my kind heart is why I'm here now. With someone who will look out for me.
Not to mention the arsenal of girls you have that would look out for me too.
That's true. I guess we both got lucky then.
I can agree to that.
Is that you [mcf]?
Rachael? What are you doing here?
Business kid, it pulls me around the globe. I didn't expect to see you in here.
This is crazy. Small world huh.
Are you going to introduce me to your girlfriend?
Oh uh, this is just my friend... but her name is Stacy.
Hey, I'm going to let you two talk. I'll be over here.
You don't have to, you're free to talk with us.
I know, I'm just a little emotional right now.
Oh, uhm. Okay. Just stay in sight. I don't know if that creepy guy is still around.
I will.
Sit with me [mcf].
So how's college going?
Hold on, have you heard anything from my mom?
Yes I have. That's a lot to get into right now though.
Okay, just whenever you have time.
Yeah, college is going well.
I bet you've been having fun. Brand new place full of brand new women.
Yeah it's been crazy.
Tell me... how many?
How many what?
How many girls from the college have you been with?
Come on there's no way you haven't been with at least one.
I haven't Rachael.
Why the hell not kid? That girlfriend of yours holding you down?
No actually. She kind of told me that I'm allowed to be with whoever I want to be with.
Damn... you got a keeper.
So why haven't you been with any of these girls?
I don't know. They're all friendly to me but it's not like that.
Have you tried to make it like that?
Not exactly.
You're not always going to get girls that will throw themselves at you like I did.
You're not always going to get girls that will throw themselves at you like I tried to.
You have to be the initiator. None of the girls your age want to appear easy. But give them a little push and who knows where they will go.
Yeah, I get that. This whole new relationship thing is still new to me.
I understand that... hey.
How's [am] doing?
She's doing great. You should come by and see her.
Yeah, I will. I miss her.
Letting her leave was one of the hardest things I've done in a long time.
Really?
Yeah, your mom is awesome. Was always there for me and knew how to make me laugh.
I could never get her to hang out with me but I'd still say she was my best friend.
Dang Rachael. I'm surprised you let her go without a fight.
I know how to pick my battles. I heard for years pretty much daily about her amazing son.
She would always brag about you. All the other moms shit talked their kids but never her.
So when the woman who I think could do no wrong is so amazed by someone. I took note of that.
Part of me thought she might be exaggerating, but when I met you... you acted exactly how she described you.
That's a big reason I was so... you know.
That's not like me kid. I've never even flashed a boob for a guy until he's at least spent hundreds in drinks on me.
So if you had that pull on me, I can't imagine what you could accomplish with these college girls.
But yeah, there was no way she was going to stay. I didn't even want to try and make her.
I didn't know you had such a nice side to you Rachael.
You don't know most of my sides... yet.
You haven't forgotten about that thing we planned on the phone the other day right?
The three person party?
I can't say I have. Is that still a thing?
Yep, I'll message you tonight, before I come over.
Sounds good to me.
It fucking better. See you soon kid.
See you Rach.
I need to get going though. I'll come by sometime tonight. We have a lot to talk about.
I'm sure we do. I'll see you soon Rach.
See you kid.
You ready to go Stacy?
Sure... uhh, who was that lady?
My mom's old boss... Are you okay now, or still feeling emotional?
A bit, I just am happy to be where I am right now.
I'm happy you're here too. Now, let's get to class.
5 minutes later
Oh awesome, the girls are already here.
Girls! We're back.
Welcome back.
How'd everything go babe? Are you okay?
Yeah, it was strange but everything is settled.
Good. That's nice to know.
So... Shauna. Sorry about earlier.
I kind of forgot where we were. I didn't mean to put you on the spot like that.
No, no. That was fine.
I'm happy that you didn't mind kissing me in front of everyone. It just shocked me.
Good. I'm happy everyone knows now. Did the other girls ask about it?
They sure did.
What did you tell them?
That it's up to you who you want to be with. They had a lot of other questions but I didn't really answer them.
I'm sorry for dumping that on you.
I know you didn't mean to, plus it was funny seeing them all clamor about it.
Haha, I bet it was.
My favorite students!
Hey Veronica, I thought teachers weren't meant to have favorites?
Don't tell on me.
Haha, your secret is safe.
So uhh... Are you still on for meeting my nephew today?
Oh fuck... I forgot about that.
Uhh... Absolutely. I might not be able to stay for long but I'll absolutely meet him and play with him for a bit.
That's perfect. Thank you so much again [mcf].
Don't mention it. I'm happy to meet him. Is it still a surprise?
Mhmmm, he thinks he's just going to the gym to play.
Perfect. I hope he freaks out.
I can guarantee you he will.
I'm going to be the best aunt in the world.
I'll make sure he knows it was all you that set it up.
Oh, that would be perfect.
Are you ready for class to start?
Sure am... well actually can I be excused for a moment?
Well yeah. Class hasn't started yet and won't for a bit. You're free to do whatever. Thank you for being polite though. Just be back before class starts.
Yes ma'am.
Where even is the nearest bathroom?
Oh hey Rainn and Bailey.
Hi.
Where are you running off to?
Trying to find a bathroom.
I can show you.
That would be awesome. Thank you.
Hey... you should come by the diner today.
I'm not sure if I'll have time today Rainn. If I do I'll be there though.
Great. See you then.
So... bathroom. There's one down the hall... I think.
Lead the way.
Why are you looking at me like that?
Just thinking.
Thinking about what?
[g1] told us about your two's relationship. I'm just thinking about all the girls that are going to come at you.
All the girls that are going to flutter their lashes at you.
Rachael told me to be more assertive. This seems like a good time to try it out.
Yeah? Are you one of them?
Damn, that got her. She's getting as red as Shauna got.
I'm actually not sure if I want to pursue other girls yet. But flirting never hurt anyone.
I'm just playing with you Bailey.
No reason to turn into a tomato.
Haha, shut up.
She clearly likes me. I like her to, but do I want to pursue something with her?
Hey Bailey.
Yeah?
I like you too.
Haha, right back into a tomato.
Are you being serious?
Yeah Bailey. I think you're awesome. I love your personality and you're as cute as can be. So yeah, I like you.
Follow me.
Uhh... This isn't a bathroom.
No, sorry. I'll take you to one in just a second. I just wanted a moment alone with you.
Yeah? I don't mind that. How do you want to spend this moment?
You just told me you liked me dude. I haven't exactly been shy about liking you...
So I figured we should have a moment to...
What? Hug? Kiss?
The last one.
Yeah? I think I want that too.
I don't know why but I just want to tease her. Maybe it's how she reacts but it's so tempting.
Well... What are you waiting for?
I'm just enjoying this moment.
Mwah!
You were taking too long...
Haha, fair... But that's it? A little peck?
Huh? You want to do more?
More than a friendly kiss? Yeah, I do.
Well, I uhh... Don't know.
All right, no more teasing now. Time to go all out.
This seemed to work on [g1] and Shauna... hopefully it works on her too.
She's going with it... when I did it to the other girls they just sort of let it happen.
But Bailey is pushing her tongue further and moving it around...
Wow...
Yeah, that was much better than what I did.
Was it good for you?
It was great Bailey.
Good... did you want to do anything else?
That's up to you Bailey, we should get back to class soon though.
Yeah... Uhh... What would you do with [g1]?
Right now? There's a lot I would do. For some reason I really like picking her up.
The way her face lights up and she gets a goofy smile... so yeah. I'd pick her up and lay her on that table.
Can we do that?
Yeah... but I mean that usually leads to something else.
I know, but there's no harm in just doing the first part.
Well, when you put it like that.
Oh! [mcf]...
Damn Bailey, you're light.
You picked me up like I'm nothing...
You weigh nothing... do you not like it?
No! I like it. It's just a weird feeling.
Weird how?
It's like a powerless feeling, I'm just a tiny girl and you could fling me around like it's nothing.
Mmm, Bailey sounds like she likes being a bit submissive...
I definitely wouldn't mind exploring that side of her...
I'm basically pressing her against me and she doesn't seem to mind at all.
Although I should really lay her down, I've just kinda been holding her here doing nothing.
Oh! We're ruining this table.
We just knocked over a lamp... it's fine.
But what if someone walks in?
I don't think they would care about the lamp as much as they would us laying on their desk.
I know... it's just this is great and I don't want this to end in me being embarrassed...
We can stop now Bailey.
Are you sure? I don't want to make you mad...
Mad? Come on Bailey.
I told you I liked you because well... I like you.
You have a nice personality. I can tell you care about those around you.
Not to mention you're cute as hell. I like your smile and your big brown eyes.
I didn't tell you it so we could fool around in some office. So yes... we can stop.
Thank you [mcf]...
Woah... what are you doing Bailey?
Fuck... that actually feels really good.
After getting interrupted this morning twice... I wouldn't say no to this.
She's a petite girl. Which actually fits her really well. I can tell she has perky nipples though.
I can feel them even through her bra.
This thumb action is nice but it's time to move onto something else.
Hey! I was sucking on that... Give it back.
We really don't have much time Bailey. Let's do something else.
What do you want to do?
Flip around.
Like on my knees? What are you going to do?
Yeah, on your knees. I just want to look at you.
Uhhm... okay...
Mmm, she's got the perfect amount of butt and thigh for her frame. I wonder what she looks like underneath the underwear.
That's surely too much for right now though.
I do wonder just how ready she is though...
So? Enjoy the view?
Oh yeah... she's ready. Her panties are wet and it feels like there's a tiny oven down here.
Oh! I guess you are enjoying it... hehe
Sorry Bailey... I couldn't resist. You're just really fucking sexy.
Can I see you out of your uniform?
Can I keep my underwear on? We're not really in a safe place.
Yeah, I just want to see you without this in the way.
Can you check and make sure no one is coming and that the door is locked while I take it off?
Sure, yeah I can do that.
Door is locked and it seems everyone is already to their class. Hallway seems empty.
Hopefully Veronica doesn't mind us being a few minutes late...
Okay, I'm ready.
How do I look?
Perfect. You just ooze 'girl I want to protect but also take home at night'.
Stand up... let me get a better look.
I'm not too boyish? I know I'm not very curvy... Not like [g1] or Shauna.
Curves are nice... you have some yourself. But when a girl can be petite and pull it off so well... it's fucking sexy.
The only way you could get better right now is if your ass is how I'm imagining it.
Small and firm... but cute. Can you turn around?
Oh yeah... exactly how I thought it was.
And a nice thigh gap to boot.
I'm glad you like my body... I know I like yours.
After seeing you with Liz... well I don't know if I could handle that thing.
You talked a big game back then.
I told you... that was all Zoe telling me what to do.
Yeah, maybe... you can't fake the look you had in your eyes though.
Yeah? Was it like the look I have now?
Close... you looked a bit more conniving before.
I very much prefer where you are now to where you were then though.
So do I. And maybe I'll have that same look when I see it again.
There's nothing stopping you... go for it.
Oh my fucking god [mcf]...
What? You've seen it before.
It's different when it's right in front of my face.
There's no way that would ever fit in me.
There's other ways... for now at least.
You can grab it... if you want to.
Yeah, I want to... There's a lot I want to do.
Like what exactly?
Well... I'd firstly like to not be in this office so we'd have privacy.
So would I...
If we weren't here though. I would want to taste it...
I mean... you could try that now. Not much difference than what we're doing now.
True... Well...
I'd do it like this.
This fucking tease... she's just blowing warm breath on it.
My cock is twitching just waiting for her to do something.
I'd get you all riled up... and then I would...
Oh would you look at the time! We should get to class.
Fuck me... I live in a world full of tease and interruptions.
I'm sorry... that was kind of mean. But if we started this there's no way we wouldn't be extremely late.
Bailey...
What? Please don't be angry with me... we just don't have time. I'm sorry, that was a bad joke...
I promise I'll make it up to you. I just don't want to be late and... when I got down there I got a little nervous.
I'll make things better soon. Just don't be angry at me please.
Mwah!
You're right. We need to get to class. But first...
I want to say that I'm happy we did this. I'm happy I met you and that we are already where we're at. You're awesome Bailey.
[mcf]... I'm happy too. Incredibly so.
Great, now can you please show me the bathroom before class?
Oh, haha... I completely forgot about that. Yeah, let's get dressed and then I'll show you.
Awesome, thanks Bailey.
A few minutes later
Here we are...
Thanks again Bailey.
No problem... hey... I have a question.
What's up?
Are you going to tell [g1] and Shauna about me?
Yeah, I intend to. Are you okay with that?
Yes! I like you... and I don't want you to have to hide me.
I would never hide a girl as beautiful as you Bailey.
Hehe, I'm going to go ahead and head back to class. I want to tell Rainn about what happened... if that's okay.
I don't mind. Like I said, no hiding.
See you in class Bailey.
See you [mcf].
So... should we get back to class?
Yeah, we should. After you show me that bathroom.
Oh, haha. I completely forgot about that. Yeah I'll show you. Follow me.
A few minutes later
Here we are...
Thanks Bailey.
[mcf]... I'm glad you told me. I'm very happy about things.
I am too Bailey. I'm excited for everything to come with us.
Are you going to tell [g1] and Shauna about me?
Yeah, I intend to. Are you okay with that?
Yes! I like you... and I don't want you to have to hide me.
I would never hide a girl as beautiful as you Bailey.
Hehe, I'm going to go ahead and head back to class. I want to tell Rainn about what happened... if that's okay.
I don't mind. Like I said, no hiding.
See you in class Bailey.
See you [mcf].
Here we are...
Thank you Bailey.
No problem [mcf].
I'm going to go ahead and head back to class. Make sure I'm not late and all.
Good idea, see you Bailey.
See you [mcf].
One bathroom visit later
Okay, time to head back to class.
Oh shit, it's Penelope. I should say hey to her... especially after yesterday at the diner.
Penelope! What's up?
Oh, hey [mcf]. What are you doing over here right now?
I had to use the restroom before class.
You know there's one like right next to the classroom right?
Uhh, no... I didn't. Bailey showed me this one.
I think she just wanted to spend some time with you. This is probably the bathroom furthest away from our class.
Which works out for me since I can walk you back.
That's perfect... because I'm a little lost.
Haha, follow me.
So... I heard a little rumor about you.
I think I know what it is.
I think everyone knows what it is by now. Is it true? You're with Shauna?
And [g1]. That spread really quickly.
Yeah... I wouldn't doubt that they are talking about it on national news right now. I mean that's how I found out everything I know about you.
But it could be way worse... you could be the guy that had the imaginary girlfriend.
Haha, well having two is better than having none.
Hey Penelope...
Call me Penny. I liked it when you did yesterday.
Really? I assumed you probably get called that all the time and that it might have been annoying.
No, I've been called it a lot before... but I like it when you do it.
Penny it is then. I just wanted to say that I like this smiley version of you more than the one trying to hide from me.
Yeah, I do too...
What about the version of me without glasses?
I like both the glasses and no glasses.
I like myself without them more... I just can't see as well.
You have nice eyes that the glasses hide a bit, but I'd value eyesight over that.
Anyway... I think it's really cool that you're with Shauna.
With everything I've read... it seems like you were her protector.
If I had someone like you growing up, I could imagine myself being in love with them.
So I'm happy for you both.
You being who you are... being with a girl like Shauna. That's a big deal.
It's actually huge. Especially since you were open about it, not doing it in secret.
She had you growing up to protect her and now she has you in a different way.
I'm happy for you both.
Thanks Penny.
Sooo... it's none of my business but have you and Shauna done anything yet?
That's a pretty personal question to ask someone you just met yesterday.
Sorry... I feel like I've known you for a long time since I've read a ton about you.
I don't think I'm going to tell Penny about me cheating before I tell [g1]...
But I can tell her that we decided to take things slowly.
Uhh... no we haven't. We've talked about it and decided we will take things slowly. All this is new still.
I understand that. Sorry for being nosy.
It's fine. It helps that I'm not a very secretive person. I'd appreciate if you didn't tell Shauna that we talked about this though.
I won't. I still haven't even met her.
I'll introduce you now if you'd like.
Yes please.
Before we do that I have one final question.
What's up?
When you and Shauna do decide to do things... are you going to do anything with her dick?
Woah, more very personal questions...
Sorry, I can't help myself from asking.
Yeah, uhh... I'm not sure Shauna would be into that.
What makes you say that?
Just how she talks about things, she fully sees herself as a girl.
Oh... well that works out perfectly for you then. Unless you were interested in her that way.
I respect Shauna as she is. I don't mind that she has it at all. She's still as much of a girl as every other girl to me...
But I'm not really into that.
That's fair. Sounds like it works out for the both of you as well.
I might be, I'm not really sure yet.
Yeah? Wow... that's awesome.
Not that it really matters. I really don't think Shauna would be down for anything like that.
Why is that? She just might not be comfortable with that side of her. She's probably scared of what you think about it.
You should try easing into things... maybe get her to touch herself for you. Things like that.
But if she's not down then obviously stop trying and accept her feelings.
Of course. I'll give it a shot. Thanks Penny.
No problem, I'm happy to help.
But yeah... I want to meet her.
Let's go meet her then.
[mcf]! We need to talk!
Okay... I'll be in the class in a second Penny. Just wait for me okay?
Sure... I'll be in there.
What do you need Willow?
You owe me.
I owe you? What for?
You knocked my boyfriend out yesterday. You owe me big time.
Woah... that guy is your boyfriend? Explains a lot.
Plus after what you said about [g1] yesterday... I'd say we're even now.
Come on... a little banter isn't as bad as knocking someone out.
He sucker punched me first Willow, I don't owe you or him anything.
Why was that guy trying to talk to Stacy so badly if he's with Willow?
I should keep that to myself though. I don't want Stacy to be a target for Willow.
You owe me.
What do you think I owe you.
Good, you admit it. I'll let you know soon.
I didn't admit to anything. I don't owe you anything.
I said I'll let you know soon [mcf]. Have fun in class.
This fucking girl... why can't she just be easy going like all the others. I get the feeling she'll be nothing but a headache.
I'll worry about that later though. Not worth it right now.
Oh shit, Shauna looks like she's out.
She did say she barely slept last night...
Maybe I should meet her some other time.
No, I'll get her up. Just give me a second.
Shaaaunaaaa... You need to get up. Class is about to start.
.....
Well, I guess she's too sleepy to go to the arcade today...
Ughhhh...
I'm up, I'm up...
Heh, you look really cute when you're sleepy eyed.
And you look very handsome when you tell me I'm cute.
What did you say about the arcade?
Nothing, I was just joking about not going. But we definitely are.
And you're going to win me the biggest stuffed animal they have.
That's right.
I can't wait... [g1] said that she's going to stay home and let the two of us go.
Really? Why did she say that?
So we both get some alone time today. After we get back she said she wanted some time alone with you.
Oh that works then. You should really take a nap before we go though.
I will, whenever we go home.
Sounds good... so Shauna there's a girl I want you to meet.
Sure... but first.
Mwah!
I get to do the shock kissing this time.
Haha, that's fair. We're even now.
So who am I meeting?
Penelope. She's waiting on us in the center of the class.
Oh. Let's talk to her then. Didn't mean to make her wait.
Hi Penelope... it's nice to meet you.
It's nice to meet you too Shauna. I don't want to sound weird but...
I did a lot of research on [mcf]... there were articles about you two and it turns out that me and you have a lot in common.
So I wanted to meet you.
Oh... well that's nice of you.
You two should hang out sometime. I think you two will get along.
Yeah maybe.
I'm going to go sit down now. Thanks for introducing us.
No problem Penny. I might swing by the diner later.
I hope you do. See you.
Fuck... this meeting was a little awkward.
So... how do you know her?
I stopped for a burger yesterday at a diner. She worked there and we talked for a minute.
She was nice and mentioned you. So I figured you two should meet.
How did she know about me?
She said some old interviews I did. Or some article or something. I'm not sure exactly.
What did she mean she's like me?
I think she meant she was bullied at a young age too. She mentioned that she didn't have someone like me.
I thought it might be cool to know another girl that has gone through everything you have.
It is... I kind of like being that girl that you protect. It seperates me from the rest.
Shauna, I never said I was doing anything with her. I just wanted you two to meet. She's just a friend.
You have a ton of things that seperate you from every other girl. I'll protect any girl I'm with though.
I don't view you any differently based on that. I view you differently based on everything we've been through.
Nothing will ever change that and no one will ever rival that.
Is she like me? You know...
Yeah she is. I thought it might be cool to know another girl that is going through everything you are.
It is... I just like being the only one in your life. It seperates me from the rest.
Shauna, I never said I was doing anything with her. I just wanted you two to meet. She's just a friend.
You have a ton of things that seperate you from every other girl. That isn't one of them though.
I don't view you any differently based on that. I view you differently based on everything we've been through.
Nothing will ever change that and no one will ever rival that.
You're right... I'm just being weird. I'm not used to any of this yet.
Not used to calling you mine, or sharing you. Any of it.
It's still weird to me too Shauna. It will become more natural with time I think.
Yeah... it should. I'll talk to Penelope again sometime soon.
Thanks Shauna. I think it would be good for both of you if you were to be friends.
Babe?
I'll let you two talk. I'm going to lay my head down for as long as I can.
Okay Shauna. I'll wake you before class starts.
That was a long bathroom trip. What happened?
Bailey took me to one far away.
Bailey? She's the girl with the shaved side in her hair right?
Yeah, that's her.
Oh, she seems nice. She's pretty too. Did you two do anything?
I thought you didn't want to know about things like that unless I wanted them to be a part of us?
Yeah... I kinda like hearing about it though. Come on... tell me.
I was being a little flirty with her. Got her to indirectly admit she liked me. Then I told her I liked her too.
After that we went into someone's office and kissed a bit. That's all.
Do you plan to do more?
Is it a bad thing if I do?
No baby. I want you to. Thanks for telling me.
We didn't do anything. I'm pretty sure she likes me but I think I just want her to be my friend.
Why? She seems lovely.
She is, there's just something not there though. Can't force things.
I guess so. Thanks for telling me the truth.
Of course, and thank you for... well everything.
The way she immediately grabbed my arm is so fucking adorable.
No thanks needed. You deserve everything.
Mwah!
Hey! I talked to Shauna.
I told her that I'm going to stay back while you two go to the arcade and that I wanted some time alone with you after.
Yeah she told me about that.
That way we can finish what we started earlier.
Maybe more?
Definitely more.
I hate to interrupt the cute couple but there's someone you need to meet real quick [mcf].
I'm going to sit down with the girls while you do that.
Okay, I'll be over there in a second.
Sorry about that. There's actually two girls you haven't met yet. Elizabeth and Kimmy.
Oh, I actually already know Elizabeth. Known her most of my life.
But yeah, I need to meet Kimmy.
Oh, I didn't know that about you two. But Kimmy is right here.
Kimmy, this is [mcf].
It's nice to meet you.
Mhmm, you too.
I'll leave you two to it.
So, tell me about yourse-
Stop right there, let me say a few things.
I don't know what the praise or hype is about for you. You don't seem special to me.
I don't know why you're in our class. I just don't get it.
Woah, Kimmy. What's the hostility for?
What isn't it for? You ruined everything.
What do you mean? What did I do?
Ugh, you don't even know. Listen, we're going to have to work together.
If you don't have to talk to me then don't. That will make this year go as smoothly as it can.
Kimmy, talk to me for a second.
Fuck, what did I do to her?
What did she mean we'll have to work together?
Everyone take your seats! Class is starting.
Well, I need to focus on class for now. But I'll get to the bottom of that.
One class session later
Good job today everyone. [mcf]... are you still good to meet my nephew?
Sure am.
Okay, I'm going to get changed really quickly. Wait here.
Oh? What about her nephew?
Sorry for not telling you sooner. I kind of forgot.
I'm going to go meet her nephew, he's a fan. I won't be gone long.
That actually works out really well. I was going to take Elizabeth to get her hair dyed back red.
Really? That's great. Are you going to get your nails done?
I might, I don't know.
You should... and get them painted black this time.
I told her the same thing.
Man, Liz worked quickly on getting closer with [g1]. It's really nice seeing them get along.
Okay, I'll think about it. We shouldn't be too long either though.
Well, I'll see you two soon then.
See you [mcf].
Bye baby.
What about you two girls?
I'm going to go home and sleep a bit.
I'll see you soon [mcf]. Wake me up whenever you're ready to go.
I will Shauna. See you soon and sleep well.
What about you Stacy?
I should probably finally find out about my dorm. Meet my roommate and all that.
Why? You can just come to our house again.
I can't just crash there everyday, I need to find out about where I have to stay.
You can stay at our place for as long as you want Stacy. We have the room and we like having you there.
Are you sure? I really don't want to impose.
Yes really. I want you there Stacy.
Thank you so much [mcf]. I really didn't want to have to do all that with my dorm.
I'm scared my roommate would be a jerk.
Don't worry about that. Just move your stuff into our place.
[mcf]... we've only been friends for a day.
So? Don't you like it at my place? It's basically just a big dorm room.
Yeah, I do. But...
No buts. You like it there. We like you being there. So you should be there.
Okay... yeah. If you insist.
I do, do you need help moving your stuff?
No, I don't have a whole lot.
Well good. So you're going to head to our place now?
Hehe, yeah. Do you need me to do anything?
Just check on [am] for me. I know she's not used to staying home alone all day.
Yeah I can do that.
Thanks Stacy. I'll see you at home soon. You should catch up with Shauna and walk home with her.
Okay I will, see you at home.
After all the help Stacy has been and how nice she is. I'm happy she'll be staying with us.
[mcf]? You're still here?
Yep, about to head out though.
You decide if you're going to come by the diner today yet?
Same as before, if I have time I will.
Well, I hope to see you then. Bye [mcf].
Where do you think you're going?
I don't know, I don't want to bug you too much today.
You're not bugging me. The only thing that bugs me is that you were going to leave without a kiss.
Well let's fix that.
Oh damn Bailey. That's definitely no friendly peck.
Better?
Way better.
Good, now I better see you at the diner later. Or else that will bug me.
I'll definitely try to be there.
Grr, I'll take it. See you [mcf].
See you Bailey...
I like how things are progressing with her. Feels natural.
So you and Bailey huh?
Oh hey Rainn. Yeah, she told you? I'm assuming.
Of course she did, we're best friends. She tells me everything.
You're cool with it all?
Yeah but...
If you hurt her... whatever you do to her I'll do to you.
Heh, noted.
Have a good day Rainn.
Likewise [mcf].
Veronica should be back any second. I can't spend much time with her nephew but I'll try to make it fun.
See you Bailey. Take care.
Hmm, that was a bit distant of her. I hope she didn't expect anything from me earlier.
Anyway Veronica should be back any second. I can't spend much time with her nephew but I'll try to make it fun.
[mcf]? How's it going?
Oh hey Jasmine.
Damn, Kimmy is with her and looks as pissed as earlier.
She's even pulling Jasmine back.
Oh... uhh. I'll talk to you later [mcf].
See you soon Jasmine.
What was that about? What's gotten into you?
I'll tell you in a minute.
Well at least I can probably find out what's up with Kimmy through Jasmine.
Oh good. You're still here. You ready to go?
Jesus, there's just girls popping up everywhere.
But damn Veronica. I didn't realize she had a body like that.
How old is she anyway? She doesn't seem a day past 30.
Hello?
Oh, sorry. I was just a little shocked.
Shocked about what?
Honestly, I didn't realize you had the body that you have.
Oh... [mcf]. You shouldn't say those things, especially not in this hallway.
Sorry, I don't mean it in that way, just a compliment.
Thank you... but please keep that to yourself, after last year I can't have a student talk to me like that.
But really... thank you.
Won't happen again Veronica. We good to go?
Yeah, we can go.
A few minutes later.
Doesn't look like they are here yet.
Well then let's take a seat.
Sure...
Thanks for coming here again. There's no kid that deserves this more than Nathan.
No problem Veronica. I'm happy to be here.
That kid has been through so much this year.
His father went to jail on some drug charge. Him and his mom had to move twice since then.
His mom has been doing her best but it's got to be hard, she still hasn't told him where his dad is.
That's awful. I assume he asks her all the time about him though?
Oh yeah, it must be stressful for her.
I was the same way but it was about my mom. Poor kid.
That's why I'm very grateful for you coming here.
I hope it helps everyone out. He's such a sweet kid.
What are you two doing here?
Oh shit, it's the nurse that saw me when Natalie landed on me.
Oh, it's you. How are you feeling?
I'm good. Thanks for helping me out that day.
I didn't really do much.
Sorry kid, I'm a hugger.
Okay, she's squeezing pretty tight. She's pressing herself against me. She's pretty firm for an older woman.
Would you mind if me and Veronica talk alone for a second?
Oh, yeah sure. I don't mind.
It's okay, just give us a second. You should hide behind the bleachers and make it a surprise.
That sounds like fun. I'll be back there.
That was a bit strange, I wonder what they had to talk about.
What are you doing here with him?
Oh shit, sound travels in this gym. I can hear them still.
He's here to meet my nephew. I was surprised he agreed to it. Hell he's the one who brought it up.
Oh, I thought you might have been here on a little secret visit.
No, after everything that happened last year... there's no way.
I don't know... I've never seen you wear clothes like this.
What? Workout clothes? I came here to play basketball with my nephew.
Hmmm, I don't think you need skin tight everything to play basketball.
Haha, shut up.
I wouldn't blame you if you were here for him.
He had a little accident the other day and I had to check on him. Some girl kneed him in the groin.
Oh, I didn't know that happened. I hope he's okay.
Trust me, he is. He fell asleep in the nurse room and I was just doing my job.
Checking on my patient and everything. Took a little peek.
You didn't! That's messed up!
Couldn't help myself. Just yeah, he's totally fine.
What the fuck...
If his girlfriend hadn't shown up he might've woken up to me instead of her.
I'm going to pretend I didn't hear that.
All that man has to do is ask and I'd do whatever he wanted.
Okay, okay. I got it. You're really perverted you know that?
Yeah, I know it. It's my best trait.
Knock, knock, knock
Oh shit, that must be Nathan. It's my time to shine.
I'm just going to ignore everything that nurse just said.
Hey auntie.
Hey Nathan. You ready to play?
Yeah! Mom said I can't stay very long though. She's going to the store then she's going to pick me back up.
Aah. Oh well. We'll make the best of the time we have.
Damn, Veronica has a nice ass too. And if I'm being honest with myself the nurse doesn't have a bad one either.
I have someone I want you to meet.
Who?
That sounds like my cue.
Hey Nathan. It's nice to meet you.
Oh my god! Are you [mcf]?
Yes Nathan, that's [mcf].
Your aunt told me you were a fan. So I just had to meet you.
So you should thank her. I wouldn't be here without here.
Thank you so much auntie.
Thank you, thank you, thank you!
Isn't that just the cutest thing.
Thank you [mcf].
Damn, her voice was shaky saying that. This really does mean a lot to her.
I'm going to head back to my neck of the woods. I just have some last minute things before I go home.
You should come by sometime [mcf].
Uhh, maybe. I might.
Bye kid.
Are we going to play any?
We sure are buddy. But first I need the strongest high five you can give me.
Go ahead Nathan, let him have it.
Don't hold back.
Kid barely swung. Oh well, time to ham it up for him.
Ow! Dang Nathan you're strong! We better stop now or else you're going to break my hand.
Haha, sorry. I didn't realize I was so strong.
Well you are! Go ahead and go grab a ball. There's usually one in the bleachers somewhere. Try the other side first.
Sure thing!
He's a sweet kid... are you crying?
Sorry, I just haven't seen that kid smile like that in a long time. It feels good.
I'm trying not to cry. We have some basketball to play and I can't do that with tears in my eyes.
Well said, but I'm happy you're happy.
Now I'll go play with Nathan while you get those eyes dry.
Gotcha, thanks again [mcf].
Great! You found a ball.
Yeah, it's a little big though.
True we can still play with it anyway.
Yeah, I'm growing up quickly so I need to get used to these.
Exactly. That's a good mindset.
My mom says that a lot. That I'm growing up quickly.
Yeah? How's your mom doing? You taking care of her?
What? I'm the child, she takes care of me.
Yeah but you're the man of the house now. That means you have to be strong and be there for your mom. Make sure she's doing okay.
I heard you two have been going through some stuff. It would help out a lot if you were there for her.
It's not hard, you just have to let her know you that you love her and that you're there for her. Can you do that?
Yeah, I can try.
Great, so what do you want to do?
Can you lift me up so I can dunk? My dad used to do it all the time.
Sure thing buddy. You ready?
Yeah!
And up we go!
Wooo!
Ha, Victoria looks a lot like Harp when I dunked on Damien.
That was fun. Let's do it again!
Hold up buddy, we should play some actual basketball before you have to go.
Oh yeah! Let's play!
One short basketball game later
Camera flashes
What the fuck? Who is taking a picture?
Oh, it's that girl from my class. Why is she taking pictures?
Can I help you?
Sorry! I should've told you I was here before I took pictures. I was talking to the nurse and she mentioned you were in here.
I run WVM's website. I'm just getting a photo for a story.
Oh okay, yeah. Next time please ask first.
I will, that was rude of me.
I'm also the girl that will run your social media. Weekly posts about games and how much you love it here at WVM, things like that.
You're going to handle all of that?
Yeah, me and Kimmy will.
Fuck, of course Kimmy would be involved somewhere.
Kimmy? I don't think she likes me very much.
What makes you say that?
Her telling me she doesn't like me.
Why would she say that?
I really don't know. I'd love to find out though.
She's usually a good judge of character. I'll find out what's up.
I'd love to know what you find out.
Mhmmm, I'll let you know. Bye [mcf].
Bye uhh..
Fuck I meant to ask her what her name is.
Oh well...
What was that about?
She was getting a picture for the website, that's all.
Oh well, little man's mom just called and said she's outside.
Awh that stinks.
Don't forget what I told you bud. Be there for your mom, she needs you right now.
Do something nice for her. Make her a card or something just to show that you're thinking about her.
Yes sir. Can we play again some time?
If your mom is cool with it then sure. Maybe some day next week.
It was nice meeting you.
It was nice meeting you too Nathan, don't forget what we talked about.
I won't. Bye [mcf].
Bye Nathan, take care.
I wish he could've stayed for longer.
Me too. But that was nice.
It was and I owe you big time [mcf]. Anything I can do just let me know.
You don't owe me anything Veronica. I'm happy to be here.
You're fucking awesome.
Ha, I try.
I won't take up anymore of your day. I'll see you in class tomorrow okay?
You sure will. Take care Veronica.
You too [mcf], and for the final time... thanks.
Hmm, this went quicker than I thought it would. I could just head home and take my time or I could take that nurse up on her offer to visit.
I doubt I'd consider it on a normal day, but after being interrupted this morning, I just need to do something.
Fuck it, I have to be quick but that nurse was obviously interested in me.
A quick little visit won't hurt anything.
Oh fuck... didn't expect to see pussy right away.
She's well groomed for her age.
Ahem... nurse.
Oh there you are... I started to think you weren't going to come. I've been in that position for so long.
Huh? You knew I was coming?
You really don't think I knew you could hear me in there? Those very crude things I was saying very loudly?
Come on kid, I thought you knew. I tried to get Veronica in on it too.
Now come on, I need to get home soon, my husband will worry about me.
Woah, I don't know now. I didn't know you had a husband, you don't wear a ring.
Oh don't worry about him, he lets me sleep around. He likes to hear about it. It's the only thing that gets him going anymore.
Huh, that sounds a lot like [g1] actually so I can't really judge that, except for that last part.
Take your clothes off.
Fuck it, this is what I came here to do after all.
Mmmm, it looks as good as it did the other day. It's even larger now though.
Nice and erect cock, large as my forearm. You're a keeper kid.
It's a shame I'm not 40 years younger. I'd lock you up.
But that doesn't mean I can't have my fun now.
Lay down...
No, I'm in a hurry too. I want you as you were when I walked in.
Mmmmm, yes sir.
If I didn't know it was her on the other side of this ass, I could never tell it belonged to a 60 year old.
Or maybe I'm just extremely horny, who knows.
She's firm too, she definitely ages well.
Don't be gentle kid, I might be older but I can still fuck like I'm young.
Here we go.
Oh fuck yes... stretch that pussy out.
She's tight, way more so than I would have thought. Maybe all that shit you hear about older women is just exaggerated. This isn't bad at all.
A firm ass, nice legs, swinging tits. There's nothing to complain about.
Deeper, put it deeper.
Oh fuck yes! Fuck me, use my body. Do whatever you want.
Pound my fucking pussy like no one ever has.
Oh fuck...
Just like that! Keep going just like that...
That cock feels so fucking good... the best I've ever had.
Fuck, you're a real surprise.
Oooh fuck, fuck me faster! Deeper!
OOOoooooh! Fuck!
Thaaat's fucking peeeerfect... Fuck meeee..
This is way better than I thought it would be, I'm about to cum...
Just a few more... Oh shit...
Fuuuck.. Damn nurse.
Oh fuck kid, that was... great. Fucking great.
It's all over my back, you're a dirty boy.
You're a dirty girl, so it works out.
Damn right I am, come by anytime when you need to be 'seen'. We could have a lot of fun.
Yeah, maybe. This was fun. I'm going to head out now.
Yeah you should. I need to get home. Hubby will love this story.
And with that, I'm gone.
Fuck, I just hope she keeps this to herself... well just her and her husband I guess.
Time to get home though, need to hurry.
One trip home later
Feels good to be home, I wonder if Harp and Natalie are here.
[mcf]! Behind you.
It appears they are.
Woah Natalie. Is that you?
Haha, yeah. I got a haircut. Do you like it?
It looks great Natalie, your older hairstyle hid those big beautiful eyes.
Hehe, thank you [mcf].
No problem Natalie, I really like your new look.
I like your look too... uhh... you have a nice house.
It's the school's not mine, but thanks Nat.
Uhh, where's your mom at?
She's upstairs with your mom, talking about us as kids and I couldn't take it.
So I came outside to wait on you.
Yeah, I would have ran from that too. Hopefully [am] didn't mention anything too embarrassing about me.
Not really, just a bunch of sweet things. I just couldn't handle my mom's stories.
As much as I'd like to avoid my own stories I should go say hey to them.
Yeah, you should. My mom wanted to talk to you.
Anything serious?
I don't know, probably not. She wouldn't say much.
Well, let's find out.
Man, Natalie's outfit is revealing. I'm surprised Harp let her wear it.
I'm also surprised she's not too shy to put that on. I'm happy she is comfortable enough around me to wear it though.
Before you head inside can we talk for a minute?
Sure Natalie, what's up?
Sit with me for a second.
Are we still on for our... hang out? Or whatever?
Our date you mean?
Hehe, yeah... date.
I'm still down for it. I've been looking forward to it.
Really? I have too...
I have the perfect idea for it as well. Turns out we have a home theatre here. We could watch a movie if you want to.
Just the two of us? That sounds perfect. Is [g1] okay with that?
I heard about you and Shauna... but...
She's more than okay with it, she's happy we're having our date.
I'm happy about it too, so... what kind of date is this?
Like what am I to you?
A friend right now. But I think you're a beautiful girl with a great personality and I can see us being more than that one day.
[mcf], you're going to make me blush. I'm not used to compliments like that.
Are you really interested in me? Like in a relationship way?
You answer first, knowing I'm in a relationship with [g1] and Shauna... would you want to be a part of that?
I'm new to all this... I'm not sure what I'd want. It does seem comforting knowing they'd be there for you if there was something I couldn't do...
Well, I'm interested in you Natalie but you'd have to be completely okay with me being with the other girls.
You obviously don't have to decide anything now. We can just be friends and see how things progress.
I'd like that... I just don't want to agree to something I'm not certain of...
I understand. It's not the normal relationship and if you're not okay with that then that's completely fine.
I'm going to go say hey to our moms.
You sure you don't want to sit here for a little longer?
I'd love to, but I really should let them know I'm here.
Yeah... okay. I'll be out here.
I'll be back soon.
I'll be out here. I don't want to hear her embarass me.
Haha, fair enough. I'll be back out here shortly.
There's Harp, but she's alone.
She's also drinking wine. Ha... never seen one of my coaches drink any alcohol before... surprisingly.
Harp, how's it going?
Oh, there you are. Shauna told us that you were going to meet Veronica's nephew. How did that go?
He's a sweet kid. It was a good time and I think he had fun.
I've met him once and he seemed like a good kid. That was really nice of you.
Thanks Harp, I plan to meet him again soon. So... you met my mom?
Yep and everything is starting to make sense. She seems like a lovely lady.
She's great. I love her to death.
That's sweet. She seemed to love you just as much. I feel like I know a lot more about you after talking to her.
Ha, what did she tell you?
Just some stories from your childhood. Some of the things you've done for her. She told me about you and Shauna growing up and some of the things you two have been through.
But that leads me to what I need to talk to you about and I'm sorry but I need to get serious for a moment.
I understand Harper. What do we need to talk about?
You know I'm a mom right?
Of course Harp.
Well that comes first, way before my job as your coach.
I have no problem with how you choose your relationships, that is entirely up to you and is your personal business.
As long as you show up to practice and give the team all you can give it. You're free to do whatever in your own time.
But when my daughter is involved that is entirely different. I haven't been the best mom...
I was too strict on her growing up. She didn't have a father for the large portion of her life and I've always felt the need to be that for her.
I didn't let her have a social life and I blame myself for that. She's very inexperienced...
But she seems to be very infatuated with you and I think that's great. I think you're a great guy.
Not just great, you're special and I'd let you date my daughter without a second thought...
If it was just her... I'm not sure how I feel about the whole open relationship thing.
I don't want my daughter to hate me though. I also don't want my protectiveness to hold her back anymore.
So I'm going to leave that up to her.
I need you to promise me that you'll take care of her and honor whatever she decides.
She's such a wonderful girl with such a big heart and I don't want to see her hurt.
I like you [mcf]... I can't thank you enough for what you've done for me and Natalie already.
But if you hurt my daughter then... things will be different.
Just... please promise me [mcf]... You'll take care of my daughter.
Harp, I agree with you. Your daughter is a wonderful girl with a big heart.
I like making her smile and I like that she's opening up to me quickly, it's endearing.
Me and Natalie are just friends... for now.
We actually talked before I came in here... about a few things.
One of those being my current relationship with [g1] and Shauna. I told her that I'm interested in her.
But I'd still be with the other girls, we both agreed we would continue as friends and see where things go.
I love having you and Natalie around and I love how quickly me and you are growing closer.
I also love helping Natalie open up and she's a beautiful girl who I'd be lucky to spend my time with.
I don't want to do anything to jeopardize that. Your daughter is completely safe with me Harp. I promise.
Thank you [mcf]... really.
I knew that's what you would say but it's so nice to hear you actually say it instead of assume you would.
I'm sorry for being the overprotective mom... twice today.
It's fine Harp, you're a great mom. Me and Natalie are going to have our date just as friends.
We have a home theatre in the basement and me and her are just going to watch a movie. You're free to stay and monitor us if it makes you feel more comfortable.
As much as I want to say yes to that... I trust you.
I'm glad to hear that Harp. Is there anything else we need to talk about?
No, I think that's it. For now at least.
It's nothing too serious, I just hate that I feel the need to talk about this.
What's up Harp?
It's just about what I saw in the gym today, or I should say what everyone saw in the gym today.
It's none of my business what your personal relationships are like.
But I just want to make sure your head will stay on basketball. I heard a lot of girls talking today.
You're free to do whatever you want to do in your free time.
As long as you show up to practice and give this team everything you've got...
Harp, of course my head is on basketball.
You have no clue how badly I want to get that first win for WVM. Hopefully in our first game.
You have nothing to worry about, my personal life will not conflict in anyway with basketball. I promise.
Thanks [mcf]. I feel stupid for saying it now but I think I needed to hear you say it.
It's fine Harper I don't mind. If you ever need to ask me something to ease your mind well... ask away.
You're too good of a guy [mcf]... I really trust you.
I'm glad to hear that, I trust you too. Is there anything else we need to talk about?
No, I think that's it. For now at least.
[mcf]! You're home!
Hey mom, how was your day?
Boring... I missed you.
I missed you too. What did you do today?
Straightened up a bit and some other things. Just trying to keep myself busy...
I'm not used to having this much free time. I feel guilty just sitting here all day.
Don't feel guilty, you worked your butt off for so many years to take care of me. This is only the start of paying that back.
I love you... I don't need anything but to be surrounded by my family.
We're not going anywhere... and I love you too mom.
We do need to work on getting you out of the house some though.
I'm fine, you know I've always liked staying at home.
I also know you don't like being alone though. We should find you a friend that you can hang out with while we have to be at school.
We'll worry about that some other time dear... your coach is a very lovely woman.
Yeah, I think so too. She's been really great with me so far.
Good, she said she liked the pool... you should invite her to take a swim. Relax a bit while I cook.
You sure? I can help you cook if you need me too.
No sweety, it's fine. I haven't done much today and don't mind cooking... you relax.
Okay, thank you. If you need anything just let me know.
So, do you want to go for a swim Harp?
Uhh, yeah... I didn't bring a bathing suit though.
We have plenty here that have never been touched.
Okay then, sure. Let's go for a swim. That sounds nice.
Perfect, I'm going to go get changed into one too and I'll meet you and Natalie out there.
Sounds like a plan. I haven't been in a pool for well... way too long. I'm excited.
Haha, well I'm glad. Better get changed quickly then.
A few minutes later
Looks like I'm the first one out here. I'm happy we're going for a swim, I'm a little wound up.
I still have a lot to do today... I should swing by the diner and see all those girls.
I also have the whole thing with Rachael planned. I still have no clue who the second girl is and that's exciting.
Then there's the second threesome with Keyana... She hasn't called or texted me or anything yet though.
Maybe her wife had second thoughts... hopefully not.
I still need to visit Zoe and see what happened between her and Emiko.
Then the arcade with Shauna. I need to go all out and make this a very memorable first date for her.
I also get to have some time alone with [g1]. While I have no issues spending time with both of the girls, I'm happy I have this time to solidify things with them individually.
I know [g1] probably just plans on chilling here... but I want to do something nice with her too. Maybe there's a romantic spot around here.
You a robot?
I've been standing here for a minute waiting for you to move. Everything okay?
Haha, yeah I'm good. Just deep in thought.
Harp really pulls off that bathing suit...
Where's Natalie?
Well there's a slight issue. All of those bathing suits were really revealing.
She's too shy to come out here in it...
I told her I'd come out here and distract you while she snuck in and hid in the water.
But I trust that you understand that and will look away and let her be comfortable.
Of course Harp. Let's go ahead and jump in the pool and I'll look the other way.
Thank you [mcf].
Yesterday Harp was saying she was self conscious about her body... she doesn't seem that way right now.
There's no reason for her to be anyway, she looks great.
I guess she might be having post workout confidence from our jog this morning also.
Perfect, we'll just stay like this until Natalie gets in.
Works for me.
I don't have any issues with this view right here anyway.
So... how's life?
Honestly Harp, a bit crazy these past few days.
I can imagine... are things calming down at least?
I don't know, every day there has been something new. As soon as one thing settles another emerges.
I know the feeling [mcf], you know I'm here for you if you ever need to talk right?
Of course I do Harp. You're my coach but I've never really went swimming with a coach before, so you're more than that.
I've never spent time with one of my players outside of the gym. So I guess we're both in uncharted water.
Ha, say... what made you want to become a coach anyway?
Huh? Oh uh...
There's Natalie... don't look she's about to get in.
That was strange... Seemed like a simple question.
Hmm, that suit does seem revealing. Props to Natalie for coming out in it despite being shy.
What are you two chatting about?
Life... and saying we're here for eachother. That goes for you too Natalie.
Awh, that's sweet. I'm here for you too [mcf].
And of course I'll always be there for my daughter.
Haha, Natalie looks like she doesn't want Harp to act this way when I'm around... but I find it cute.
It just give me a warm feeling... I wish I knew more about their past though.
You girls are cute.
AAAAH!!! Oh my god!
What was that? Is she okay?
That sounded bad...
No, that wasn't a bad scream. She sounded excited. I'm going to go check on her.
How can you tell it wasn't bad? That just sounded like a scream to me.
Ehh, I just know [am] I really should check just in case though. I'll be right back.
We'll be out here...
Woah, Rachael is here earlier than I thought she would be. Well there's mom's friend to hang out with.
I'm happy she's here, I'm sure there's aspects of their friendship that me and the girls aren't able to provide.
What are you doing here Rachael!?
I'm here to take you back obviously!
Aha, I'm going to have to object to that.
What are you gonna do? Stop me?
That's exactly what I'd do.
Haha, I'm just teasing. I couldn't make [am] come with me no matter what I tried anyway.
Did you know she was here [mcf]?
Yeah, we saw each other at a bus station this morning. I told her to come over and see you anytime.
I got here as soon as I could. I was busy with meetings and setting up something.
Why are you in swimming trunks [mcf]?
Well... I was swimming. Would you like to join us?
That sounds like a lovely idea.
You know I really wouldn't mind a swim right now. Sure, got any extra suits?
We should... probably. Not really sure how many there were to start.
Well won't you be a gentleman and show me to them?
I don't think he needs to help you find a bathing suit Rach...
Well I certainly don't know where they are at. I just need the boy to show me where they are. You don't mind do you [mcf]?
No I don't mind, I can show you where we keep them.
Mom really doesn't trust me alone with Rachael, I guess she does have good reason not to.
Perfect, lead the way.
Be back soon mom.
This is a nice place [mcf].
Thank you, all the bathing suits should be in the room behind you.
What's the rush? We have a lot to talk about.
I assume we do, but in the hallway probably isn't the best place to talk.
Then come in the room and talk to me while I change.
Yeah? I guess we could do that.
Ooooh, I expected a bit of fight from you. This is a nice surprise, come on then.
No funny business though. We're saving that for later.
When exactly?
I'll let you know as soon as I do.
Still not going to tell me anything about the other girl?
Nope, you'll like her though. She's a big time client.
Okay, I'm excited... very much so.
Imagine me kid, I've been in meetings all day just thinking about it.
I'm surprised at my self control to not jump your bones now.
Awh, you wore panties today. I was hoping for a repeat of last time.
You think I go commando all the time?
I can dream can't I?
Haha, that was a very rare thing. I knew you were coming and I wanted to impress. Since you remember it I assume I did?
That's a pretty safe assumption.
Hmmm, what about these?
Jesus Rachael, they're exactly as I remembered them. So yeah, very memorable.
Good, good.
They're a little sore today, if only there was a big strong man to help me massage them...
You're going to tease me too?
Hehe, I guess I am.
Okay, you should wait in the hall now, I'm not as groomed as I'd liked to be and don't want you to see that yet.
Ha, fair enough... I'll be in the hall then.
Huh... weren't me and her supposed to talk about something?
We do? Well you should get changed and then we'll talk okay?
Hmmm... sure. Be out in a moment.
Take your time.
I wonder what we need to talk about?
I know I still need to ask her about my biological mom. Probably shouldn't do that when [am] is around though.
I wonder how [g1] and Liz are getting along. I wish Shauna or Stacy could have went with them to help smooth any bumps that may happen.
Looking back on it I should have told them to put it off for a bit and then we would all go once I was done meeting Veronica's nephew.
Maybe I'm just worrying over nothing and they're having a great time...
What do you think?
Oh. Uhm... It's uhh...
It leaves you speechless huh?
You uhh, yep.
Haha, that's cute. So? Where's the pool?
Don't we need to talk first?
Yeah, we should. I was thinking about waiting until after dinner to bring it up... let's talk outside.
I want it to be a surprise, so I don't want [am] to hear somehow.
Sure, we'll take the long way to the pool and just chill halfway and talk about whatever.
So? What is this secretive thing?
You're not going to tell [am] right?
Not unless it's something that can harm her.
Good answer. Uhh... I might be around for a bit.
That's awesome Rachael. What happened?
Those meetings and all that, well they weren't actually meetings. I just purchased a new office space here.
That's great. So you're expanding the business?
Expanding one and closing another. I sold my old company and I'm focusing on my whole fixer business.
You have caused quite the stir. I have a backlog of like 15 women already who are all ready to pay. I even upped the price.
I could make a ton just off of you alone. So being close to you and having a place for you to meet the women sounds like a good plan.
Does that mean my pay changes at all?
Heh, yes it will. You'll be paid as soon as there's confirmation the girls are pregnant.
You should come by and see it today and we can talk about a few more things.
I think I know what she means by that.
Sure Rachael. I'll swing by.
Great! I'll send the address. So... anything happen between you and [am]?
Do you mean that how I think you mean that?
Yes.
Then no, we haven't.
[mcf]... why not?
Because she's my mom. Why do you want us to so badly?
Is it not obvious? That beautiful woman is totally in love with you. No woman talks about anyone the way she talks about you.
What part of that makes you think we should do anything together? She's a great mom and I'm a good son. That's it.
She doesn't have to be your mom anymore. You could make her an actual mom.
Jesus Rachael, there's a thing called boundaries you know?
Come on, I know it's strange but hear me out.
You view her as a soft and innocent woman right?
Yes I do.
You would do anything for her and you want to see her as happy as she possibly could be right?
Of course.
Do you think she's ugly?
I think she's beautiful. That's not the point though.
That's exactly the point. You're not related, you love her and everything she has to offer. So I repeat... why not?
It's not that simple Rachael.
Why isn't it? Here... just close your eyes.
Rach...
Please [mcf]...
Thank you, now don't freak out or flip. Just think about [am]. Not as your mom but as a woman. Imagine her in something sexy crawling towards you.
Just think about all the things she's never done that she'd be willing to do with you.
She's slowly inching towards you...
You can't resist her, the woman who raised you is now just putty in your hand. Your play thing to please.
Imagine pinning her down...
She's not even resisting, she knows she wants it.
She's yours to take. So are you really telling me you aren't interested in that?
Open your eyes.
So? What do you say?
Uhhh....
[mcf]!
Oh thank god... I needed someone to rescue me from this moment.
Over here!
Heh, it's cute she's still trying to hide behind the wall. Not doing the best of jobs though.
I went searching for you. Where did you go?
My mom had a friend show up. She's going to join us and swim a bit.
Hi, it's nice to meet you my name is Rachael.
Oh... it's nice to meet you as well. I'm Natalie.
I'm uhh... going to go back to the pool.
Okay Natalie, we'll be back there in a minute.
I don't think she liked that. Probably just her being shy around new people.
Damn, look at the ass on her. Is that the girlfriend I heard so much about?
No, she's my coach's daughter.
Oooh, better stay away from her.
But there's my girl.
Huh?
Hey babe, I missed you.
I missed you too, where's Elizabeth?
Right behind me, things got a little tense so I'm giving her some space.
Oh no, what happened?
Nothing really. I could just tell she was getting frustrated. I don't think she likes her hair right now.
I tried to tell her it was fine but... you know. We aren't there yet.
I'm proud of you two, that's a great start.
Are you going to introduce me [mcf]?
Rachael this is [g1]... my girlfriend.
It's nice to meet you.
I've heard quite a few stories about you. All of them were good.
Keep being you kid.
Oh... Thank you very much. I will.
I'll get out of your hair. There's a pool calling me.
We're not far behind.
Rachael? That was [am]'s boss right?
Mhmmm, she might be around a bit. She moved to an office here.
That's good for [am] right? She has one of her friends back. I'm happy for her.
I am too, Rachael can be a handful but she means well.
Oh! I just remembered.
So you did get them painted. They look great.
Hehe, thank you baby.
I like it a lot. Way better than the half painted nails I had before.
Ha, I'm sure.
So how did meeting Veronica's nephew go?
Really well. He was a sweet kid and he was going through some things. Made me feel awful.
Like what?
His dad is in jail and he doesn't even know it. Things like that.
That is awful. Did you make him have a good time?
It seemed like it. We didn't get to hang out for long so I told him I'd meet up with him again.
Something about kids, I can't stand seeing them go through something like that.
You're going to make a great father one day [mcf].
Mwah!
How is Shauna?
I haven't seen her. She should be sleeping.
Are you excited for your date with her?
Of course I am, I'm excited for ours too.
Are you going to try anything with her?
Depends, we said we'd take things slowly so I'm going to follow her lead on that. I have something in mind though.
I want to hear all about how it goes.
Whatever you do decide to do, save some energy for me. I have something planned for tonight myself.
Oooh, I can't wait to find out.
Don't worry, you will. Is Natalie here?
Yeah she's in the pool.
I'm going to go say hey to her. Are you coming?
Uhh, in a minute. I'm going to see how Elizabeth is doing. Then I'll be there.
She's acting a little strange right now, just a fair warning. But it's sweet of you to be thinking about her.
Thanks for the heads up, I'm just going to make sure she's doing okay then I'll be back there.
No rush, she might need you. I'm not sure. If you need me at all let me know.
I will babe.
There she is, she definitely seems to be down.
Her hair isn't bad... not how it was but not bad.
Liz? Are you okay?
Huh?
Oh, hey [mcf].
What happened Liz?
I don't think I can do it...
What? Your hair looks nice to me.
No... the hair stinks. But it's just hair. I don't know if I can pull off fixing things with [g1].
I tried I really did. I just felt myself getting angrier and angrier for no reason. I think I ruined it.
She even walked ahead of me, she didn't want to be around me anymore...
Liz, that's not true. I just talked to her.
She said she could tell you were getting irritated so she gave you some space.
It has nothing to do with her not wanting to be around you. She's just trying her best to make it work and she can tell you're trying too.
You've done great today Liz. I'm proud of you.
Really?
Absolutely. I'm so happy to see you two interact. Today was a good step in the right direction. You did good.
Mwah!
Elizabeth, we shouldn't do that.
What? It's just a friendly peck. You've been everything I've needed you to be today. You deserve a little kiss.
Okay... we're all by the pool if you want to join us.
I think I'm going to rest a bit [mcf], on my own...
That's fine, I won't push anything today. Get some rest.
Thanks [mcf], for everything... again.
You've been everything I've needed you to be today [mcf]. Thank you...
It's what family does for family... we're all by the pool if you want to join us.
I think I'm going to rest a bit [mcf], on my own...
That's fine, I won't push anything today. Get some rest.
Thanks [mcf], for everything... again.
Hmmm, Rachael isn't out here? She must've went back inside with [am].
Natalie has that same kind and innocent look with [g1]. They do seem to be growing quickly as friends.
Girls, I am back.
Welcome back. I think you're about to be leaving again though.
Why's that?
There's a picnic table in the back. I was about to go check it out and see if it's good for us all to eat on.
Well then it does look like I'm leaving again. Sorry Natalie.
Ha you're good... the pool is my friend today. Plus I'll be there when the food is ready.
Fair points. Have fun Natalie.
Oh [g1], you should've let me test it first. So I could make sure it was stable before you sat down.
It could have split or cracked and you could've gotten hurt.
Hmmm, are you just trying to protect my butt from damage?
Ha, I mean no... but yes.
I think it's a perfectly fine table... sit with me.
I like looking at you...
Haha, that's random. I like looking at you too though. Those big brown eyes, cute little nose, your perpetual smile, and don't get me started on the freckles.
You always know exactly how to put butterflies in my stomach, time and time again no matter what.
I mean it, I wouldn't mind if life could just be what we are doing right now.
Sitting with the best girlfriend in the world, staring into her eyes. Knowing all of our family and loved ones are nearby.
It is nice. I wouldn't mind it either. In fact I wish that was reality... that we could just sit here forever with a slight breeze on us. It would be heaven.
But about the family and loved ones...
What about it?
Do you think we'll be adding any more girls to that soon?
Uhhh, actually yes. One. I offered Stacy to stay with us indefinitely. I might have pushed her into it a bit.
Are you and Stacy?
No, she just did an insanely nice thing for me and I'm trying to pay her back for it. Plus it's nice having her around.
I can't get over just how thoughtful you are. You always put others above your own needs.
Not always, I try my best though.
Hehe, my hand is so tiny compared to yours...
You don't mind that I asked her? I know I should have made sure it was okay with you and Shauna first, [am] as well but it was very much an in the moment thing.
I understand. I'm happy she'll be here too. I would've liked to have been asked but my answer would have been yes anyway.
I promise I'll ask no matter what in the future.
Thank you baby.
Food is coming!
One chicken salad for the lovely couple.
But that's... that isn't what I asked for, I mean technically it is but...
Haha, oh well, it was still very nice of [am] to cook so much food on such short notice.
Thanks so much for the food mom.
Of course honey, I hope you like it.
Everyone here?
Are you going to wake up Shauna?
No she should get her rest, I'll buy her some food tonight at the arcade or after.
So if everyone is here then... let's eat.
One chicken/salad meal later
Thanks for having us over... I think I'm going to head home now.
You don't have to go just yet.
I know, I've been up for a long time though and we both have to get up early so I would like to rest a bit.
I understand Harp.
Take good care of my daughter [mcf]...
She's completely safe Harp, I'll have her home soon.
There's no rush, have a good time... just not too late.
Yes ma'am. I'll see you bright and early for try outs.
See you then [mcf].
Hey, I'm going to head to my new office myself.
Thanks for coming by, it was a nice surprise for [am].
No problem, you still going to swing by tonight?
Yeah, just message me when there's a good time to come over.
Perfect. I'll do exactly that. See you later.
Bye Rachael.
You ready Natalie? Still down for a movie?
Mhmmm, what movie?
I saw a few cabinets full of movies down there, I'll leave that up to you.
Hmmm, okay. Where's this home theatre?
Follow me.
Dang [mcf], this is nice.
It really is... I didn't even know it was down here until this morning.
If I had this at home I'd probably never leave.
Ha, well you're free to come here anytime and watch as many movies as you want.
You mean that?
As long as you're the same cute, bubbly, and quirky Natalie. Hell yeah.
Oh, one quick compliment and she's right back to her shy self...
Thank you [mcf]...
No problem Natalie... have you decided on a movie?
Yeah I have one in mind. You might like it.
What's it about?
Typical survival movie, it's a girl that was on a crashed helicopter on some island.
Sounds bland I know but I've heard things about it that make me want to watch.
Sounds good to me.
a few minutes later
It's the same woman that was in the movie me and [am] watched the other night.
This seems extremely cheesy though.
I don't know if Natalie is absent mindedly cuddling me or what, but it's nice.
She never really said anything, just slowly drifted into me.
Psst, [mcf].
Oh, what's up mom? Everything good?
Yes honey, I was just checking to see if you two needed anything. Any drinks or blankets or whatever.
Uhh no i think we're good, thanks anyway though mom.
If you change your mind then just yell for me okay?
Will do mom. Thank you.
Hmmm, [am] has never been the kind to interrupt a date so that was strange.
Then again Harp probably just told her to keep an eye on us.
Natalie jumped away from me quick when she realized [am] was in here though.
I'm sorry.
You didn't do anything wrong Natalie. I was enjoying it.
Can I ask you something Natalie?
Sure...
You seem to get a little shy around new people. Yet I don't remember you that shy around me, except for at times.
You're different... my mom talked about you a lot.
I just remember all those days last year where she would come home and just lay in bed.
This same time last year she pretty much cried herself to sleep every night.
Now she's out and about all day, up early with a smile on her face, making breakfast and everything. The difference is insane.
When someone can show up and have that impact on the life of someone you love, you can think the world of that person.
You and your mom seem really close.
She's always had my back, I love my mom.
Heh, this girl trips me up sometimes. One second she has the most distraught look on her face and now she's bright and bubbly again.
Thank you for helping her [mcf].
Of course Natalie. Like I said in the pool, I'm here for you two.
So should we get back to the movie?
Yeah, we're missing quite a bit.
A few minutes later
This movie is wonky. It's got its charm but it's laughable at some parts.
Natalie seems to agree, maybe I'm missing the point of it.
The rest of the movie later
That wasn't a bad movie... what did you think?
Uhh, yeah it had its moments.
So, is there anything else you'd like to do or should I get you home.
I should be heading home, but first...
You've been very open and honest with me... I want to do the same.
I'm still not sure how I feel about being a part of an open relationship, I need to talk to [g1] some more about it.
But I do know that I like you... a lot.
I like you too Natalie.
And I just wanted to thank you with a little...
Mwah!
This girl is beyond cute. This kiss reminds me of mine and [g1]'s first kiss. It's like I'm reliving it.
That wasn't bad was it?
Not in a single way. It was great.
You're a special girl Natalie. I'm happy you're here.
I hope we can do this again soon.
I definitely wouldn't be opposed to it.
Then we'll set something up soon. Should I take you home now?
Yes please.
Okay, let me go say bye to [g1] and then we'll be on our way.
I'll be waiting outside.
Thanks for having us over... I think we're going to head home now.
You two don't have to go just yet.
I know, I've been up for a long time though and we both have to get up early so I would like to rest a bit.
I understand Harp.
Thanks for coming you two.
Thanks for having us.
Have a good rest of your night [mcf]...
Yes ma'am. I'll see you bright and early for try outs.
See you then, bright and early.
Hey, I'm going to head to my new office myself.
Thanks for coming by, it was a nice surprise for [am].
No problem, you still going to swing by tonight?
Yeah, just message me when there's a good time to come over.
Why don't you come by now?
Uhh, I mean I guess I could do that.
I'm going to go tell [g1] bye before I leave. I think she went up to one of the rooms.
Take your time. I'll meet you there.
Dang, is she sleeping? At least I got a good view of her legs before heading out.
I'm tempted to see if she's really asleep but she should get her rest. I want her to be ready for tonight.
Plus I still have everything with Rachael to get 
Babe... are you asleep?
Huh?
Oh hey baby. How'd everything go?
Very well. I was just coming up here to tell you I'm about to head out.
Oh, are you going to the arcade now?
Not yet, there's some things I have to get done first then I am.
Oh... how long will you be out?
Not sure. What I do know is I came up here and got to see that you weren't wearing any underwear under that skirt.
Are you sure about that?
Yeah, I'm pretty sure about it.
Prove it then.
Oooh, you asked for it.
Baby, baby, I was joking!
Haha, it's too late for that now.
Caught with your panties down.
Hehe, you got me.
You're so fucking sexy [g1].
Oh babe...
I can't resist...
No one says you have to...
OHHH! Babe! No teasing today huh? Just straight to it.
Is that an issue?
Not at fucking all.
Take your shirt off.
Yes sir...
Mhmmm, good girl.
Oh fuck...
How does it feel?
Fucking incredible... I don't know what you're doing with that finger... but keep doing it...
Mmmmmmmm....
Faster baby...
Oh... fuck yeah... Mmmmmm...
I'm already getting that feeling...
Don't hold back... Let it all out.
Mmmm keep going like this... mmmmmm... and I will...
Just a little bit more...
I'm about to... fuck baby...
I'm right there... Keep going!
Huh? [mcf]? Why did you stop?
Sorry [g1]. I want you as worked up for tonight as I am.
Baby, come back!
Think about it [g1], we're both worked up to our limit. Tonight is going to be fun.
Mwah!
That's all I wanted. A goodbye kiss.
You're not upset?
Slightly annoyed but I know what you're doing and I... like it.
What do you mean?
I like doing what you say... At least when we're fooling around that is.
Oh really? You know what you should do then?
What do you have in mind?
Nothing much, I just want a good view of your ass before I leave. Something to think about while I'm out.
Anything for you.
It will be here anxiously waiting for tonight.
I fucking love you babe.
I love you too baby, have a good time out
You ready to go?
Define ready? But yes I am. Are we walking?
No, we'll take my car. Let me get it real quick. Just stay here and I'll pull up.
Get in loser we're going shopping.
Haha, is this really your car?
Huh, Harper must not have told her about it.
Technically not mine but I get to drive it so it's just as good.
Hop on in.
This isn't dangerous is it?
What? No, we're going to be going the speed limit. Just buckle up and I'll be sure to drive safe.
Okay...
10 minutes later
This was fun...
See it wasn't a scary drive.
Not just that... for everything today. It was fun.
I agree Natalie. Are you going to be at the tryouts in the morning?
I wasn't planning on it but yeah... I think I will go. I'd like to see you then.
You'd definitely make getting up that early not as bad.
Hehe, I'll see you in the morning then [mcf]. Have a safe drive home.
See you Natalie. Have a good night.
Guess now is a good a time as any to head by the diner.
A few minutes later
Guess now is a good a time as any to head by the diner.
A few minutes later
Huh, why is this place empty?
Are they closed?
Certainly looks that way.
Why wasn't the door locked then?
Guess I can lock it for them and head out.
[mcf]! Wait!
Oh, I'm glad to see you Bailey.
What's going on? Is this place closed?
Yes, they close early on Tuesdays.
What are you still doing here?
I live upstairs and I convinced them to let me lock up.
I was waiting for you to come.
Oh god I'm sorry for making you wait Bailey. I didn't realize they closed early.
It's my fault. I forgot to mention it.
Everything happened so fast earlier. My brain has been scrambled since.
What's gotten it so scrambled?
What we did earlier, in that office. It didn't feel real.
It came out of nowhere, I've liked you since I met you on your basement stairs. Which for some reason feels like forever ago.
Is everything you said true?
Yes it is Bailey, I meant it all.
I liked you at first too but I didn't know what to make of you.
Since then you've shown me your kind and caring side.
I like your personality, your style, the way you carry yourself and the fact that you are loyal to those that care about you.
I think you're as cute as could be.
Mwah!
Sit with me for a moment?
Absolutely.
So how exactly will this work? With the other girls I mean.
We'll do our own thing. It'll be just like a normal relationship except you will have to accept the other girls in my life.
Can I tell people about us? I mean I told Rainn but I trust her.
That's up to you. I don't mind at all.
Really? Like, can I talk to you or even kiss you if [g1] or Shauna is around?
That one is iffy. I'm not sure about the kissing but you can absolutely talk to me whenever.
What about in private?
We can do whatever we want in private.
Oh yeah?
So you wouldn't mind me sitting in your lap then would you?
I'm offended it took you this long to do it actually.
Haha shut up... so [mcf].
I'm sorry about earlier in the office. I was a mixed bag of emotions between shocked, shy, and horny.
That's quite the trifecta. How do you feel now?
About the same...
We could go up to your room and fix a few of those emotions you know...
I can't [mcf]... it's a long story. We can't go to my room.
That's fine Bailey. We don't have to do anything. I'm happy with where we are now.
No, no. I want to. It's about Rainn, we had a whole no boys thing. I don't want to hurt her feelings by bringing a guy home.
I don't want to hurt Rainn's feelings either. Here is too in the open, is there anywhere we could?
Oh my god, I'm an idiot. I have an idea.
Follow me.
Are we going to the kitchen?
Yep. We'll be away from all the food and utensils don't worry.
Stay right here. I'll get a little corner set up for us and I'll tell you when to come in okay?
I'll be right here.
Public kitchen sex, that's something new for me...
As long as we're away from everything and clean up after then it really isn't a big deal.
I wonder if Zoe and Emiko live upstairs also.
[mcf]!
Am I good to come in?
Yes!
Damn Bailey... You're so fucking sexy.
I don't have the curves [g1] and Shauna have though...
You don't need those, you're sexy in a whole different way.
Oh, [mcf].
I love this cute petite body of yours.
You really mean that? You're not just saying it?
I mean it Bailey, sit down. Let me show you I mean it.
Getting shy Bailey?
No... A little bit...
It's okay, take your time. Get comfortable.
I'm fine, I just haven't really showed many people my pussy...
I don't know if it's any good...
I'll be happy to be the judge of that.
Hmmm... Okay...
Bailey, it fits you perfectly. You have a sexy innie.
You like it?
I love it. Can I?
Wait, let me slide out a bit.
Okay, I'm ready.
I can't believe this girl is worried about her body. There's something about it that is driving me crazy.
I want to feel inside of her.
Jesus, she's even tighter than [g1] was.
Ohhh, [mcf]... That's... nice.
It doesn't hurt?
No, it feels great.
Hmmm, it doesn't feel that way for me but maybe I'm wrong. I'm worried to risk it though. I should switch it up.
External stimulation is the way to go... for now.
Ohhhhh....
What are you doing? That felt amazing.
Yeah? What about this?
A lick and a rub... see how she reacts to that.
*Muffled moans*
Haha, I didn't expect Bailey to be this... innocent?
It's making her even cuter.
[mcf]... wait. Stand up.
What for?
Please?
It's your turn.
I was just getting started on you. Did you not like it?
It felt amazing [mcf]. I just really want to do this.
Well if that's the case, I won't argue.
Can you back up a little bit so I can get on my knees?
Sure Bailey.
It's so big [mcf]...
I don't know how much I can do to it.
Just do your best. I promise you'll do an amazing job.
Okay, just tell me if I mess up.
Ohhh shit...
Damn Bailey, using both hands and sucking on the very tip. Definitely not that innocent.
Do exactly what you're doing now Bailey but stroke me while you do it.
Mhmmm.. like... this?
Oh shit, yeah... exactly like that.
I was expecting way less from her after how this started but damn.
You're doing fucking great Bailey.
Mmmmm...
Usually I prefer a little faster but I want you to keep going exactly as you are.
I won't last much longer if you keep it up...
Where do you want me to cum Bailey?
Mmmmm-mou...th...
Mmm, good answer. I want to finish with her doing this.
Just a little bit more Bailey, I'm close. 
Holy fuck!
That had to have been a lot and she didn't even flinch...
Did you swallow all of that Bailey?
Mhmmm.
I have no words... That was great.
Go ahead and sit back down and we'll finish what we started before this.
It's okay [mcf], I just wanted for you to finish and have a good time.
You've made me incredibly happy today. I just wanted to thank you.
That's definitely the best 'thank you' I've ever received.
I wouldn't mind getting you off too. Watching you try to muffle your moans was hot Bailey.
Well that's another reason... I was muffling them because I'm scared someone might hear us and find us.
I know this was my idea but I just don't want to risk it and try to do too much.
I understand what you mean. It's not the best look to be found fooling around in a kitchen.
Next time I have you alone though we're going to finish this.
We should be alone again soon then.
Agreed... so should we get dressed?
Yeah we should. You should also walk out first just in case someone is out there... we might not look too suspicious that way.
Smart, I doubt anyone is out there but now is absolutely a good time to play it safe.
A few minutes later
Nope, no one... I need to talk to Bailey about just coming to my house.
[g1] probably wouldn't mind. I don't really know what the rules are for bringing girls home.
I should have Bailey talk to [g1]. [g1] has been pushing me towards Natalie and I'd have to think she might try the same for other girls.
Despite her constant affirmation that this is what she wants... I still can't help but feel like I have to triple check everything.
Hi...
Hi. Everything good?
Yeah, everything is great. Do you want to sit down for a minute?
Sure... I can't stay for very long though.
What? Got some other girlfriends you have to go see?
If you count visiting my mom's boss then yes.
Hehe, I get it. I just wish we had a room to go to right now.
I have an idea for that.
I'm going to talk to [g1] about you coming over one day.
I would love to... I doubt she'd be okay with us going off on our own for a bit though.
I don't know Bailey... I think she'll be fine with it.
I'll let you know how that talk goes tomorrow. Hopefully then we'll have a nice bed to do whatever we want in.
I hope she says yes [mcf]... if she's not okay with me being there we could always rent a room somewhere.
True, I don't think we'll have to though.
I wonder what that story with Rainn is... why is it such a big deal for her to have someone over?
I don't want to ruin the mood by bringing it up now.
I'm just so happy you came. I was about to go upstairs.
I'm happy you waited. This was really nice.
Yes it was.
Are you about to leave?
Not before I get another kiss...
Hmmm... so if I don't kiss you then you'll stay?
Bailey...
Mwah!
I'll see you tomorrow.
Yes you will. I'll be at practice earlier than usual tomorrow.
Tryouts right?
Yep, Coach needs my help so I'll be there at like 5am. If you're up you should come hang out.
I don't know about that early, but I'll come as soon as I'm up.
Sounds perfect. I'll see you soon Bailey.
See you [mcf]. I'll miss you.
One trip to Rachael's office later
Damn, this place is empty. Rachael's old business had a bunch of flare when you walked in.
I wonder what this place will look like in a few months.
Rachael? You here?
Yeah! I'm back here!
Hey, what's up?
Just getting things ready for tonight.
I'm kind of throwing all of my eggs in this basket. Figure I should just go ahead and sleep here as well.
You're going to sleep here tonight?
Yeah, is there a problem with that?
No, I don't know. I just assumed you'd be staying with us until you got everything going.
Is that an offer?
If you want it to be. I feel bad having to leave [am] home alone all day and it would be nice to have you around to keep her company.
Thank you for the offer. I'll think about it... but we actually need to talk about your living situation.
But first... are you ready to meet the mystery lady?
Of course I am. Is she here?
Not yet but she will be very soon.
You haven't had any surprise threesomes since we've last talked about it have you?
I can't say I have.
Good, let's sit and wait on her then.
So... how did you get into this business anyway?
What? Being a fixer?
Run a successful business for a decade and you'll meet a ton of powerful people.
They all eventually need favors or information. Turns out I enjoy setting all of those things up.
I feel like there could be a ton of problems there... a lot of shady people asking for things.
That's why I only work with those I trust... Sure I can get burned at times but that's why contracts exist.
I don't remember signing any contract.
You will be from here on out. Anna and Keyana were both tests.
I wanted to see how reliable you were. To see if you would disclose any information.
They both knew that risk. They both were heavily discounted for it also.
Oh, damn... I guess I should have realized that.
You're still new to it all... You're learning quickly and you didn't fuck up.
Ha, thanks.
We do need to talk about Keyana though. There were some issues.
Oh? What happened?
Everything we just talked about... the contracts.
Well I did make the girls sign them... but I was told Keyana was the one that wanted your services.
I knew her wife would know so she had to sign a contract as well but it wasn't the one that protects you from her coming after you in the future for child support and all that.
I called Keyana this morning and she told me their plan and I had to shut it down.
Don't worry though, they're coming back to sign new ones.
I don't think she was trying to pull anything on us. I mean why would she tell me about it if she was?
But they're both pissed... but it's business before friends.
Just in the future... if I don't tell you about them, you don't do anything with them. Understood?
Understood Rachael.
That sucks...
It's nice to know Rachael will do what it takes to protect me though.
Now that all that is out of the way... we can relax.
Long day?
Very long day... mainly because I've been looking forward to this.
Hmmm... you know we don't have to wait on her to get started?
[mcf]!
You're an impatient boy...
It's hard to be patient after seeing these splayed out.
You could at least kiss me before playing with my tits.
I wouldn't mind that... didn't know if you would though.
Well I don't. In fact a kiss might just be what it takes to get my top off.
Mwah!
Ha, woman of her word...
I thought that would do it. Good boy.
I would've done a whole lot more than that...
I would do a whole lot just to see this cock again.
I've thought about that little stunt you pulled with making me close my eyes every night since we've had sex.
Then you ramming that huge cock in me...
These pants have to go.
Mhmmm... everything feels better now. The world is how it should be.
We should wait until she shows to really start... but I like where your cock is right now.
I've never had a dick between my tits before but that's because I didn't want to embarrass anyone.
I don't think that's an issue for you...
Even still, your cock may be huge but so are my breasts...
Seems like a perfect match to me.
It certainly feels like it... How does it feel to you?
It feels like I want you to keep going.
Mmmmm... I can do that.
Couldn't wait on me?
Oh shit...
That's the actress from the movies I watched with [am] and Natalie
That's the actress from the movie I watched with [am].
There he is. The future dad of my baby.
Fuck, I don't know her name.
Uhh, sorry. We were waiting on you before we got to the actual fun.
It's nice to meet you. You're an actress right?
'An actress'? Yeah, you could say that considering I'm the best paid actress on the planet.
You seriously don't know me? I'm a household name.
I'm sorry I don't watch many movies or keep up with them.
My name is Eden. Me and you have a lot to talk about.
Nice surprise huh? You're being paid to fuck a celebrity. That's got to stroke your ego a bit?
Speaking of stroking, I don't see much action happening.
Well now that you're here we can do something more inclusive.
I got to say I wasn't looking forward to the small talk before everything.
So I'm happy everything's already going.
He made the first move and I couldn't resist.
Can't say I blame you. He's quite a man.
Yes, yes he is...
Oh wow... I didn't realize how big he was. Your massive tits hid him well.
You ever have two girl's mouths on your dick before [mcf]?
Oh, what am I asking? Look at you... of course you have.
Actually he says he hasn't. I don't know if I believe him though...
Hmmm, well let's show him what it's like.
She's not wasting any time. How does her mouth feel [mcf]?
Feels great... would feel better with you on the other side though.
Don't mind if I do.
That feels amazing girls.
I have a two very successful women on their knees for me right now... and I'm being paid to be here.
Life is good.
Fuck girls... your mouths are great...
Something about two women with their mouths on your cock... there's nothing to complain about.
Mmmmm...
I could let this go on all day... but I want to do more with them.
Okay girls, let's do something else.
Phew, I have on way too many clothes for this.
I think both of you girls do.
You have such nice tits Eden.
My tits? Look at yours...
They're so big and soft... you should be the one getting pregnant.
I'd love to see these puppies full of milk.
Woah, let's not get ahead of ourselves. We're here to get you pregnant not me.
And I think we both have on some clothes that prevent that from happening.
Let's take them off then, I wonder which pussy he would prefer... mine or yours.
Only one way to find out. Let's get these clothes off.
Yep, I'm definitely a very lucky man.
So? Which one [mcf]?
You're not hurting any feelings. Tell us the truth.
They're both great but I'd have to pick Rachael.
The little tuft of hair and her thick thighs... no beating them.
Good choice kid.
Hmmm, we'll see if he feels the same way after he's fucked us both.
They're both great but I'd have to pick Eden.
I like innies and her darker skin... but they're both great.
Good choice.
There's tens of thousands of guys that would kill for that pussy so I'm not mad at that.
We'll see if he still feels the same way after he's fucked us both.
Okay, enough talking. Time for action. How do you want us [mcf]?
Are you one of those guys who only wants us to play with him? Or can we play with each other too?
I want you two to lay on top of each other. Pussies stacked so I can fuck you both at the same time.
Oooh, greedy... What do you say Rachael?
Let's give the boy a good time.
Hmmm, I want Rachael on her back and I want you to sit on her face.
Oooh, what do you say Rachael?
Sounds like I'll be fulfilling both of your dreams at once.
Lay down Rachael.
I wonder if she feels as good as I remember.
Stick that cock in me [mcf]. I've wanted it all day long.
Oooh fuck yes...
That's so fucking hot.
How's her tongue Eden?
Fucking amazing, feels even better when she moans. So get to work.
I want to feel her breasts smack against my thighs... fuck her good [mcf].
Give her every inch.
MMMGHMMM....
Oh fuck yes! Make her moan into my pussy!
Make those big juicy tits bounce up and down.
Oh... shit...
MMMMMMMmmmm...
This is so fucking hot!
I want to play with the both of you every day for the rest of eternity.
How does she feel?
Fucking great.
Mmmm... I wonder how she tastes.
Suck my cock and find out.
Mmmm... naughty boy.
Don't mind if I do.
Holy shit...
How does she taste?
Mmmm... perfect.
Turn around Eden and lay on Rachael's stomach. I want to fuck you both at the same time.
Mmmmmm...
Hehe, how does his cock feel Rachael?
You're about to find out.
First you'll think 'Holy shit there's no way it's going to fit'.
Then you'll feel it stretch you apart... it feels amazing.
You'll reach a point where you don't think he'll go any deeper... then...
Boom!
Holy shit!!!
Holy shit is right...
Haha, how does it feel?
So fucking.... agh....
Hold it, that tingly feeling goes away... until he starts going again anyway.
Fuck us [mcf].
Holy shit! He's so fucking big!
It doesn't get easier... every thrust will send that shock through you.
You girls feel fucking amazing.
You like fucking our tight pussies? Mmmm...
Holy shit...
I'm getting close girls...
Don't forget to finish in Eden... Give her all of it.
Fill me up [mcf]!
FUCK!!! HNNGGHH!! FUCK ME!
Ohhh fuck yes... fuck her real good [mcf]...
Aghhh, holy fuck!
Can you feel it? Did he fill you up?
His cock is spasming inside of me... I think he did.
Mmmm... good.
I can feel it leaking out of me.
I feel it running down me too.
Shit Rachael, why were you hiding this guy from me?
I'm not hiding anyone, he's still new to this.
So now that he's finished...
What did you need to talk to him about?
Oh, that's right.
First, thank you for this [mcf]. That was great.
Yeah, it was.
Going back to only one girl will be tough.
I have something to ask you [mcf].
Ask away.
We're both famous right?
Well I mean... you are.
You are too. Like it or not.
Anyway, what if we did something crazy? Get both of our names talked about in every home in the world.
What do you have in mind?
A sex tape. Just me and you... you'll record it and it will 'leak'.
Eden... that's a pretty big deal. That will be out there forever.
Good, come on. I'm hot but I'm not getting any hotter. I have a movie coming out soon and this would be the icing on the cake.
Every guy would wish they were you. Every girl would wish they were me. Both of our names would be on every headline for weeks.
Of course we'd end it with you finishing in me again. It's a win-win for us both.
What do you think Rachael?
It's your life, if you want to do it then do it.
Just remember everybody will see it. Including everyone you don't want to see it.
[am] especially. That girlfriend of yours too.
Although I heard she might be more open to something like that. It's a lot to consider.
What do you say [mcf]?
Fuck it, let's do it.
My face can't be in the video though. We can hint that it's me in the video but no confirmation.
Deal!
Thank you [mcf]. We'll set a date real soon okay?
Sounds good Eden.
Today has been fucking awesome. I'm going to go get cleaned up.
Don't go anywhere.
Everyone is already talking about my relationship. Why not give them a sex tape to talk about as well?
I'm sorry Eden but I don't really want a sex tape attached to my name.
Oh... that's dissapointing...
Well... I guess I'm going to go clean myself up.
I feel kind of bad turning her down but that's too far for me.
That sounds weird coming from the guy impregnating strangers but I wouldn't do this if it were public.
That was fun...
Yes it was.
We still have some things to talk about... want to get dressed?
Yeah, we should.
Threesomes are great.
I still have my dates with [g1] and Shauna. Tonight should be fun as well.
Okay, now that we're decent. I want to talk to you about something.
And I'm just going to be blunt in saying it.
So... you have a big problem coming up and you're playing right into it.
Ha, what a completely vague and worrying thing to say.
I'm being serious. I know about the two houses and the nice car.
I know, they're awesome right?
But those things make you dependant on that Charles guy. I heard most of your conversation with him in the bus station.
He's a time bomb. He'll be on your side until the second he thinks he can get more from someone else.
And if that never happens then he will end up having a power trip and be nothing but a headache for you.
I've had to deal with men like him all of my life, they're no good.
I've spent the last few days combing every available property around here to find this office.
I can have you in a new home by tomorrow. Just say the word.
Hmmmm... she makes some great points. Charles has given me no reason to trust him. Not to mention his nephew knows where I live.
Hell, he might even have a key to the house...
So instead of being dependant on Charles... I'd be dependant on you?
You're learning... good.
Nothing in life is free. You'd have to continue working for me.
But now that the word is out about you... there's a ton of women wanting to sign up.
Supply and demand... prices are going up so I can take care of the house.
I have so many women in line for you.
Rachael... if I continue doing this I'm going to have to tell my girlfriend about it.
Oooh, if you do that then she's going to have to sign a contract as well.
You really shouldn't tell her about the ones you've already done. She might flip and blow the lid on this thing.
Just tell her it's a new offer. I'm coming over later and we can both discuss it with her.
Yeah? That works with me.
Perfect. Then we're all straight.
What about it?
Let me sit down first. It's been a long day.
So... you have a big problem coming up and you're playing right into it.
Ha, what a completely vague and worrying thing to say.
I'm being serious. I know about the two houses and the nice car.
I know, they're awesome right?
But those things make you dependant on that Charles guy. I heard most of your conversation with him in the bus station.
He's a time bomb. He'll be on your side until the second he thinks he can get more from someone else.
And if that never happens then he will end up having a power trip and be nothing but a headache for you.
I've had to deal with men like him all of my life, they're no good.
I've spent the last few days combing every available property around here to find this office.
I can have you in a new home by tomorrow. Just say the word.
Hmmmm... she makes some great points. Charles has given me no reason to trust him. Not to mention his nephew knows where I live.
Hell, he might even have a key to the house...
So instead of being dependant on Charles... I'd be dependant on you?
You're learning... good.
There's no such thing as free. You would have to work for me.
Do you mean the whole pregnancy thing?
Not exactly... although that would be ideal.
There are other things you could do for me. None of them come near the money we could make doing the original plan though.
Speaking of, I spread it around that a very high profile athlete might be interested in something like that.
My phones been going off with the amount of women inquiring about it.
[am] also told me about your girlfriend's new deal. So there's nothing holding you back.
There's a big difference between seeing other girls and impregnating strangers.
The only difference is your mindset.
[g1] might feel differently about that.
Well then, don't say no now. Go home and have a talk with her... be honest about it and if she has any questions I'll be there later tonight and she can ask me.
Okay... I can do that at least.
Great, I'm happy to hear that. So are we in agreement about getting you into a new house where no one has leverage on you?
You mean no one besides you?
I'm no threat to you. I see how valuable you are and you're also the son of the woman I'd kill for.
Hold on, let's say [g1] isn't okay with it or I decide I'm not okay with it. What would the other job be?
Ooooh. That's not as glamorous. It would start with you helping move a lot of furniture into this place.
After that would just be whatever I needed help with. I might need you as security one day or you might could help with the business.
I can't give exacts just yet. But we'll figure something out. What do you say?
I don't really have a choice. I don't want to rely on Charles.
Deal.
Perfect. Then we're all straight.
So... I actually think that's it.
Actually Rachael... what about my mom?
Oh my god I almost forgot.
I left your mom many messages before she got back in touch with me.
When I told her you were trying to find her she got very emotional...
She told me she would have to call me back and that's where we are now.
Thank you Rachael.
I'm sorry I don't have much more yet but I'll let you know as soon as I find out anything else.
You haven't heard anything about siblings have you?
What? Siblings? No, I haven't. Why?
Nothing, just a weird dream I had.
Hmmm, maybe I don't have a sister after all.
If you say so...
Yeah I suppose so.
Thanks for coming today [mcf]. I'll see you later tonight.
See you Rachael.
I should call [g1] really quick and see if she can wake up Shauna for me so she can get ready.
Oh, I have a message from Bailey.
I'm sorry! I forgot to tell you where Emiko and Zoe live. They actually live at the dorms. I don't know why I didn't just say that earlier. lol
Hmm, the dorms. I can swing by there before I pick up Shauna. That way she has plenty of time to get ready.
Time to call [g1].
Hey baby, how's everything going?
Very well... could you do me a favor?
Sure... anything.
Would you mind waking up Shauna for me and telling her to go ahead and get ready for our date?
She's actually already getting ready.
Oh perfect. Uhh, is Stacy there yet?
I don't think so... should she be?
Yeah she should. Huh, I wonder where she is.
You don't think anything bad happened to her do you?
No babe, she said she had to move all of her stuff. She's probably still at her motel.
Can you go by and check on her please?
I was thinking the same thing. I'll head by there before I pick up Shauna.
Text me and tell me if you find her okay?
I will... I love you and I'll see you soon.
I love you too.
Hmm, I think I know where the motel is. I think I've driven by it a couple of times.
A few minutes later
This place looks deserted. Maybe this isn't the motel.
Is there an office for me to check?
Yes there is... and that looks like Jasmine in there.
[mcf]??? What are you doing here?
I could ask you the same thing.
Kimmy works here. I've been hanging out with her.
Fuck Kimmy is here, I'd rather avoid her right now.
So what about you?
Uhh, have you seen Stacy?
She's the redhead with freckles right?
Yeah that's her.
Uhhh... last I saw her she was talking to Ryker.
Ryker? As in my teammate?
Yeah. But last I heard you knocked him out.
Wait... Ryker is Charles' nephew? Fuck...
Fuck, fuck, fuck.
Jasmine what room is Stacy in?
If that fucker touched her...
Third door on the left, first floor.
What's wrong [mcf]?
If he laid a finger on her I'll fucking kill him...
Her lights aren't on... that can't be good.
KNOCK, KNOCK
STACY! Open the door!
...
STACY!!!
...
Ryker she better be okay...
STACY!!!!! Open the door!!!
Lightswitch flickers
Huh? I just heard someone inside.
Stacy!
I'm sorry [mcf]! I didn't mean to fall asleep.
Oh my god... Stacy.
Fuck me, I have to calm down. I probably scared Stacy to death.
I was ready to kill someone...
I'm sorry for scaring you... Jasmine told me Ryker was with you. I didn't know if he would try something.
I don't trust that creep.
Oh, she's hugging me tighter.
He was here... but Kimmy made him leave.
I need to thank Kimmy then. Do you have all your stuff ready to go?
I just need to pack a few last minute things.
You do that then I'll take you home okay?
What the hell is going on out here!?
Oh, Kimmy. I'm sorry for the noise.
I'm sorry [mcf]... I didn't know Kimmy made him leave already.
It's okay Jasmine. I heard Ryker was here and I was worried if Stacy was safe or not.
Well she is because I kicked that creep out of here. Kind of like how I'm doing with you now.
I'll leave very soon Kimmy. I'm just waiting on Stacy to get her final things.
Thank you for helping her... I owe you.
You can pay me back by leaving.
I don't think she likes you very much.
Ha, I wonder what makes you think that? She didn't happen to tell you why she hates me did she?
Kind of... it didn't make a ton of sense to me though.
Can you tell me?
Yeah, can I sit down first?
Sure.
Okay, first things first. Kimmy mentioned she had to run your social media...
I decided I'd help her out by taking care of that so here you go.
I need a new phone just for social media?
Yes... it also has the contacts of everyone important at WVM.
There's quite a few posts for you already... we ran a little ticket giveaway where fans had to post some selfies.
You don't have to check it out now... just sometime tonight okay?
Sure Jasmine...
Why did Kimmy have to run my social media in the first place?
Do you know what Kimmy was before you came here?
No, I don't.
She was you... the star on the campus.
Except she was the star for swimming. She got the house, the car, all that stuff.
Now that you're here she's had to move into the dorms and give her car back... to pay for everything now she's had to pick up some jobs.
One here and two for you.
Two?
She's also your maid.
Fuck, she doesn't have to do that.
I didn't know any of that Jasmine, no wonder she hates me.
I get her being upset but she can't blame you.
I understand it. I'd be upset at the person that made my life harder too.
You're a good guy [mcf]... but you can't always worry about how other people feel.
You didn't choose for those things to be taken from her... it's not your fault.
She'll realize that soon. Just give her some time.
Thanks Jasmine.
So how is everything with Damien?
The same... we're meant to talk tonight though.
About what?
Us I guess. He just told me to make some time to talk to him tonight.
Well I hope it goes well.
I do too, it wouldn't be happening if it wasn't for you either.
I didn't do much Jasmine.
Keep telling yourself that.
I should be getting back to Kimmy, she'll be mad that I've been talking to you for this long.
Ha, she probably will be. I'll see you in the morning Jasmine.
I'll see you then [mcf].
It's nice to hear some good news about them for once...
I want Damien and me to be buds. I can't do that if he mistreats my friends though.
I hope he's at tryouts as early as I'll be...
[mcf]?
Oh Stacy. Is that all you're bringing?
Yep this is it.
Do you want me to carry it for you?
I can get it, it's not very heavy...
I really don't mind Stacy.
Ha, be my guest then.
Hey, I really am sorry for freaking out earlier.
It's fine. I'm happy you care enough about me to freak out.
I do... I also should have mentioned that you don't have to live with us if you don't want to. That was a big ask and I sort of forced it on you.
It was a big ask but I'm happy you forced it. I probably would have said no just because.
But you're right. Even though I would never move in with someone I just met... I want to be there.
so even if it's strange... it's what I want so who cares?
I'm glad you feel that way because I definitely want you there... ready to head home then?
I absolutely am.
There is one stop I have to make but it will be quick.
I just want to check in on Emiko and Zoe.
Sure, I don't mind.
Perfect.
A few minutes later
I'll be right back... I'm going to lock the doors just in case.
I'll be fine [mcf]... go check on your friends.
If you feel uncomfortable at all then just call me and I'll come back okay?
Okay, I'll be here.
Knock, knock
Zoe? You're back already?
That was quick...
Get inside before someone sees-
Oh my god! [mcf]! Look away!
What happened to your nose Emiko?
Leave please!
Emiko...
Talk to me... what happened?
...
Did Willow do this?
...
It's okay... you can talk to me.
What happened?
.... You know when you said you would protect me from the mean girls?
Well... when Willow said those things about [g1]. I got angry... I went to talk to Willow about it after class.
She started calling me names too and I got mad and pushed her.
That's when she punched me...
I'm so sorry [mcf].
Emiko... you didn't have to do that.
I just wanted to return the favor. Be the friend to you that you would be for me.
I'm so sorry. I didn't mean to get everyone in trouble...
Thank you Emiko.
Why are you thanking me?
Poor girl has bloodshot eyes. I feel awful for her.
Thank you for standing up for [g1] and me. I never want you to do it again... but it really means a lot.
You mean it? But I got everyone in trouble.
You didn't mean to... I'm thankful to have you as a friend Emiko.
Does it hurt?
A little bit... does it look bad?
I could barely notice it until you tried to cover it up.
Will you be in class tomorrow?
I don't know...
I hope you are... you're not afraid of people seeing the bruise are you?
The only person I was afraid of seeing it was you.
Well then there's nothing to worry about because I think you look as cute as ever.
Woah, hey there [mcf].
Oh, hey Zoe.
Having fun?
Sorry, I just came by to check on you two after I heard what happened with Willow.
That's sweet of you.
If I knew you were coming I would have gotten you something to eat too.
I'm good, I've already ate but thank you.
I uhh... I heard you're the one that jumped in and helped Emiko with Willow... I'm glad you were there.
Yeah, me too. Don't get mushy with me. I'm meant to be mad at you.
I missed a day of school, someone has to take the blame and it's not going to be the girl with a bruise on her face.
Fair enough, I'll take the blame.
You can make it up to me though. I'm throwing a party here tomorrow night and it would be awesome if you could come by.
It's nothing big, just a few girls from school.
Uhm sure, can I bring some girls?
Anyone you want. And hey...
Maybe during that party we could sneak off and you could thank me properly.
I'll be at the party Zoe... we'll see about anything else.
Ehh, I like my odds. Are you going to stay for a while?
No, I'll let you two eat. I have Stacy in my car outside.
That's the redhead right?
That's her.
Lucky girl.
Well since you're leaving...
I'll see you bright and early tomorrow morning.
You'll be at tryouts?
Of course. Head cheerleader and all.
Ahem...
I'll be at tryouts too.
Are you sure? If you're in pain you should rest.
I'm sure... I promise I'll take it easy. I want to be there.
Well I won't argue with that then, I'm happy you're going to be there.
Thanks for coming...
Of course Emiko. I'll see you in the morning.
I'll see you then [mcf].
A few moments later
How were they?
They're okay. We got invited to a party tomorrow night. Want to go?
I've never been to one. Are you going?
Yeah I told her I would.
Then sure, I'll go...
Perfect. You ready to go home now?
Yes I am.
Me and Shauna have a date planned so I'm going to drop you off but I'll be back in no time.
It's no rush. I hope you have a good date.
Thanks Stacy.
Me and Shauna do have a date planned though so I'm going to drop you off but I'll be back in no time.
It's no rush. I hope you have a good date.
Thanks Stacy.
A few minutes later
See you soon [mcf]! Thank you!
See you Stacy!
Shauna in a dress? She still has on sneakers though. I hope she never changes.
Hey.
Hi. You look amazing in that dress Shauna.
Hehe, [g1] picked it out for me. I couldn't do the heels.
I don't think I want to see you in heels, that's not the girl you are.
What do you mean?
I've never seen you wear anything like that. It's not your personality.
But if you did want to wear them, I'd have no problem with it.
Isn't it bad that I'm not that girly?
Not at all, you're you. I don't want you to force anything. I love you how you are.
Mwah!
I love you the way you are too.
Isn't it bad I'm not that manly?
What? How are you not manly?
Ha, people can say I'm too emotional?
How are emotions not manly?
Hiding your emotions out of fear of appearing girly is the least manly thing I can think of. Be you.
Plus if anyone tries to say otherwise just pull down your pants and show them your giant cock.
Haha, bold words Shauna.
Am I wrong?
I suppose not. Just not used to you talking like that.
Anyway, are you ready to go?
Absolutely.
Buckle up please.
A few minutes later
Oh thank god there isn't a bunch of kids in here. In fact I don't think anyone else is here at all.
Oh no...
What's wrong?
I thought this was the kind of arcade where you get tickets and prizes... it's just games.
That's okay, we both like games.
But... what about the prize at the end?
It's okay Shauna. You're wanting to recreate that night at the fair huh?
Kinda...
It was the night where I realized how I truly felt about you. I still have that dinosaur because it reminds me of you.
I just want to relive that night.
I get that Shauna and we will absolutely do it again sometime. But let's make some new memories.
We used to come to these kinds of arcades all the time. Know what never happened in them?
What?
We were never alone in one, and we weren't a couple then.
I remember us playing tag all the time in these. It used to be your favorite thing to do.
Anytime I thought you were getting bored I would tap you and yell tag. It would always make you have a huge smile on your face... before you would bolt at me.
Haha, I remember that. We got kicked out of that one arcade because we bumped into that lady and knocked her drink down.
You used to always start it, but hey... let's make new memories.
Tag! You're it!
Haha, better run!
Good thing she's not wearing heels.
I'm going to get you!
Which way are you going to go?
That's the oldest trick in the book Shauna! The simple answer is to go over!
Ahhh!
Haha! What are you doing Shauna?
I could easily tag her right now... but this is fun to watch.
What are you going to do now!?
Nice try, you do realize I play basketball though, right? I can just jump up there myself.
Oh... right.... Haha
Do it then.
If you insist.
Hi.
Hi.
We're going to get kicked out of here.
Haha, it'll be worth it.
Not going to tag me?
Not yet, I don't have a good getaway. You could just tag me back as I jump away.
Well then just sit up here with me.
Gladly. What do you want to talk about?
Can I ask you something?
Anything Shauna.
I miss [g1]...
I do too... but that's not a question?
Well... since this isn't the kind of arcade I thought it would be... What if we go back and pick up [g1]?
You really want to forfeit your 'alone time'?
Hey, don't get me wrong.
I love you, I love you so fucking much. I could spend the rest of my life alone with you.
I just feel bad leaving [g1] at home... I feel like she would enjoy being here.
Are you sure Shauna? I'd love for her to be here but I don't want you to feel like she has to be here.
I know, but I really do want her here.
All right, let's go get her then. Do you need help down from here?
Hehe, yes.
Just slide on down. I won't let you fall.
Don't drop me.
Cute panties...
Were you looking up my dress?
Ha, not on purpose. You spread your legs in front of my face.
I'm not used to dresses, they restrain a lot of movement.
I mean move however you want to around me, like I said... cute panties.
We should talk about that by the way...
Talk about what?
Our conversation this morning. About taking things slow.
What about it?
Is that what you want?
I want what you want Shauna. If you want to wait and build up our actual relationship then I'm more than happy to do that.
What if I do want the other thing?
Then I'd say we should still go slowly. Get you comfortable in your own skin.
Yeah... that would help wouldn't it?
I know you have these insecurities in your head that are holding you back.
We're going to get you past those. You're a beautfiul woman that should be confident in herself.
Mwah!
Okay... so slowly.
[mcf]? Shauna?...
[g1]???
What are you doing here?
What happened? Is everyone okay?
Mhmmm, I just needed to be around you two.
We're here for you [g1].
How did you get here?
The bus.
Babe... what happened?
I'm sorry... I didn't mean to ruin your alone time.
You're not ruining anything. Me and Shauna were about to come get you.
What do you mean?
We both agreed that it didn't feel right being here without you. So we were going to come get you.
That's right, you're not ruining anything.
Awh... I love you both.
I love you too.
I love seeing you two together.
Shauna's really impressing me with how she's handling [g1]. From helping her after the rally yesterday and everything she's done since.
I'm really glad they're growing close so quickly.
So what were you two doing?
Hold on babe. You haven't told us what happened yet.
Let her sit down and talk.
It's not that big of a deal... I just felt alone after it happened.
After what happened?
Elizabeth and me got into an argument.
I don't even know what started it... but she said a lot of mean things.
Fuck... where was [am]?
[am] and Stacy went to Rachael's office. I stayed behind to wait on you two.
What made her go off on you?
She asked me if it was true that I was letting you be with other girls. I told her the truth and she started to yell at me.
That's awful...
Where is Elizabeth now?
She said she was going to go see about her dorm.
Good, she shouldn't be in the house if she's acting like that.
What the fuck happened to her?
But it's fine. I'm used to her acting that way. I just didn't want to be home alone.
I'm glad you came here babe.
I am too. Don't worry about her.
She's just jealous... she'll be okay.
Hey... do you want to go on a walk or something?
You don't want to stay here?
We have all these games at home and can play them for free whenever. You need some air.
Yeah, let's get out of here.
Are you sure?
We were probably going to do something else after we picked you up anyway.
You two are amazing.
I'm sorry about your sister... things will get better soon.
It's okay... I have new family now.
That's right, just don't give up on Elizabeth just yet.
Where do you two want to go?
You pick, we'll follow.
Hmmmm, I have an idea.
We'll decide after we visit a store. I need to get something for a headache.
Are you feeling okay? We can go home if you need to rest.
No, no. I'm fine. Let's go girls.
Lead the way.
A trip to the store later
Oh... it's that girl from class.
Her name was Ruby right?
Uhm, excuse me.
Oh hey [mcf]. How may I help you?
Huh, she has a bit of a wonky eye... Did she always have that?
Hey Ruby, do you sell any stuffed animals? Preferably big and hopefully you have two of them?
Uhmmm, I'm not sure. I'd have to check. Can you watch the front for me?
Sure thing.
She's pretty cute.
I need to get two stuffed animals this time. One for Shauna and one for [g1]. I just hope Shauna doesn't mind including [g1] in this.
Ow!
Oh! Ruby! Are you okay?
Yeah I'm fine! I'm just clumsy... I dropped your animals, do you want me to get two more?
Uhh, I think they'll be okay.
Here, let me help you up.
Thank you.
I really need to start wearing my glasses... anyway...
Thank you for your purchase. Come back anytime.
I'll see you in class Ruby.
Wait, are you going to Zoe's party?
Yeah, I believe I am. What about you?
I think so, probably will.
Cool... hey, one more question.
Do you know any cool hang out spots around here?
There's this one gazebo with pretty lights. It's nothing special but it's about as good as you'll get.
Can you tell me where it is?
I'll send the directions to you.
Thanks Ruby.
No problem and I'll see you in class okay? Have a good night.
Goodnight Ruby.
A few minutes later
What are we doing here [mcf]?
Ruby told me about this place. Figured it's exactly what we needed.
It's perfect baby... just a nice pretty place with fresh air.
Well let's sit and relax.
So... how did the start of your date go?
We played tag and talked about some things.
Like what?
How we missed you.
You two talked about me the whole time?
Girls I'm tired, let's lay down for a moment.
And we talked about a few other things, getting Shauna more comfortable in her body.
Oh yeah?
What [g1] is trying to get at is that we talked about us taking it slow.
Sorry... I told her while you were in the store.
Snitch.
Haha, sorry.
Ha, you could've just started with that [g1].
You want to know what really helped me with my confidence?
Working out everyday with him?
Well that helped... but it was just doing it. Turn that voice in your head off.
Kind of like this.
[g1]!
You don't mind do you babe?
Uhh... [g1]?
What? Do you want me to stop?
That's not what I'm trying to say... it's just Shauna.
Mwah!
If you're scared we're freaking out Shauna... why don't you ask her?
What has gotten into her?......
I kind of like it though.
Shauna?
Haha...
What's funny?
We talked about this while you were in the store too.
Ahh, I see.
I wonder what goes through that brain of yours... what makes you so damn perfect?
Hehe, I thought you'd be upset at me for tricking you.
You're too sexy for me to think about anything else right now.
Mmmm... what are you going to do about that?
Haha... baby.
Are you sure you're okay doing this in front of Shauna?
We're both your girlfriends, I'm sure she's going to walk in on us again sometime and I'll walk in on you two. Might as well get used to it.
That's true... well then, let's take those clothes off.
Only me? What about Shauna?
What? I thought I was just watching?
You don't have to Shauna. It could really help you feel more comfortable around us though.
Do you really want to sit in the corner awkwardly or would you like to enjoy yourself too?
You don't have to do anything with us, just have a good time yourself.
Are you saying what I think you are?
What? Masturbate? Everyone masturbates, it's not weird.
It is a little bit.
No reason to push her on this, rather just make sure she's comfortable and has a good time.
How about this? We won't look. You sit by and watch, have a good time yourself and we all grow closer. Everyone wins.
Promise not to look?
Promise.
Promise.
Okay... sure.
Perfect, thank you Shauna.
Oh? You're already undressed?
That outfit is really easy to get off. Now it's your turn.
You're so fucking sexy [g1].
Mmmm, so are you... Now lay on your back.
Last time we were like this... I couldn't really walk for the entire rest of the day.
We can start with something easier babe.
I think I can do it.
Jesus, does Shauna not realize she's undressing right in front of me?
I mean to be fair she's either in mine or [g1]'s vision, guess she'd rather me see.
She has an amazing ass too.
*whispering*[mcf], stop looking.
She's undressing right in my vision.
I know but you made a promise. Just look at what we're doing.
You're right, are you ready?
Mhmmm.
Ahhhhhhmmm....
[g1], are you sure you want to start with this?
Mhmmmmm....
I'm great [mcf]. I promise this will feel great for both of us.
Watch this.
AHHHHHHHHMMMMMMMMMMMMM!!
Holy fuck!!
[g1]??
Oh fuck!
Shauna, it's okay.
Ohhhh.... What happened?
Your moan made Shauna turn around.
Poor girl... Give me a second baby.
What's wrong Shauna?
Can I put my clothes back on?
No Shauna. You have nothing to hide.
What's so scary about showing down there?
.....
Come on, turn around. I won't look.
Is it because I'm here?
A little bit.
I understand. I'm nervous to be naked in front of you too.
And I love you Shauna but I'm not here for you, just like how you're not here for me.
We're here for [mcf]. We don't need to worry about each other. But I do think you're gorgeous.
Are you scared to let him see?
I don't know...
How about we try it? We'll both just stand here and let him look. And he'll be honest with us about how he feels.
Okay...
Don't be nervous Shauna. It's me.
What do you think? Be honest.
I wouldn't change a thing about either of you. That's the truth.
You're both incredibly sexy and I'm lucky to be here with you both.
And if that isn't enough to convince you Shauna... look at this.
He's as hard as a rock... you can't fake that.
You really mean it [mcf]?
I wouldn't lie to you Shauna.
So please relax and just have a good time. Enjoy this.
What he said.
Do you want to see more?
Really? Of course I do.
Here, give me a second.
Good job baby.
You too, you've been an immense help.
We make a good team... do you want me to show off with Shauna?
Is that even a question?
Hehe.
I'm so proud of you Shauna.
Fuck girls... I have nothing but positive things to say.
You're both perfect in your own unique ways.
I can't wait anymore baby.
Oh yeah?
Come here then...
Are you watching Shauna?
Mhmm...
Stick it in me [mcf]... I've been waiting all day for it.
Ohhhhmmmm... Fuck yes baby...
Go deeper...
Fuck me... caveman brain is taking over again...
Ahhhh!! Ohhh my god...
Hmm, I wonder if Shauna is enjoying the view.
He, I'd say she is.
I wonder how nervous she really is right now, I know she's putting on a bit of a brave face.
I'm just happy she's trying.
Oh, she's making eye contact and she didn't even stutter...
Maybe she isn't as nervous as I thought she was.
Fuck it, let's give her a show to remember then.
Baby! What are you doing?
Switching positions... are you ready?
Fuck me baby...
[g1]??
Oh fuck!
Shauna, it's okay.
Ohhhh.... What happened?
Your moan made Shauna turn around.
Poor girl... Give me a second baby.
What's wrong Shauna?
Can I put my clothes back on?
No Shauna. You have nothing to hide.
What's so scary about showing down there?
.....
Come on, turn around. I won't look.
Is it because I'm here?
A little bit.
I understand. I'm nervous to be naked in front of you too.
And I love you Shauna but I'm not here for you, just like how you're not here for me.
We're here for [mcf]. We don't need to worry about each other. But I do think you're gorgeous.
Are you scared to let him see?
I don't know...
How about we try it? We'll both just stand here and let him look. And he'll be honest with us about how he feels.
Okay...
Don't be nervous Shauna. It's me.
What do you think? Be honest.
I wouldn't change a thing about either of you. That's the truth.
You're both incredibly sexy and I'm lucky to be here with you both.
And if that isn't enough to convince you Shauna... look at this.
He's as hard as a rock... you can't fake that.
You really mean it [mcf]?
I wouldn't lie to you Shauna.
So please relax and just have a good time. Enjoy this.
What he said.
Do you want to see more?
Really? Of course I do.
Here, give me a second.
Good job baby.
You too, you've been an immense help.
We make a good team... do you want me to show off with Shauna?
Is that even a question?
Hehe.
I'm so proud of you Shauna.
Fuck girls... I have nothing but positive things to say.
You're both perfect in your own unique ways.
I can't wait anymore baby.
Oh yeah?
Come here then...
Are you watching Shauna?
Mhmm...
Stick it in me [mcf]... I've been waiting all day for it.
Ohhhhmmmm... Fuck yes baby...
Go deeper...
Fuck me... caveman brain is taking over again...
Ahhhh!! Ohhh my god...
Hmm, I wonder if Shauna is enjoying the view.
He, I'd say she is.
I wonder how nervous she really is right now, I know she's putting on a bit of a brave face.
I'm just happy she's trying.
Oh, she's making eye contact and she didn't even stutter...
Maybe she isn't as nervous as I thought she was.
Fuck it, let's give her a show to remember then.
Baby! What are you doing?
Switching positions... are you ready?
Fuck me baby...
Oh!! Just like that!
Fuck me baby!!
You feel so fucking good...
Ahhhnnnnggg.... Enjoying the view... Shauna?
Mhmmm...
From a bathroom floor to a gazebo floor. Moving up in the world.
It feels even bigger than before!
Fuck baby... 
AHHhhhhnnnnggg!!
Ohhhh...... HNnnnngggg!!!
Phew... that was so fucking good [g1].
AHHHHHHOOOuuuunnnnnggggg!!!
Fuck... Baby...
Fuck... I don't think I'm done.
Ahhhnnng!
Phew... that was so fucking good [g1].
Fuck me... I have to pull out!
AHHhhhhnnnnggg!!
Ohhhh...... Ahhhmmm...
Phew... that was so fucking good [g1].
That was great...
You're getting better and better every single day.
How's Shauna doing?
Look for yourself.
I think she's close...
Yeah, I think you're right.
Help her out...
Really?
I mean... if you want to. It might go a long way for her confidence.
Uhhh. Sure.
Shauna... Don't freak out. Let me help.
[mcf]!!
Calm down... it's okay. Just relax.
Okay...
This will feel great... I promise. Just let me star-
Ahhhnnnngggh!!
Ohhhnnnnn!!......
Did she just?
I'm sorry... I was so close...
Haha, sorry for interrupting.
No, no. It helped.
Ehh, I don't know. I don't want to freak her out.
Ahhhnnnngggh!!
Oh shit, she really was close.
Ahhhh....
I think she's close...
Yeah, I think you're right.
Help her out...
Really?
I mean... if you want to. It might go a long way for her confidence.
Uhhh. Sure.
Shauna... Don't freak out. Let me help.
[mcf]!!
Calm down... it's okay. Just relax.
Okay...
This will feel great... I promise. Just let me star-
Ahhhnnnngggh!!
Ohhhnnnnn!!......
Did she just?
I'm sorry... I was so close...
Haha, sorry for interrupting.
No, no. It helped.
Ehh, I don't know. I don't want to freak her out.
Ahhhnnnngggh!!
Oh shit, she really was close.
Ohhhnnngghh....
Ahhhh....
Babe...
This was our first time all together.
Yeah, it was.
I wish we had something to remember it by.
I still need to give them the stuffed animals.
Ha, yeah me too.
Should we get dressed? It's starting to get chilly.
Yeah we should. It was also pretty risky to be out here this long anyway.
One clothes change later
That was fun...
Would you do it again Shauna?
Of course.
Hopefully sooner rather than later.
True... can you girls excuse me for a moment? I need to grab my phone from the car.
Are we not about to leave?
We are, but I'll be right back.
Uhhh... okay.
Well they definitely know I'm about to pull something.
I'm a basketball player... not an actor.
I really did leave my phone though.
A message from Rachael.
[am] said to bring the girls to my office tonight. We're staying here. xoxo
What? That place was empty except for only one bed.
It works out though, I don't really want to be around the house ever since I found out about Ryker.
Let me give these girls these animals then we'll head that way.
What are you about to do?
You're clearly up to something.
Hmmm, just close your eyes and put out your hands.
They can probably already see these things behind my back.
Huh, no retort from either one of them.
Okay, open your eyes.
[mcf]!
[mcf]!
Thank you! You didn't forget!
I told you I'd get the biggest stuffed animal I could find Shauna. That's exactly what I did.
You don't mind that we get [g1] in on this do you?
Absolutely not, if you only got me one I'd be giving it to her.
I love you.
I love you too.
Thank you babe. I love you.
And I love you.
Are you girls cool going to Rachael's office? [am] wants to stay there tonight.
Uhh, sure I guess.
It's cool with me.
Perfect, let's get going then. It's getting really late.
Still empty.
It's a big place.
They should be right back here.
Yep.
Man, I haven't seen much of [am] at all today.
I need to spend some time with her before bed.
Welp, Rachael sees me.
There he is.
There you are honey! Did you have a good date?
Yeah I did. I had a great time.
That's fantastic.
I really missed you today mom.
I missed you too.
We need to make some more time for just the two of us.
We really do. Sometime soon I promise.
I love you mom.
I love you too honey.
Part of me wants to give her a friendly kiss but I don't know how she'd feel about that in front of Rachael.
Mwah!
Well damn, I guess she doesn't mind very much at all.
I hope that didn't give Rachael any ideas.
Rachael said she needed to talk to you again so I'll be back okay?
Okay mom, I'll be here.
Watching you two interact makes me think about having a son...
He'd probably turn out to be a shit head though.
And it's not really you I need to talk to... it's your girlfriend.
Oh...
Babe!
Yes?
Yes?
Ha, it was bound to happen eventually.
Uhh, [g1] I need you for a second. I'll talk to you in just a moment Shauna.
Fuck...
What do you need?
Rachael wants to talk to you.
Oh... okay.
You want me to handle this?
Sure, go for it.
Okay... so basically I have a business opportunity for [mcf].
Me and him can make a lot of money together and can get you guys out from under that creep Charles.
Not to be rude but why do you have to talk to me about this?
Because your boyfriend has a conscience.
What does she mean?
Just listen to what she has to say [g1].
Fuck me, I feel awkward right now.
Okay... so basically.
Actually [mcf]... Can you leave us to chat for a moment? This is a bit hard to do with you standing right there.
Oh... sure.
It's okay baby. I'll be here.
Guess I'll go make sure Shauna is good.
Babe!
Ha, fucking jerk.
You know you're my babe too Shauna. Easy mishap.
Mwah!
Damn right I am.
[mcf], Shauna...
Hey Stacy. How's it going?
It's going well. How was your date?
Absolutely nothing to complain about.
That's good.
Were you still wanting to talk tonight? You know? Get to know each other?
Yeah I'd love to. Do you want to right now?
Sure...
Well, I'll leave you two to it.
You don't want to share any stories?
Not really...
Fair enough. We'll be over here if you need us.
Roger, roger.
So... tell me about yourself.
Can I get closer?
Yeah, sure.
Better. What do you want to know?
Hmmm... why do you hate basketball?
My mom hated it. Guess I just took after her.
What's your relationship with your mom like?
It was great... then she sent me off here a year early.
Why did she do that?
My guess is as good as yours...
Ummm, what family do you have?
Just my mom. That's all I've ever known. No grandparents or anything.
Me and my mom were broke pretty much my entire childhood. Jumping city to city.
Always switching schools so I never really had friends.
That's why I'm so happy I found you.
I was so nervous coming here.
I heard a lot of stories about this place and not many were nice.
But you're the nicest person I've ever met.
Stacy...
AAAAAHHHHH!!!!
What was that?!
Fuck that was an actual scream from her.
Mom!
Come here!
There was someone looking in the window! They were in a hoodie!
Mom, it was probably just a homeless guy looking for a place to sleep.
Honey this was different!
I'll check it out. Go back with the other girls.
If this is any of those creeps associated with Charles...
Oh shit... there they are.
They don't look homeless... and it's a woman... Is that the girl from Charles' office?
Hey! Can we talk for a second?
What the fuck they're running.
Hey!
Fuck, I feel like I need to chase... but what if it's just an innocent woman that's creeped out?
I can't risk it... and she's not very fast.
Stop!
If she makes this turn I can just jump these boxes and grab her...
I said stop!
In case this is just some random woman I need to take the impact of the fall, sort of like with Natalie.
Ahhhh... that hurt...
I'm sorry, you wouldn't stop... Why were you peeking in on us?
*Sobbing* I'm so sorry.
Hey, hey... it's okay.
You didn't do anything wrong.
She's hugging me so tightly...
What did you do?
I'm so sorry [mcf].
I didn't want to run... I didn't know what else to do.
She knows my name, and she smells so familiar.
Who are you?
[mcf]...
Mom??...
Fuck... I'm so dizzy...
...
...
[mcf]!
Huh? Mom?
Is that Stacy?
Come on buddy. We need to leave before daddy gets home.
Come on!
Where are we going?
On vacation.
Without dad?
He's going to meet us there...
Help me finish packing please.
Fuck, my head is still spinning...
...
...
PUT HIM DOWN!
YOU'RE NOT TAKING MY SON!
I SAID PUT HIM DOWN!
What the fuck was that?
Was that really my mom? Or was that all just a dream?
And Stacy... there's no way.
What the fuck is going on?...
That's a good idea. What do you have in mind?
At least Shauna and [g1] are here right now...
I don't know... I just hate seeing him like this.
He's always the one doing things for us... we should do something for him.
I think you've been pretty giving recently.
You know what I mean Shauna.
I wonder how that talk with Rachael went...
He says he's just been stressed. We should try to help with that.
What do you have in mind?
Hmmm... we should surprise him with something.
Like when he comes home we surprise him with food, a comfy bed, a big tv, and us to cuddle with. Just so he can relax.
You know that's not how [mcf] is. He's not one to relax.
I know... I just don't want to see him like this anymore...
Fuck... I need to let them know I'm okay.
I don't either [g1]. He has us though, everything is going to be okay.
We'll figure out what happened when he gets up.
Girls?
[mcf]!
Are you okay?
I'm fine... I'm sorry for worrying you girls.
What happened?!
[am] said she saw someone outside, I went to check it out.
I saw a woman walking and tried to get her attention. She ended up running so I gave chase.
At the risk of sounding crazy... I ended up tackling her to the ground.
She started to apologize, that's when everything started to piece together.
Her smell, her voice, everything. Then she looked up... I think she was my mom.
Lay back down honey...
I know I sound crazy babe. It's the truth.
I'm not saying it isn't the truth... it is crazy though.
I'm worried about you... You have so much on your plate right now.
Maybe you should talk to someone about it? Like a professional...
Babe...
Don't answer yet, just think about it... please.
I promise I'll think about it. Just please don't worry about me.
Mwah!
You know I always will.
Ha, fair.
I'm going to go wake up [am] and let her know you're awake.
No, you don't have to wake her up. Let her rest.
The only way we could get her to lay down is if we promised to wake her up the second you got up.
Oh...
I'll be right back.
Are you sure you're okay?
I think so Shauna. I don't feel like there's anything wrong.
Are you going to see a therapist?
I don't know.
[mcf] please... There's something wrong and we don't know how to help you.
I love you... I just know that you think you can overcome anything.
You've always been a rock in my life... seeing you unconscious was weird. It felt wrong.
We just want to know that you're okay. Just please go for us?
We've been sitting on this bed waiting for you to wake up for hours... we just...
Shauna, I promise I'll go.
Really?
Yes, we'll find one for me today okay?
Okay. Thank you.
I'm sorry to push it...
Don't say that. I'm glad I have two girls that care enough about me to push me.
You two are right. This may be bigger than me and a therapist might be just what I need.
I thought it was over after the last one.
I swear that was my mom though...
Thank you...
Mwah!
I love you too by the way.
Hey, uhhh... what time is it? How long was I out?
Last I checked it was close to 3am.
Phew... good. I have to be at practice at 5am for the tryouts.
You and [g1] have been up all night?
Yep, by your side.
[mcf]!!
Mom...
Come here!
What happened? Are you okay? Tell me...
I thought you were asleep? You seem wide awake.
I couldn't sleep, don't worry about me right now. What happened out there?
I'm okay mom. What all do you know?
I made you go outside when I saw someone creepy looking in...
You didn't make me do anything mom.
Then I was back here with the girls waiting on you to come back. That's when we heard knocking.
Rachael went to check because we thought you might've just been locked out.
That's when she found you on the ground outside the door. What happened?
I'm not sure... I know I had another dream.
I think I chased down the person you saw. I tackled them.
I think that person may have been my biological mom.
What? How?
She had on a hoodie so I couldn't tell at first. But when I tackled her she started to apoligize and I saw her face. That's when I remember getting dizzy and having another dream.
Are you sure it was her?
I think so, I just don't know how much of it was real or a dream.
I'm sorry for keeping you up.
Hush honey, don't apologize to me.
I can't remember the last time you were up this late.
It's been awhile... I just couldn't sleep.
Were you three on another bed?
Yeah, one just like this one but in the other room.
What do you say we all cuddle up and sleep in this one then? That might help you sleep.
I'd like that...
That does sound like a great idea. We can sleep in.
You girls can. I have to be at practice in a few hours.
Don't you think you should stay home today?
Me, Shauna, and Stacy talked about taking today off from school and helping Rachael move her things in here, plus we haven't slept.
Well... how about I go to practice but come back here when that's over?
That way I can also tell Veronica why we won't be in class.
Will you promise to take it easy? Harper will tell me if you don't.
Heh, I promise.
And [g1]...
I'm going to find a therapist for me today.
Really? Thank you baby... Me and Shauna will help you find one.
We also have a lot to talk about... so let's get some rest and worry about that when you get home okay?
Sure thing. I love you.
I love you too.
Roll over mom. Let me put my arms around you.
Can I ask something dumb?
Heh, what is it?
If it was your real mother...
Hey, hey. I know where you're going with this.
It doesn't matter who she was. It doesn't matter how we ended up here.
You're my mom. No matter what happens that will always be the truth. You raised me.
We've been through it all together. No matter the circumstances you made sure I was safe and that I had food on my plate.
I'm the man I am today because of you. Not her.
All the sacrifices you've made for me... I'll never forget.
Mwah!
I'd do it all over again if I could. I love you honey.
I love you too mom... now get some rest.
Goodnight girls... I love you all.
Goodnight everyone. I love you all too.
Goodnight kids... I love you all aswell.
Goodnight... You guys took all of the I love you's so I'll just repeat it. I love you all.
An hour an a half later.
I keep falling in and out of sleep...
I think it's time for me to get up anyway.
Now just to do it without waking any of the girls.
Slowly...
And I'm up.
Time for tryouts... then helping Rachael move some things.
[mcf]? You up?
Oh hey Rachael. What are you doing up?
Was going to check on all of you. Are you okay?
I'm fine. When you found me out there... was there anyone else?
No, it was just you on the ground. I freaked out a little bit thinking you were hurt.
But you didn't have any scrapes except one on your back. It wasn't bad though. Still had your wallet and everything also.
Took an hour to convince [am] to not call 911.
[g1] told me what you said happened when she told [am] about you being awake.
I don't know if that's what really happened though.
I'll look into it for you. Are you going to help me move some things today?
I am. As soon as I get back from practice. And thank you Rachael.
Thank you as well.
Hey, how did the talk with [g1] go?
It went better for you than it did for me. You have a little business woman in the making.
What do you mean?
We'll both explain it later. Just focus on practice for now.
Sounds good Rachael. Have a good day.
You too hun.
Phew... okay. Got out of here without having to see Stacy. Not sure if I could handle that right now.
[mcf]?
Fuck...
I have a bad feeling in my stomach.
Where are you going?
I have to be at practice by 5. What are you doing up?
I don't sleep much... and slept in the middle of the day yesterday.
Are you okay?
I'm fine Stacy, thanks for worrying.
Of course. I enjoyed our talk last night. I wish we could've finished it... maybe tonight?
Sure. I'd like that.
That could help me figure out some things.
Can I give you a hug goodbye?
You don't have to ask Stacy. Come here.
Have a good practice.
Thank you. I hope you have a good day too.
Mwah!
Oh, she just kissed my cheek.
What was that for?
Everything. That wasn't too far was it?
No, I don't mind. It's just a kiss on the cheek.
Good, so I'll see you later?
Sure will. See you Stacy.
A few minutes later
I thought this dream stuff was over... Life feels so different than it did a few days ago.
I used to feel like I fit in my place. Just secure. Now it feels like I'm thrown everywhere and can't settle down.
I've barely played basketball or even been to a gym. Hopefully that changes today.
I should leave this car at WVM also. If I'm giving up the houses then the car has to go as well.
Huh? Who is that?
No shoes and she looks like she has a limp.
Fuck... I have a few minutes. I should stop and see if she needs help.
Ma'am? Do you need help?
She looks familiar but I can't see her face. I have to lean over.
Oh fuck...
Willow? What's going on?
...
Here, get in.
I don't like the girl but she clearly needs some help.
...
Come on Willow. I can take you home.
Are you okay? Do you need help?
No... home is fine...
Can you give me directions?
Take a left.
A few minutes later
This is your place?
Yes.
Can I walk you inside? I just want to make sure you're good.
What the hell happened to this girl?
Mhmm.
Not a bad place.
Do you need anything else Willow?
...
Can you come inside for a moment?
I really don't have much time... not like I can really say no right now though.
Sure, I can't stay for long though.
So... can you tell me anything?
No... Not right now.
What do you want me to do Willow?
I don't know... stay...
I'm sorry... I have to go to practice. You can come if you want to.
No...
I can come back later?
I'll take that as a yes.
I'm not sure when... but I'll be by sometime soon.
I didn't mean it...
Mean what?
About [g1].
Oh... thank you. Don't worry about that right now. Focus on you. I'll be back sometime today okay?
Bye...
I feel awful leaving but I promised Harper I'd be there at 5.
I wonder what happened to her. I need to come back here as soon as I can.
One trip to practice later.
I love the smell of this place. About the only familiar smell here.
Where is everyone?
Oh, it's just Harp... Hopefully it's not another no show day.
Coach!
[mcf]! You're late.
Sorry... last night and this morning were weird.
It's only by a few minutes. Thank you for coming.
So where is everyone?
In the other room.
How many?
Counting Ayden? Four.
Awesome. What's the plan for today?
I'll go over that whenever everyone is here.
For now you should go get changed into your practice clothes.
Will do coach.
Wait.
Your good morning hug...
Just what I needed.
Natalie told me all about your date. She seemed to have a really good time.
I'm happy for you two. Thanks for that.
Is she here this morning?
Not yet. She was getting ready when I left so she should be here somewhat soon.
Now go get changed.
Yes coach.
Cool logo...
These are a lot like the lockers at my old gym.
A few moments later.
These are much better than the old ones. Way more comfortable.
[mcf]. What's up?
Oh hey, good morning Damien.
How are you?
Ehh, weird night last night. What about you?
The same. Me and Jasmine talked for like 5 hours.
Oh yeah? How'd that go?
Started out awfully but gradually got better. Not really sure where it's at now.
But hey, that's not why we're here this morning.
True, everything is good with you and Jasmine though right?
Should be.
Hey, are you free any today?
Probably not. What did you have in mind?
Just wanting to hang out. What do you have planned?
I have to help a woman move some things into her office.
Want some help?
You'd be willing?
Yep. Sure am. No flaking this time either, I promise.
I'm sorry for the first time. That isn't like me. Let me make it up to you.
I won't say no to help Damien. You good to head there after practice?
Sure thing.
Thanks man. Means a lot.
No problem... so... time to meet the new guys huh?
Sure is.
That's nice of him... at least he's trying.
I wonder what Jasmine thinks about their talk last night though.
I wonder what Harp has in mind for us today.
Hopefully nothing too intense. I don't feel completely right today.
Oh, hey you two. Ready?
Sure am.
Can you go get them Damien?
Yeah I can do that coach.
Excited?
Sure, what about you?
Yeah... a little nervous though. Meeting new players can be tough. I have to be Coach Harper not just Harper.
I think you're great at both.
Yeah? You think I could just be Harper and get away with it?
I love your smile but you're a little too smiley for a coach. You have to be a little more stern or players might try to take advantage of you.
Like this?
Ha, tone it down just a bit. Look approachable but not too approachable. If that makes any sense.
This?
Perfect. Just like that.
Thanks! I'm going to go help Damien bring them in here. Stay here.
Will do coach.
I feel like dunking today... but I really should try to take it easy...
I wonder what seeing a therapist is like. I wonder if I'll like it.
... I can't get my mom out of my head. That had to be her. It felt too real... and Stacy.
Fuck me... my thoughts are so jumbled right now.
Maybe I am just crazy.
[mcf]. There's some guys to meet.
Oh shit.
Come here. Let me introduce you.
This is Dubaku. He is transferring from track and field.
It's nice to meet you Dubaku.
Nice to meet you too.
And we have Marcus and Kenji.
Nice to meet both of you.
...
Likewise.
You're the famous guy right?
I guess.
Me and you need to talk. Later.
Sure?
Okay everyone. We're starting with laps, let's get loosened up.
Thoughts?
Better than I thought they would be. Kenji is huge and Dubaku doesn't seem bad either.
Marcus lacks the height though.
Yeah I know. But he may surprise us.
Very true, I hope he does.
Welp, time to start running.
Going to join us?
Ha, my legs are still jelly... now start running.
Many laps later.
Okay guys! Huddle up.
Now that we're warm. We're going to play a quick 3v3. Black shirts versus yellow shirts.
[mcf] and Damien don't try to show off. This is about seeing what the new guys can do.
Don't worry. We'll have our chances to show off soon.
Ha, I can't wait.
Your team gets ball first.
What's up Ayden?
It's going man. Not happy being up this early... but here we are.
I understand that. Let's show Harp what you guys can do.
I should have the ball as little as possible right now.
I'm not sure how Dubaku plays but I'm not sure I trust Ayden's ability either.
Kenji is two feet taller than Marcus. Plus he's already in the box.
Who do I throw it to?
Let's see what he has.
He has inside position, if he can twist around and get past Dubaku's hand then he should have an easy layup.
And he went straight up with it...
At least Dubaku knew how to play it.
Let's see what Kenji can do.
He has the size and power to just push Marcus back and have an easy post score.
Good shit Kenji.
Marcus had no chance.
And he made the shot. That's encouraging.
I wonder why Kenji wasn't already playing basketball.
A few minutes later.
Oh man. I'd love to a little eurostep layup right now...
Coach said this isn't about me or Damien though and Kenji has Dubaku beat.
Let me throw it up for him and see what happens.
Damn, Kenji is impressing me.
And it's not like Dubaku played that awfully either.
These two seem better than Mackey and Ayden.
A few more minutes later.
Oh, I'm in iso with Marcus. I should pass out of this but I want to see how Marcus will handle me.
I'll start off basic.
.....
..... I didn't even do anything.
Are you okay?
Uhh huh...
[mcf]! Come here for a second!
What do you think so far?
Kenji and Dubaku should be on the team. Marcus... not so much.
I was thinking the same thing. I think I'm going to tell him to go home...
I'm going to run the other three through some drills. You don't have to stay around for those. Just stay available because I want an actual game out of you today.
Sounds good with me Harp. I mean Coach.
I'll find you when I need you.
How did I do?
You did well. Definitely well enough to get a spot on the team if you keep it up.
Good. Thanks for answering.
[mcf]!
Zoe!
Still on for my party tonight?
Probably. Depends on how the day goes.
Hmmm, you don't want to miss it. I can promise you that.
Why's that?
You'll have to come and find out.
I'll try to Zoe. What are you about to do?
I'm about to go do some stretches in the weight room.
I have a free moment. Can I join you?
Of course you can. Follow me.
Hmmm, Zoe is usually accompanied by Emiko. She must have ended up sleeping in a bit or something.
Here we are! Nice right?
Ha, it's a lot like my old gym... just like the locker rooms. 
The color scheme and floor is way cooler though.
Yeah I like the stars too. I'm going to change into something else real quick. So just wait on me okay?
You got it Zoe.
This is where mine and [g1]'s spot was in the old gym. I miss working out with her.
I wonder if I could talk her into coming here. If I can bring her here anyway.
It will be nice to check her out while she works out and not feel guilty for it.
Maybe I can even convince Shauna to give it a shot.
Okay I'm back.
Damn, nice outfit Zoe.
Hehe, thanks. So are you going to stretch with me?
I'll give it a shot.
Okay follow my lead.
This is the upward facing dog... Just stretch out...
This feels pretty good. Helps to have the view of Zoe's ass in yoga pants though.
Okay... moving on.
This one is all about flexing out your core.
Like this?
No, no... Close though. Let me help.
Try to straighten up a bit.
Uhhh Zoe...
What?
Your foot...
Do you want me to move it?
Now's not the time Zoe.
Ugh... You're no fun.
Sorry Zoe...
Guess I'll leave you be then...
No Zoe. I'm enjoying the stretching... let's just keep it to that though.
Hmmm... Fine...
No, it can stay...
Hmmm... Good answer. I hope you don't mind if I.
Fuck Zoe. Not shy are you?
Never have been. I know what I want.
And that's you at my party tonight.
It feels like the thing in your pants wants to go.
It's not about not wanting to go. It's about time.
Well then make some time.
Okay, okay. I'll be there.
Good boy.
Woah, woah. Where are you going?
If I let you finish right now you wouldn't come to the party. We'll have a good time later tonight, don't worry.
Here... I'll even give you a little extra.
I just want you to come to my party is all. The foot was too far but what about this?
Jesus Zoe.
Nice right?
You can say that...
They'll be at the party tonight... waiting on you.
Okay Zoe. You clearly really want me there so I'll be there. Or at least I'll try my best to be there.
Damn Zoe.
So you promise you'll be there?
These will be there tonight... all for you.
Yeah, yeah. I promise I'll be there.
That's all I wanted. Try to be there early so we have some alone time.
I'll try to Zoe.
Who is that walking up?
Oh shit, hey Bailey.
Good morning [mcf].
I'll leave you two to it.
How did you sleep last night?
Last night was a little-
Mwah!
Sorry, I've been thinking about doing that since you left yesterday.
Ha, I'm not complaining.
Soooo... did you get a chance to talk to [g1] about us?
Uhh... not exactly. I was about to say last night was strange.
Oh... well that's okay. I know you'll ask when you can.
I'm not impatient. As long as I can hug and kiss you I'll be happy.
I'll ask her today, I promise.
There's no rush.
Will you be at Zoe's party tonight?
Yeah, Zoe was selling me on it before you came in. I think I'll be there.
Good... Are you bringing anyone?
Probably everyone... [g1], Shauna, and Stacy. Elizabeth if I get a chance to talk with her also.
I saw her just a minute ago... Do you think we could hang out some at the party?
Sure thing Bailey. I'm sure we'll have some time for just us.
In fact I'll make sure there's time for us... I still have to finish what I started in that kitchen.
[mcf]!
What? Got something against it?
..... No, I don't.
Haha, I didn't think so.
Where is Zoe going?
How did you sleep last night?
Last night was a little strange. But when I did sleep it wasn't bad.
Yeah, same here honestly.
Uhhh... are you going to Zoe's party tonight?
Yeah, Zoe was selling me on it before you came in. I think I'll be there.
Good... Are you bringing anyone?
Probably everyone... [g1], Shauna, and Stacy. Elizabeth if I get a chance to talk with her also.
I saw her just a minute ago...
Do you think we could hang out some at the party?
Oh wait, you're going? Hmmm, I might not go after all then.
Ha! What's that supposed to mean?!
I'm just joking with you Bailey. Of course we can hang out.
Where is Zoe going?
Oh shit it's Elizabeth... She doesn't seem very happy to see me.
I should talk to her and hopefully find out her side about what happened last night.
I'm sorry Bailey, can you excuse me for a moment?
Oh... sure.
Elizabeth...
...
You have to talk to her too?
Yeah I do.
Hmmm, you agreed to come to my party so I'll let you talk to her first.
Thanks Zoe.
Liz, what did you say to [g1] last night?
...
...
Come on Liz, you've never been afraid to speak your mind before.
Just tell me what you're thinking.
...
My sister is an idiot.
Liz, what makes you say that?
She was lucky enough to have you... what the fuck is she doing?
She's just letting you go and be with anyone. That's weird [mcf].
Now I have to see you with all these other girls.
Seeing you with my sister was hard enough.
Liz...
Don't 'Liz' me right now...
You should realize how your actions effect the others around you.
What would my mom think if she saw her daughter's boyfriend sleeping around on her?
It's not like that.
I don't want to hear it. I'll be staying with a friend. You have fun with all of your girls.
Elizabeth.
Fuck...
I don't think she's telling me the whole story.
I think she's more upset about the fact that I haven't asked anything from her.
She probably just feels a bit excluded. I should do something to fix that.
I need to see how [g1] will feel about it first though.
Everything okay?
Yeah... she's just having a hard time adjusting to things.
I'm sorry.
It's okay. It's not exactly an easy thing to adjust to. We'll figure it out.
You just giving her some space?
For now. But I think I can change her mind about things.
How so?
It's a little complicated. It will also take a bit of searching.
I actually might need your help setting it up.
Whatever you need.
Great, thanks Bailey. I'll let you know more whenever I have it more planned out.
Sooo... What do you have planned out?
If [g1] is okay with it... I want to remind Elizabeth of a few things.
I want to find a bunch of old pictures. I basically want to remind Elizabeth how much she means to all of us.
That's sweet... Where do I come in?
That part still has some planning. I'll tell you more about it at the party tonight.
[mcf]! Back in the gym!
Oh, drills are over?
Yep, all three of them did very well.
So I think we are going to have three new teammates.
That's awesome. So we're up to Me, Damien, Mackey, Lee, Ryker, Ayden, Dubaku, and Kenji.
That's 8. We can work with that. Ideally we can find two more.
I don't doubt it. I'm sure we will. We still have all of the old bench players to test out too.
I just really want my first win [mcf].
We're going to get you more than one Harp. How far away are we from our first game?
Well... We weren't scheduled for our first game until next Friday.
Jesus, that's early.
But... Since everyone is talking about WVM because of you. We were offered to swap games and have ours be the season opener.
So, early next week? And it will be broadcasted to the entire country?
Yeah.
Fuck...
Let me guess? That was a Charles decision?
Kinda, he asked me and I agreed. It's just preseason. It will be a good test to see where we are.
We barely have a team put together... I'll just trust Harp on this one.
Oh... Who are we playing?
They're called The Briars.
Briar? Like a thorn?
Well they've been a thorn in our side. We lost to them twice last year. First time by 22 points and second time by 38.
But this year will be different. I believe in you and this team.
We won't let you down Harp.
Now come on. Let's go play some basketball.
Bye [mcf]. I'll see you later.
Bye Bailey. I'll see you at the party tonight.
Not in class?
Not going to be able to make it today. I have some things I have to do.
Oh... well I'll keep your seat warm for you.
Haha, thanks Bailey. See you tonight.
See you [mcf].
I appreciate Harp's enthusiasm but I barely know my teammate's names still.
They don't know the playbook or anything. Hell, I barely do.
Guess we'll just have to step it up. We'll be playing in front of the entire country.
I need to get back on track myself. I've barely worked out or trained these past few days.
That needs to change and quick.
Looks like they're not back yet.
Where'd they go?
I let them take a break after drills.
Ha, I don't think I've ever had a coach that let me take a break mid practice.
What? It's only fair. I let you run off with Zoe mid practice. So they get a break too.
Fair point. With a game looming on us now we should amp up our practices. I know today is different because of tryouts but we need everyone here.
I know, let's sit and talk about this.
I talked to Mackey some yesterday. I don't know what happened but he has done a complete 180.
He's all about basketball. He would've been here this morning but I told him to take it off or come in at 7 like usual.
That's great to hear actually. Will he be here today?
He acted as though he would be. Tomorrow also.
Lee's going to be here then and we both know Damien will as well.
Dubaku, Ayden, and Kenji all seem committed. That's why we held tryouts at 5am.
Only those truly interested would show up.
The only question mark is Ryker. I heard you had a run in with him.
You could call it that. We don't need him Harp.
Like I said before... getting rid of Charles' nephew wouldn't be easy or worth the headache.
If he shows up, good. If he doesn't, we'll be okay.
So from here on out practices should go smoothly. 4v4's aren't the same as 5v5's. But we'll make it work.
Damn right we will.
Uh oh, heads up [mcf]!
What do you me-
Haha!
Got you!
Haha, I had to get you back for the other day.
I thought the other day was me getting you back for kneeing me.
Oh yeah... whoops.
Looks like we have a little war on our hands.
Oh damn, I didn't realize my head is in Harp's lap.
Mom, look away for a second.
Oh god, make it quick honey.
Mwah!
Are we even now?
I'd say we are.
There's something else I want to say but I should really refrain since Harp is right here.
Good. We're done now mom, you can let him up.
We could always end this little war here. Peace treaty.
Hmmm, I think I prefer retaliation.
Awh, come on.
I'll think about it.
You know I can hold you down for a bit right? Might want to rethink that answer.
Haha, fine. Peace treaty it is.
Good, you can let him up now mom.
Will you be at Zoe's party tonight?
Yeah I will be. What about you?
Absolutely. Wouldn't miss it.
That's not what I heard last night.
Mom...
Don't let my mom embarrass me too much. I have to go get things ready for class.
Ha, I won't let her. Not too much anyway. I hope you have a good day Natalie.
Thanks [mcf]. I hope you do too.
She told me last night that she wasn't going. Guess you going changed her mind.
Is that a bad thing?
No, no. It's cute.
Ayy! [mcf]!
Yo Ayden. Where's everyone else?
They're on their way.
You ready to crush this thing?
Always ready. What are we crushing?
Dubaku and Kenji.
2v2.
I haven't told him yet Ayden.
You two are just going to play a quick game of 21 against the other two.
Since I had to let Marcus go home we can't do a 2v3.
And I already know what Damien can do.
So it's just you four for right now.
Sounds good to me.
I'm going to get ready.
That's not an issue right?
What isn't?
Letting Damien skip out on this one.
No that's fine. Like you said you're still seeing what all of us can do and you already know what Damien is capable of.
I still have to see that for myself because all I've done so far is dunk on him but I'm sure that will happen soon.
I promise he's better than that.
I believe it.
[mcf]. Can we talk for a moment?
Veronica? I didn't expect to see you here.
I had to be here early for a meeting. Figured I would stop by just to thank you again for yesterday.
Nathan's mom called and told me he was a perfect angel to her after his talk with you.
Good, good. That's awesome.
It really is. You excited for class today?
Oh, about that...
What?
We're not going to be able to attend class today.
What do you mean 'we'?
Me, [g1]. Shauna, and Stacy.
[mcf]...
You have to be better than this. We're only three days in and you're already getting girls to skip my class.
I'm not going through this again young man.
Veronica, no. It isn't like that at all.
Hear me out.
Do you like Charles?
God no.
I'm currently staying at a place he owns. I have the opportunity to move out of there and I also have to help someone move into an office.
All of those girls live with me and are helping me move. That's all, has nothing to do with skipping and we'll be there tomorrow.
Oh...
Still, it looks bad on me when the only guy in the class is out and takes a chunk of girls with him.
I'll make it up to you Veronica.
I still owe you after what you did for me yesterday.
So we'll call it even... if you agree to stay after class tomorrow and make up the lesson you'll miss today.
Deal. Does that include the girls as well?
No, girls skip all the time but they don't put a target on my back like you do.
I told you there wouldn't be any special treatment, if anything there'd be less opportunities.
I get it, you have to set an example. Deal.
Deal, sorry for the bad cop routine.
I understand. We're all just trying to do our jobs.
I won't keep you too late tomorrow. You're a fast learner.
It would be ironic and hypocritical of me to be late to my meeting for scolding you on being absent. So I should get going.
Ha, I'll see you tomorrow Veronica.
See you [mcf].
That's fair. Veronica isn't bad to be around either so I really don't mind having to stay over.
Ugh...
What is it Harp?
Oh, it's nothing...
The look on your face says otherwise.
What look? I'm fine.
If you say so Harp.
That was definitely strange.
Okay, time for that 2v2. Go get ready.
Sure thing coach.
Everyone is here. Me and Ayden vs Dubaku and Kenji.
Everyone ready?
Ready to win? Yes.
We're ready.
You get ball first. You'll need it.
Okay big guy. You better be the one guarding me if you plan on trash talking.
Oh I am.
Let's go then.
What do you need from me?
Hmm, I don't think Kenji is that fast but Dubaku can play defense.
Play inside and wait for the ball, if you see me cut then you run to the outside and get Dubaku out of the box. If he stays I'll pass it to you.
If he follows you then I should have an easy score.
That's all?
That's all, just try your best to drain your shots and this should be easy.
Let's do it.
They talk a lot about you, I don't see it.
Keep talking.
I can just play him like I did Damien. He's not running at me but I know he can't keep up with me. As long as I can get around him.
Oh yeah, big boy is too slow to play that close to me.
Hopefully Ayden ran to the three point line.
Fuck, he switched to me. Ayden should be wide open but I think I can dunk on Dubaku. Set the tone and let them know who I am.
Wide open and his jumper looks much better already.
Definitely not perfect but it at least doesn't look like a toddler drinking from a sippy cup anymore.
Buckets!
Nice Ayden!
Kenji was a little too disrespectful. Got to show off a bit.
Too easy.
Still, not a bad effort by Dubaku. Definitely not a terrible defender.
Woo! Good shit [mcf]!
Now let's do that a few more times and end this thing.
Ha, that easy huh?
It's that easy.
10 minutes later
Huh, it really was that easy. It's already 18-0. Ayden is draining all of his shots and Kenji can't stop me.
He's also quiet now. Hell, he's playing a mile away from me.
So far back that I can just pull up a 3 and end this.
Kenji is just a little too slow for this.
That's game!
Let's go!
Good job [mcf] and Ayden!
21 to nothing. Maybe they're not as good as I thought they were.
No, they're definitely not bad. A few weeks of practice and we'll have them ready.
So if they're not bad... you're just that good?
You said it not me.
Haha, tired at all?
I can go all day coach.
Well save that energy, there's a few more things I want to run them through but you're all done for today.
So go hit the showers.
That's all?
For today, tomorrow we'll pick up where we left off here. With everyone.
I'll see you later tonight when I drop Natalie off at the party.
Okay coach. I'll see you then.
Have a good day [mcf].
I wonder if there are any courts near my house. I'd love to get the girls playing also.
Anyway, I should get these practice clothes off then hop into a shower.
Haha, stop it.
Oh? Is Damien here?
Oh what the fuck... What are they doing?
You know what? I don't want to know.
Lee was probably just helping him tie his shoe or something... fuck...
I'll just yell over to let them know I'll be walking by.
Yo! Damien!
Frantic rustling noises
What's up?
I'm about to head out, you still wanting to help out?
Sure do! Just send me the address and I'll be there!
Will do! I'm going to head to the showers and then I'll be gone.
Now just to walk to the showers and not make any eye contact.
That could have been anything. Lee could have just been helping Damien with a cramp.
It would be silly to jump to any absolutes.
Let me just get cleaned up. Get that off of my mind.
Showers are nice at least.
One shower later
My minds a bit scrambled. Not really sure what all I have to do today.
I know I need to help Rachael move and go to Zoe's party.
Oh, I also need to find a therapist.
Walking noises
Oh, someone's walking up. I've had my curtain open all this time.
Should really close it.
There we go. No accidental flashing today.
Is someone in there?
Yeah, I'm [mcf].
Oh, hey [mcf]. I'm Tia.
You're in my shower.
Tia? I don't think I know a Tia.
I'm sorry Tia, I'm almost done.
That's not good enough for me. I can't wait.
Well hello there.
Oh, that's the girl from my class.
Hi, I'll be out in just a second Tia.
Oh... I was prepared to kick you out. But I think you can stay.
Isn't this shower only for men anyway?
It is this year. Last year this was my shower and I come here early so I can use it.
Didn't know that. I just picked a random one. I'll get out of your way.
Shower is plenty big enough for two people.
Ehh, I was pretty much done anyways.
If you say so. Thanks.
See you Tia.
Time to head home. Well no, I need to stop by Willow's and check on her.
That should only take a minute.
A few minutes later
There's plenty of room. I'm just finishing up.
Perfect. I don't mind sharing with you.
You know I can see you undressing right?
You know I just barged in on you and saw you naked right? It's only fair.
It's a nice view.
Yeah?
What about this one?
Even better.
Heh, now move over. Give me some room.
We need tighter school uniforms. I didn't even notice she had that ass on her.
I wouldn't mind this view for every shower I take.
I really was almost done...
Do I just stand here awkwardly and wait? Make a move?
Anyone there?
A hot girl joins you in the shower and you just stand in the corner?
Maybe I like it when the girl makes the first move.
Getting naked and getting into the shower with you was the first move.
This place not private enough for you?
Do you know a better place?
There's the shower Charles uses. It's fancy and has a lock on it.
Can we get in?
Oh yeah. Follow me.
If she knew about this nice private shower why didn't she just go there herself?
Oh well, don't look a gift horse in its mouth.
It's actually hidden so don't tell anyone.
How do you know about it?
Another girl showed it to me.
Just follow me.
See? Nice right.
Yeah, it's very strange to be hidden though.
Charles is a strange dude.
You and him haven't done anything have you?
God no. He's a creep. But he's a creep that is out of town which means no one will bother us here.
Any complaints?
You're a very beautiful girl Tia.
Awh, you're quite handsome yourself. You're not just saying that so I'll touch your dick are you?
No, although knowing that you're about to do that definitely doesn't make you any less hot.
Well then we should start.
Seeing my ass bounce around wasn't enough to make you hard? Tough crowd.
I don't mind working for it.
It's already big and you're not even hard yet.
I bet I'm not the first girl to jump you in a shower.
I mean considering Shauna, nope.
How does my hand feel?
It feels great. Keep going.
I can feel you growing, stiffening up on me.
I'm going to have to change my angle to get a good grip on you.
Mmmm, here we go.
Ever since I met you the other day I knew I'd be on my knees for you.
This was my first chance. Every other time I've seen you, you were with someone else.
Be honest with me. Was that really 'your' shower?
Yes, it actually is. But I usually just wait for whoever is in it to leave. When you said it was you I figured I'd invite myself in.
And here we are.
Such a big boy. My hand can just glide on your cock all day.
Man, those big brown eyes staring at me while she strokes me...
You know, I shower there almost every morning.
I wouldn't mind having a shower buddy.
Yeah? I might pop in from time to time.
Mmmmm... do you have a condom?
Uhh, I came in here completely naked. I don't.
Damn...
Guess we're sticking to the basics today.
Not risking becoming a mom today. Even though this cock is very convincing.
Bring one next time.
I will. I'm enjoying this anyway.
I am too. Gives us something to look forward to. There's still a lot of fun things we can do. Like this.
Ohhh, that's good.
Mhmmmm.
She's moaning and making her tongue vibrate...
Hmmm, I planned on sucking you dry but I need something too. I'm so fucking hot.
Don't stick it in me. Just let me grind on it.
Promise.
I promise.
Jesus Tia, you weren't kidding. You're fucking hot down there.
It's your fault, now fix it.
If it goes in me then this is over.
Fuck me... this feels fucking great.
Your huge cock rubbing against my wet pussy. Against my clit...
Her thighs feel so different than [g1]'s. [g1] has soft inviting thighs and Tia's are toned and are squeezing me.
They're completely different but they're both great.
I want to squeeze every last drop out of you. I want you to shoot your cum across this room.
This started out kind of rough but her pussy is so fucking wet that I'm just sliding in and out now.
About to cum big boy? Give Tia what she wants.
Shoot your cum for me daddy.
AHHHNNNGHH!!..
Oh I can feel that cock throbbing! My thighs squeezing every bit of sperm that you have out.
So, was that a coincidence or do you just really like being called daddy?
Good timing, but I do like it.
Was I a good girl for daddy?
You were great.
Do I deserve a kiss?
Mwah!
Yes you do.
Thank you daddy. Get that condom and then make me scream it instead of just saying it.
You'll be seeing me soon Tia.
I should head out before the showers start to fill up.
Yeah, I left my clothes back at the other shower so I need to run back there.
I'll see you around Tia, thanks for this.
See you [mcf]. I'll clean up our mess and then head out.
Hmmm, not yet.
Maybe next time when I have a condom you can earn it.
Oooooh, yes daddy.
Get that condom and then make me scream daddy instead of just saying it.
You'll be seeing me soon Tia.
I should head out before the showers start to fill up.
Yeah, I left my clothes back at the other shower so I need to run back there.
I'll see you around Tia, thanks for this.
See you [mcf]. I'll clean up our mess and then head out.
Time to head home. Well no, I need to stop by Willow's and check on her.
That should only take a minute.
A few minutes later
Oh, she's sleeping. Guess she's skipping class too.
Her door is unlocked. It might be a bit weird to enter but I want to make sure she's okay.
Willow? Are you awake?
...
Nope, she's out. I can chill for a moment and see if she wakes up.
This really doesn't look like it would be Willow's place. Way too... colorful.
I could take a look around and see if I can learn anything about her.
I just can't see Willow hanging these up.
It's a cozy little place, I guess that's her bed.
Maybe I should put her in it.
Hnnnmmmmm...
Willow?
Guess she's just having a dream.
Ahhhhhnnn...
Willow? Everything okay?
Hnnnnaa....
Must be having a nightmare. Poor thing.
Let me get her to her bed. She might sleep better.
Please don't wake up and freak out.
Easy does it.
Damn, for one of the taller girls Willow sure is light.
She's out cold, I should just lay her down and then get out of here.
There you are. It's pretty hot in here so I'm going to leave her over the covers.
Guess I'm heading home now. I'll check on her again sometime.
[mcf]? Where am I?
Hey there sleepyhead. You're in your bed.
How did I get here?
I carried you. You were asleep on your couch.
Oh... are you leaving?
I was about to since you were sleeping.
No, I'm awake.
You want me to stay?
Yes.
Thank you again.
You're being awfully nice Willow.
And?
Just feels weird. I don't think you're a bad person or anything but you've came off pretty tough the few times we've talked.
I am, you helped me though so I'm being nice.
I'll probably go back to my usual self so enjoy this while you can.
Why not just be nice all the time?
Too much effort. It's just not who I am.
So, what did happen this morning.
Let's go back to the couch and talk there.
I just carried you up that ladder, but sure.
Sit.
So what happened? Tell me.
No.
No? Why not?
You don't need to know.
I would like to know.
You don't need to know [mcf]. Leave it alone.
You're a weird girl Willow. Are you safe? Will you need anymore help?
I don't know.
What the fuck Willow, just tell me. I can help. Whatever it is.
No, no. Don't get sad. I'm just frustrated. I want to help Willow.
I don't think you can [mcf].
Just explain whatever you're going through and I'll tell you how I can help.
It's not that simple.
I don't even know how to explain it. If I need you I'll let you know, okay?
Ugh, fine. Don't hesitate to call me.
I won't.
If you change your mind and need to talk about it. I'm only a phonecall away.
Lean back.
Why?
Just do it.
Willow, why are you sitting in my lap?
Because I want to.
We shouldn't.
It's not a move, I just wanted to sit here. It's nice isn't it?
I just wish I could understand you Willow. I haven't gotten there yet.
I'm really not that complicated.
Well I'd like to get to know you more.
Is there any chance you could apologize to [g1] for me?
Hmmm, can you just tell her I apologized?
Yeah, I can. If she asks you will you deny it?
No. Like I said I didn't mean it. Was just trying to make Rainn laugh.
We should hang out sometime. Do you have to do anything today?
Yeah I do. We'll make plans soon.
Mwah!
She just kissed my cheek...
You shouldn't do that Willow.
It was just a thank you for the ride this morning. Nothing more.
What was that for?
A final thank you for the ride this morning.
I know I'm not your favorite person so the fact you still picked me up was nice.
I told you I don't think you're a bad person Willow.
Can we just stay like this for a bit?
For a little bit sure. I do need to head home though.
Just a few minutes.
What the fuck?!
Elizabeth? What are you doing here?
What the fuck are you doing here?
I just told you it was hard to see you with other girls and now you're here cuddling Willow.
I gave her a ride this morning. I just came by to check on her.
Does checking on her include holding her like a baby?
Leave.
Liz, talk to me.
I love and care about you. Nothing you said has to matter. You can come back with me and we'll work it out.
I know things are different and I know things changed quickly. But everyone is happy.
Why not me [mcf]?
We've talked about it, we wanted to give you time to get used to your new life here.
We wanted to make sure everything was good between everyone.
You need to go.
Liz...
...
At least I know where she's staying now.
I would've been scared about her staying with Willow but she really doesn't seem like a bad girl.
What was that about?
Elizabeth is [g1]'s sister.
Yeah I knew that.
What? She jealous that you're not including her in your little three way relationship?
That's why she was crying last night.
She was crying?
I helped her through it. Hey! That's how I can pay you back for the ride.
I'll get Elizabeth back on your side.
I'd appreciate some help.
I should probably leave though.
Let me give you a hug first.
Thanks for checking on me.
Anytime Willow.
I'll talk to her for you. Not really sure what to say but I'll figure it out.
I'll see you soon okay?
Sure will.
And if you tell anyone what happened here. I'll ruin your life. Understood?
Noted. Won't tell anyone.
And don't expect nice Willow all the time.
Bye [mcf].
See ya Willow.
A few minutes later
Feels good to be back here. I see they've been busy while I was gone.
Place seems quiet...
Damn, they've gotten a lot done actually. I wonder how much is left.
I hope we don't have to start moving stuff right away. I'd like to relax a bit.
Baby... Turn around.
[g1], you look amazing...
You like it?
I love it, I wouldn't mind coming home to this everyday.
We can make that happen. I love you [mcf].
I love you too [g1].
Are we the only ones here?
It's just me and Shauna. [am], Stacy, and Rachael all went to pick out some furniture.
We figured you've been so stressed lately... it might be nice to just lay in bed with your girlfriends.
I definitely wouldn't say no to it. Thank you girls.
It's what we're here for.
We have some things to talk about though babe.
Later, right now is about forgetting everything else for a little bit.
They talked about that this morning when they thought I was still out.
I'll relax for a bit and do whatever they want me to do. It sounds nice.
Well there is this one thing I can't get out of my head.
Oh? What is it?
What your ass looks like in that fishnet. Can you turn around for me.
Hehe, first...
Mwah!
Getting tired of my kisses yet?
Not even close. Keep 'em coming. Well, after I get a view anyway.
Oh yeah, you're never allowed to take that off.
Haha, I'll put it on anytime you want me to baby.
Oh, getting handsy?
Can't help myself.
I don't mind... babe?
Yeah?
Would you change anything about me?
Not a damn thing. You're perfect to me.
Hehe...
You're perfect to me too. So...
You ready to relax?
Yeah, I believe I am.
Okay, we have a little surprise. Nothing major.
Shauna! Cut the lights!
What do you think?
Oooh, mood lighting.
Well... kinda. We wanted to do something nice but all we could find were some color changing lights. I wish we could have done more.
I love it [g1]. Thank you for this.
Of course, now come on. Shauna's waiting on us.
I hope she's in a similar outfit.
Damn girls, you both look incredible.
Come lay down.
Hey. How did tryouts go?
About as well as they could have gone. It's hard to think about that right now though.
Thank you for setting this up for me.
You're always doing things for us, it's our turn to do things for you.
Mwah!
This will be an often thing.
You girls don't have to do this.
We want to. Now just lay there and relax.
We've also setup a TV so we can all just lay here and relax... together.
What do you want to watch?
I wouldn't mind just laying here with you two honestly.
Come on, we spent a lot of time getting it to work.
Okay, how about the news then? I haven't heard anything other than WVM all week.
It'll be nice to hear about anything else.
Sure thing baby.
I'm a little shocked.
Why's that?
We expected a fight from you.
You telling us that you don't need to relax and you wanting to get straight into moving.
Shauna's ass is amazing too. Especially in that outfit.
Both of my girls are completely sexy...
I wonder what my real mom would think about this...
Hello?
Oh sorry. I just got caught in a thought.
Do you need any help [g1]?
No! You better not get up!
I'll hold him down.
I think I got it, I'll be there in just a second...
Okay it's ready... just have to find the remote.
I think [mcf] is laying on it.
So what were you two talking about?
I was telling him that we expected him to fight back.
Well, yeah... We did.
It sounds like you girls wanted me to.
Just a little. It sounded fun to force you to relax.
To be honest with you girls I needed this.
I'm tired... Things are both the best they've ever been and the worst at the same time.
I knew coming to WVM wasn't going to be easy, I just didn't expect so many issues this quickly.
That's why it's our job to do this.
You wouldn't be here if it wasn't for me.
Don't say that Shauna.
It's true though.
Shauna...
I think he's wearing too many clothes to relax [g1]. Want to help me fix that?
Yes I do.
Okay, not the time to bring up anything. Just relax...
Your pants are difficult [mcf].
Probably easier to take off if you use your teeth.
Haha, nice try.
There we go.
Okay, now it's time to relax.
I had something else in mind.
No, no. Not yet. First we're just going to chill.
How much time do we have?
Don't worry about that. We have plenty.
Shauna and I are still very sleepy. Do you mind if we lay our heads on your chest?
I don't mind at all.
I love you girls.
I love both of you too.
I love you both...
Now just watch some news and forget about everything else. Maybe even take a nap with us.
We'll wake you up if you have anymore... you know.
Yeah, I could probably use a nap.
And thank you for letting us do this.
Thank you for doing it. Now get some rest.
Yes baby.
Why can't this just be life. Laying in bed with two gorgeous women that care about me.
I just need to enjoy it while I can.
I wonder what's happening on the news.
You turn the TV on with the remote and change it to the local news channel.
Hello everyone! Welcome to WVM news! My name is Moon and I'll be running you through today's news.
Fuck, it's just news about WVM and I already threw the remote to the side.
Let's keep the trend going by talking about basketball first! A surprise schedule change has everyone at WVM reeling!
Our very own WVM Stars, which is led by our very own star [mcf]... they will be taking on the Briars ahead of schedule!
That's right everyone, our season opener will be the opener for the entire league! Broadcasted across the country!
Sure... it's just a preseason game but we'll get to see our new team in action!
This girl looks familiar.
If the rumors are true, we'll be seeing a lot of [mcf] in that game. You won't want to miss it!
Oh! I've just received breaking news!
There has been yet another update in our new star's love life!
Fuck me, I'm turning this off... wait, the remote.
Just have to reach around [g1] for it...
Got it... and off.
Why do people care about my love life that much?
Is there nothing else to talk about?
Damn, I think the girls are already asleep. They must still be exhausted.
I might as well join them. Not like I'm moving anytime soon.
Just need to relax... slow my breathing. Think about something random.
...
...
Hmmm...
Huh? Where am I?
Oh fuck, this is my old house. Am I in another dream?
The other ones I always felt panic. Like something awful was about to happen.
This one is different... calm.
Honey? Are you awake?
Mom?
Yeah it's me.
What happened?
You fell asleep watching cartoons. I know you don't like it when I bug you while you sleep...
You just looked so peaceful.
No, I don't mind. You can stay.
Awh honey, I should let you stay up late to watch cartoons more often.
Come here.
I love you [mcf].
I love you too mom.
Listen, we're already up way past bedtime. Let's make it worse.
Want some cereal?
Uhh, sure.
I thought you would. I'll get you some.
Thanks mom.
All the other dreams felt rushed and pieced together. This one is slow and clear.
I've never seen my mom like this. Every memory I have has always been somewhat negative.
I guess I'll follow her.
I wonder what causes me to have these dreams. Last time I slept with Shauna and [g1] I didn't have any. Or at least I don't remember having any.
Why is this so clear? It just feels like I'm living it.
Uh oh...
What is it?
I'm so sorry.
We're out of cereal... Please don't be upset.
I'll get some more in the morning I promise.
It's okay. I don't need cereal. I'm still tired.
I guess Stacy must have eaten the rest of it, that's okay.
Who is Stacy?
My sister.
Oh honey, you really are sleepy. Let's lay back down.
Uhh, okay.
Would it be too much to ask for you to sleep in Mommy's lap?
You don't have to.
Sure mom.
Ugh, it hurts seeing her try her best like this.
There must have been a lot of stress and pain in this house.
I like seeing her smile. I feel so close to her but she also feels like a stranger.
There's no doubt in my mind that she's the one I tackled last night.
I at least need to have one conversation with her. Clear all of this up.
Maybe these dreams will stop then.
Sleep well honey, we'll watch some more cartoons when you get up.
Goodnight mom. Do you want to lay down too?
No, I just want to sit here and watch you sleep. Keep you safe.
You're my baby boy. I'll never let anyone take you from me.
Mwah!
Ah, she kissed my nose. That tingled.
I love you honey, now close those eyes and go back to sleep.
...
....
Huh? What's that feeling?
It feels like...
Yep, like that.
Hey there sleepy head.
Hey.
I hope you don't mind us waking you up this way.
I don't mind. I'll actually be upset anytime I'm not waken up this way.
Haha, keep dreaming.
[g1] with her serious face again... so fucking cute.
Hey baby. How'd you sleep?
Very well. How long was I asleep?
We've all been asleep for about 2 hours. Did you have any dreams?
Damn, 2 hours. We're still the only ones here?
Yeah I did. It was a good memory though.
Want to talk about it?
Maybe, I'd like to continue what's happening here first.
I thought you might say that.
Oh, I like where this is going.
Hold on baby.
*Whispering* I talked to Shauna before we woke you up. I think she's ready.
I have to use the ladies room before we start. Yesterday was my turn, today should be hers.
You want me to make a move on her?
Yes I do.
Okay.
Mmmm, no questions asking to make sure? Good boy.
I'll be right back.
Oh, you can tell Shauna is nervous to be alone with me right now.
What's wrong Shauna?
Oh, nothing.
Nervous?
Yeah...
This isn't our first time alone like this.
Doesn't it feel like it is though?
Those other times were great... this is different. We're a couple.
It feels like the first time again. Same nerves I felt that day in my room.
We can wait some more Shauna. No need to rush back into it.
No, I want you [mcf].
Did you ever think we'd be here?
Think it? No.
Dream about it? Yes. You know I've always had a crush on you... Like a bad one.
Have you ever done this before?
You know I haven't. I've played with toys before but never anything real.
I'm just scared to make the first move.
Mwah!
I'm willing to bet you're ready.
What's that supposed to mean?
I bet you're soaking wet.
Me? Look at you!
Hard as a rock!
Oh yeah?
Oh!
[mcf]!
What? I already moved my hand away. Yours is still there.
Shut up...
What do you want to do Shauna?
Lay on your back please.
I'm willing to bet you're ready.
What's that supposed to mean?
You're as hard as a rock.
Me? Look at you!
Hard as a rock also!
Oh yeah?
Oh!
[mcf]!
What? I already moved my hand away. Yours is still there.
Shut up...
What do you want to do Shauna?
Lay on your back please.
Okay...
Are you okay?
Yeah, I'm just realizing where I am right now.
There's a lot of emotions...
Shauna, come here.
On top of you?
Yes, we're not doing anything. I just want you to get closer.
Okay...
Are you ready to do this? Forget the past or anything that's telling you that you have to.
Deep down, is this what you want to do right now?
Yes... I really do.
More than anything I want to do this.
I want to be your girl in every way I can be. There's just something stopping me.
What is it?
Nerves... I go to do it then my stomach gets tight and I psych myself out.
I think I need to just do it and then I'll be fine. Like a kid first riding a bike.
Are you two...?
No, Shauna's nervous and I'm trying to let her know that everything is okay.
Awh...
What happened Shauna? I thought this is what you wanted?
It is [g1]. It really is.
*whispering* What did you tell me earlier?
I can totally hear her. She has to know that.
What did you want to be for him?
... His good girl...
What else did you say?
That I'd do anything for him, even put his needs above my own.
So what do you think you should do right now to accomplish that?
Do whatever he wants?
Mhmm, good girl. You know what he wants.
Is [g1] training Shauna?
She's not making her do anything, if anything she's helping her get what she wants. It's just a strange way to go about it.
Okay [mcf], I'm ready.
Are you sure?
Mhmmm.
Whatever [g1] is doing, it's working.
Oh fuck Shauna.
Damn Shauna, you have a really long tongue. Let me see.
Jesus... [mcf] is a lucky man.
I can agree to that. How long is your tongue babe?
Mmm, not very long.
You girls are so fucking cute. And your tongue is plenty long enough [g1].
Hehe, back to work Shauna. I want to watch.
Good girl. He really likes it when you play with the tip.
Flick your tongue around at the bottom of the head, that makes him twitch.
Oh, I can't just watch anymore. Keep it up Shauna.
Shauna looks like she wants me to say something.
You're doing great Shauna. That feels amazing.
Try to go deeper Shauna.
Seems like [g1] is getting a good show...
Oh, she's staring at me and not what Shauna is doing.
Her playing with herself while Shauna plays with me is honestly really hot.
Enjoy it baby.
She may be enjoying this more than I am. And that's saying a lot.
Oh!...
Didn't expect her to just go for it.
Damn Shauna...
Mmmm...
This is a moment I think I'll remember forever. My first time with Shauna and our first time together as a whole group.
Last night doesn't count as first since Shauna just watched.
I guess this is the norm now. Not that I'm complaining.
MMHmmm...
Ohhh! Shauna...
He..
..lp
What was that?
I think she needs help to reach the bottom.
Mhmmm.
Go ahead [mcf]. Help your good girl.
Holy...
Mmmmm...
Is she moaning [mcf]?
Mhmmm, she is.
Hold it, see how long she can hold her breath.
Mhmmm.
Okay, just tap my thigh when I need to let go.
I'll count... 1!
2!
3!...
...84!
Damn Shauna! Is she okay?
Tap, tap, tap.
*Heavy breathing* Oh damn... That was tough.
That was impressive!
Hell yeah it was.
I think it's Shauna's turn for some fun.
Climb onto [mcf]'s chest Shauna.
Okay.
Shauna is becoming way less shy about showing herself.
Like this?
That's perfect.
What are you going to do? You don't have to do anything.
Do you ever use your fingers?
What do you mean?
You know what I mean.
Uhh, yeah... I do.
That's what I'm going to do.
Ahhhmmm!
Damn, that really got a reaction out of her.
Did that hurt?
No, god no.
I know that feeling, your entire body is reacting to him.
Mhmm..
And that's just his finger.
Want to find out what the real thing feels like?
[g1]... Are you sure?
Absolutely.
Don't you want to be his Shauna? Don't you want to give yourself to him?
Yes I do...
I want him to be my first and only.
Good. Are you ready?
I think so.
Lay on his chest. Let him hold you. I'll guide him in.
Thank you [g1].
Are you ready for him Shauna?
I love you so fucking much [mcf].
I love you too Shauna. Just tell me if I need to slow down or anything okay? Don't let me hurt you.
You could never hurt me. Just hold me... Look me in my eyes while we...
In we go...
AAAHHHmmmmmm!
Oh shit, I slid right in but you're fucking tight.
Mmmm, good girl. Give her a second to adjust to it [mcf].
No, no. I'm ready.
Are you sure? If you need a second then take it.
No. Please, fuck me [mcf].
Hard, fuck me hard.
Damn Shauna, you're surprising me. Give her what she wants [mcf].
AHHHMMM!
Holy shit [mcf]! Don't stop! Harder!
Jesus Shauna, you're amazing.
She's breathing so heavily already.
Are you okay Shauna?
Fuck yes, please don't stop!
AOOOooommmmm!!
AHHH!!!
[mcf]!!!
Holy... I can't... that's all I can take...
Did you?
Oh yeah...
I'm sorry, I didn't think I'd finish so quickly.
When you started going I couldn't control anything. My entire body is shaking.
How do you feel Shauna?
Like I'm on drugs. I'm dizzy and numb but I feel like I'm in heaven.
Okay.
Shauna is becoming way less shy about showing herself.
Like this?
That's perfect.
What are you going to do? You don't have to do anything.
Do you ever use your fingers?
What do you mean?
You know what I mean.
Uhh, yeah... I do.
That's what I'm going to do.
Ahhhmmm!
Damn, that really got a reaction out of her.
Did that hurt?
No, god no.
I know that feeling, your entire body is reacting to him.
Mhmm..
And that's just his finger.
Want to find out what the real thing feels like?
[g1]... Are you sure?
Absolutely.
Don't you want to be his Shauna? Don't you want to give yourself to him?
Yes I do...
I want him to be my first and only.
Good. Are you ready?
I think so.
Lay on his chest. Let him hold you. I'll guide him in.
Thank you [g1].
Are you ready for him Shauna?
I love you so fucking much [mcf].
I love you too Shauna. Just tell me if I need to slow down or anything okay? Don't let me hurt you.
You could never hurt me. Just hold me... Look me in my eyes while we...
In we go...
AAAHHHmmmmmm!
Oh shit, I slid right in but you're fucking tight.
Mmmm, good girl. Give her a second to adjust to it [mcf].
No, no. I'm ready.
Are you sure? If you need a second then take it.
No. Please, fuck me [mcf].
Hard, fuck me hard.
Damn Shauna, you're surprising me. Give her what she wants [mcf].
AHHHMMM!
Holy shit [mcf]! Don't stop! Harder!
Jesus Shauna, you're amazing.
She's breathing so heavily already.
Are you okay Shauna?
Fuck yes, please don't stop!
AOOOooommmmm!!
AHHH!!!
[mcf]!!!
Holy... I can't... that's all I can take...
Did you?
Oh yeah...
I'm sorry, I didn't think I'd finish so quickly.
When you started going I couldn't control anything. My entire body is shaking.
How do you feel Shauna?
Like I'm on drugs. I'm dizzy and numb but I feel like I'm in heaven.
That was amazing.
You were amazing too Shauna.
I only lasted like 20 seconds...
You had a lot of build up. Many years of it in fact.
Getting her off that quickly was actually really hot anyway.
Can you go anymore?
I'm sorry, I need a break.
That's okay. I understand.
What about you [g1]?
I'm still just mesmerized by that.
Was it a good show?
It was really fucking hot...
Do you want a turn?
Tag! [g1]'s it!
Come on baby, you're it.
I wanted you two to have more time... but I won't say no...
Lay on your back [g1].
Like this?
Exactly like that.
Actually, slide towards the end of the bed just a little bit.
There we go. Are you ready? Need me to start slow?
No baby, just like Shauna. I want you to give it to me.
Here we go.
AHHHmmm!!
Fuck!
Give her a second [mcf].
Ahhhmmm...
[g1] was right, this is hot.
I'm ready, I'm ready. Fuck me [mcf].
Ohhhmmm...
Ohhh is right, you're rocking me too and I'm still sensitive.
I'm sorry Shauna.
I didn't say it was a bad thing.
Mmmm.... How is it baby?
I love everything about this... I love sharing this moment with you two.
Mhmmmmm... I want it to be us three forever.
Forever and ever.
Or more, just at least us three.
Mmmm.... I think Shauna's still a little too shy to ask so I will. Was she a good girl?
She was... and so are you [g1]. You're my two perfect girls.
Fuck [mcf]... Why can I never... Mmmmm....
Are you close baby?
I'm very close...
Cum on both of us. We want it.
Mhmmm...
I'm gonna... Mmmmhoooo....!!
HHHHHHNNNNNNNMMMMMMMMMGGGGGHHHH!!!!
Jesus [mcf]!
I'm about to cum too!
HNNNGG... On us baby!
Look at me [g1].
I'm looking. Please, please, please give it to me baby.
Open your mouth.
Just a few more...
I'm gonna...
AHHNNNGGggghh!!!
Oh fuck... that was a lot... I'm not done...
Jesus! How are you not done? That was so much!
It's her turn babe.
Fuck, it hurts to hold...
Oh!
Hnnnnggg!
Mmmm... It's so warm.
Don't wipe it off Shauna. Keep it.
I didn't want to wipe it off.
Like our new look?
I love it. You girls can wipe it off if you want to.
Not yet.
I have an idea.
What is it?
I've been thinking. We should start taking pictures to remember some of these memories.
Don't you think this is a memory worth remembering?
Absolutely.
Please hand me my phone babe... it's behind you.
Sure.
Say cheese!
Cheese!
Click
Oh that's a good picture.
You're so beautiful [g1].
Me? Look at your eyes!
Send that to me.
Bzz, Bzz.
Oh! [am], Rachael, and Stacy are on their way back now.
Uh oh.
It's okay, we have time to clean up still.
Do you want me to send it to you too [mcf]?
Yeah, that's definitely a memory to keep forever. Send it.
Hehe, okay.
Let me get a closer look before you girls clean up.
Fucking amazing...
It won't be the last time we look like this.
No, it definitely won't be.
Thank you [mcf].
No, thank you girls. I couldn't ask for a better thing to come home to.
Get used to it. Now let's get cleaned up. We have to move all these lights back.
Ha, true. We'll worry about that after we have some clothes on though.
I'll be right back.
Okay baby.
A few minutes and one clean up later
Oh damn, they already have everything straightened up...
Damn you girls are fast.
We just threw on some pajamas. Nothing amazing.
I disagree. You girls in pajamas is amazing.
Hehe, sit down babe.
How do you feel Shauna?
In love.
Ha, I love you too. But I meant physically... are you sore?
Tingly, really tingly. In a very good way.
So you're not in pain?
Nope, I was ready for that.
Good, now sit up here with us.
Hehe, yes sir.
Thank you girls for doing that for me. It means a lot.
[mcf]...
You deserve it... and a million other things.
What she said. And we have much more planned.
Like what?
Nuh uh, you'll find out.
We're going to be the best girlfriends we could possibly be.
You already are. I could never ask for more.
Hey... hey.
Exactly, those words exactly. 'I could never ask for more'.
That's how I've felt since our first date... and every single day without me ever asking, you give more.
So that's part of being the best, giving without being asked.
Think about it...
Ever since that day you stood up for me I was hooked on you.
You were the first person to show me that I mattered.
From that day on I weaseled my way into being your bestfriend... And now girlfriend.
I never asked for a thing... but you knew what I needed and gave it to me.
So don't ask... just let us do what we think you need.
Okay... I look forward to the surprises girls.
And we look forward to them too.
Tomorrow sounds good.
Yes it does.
Hey, it does to me too.
Hey [mcf].
Yes babe?
Should we talk about the job with Rachael?
Oh, yeah... I've been wondering what you thought about it.
Well I-
Knock, knock
That must be them.
I'll get it girls. We should talk about this with Rachael anyway.
Coming!
[mcf]!
Hey mom. How has your day been?
It's been spent thinking about you. How was your day?
It's been great actually. No need to worry right now.
Find any good furniture?
Two couches and a table. So yes.
That's all? I was expecting more.
Rachael has always been picky...
Do you have to do anything today?
A few things. Help Rachael move, go to a party tonight and I'm meant to find a therapist to talk to.
Do you have any free time for us to hang out?
I sure do mom. I'd love to spend some time with you.
Thank you...
You smell really nice mom.
Another new perfume.
It's even better than the last.
Mwah!
Oh, excuse me...
Hey Rachael.
Hey kid.
You still good to help me move this stuff in?
Sure am. But I thought it was going to be more. I even invited one of my teammates to help out.
Oh shit, I never messaged him the address...
Blame the store for having bad furniture. And hey, free team bonding exercise.
Ha, fair enough.
I'm going to go take my heels off... let me know when you're free [mcf].
I will mom, just relax some please.
I will.
Was that a kiss I saw?
Yes you saw a mom kiss her son.
Whatever you say... it was cute.
Next time just give her a little tongue.
Jesus Rachael.
Haha, I'm just saying...
Did [g1] tell you about Keyana?
No, what happened?
She showed up this morning to resign the contract. [am] was here and she was trying to talk about you.
Keyana was upset about you not being here. So it was a little chaotic for a moment.
Damn, she didn't let anything slip did she?
[g1] saved the day and got her to calm down. Told her she would let you know when she was here.
Are you two talking about the thing?
No, not yet. Shouldn't Shauna be here for the talk?
She's keeping [am] in the other room. She feels the same as I do.
Okay then. So what's up?
You have a keeper is what's up.
She's in... even got me to increase your percentage of the cut.
I think it's amazing baby.
The idea of you caring enough to make all these girls' dreams come true... you're amazing [mcf].
She does have a few things she wants...
She wants to know who the women are and when it happens.
She also wants a communication line between you three and them. So they can keep themselves and you updated on the pregnancies.
Everything else is the same?
Yep, they'll never bother you about the kids. You get them pregnant and your job is done. You're free to talk to them as much as you want to though.
You'll be getting 25 percent now. Which is a shit ton of money.
And you'll only get girls that you agree to. It's a deal that is insanely in your favor.
But it's up to you.
But our prior talks make me think you're okay with it. Right?
Yeah, let's make it happen Rachael.
Perfect.
Since [g1] and Shauna are okay with it... let's make it happen Rachael.
Perfect.
It's still a lot Rachael.
My parents weren't there for me... I don't know if I could live with myself knowing I'm the father of children I'll never see.
Are you sure? I get it... but it's a once in a lifetime opportunity.
I want to know my children Rachael. I don't think I can do it.
I thought I might could... but I can't.
I'm sorry for wasting your time.
I'm not angry. I didn't really expect to get this far with it.
We'll think of some others way to get you some money. Don't worry.
Are you really sure? I liked the idea of a bunch of little versions of you out there.
I'm sorry [g1]. I want to raise my kids.
I'll support you whatever you choose.
Just think about those women... all with dreams of having a child but for some reason they can't.
You'd be making their lives better. And who knows, maybe some of the girls would let you be in the kids' life?
I don't think I can do it babe.
That's okay... I understand. I won't try to force you into something you don't want.
You're the most selfless person alive [g1]. I love you so much.
Mwah!
Baby, all those women that want kids but can't have them for whatever reason...
You're going to change their lives forever. You're going to make them so happy and they're going to have the best kids ever.
You're amazing.
Babe, are you sure? Have you really thought about it?
There will be women carrying and having my children. Are you sure you're okay with that?
I promise it's okay if you're not. I don't want to do it if you're uncomfortable in any way.
Honestly? I think I'd be a little sad if you didn't.
I love seeing you make people happy. You're incredible at it.
Now you have an opportunity to permanently change these girls' lives. There's no negatives babe.
I'll never say no to anything like that.
And Keyana and her wife seem like lovely women.
Rachael told me you met them. Thank you for calming her down.
No problem baby, it's my part to play in this.
You're the most selfless person alive [g1]. I love you so much.
Mwah!
I love you so much too.
You two are too cute for me...
So [mcf]. Where's your friend at?
I might've forgotten to message him the address, he can be here quick though... probably.
Message him and find out.
Damien? Tell him to bring Jasmine.
I will... uhh, where's Stacy by the way?
She's outside in the truck... on the phone.
I'm going to step outside to talk to him and say hey to Stacy then.
Sounds good...
Keyana should be here soon. I'll either tell or message you when.
But [am] is here?
You'll meet Keyana in my room. [am] won't be back there. There's a way to get in through the fire escape outside.
Okay... sounds dangerous but I guess I'm down.
Don't worry. It's safe. Now go call that friend of yours.
Don't forget about Jasmine.
I won't forget. Thank you girls.
No, thank you.
Don't forget about Jasmine.
I won't forget. Thank you girls.
No, thank you.
[g1] is too good to me... she is constantly putting me and others above herself.
I'd do anything for her... and just like [am] and Shauna. I'll give her the world one day.
No matter what it takes...
...
I should go see what Stacy is doing now...
Damn, they actually got an entire box truck in this alley.
Guess Stacy is still in the front.
Muffled talking
Haha mom... stop it.
Yeah, he's nice. Really nice.
If you say so mom.
I'm sure he would...
Yeah they're nice too. I promise mom, I'm safe.
Ahem... Stacy.
Oh! You scared me!
No, not you mom... I'll call you back.
Mhmm.. I will... love you too. Bye.
Give me a second [mcf].
Hey. Sorry about that.
Hey Stacy. That was your mom?
Yep, she was just checking in on me. How did the tryouts go?
Really well. Hey, are you still down to come to Zoe's party tonight?
Uhh... about that. My mom is worried about me and wants me to video chat with her tonight. So I can't.
I would if I could though.
Oh, that's okay Stacy. It's no big deal.
Actually... if you get back here in time do you think you could say hi to her?
I told her I was living with all of you... she didn't ask to meet you but I'm sure it would help ease her mind.
Shit, that would be one hell of a way to find out if Stacy is related to me.
Uhh, sure. If I'm here I'd be more than happy to say hey to her.
Thank you [mcf].
No problem, I know what it's like to have a mom worry about you.
I'd do anything to help ease [am]'s mind.
I owe you.
Nah, you don't owe me anything. This hug is payment enough.
Oh, I told Rachael I would be inside to help her out as soon as I got off the phone.
I won't hold you here. But what does Rachael need?
She wants me to help plan her office out... where everything goes.
Oh, well good luck with that Stacy.
Haha, thank you. See you inside.
Guess it's time to call Damien.
Ring, Ring
Ring, ring, ring
Come on, pick up Damien.
Hello?
Hey Damien, it's [mcf].
Hey! What happened to that address bud?
Got a little busy, sorry about that. If you're still down to help I'll send it.
I only have to move a few couches so if you're busy it's fine.
Nah man. I'm already headed to my car. I'll be there.
Thanks man. Oh, [g1] told me to ask if you could bring Jasmine.
Uhh... she's not with me at the moment.
Oh, well that's fine. Thanks again Damien. See you soon.
See you star.
Oh, a message from Bailey.
Hey, cutie. Thinking about you. Did you talk to [g1] about me hanging out sometime?
Got a little caught up in things. Sorry Bailey. I'll ask her in just a minute. I'll see you at the party tonight.
... ding
That's okay. I know you must be busy. I'll see you tonight. <3
Don't forget. Party starts at 8pm. <3
Oh, a message from Zoe.
Party at 8pm! You better be there!
See you there Zoe.
Yes you will. ;)
Oh, Rachael just sent me a message.
Urgent! Keyana is already here. I don't suppose you saw her in the alley but she's already in my room.
Can you make it in there?
Oh shit. I guess this is happening now.
Yeah, I can make it.
Sorry for the abruptness. They didn't tell me they were on their way.
It's okay, I got this.
I know you do.
Time to head to a fire escape.
Should be this window then just a hallway to Rachael's room
Fuck, [g1] and Shauna just drained me. I hope I can still perform.
[mcf]! We finally meet again!
Come here!
You look even better than last time.
I thought I might not see you again!
Yeah, I heard about what happened. I'm sorry about that.
It's okay, it's not anyone's fault. Just a very unfortunate series of events.
So where's the mystery wife?
She had to use the ladies' room before we start.
Here... sit down. I'll go let her know you're here. She'll appreciate the heads up.
Sure. I'll be here.
Damn, was Rachael's room this kitted last night?
No way, probably just some of the other things they've gotten done already.
How much did Rachael tell [g1] and Shauna? Do they know about the other girls?
I have so many questions for them. I hope [am] doesn't get home before I can ask.
Hello?
[mcf], meet Brittany.
It's nice to meet you Brittany.
Mmm, she's short.
It's nice to meet you too.
You have amazing eyes.
Hey now, slow it down.
Hehe, thank you.
So is this really about to happen?
It really is.
Can I touch you?
You sure can.
Mmm, you're muscular.
She likes toned.
Explains how you locked her up Keyana.
I didn't give you permission to hit on my wife.
My apologies.
Do it again.
Your wife has a special aura about her.
She has a very sweet and caring attitude, she also seems like she knows how to have fun.
She also has a fierce side that makes her stand out. On top of all that she's beautiful as can be.
Well shit... do you want to just come live with us?
Haha, that's what I'm saying.
Fuck... Rachael knew what she was doing with you...
Anyway, back to business. We've set up a few rules.
What do I need to do?
Whatever we say.
Okay, what do you two have to do?
Whatever the other one says.
She decides for me and I decide for her.
Starting with what you already know. You being her first man.
Now it's her turn.
She didn't tell me that she already told you that.
Oooh, payback time then. What does she have to do?
Hmmm... Well...
She denies it but I think she's really into anal play...
Holy shit.
I guess we're just letting it all out there then. Haha
Are you against it?
Even if I was I promised her I'd do whatever she'd say.
But are you?
Hey, hey, we ask the questions here!
Final chance to back out baby. Are you sure you want to do this?
Yes! Let's do it.
That's quite the mood change from earlier.
I like him...
Damn, they actually have a very cute relationship.
They'd probably be great moms. That's really nice to know.
Fuck it... let's have a baby.
Fuck it! Let's do it!
I'll follow your lead.
Let's start it how we always do.
Mwah!
Oh, they must like to take things a little slowly.
Nevermind.
Let's show him the goods baby.
Wow...
She has huge boobs for her small frame.
Hell yeah she does. You have really nice shaped boobs as well Keyana.
Do you want to touch them?
Sure.
Hey, hey! Real quick.
I like you... but if she says stop then you better stop. Or you won't be so pretty when you leave here. Understood?
Understood. Same goes for if you say stop for her.
Good boy. Now, have fun.
Damn Brittany, these are great.
You should see them when she's bouncing around.
I hope me getting pregnant doesn't change them much.
Show him the other side baby.
Okay.
She's thick. See why we chose her to be the one to get pregnant?
You got some hips on you too Keyana. Also I thought it was because you had competitions coming up?
That too.
I think you two will make a fine baby.
Hopefully a boy.
Take off his pants babe.
Why me?
You're closer to them. I'll get his shirt.
I hope you don't disappoint here.
It doesn't feel like he will.
You better show my wife a good time. Don't forget it, you're her first man.
Were you her first woman?
Damn right I was. And I'm not one to share, so consider yourself insanely lucky.
Oh, I do.
Oh my god. It's so big...
Fuck me... honestly, just come home with us.
This is bigger than any of the toys we use.
How did Rachael find you again?
I was randomly in her office.
Fuck, talk about walking into a goldmine.
Let's get onto the bed.
Now I'm sorry. But I get first dibs on my wife. Just enjoy the show.
I can do that.
How are you feeling baby?
Excited... hot...
We should let [mcf] have some fun too.
He can wait.
At least let the poor man play with your feet.
Okay, you do get to decide what I do with him.
I'd much rather play with that ass of hers...
Brittany is staring me down. I think she really wants me to play with Keyana's feet.
Let's give it a shot.
It doesn't feel bad but Keyana isn't paying any attention to it.
If she was then this might actually be something I'm into.
HHnnnhh!!
Brittany is having fun at least.
Didn't Keyana say they were both flexible?
Yep, yes she did.
[mcf], what's wrong?
Nothing is wrong, I'm just enjoying the show.
I see you taking glances at my wife's ass. Go ahead. Pull her shorts down.
Don't have to tell me twice.
I've been wanting to see this ass for a few days now.
Damn Keyana...
She has the cutest butt doesn't she?
Cute doesn't do it justice.
You really like hitting on my wife huh?
I like hitting on both of you.
Well it's working. So I'll let you decide what happens next.
Well Keyana's ass really caught my eye.
I thought you might say that.
There's lube in my bag. Please put some on and we'll get ready.
Yes ma'am.
Are you ready baby?
Mhmmm. Ready for anything.
And it feels like he is too.
Same as you Keyana, ready for anything.
Go for it then big guy.
Fuck... that's big.
I told you... he's bigger than all of our toys.
[mcf], just go for it. This slowly pushing is worse.
Okay Keyana.
AHHNnggg!
Jesus fuck! That's so fucking big!
You asked for it baby.
Fuck... Just wait until it's your turn.
Oh, I'm waiting.
Are you good Keyana?
Yes honey, just start slow.
Heh, guess she changed her mind.
Holy shit!
Stay down baby.
Ahhhmmm... it's so big...
I know baby. How does it feel?
Big! Like it's stretching me out...
In a good way... really fucking good...
I know you... and I know you're a secret anal slut.
Baby...
You can speed up now [mcf].
Thank god, I didn't know if I could hold back from going all out for much longer.
AHHHNNGG!!
Holy fuck!
Damn [mcf]!
I'm gonna!..
Holy shit!!!
AHHNN!!
Fuck baby! I've never seen you squirm like this.
It's nnnggg.... so fucking good!
I can't take anymore... nnnnggg...
Hnnnggg...
I think she's tapping out [mcf].
Guess it's my turn.
Mmmmmm...
Damn baby... you're still gasping...
I knew you loved anal.
Haha, it was so fucking good... fuck.
I guess I do.
I wouldn't mind a turn with Keyana's pussy either. Her ass was great but that pussy looks nice too.
Doubt she could handle anymore right now though.
She looks really hot spread out like that.
Are you ready?
Are you?
Nnnggg... yes she is.
Do you want to be on top? That way you can control everything.
Thank you... yes I would.
Lay down...
Mmm... don't be nervous baby.
I'm not that nervous... I can do this.
Mmm... last reminder. You're her first. Don't fuck it up...
I'm not going to. She'll enjoy this.
You obviously did.
You little... I can't even talk properly now... fuck...
Can I start?
Go for it baby. You're both ready.
NNNNmmm.... You're... right.
I know baby, he's big. You can do this.
Here, let me help.
Oh, okay. Replacing one great view with another.
Heh, her asshole is still quivering.
It didn't take much to get her to that point either. Brittany must be right about Keyana and anal.
You got this baby. Think about why we're here.
We're doing this to have our own little child. Think about that.
Think about all the memories we'll make. But first we have to do this.
HHnnnnmmm....
Good job baby. I know it's a little painful but I also know it's not all pain.
Just hold where you are right now and the pain will go away soon. Just let your body adjust.
Even through the pain it still feels pretty good doesn't it?
Mhmmm...
Good girl, is it getting better?
Mhmmm...
Good, good. How does she feel [mcf]?
Amazing Keyana.
I knew my wife would. Lucky man.
You can start moving whenever you're ready baby.
I'm going to just start fast.
Whatever works for you.
AHHnnnggg...
Damn baby... Watching you bounce like that is really hot.
He's... so fucking big!
I know baby. Keep doing what you're doing. He'll give us a big load and we'll be that much closer to a baby.
Fuck... it feels so different.
Than a toy? Nothing can beat the real thing.
Hnnnggg...
I'm gonna...
Hold it baby... you're doing great.
I can't... I'm gonna.
AHHHNNNMMMM!!
Holy shit baby!
HHHmmggg!!
Fuck, that was a lot... especially considering I just finished with [g1] and Shauna.
Holy shit...
I told you it was good baby.
Did I do it?
Yes Brittany, you did fucking great.
Yes you did. I'm so proud of you.
Now let's let him up. Rachael said we had to be quick.
Okay baby.
Thank you [mcf]. That was great... for many reasons.
Yes it was. You'll hear from us soon okay?
Okay girls. I'm sorry for having to leave right away...
We understand. We kind of pushed our way into you today. So thank you again.
See you soon girls. Maybe we'll be a one and done.
I hope not... I mean I hope so...
Hehe, see you [mcf]. I'll call you soon.
Now put some clothes on and head out.
That went well all things considered...
They're a really cute couple. And I'm happy I'll be making them moms...
I wonder if Damien is here yet...
Guess I just wait for Damien to show up now...
Around 15 minutes pass.
Oh, there he is.
Hey there [mcf].
What's up Damien? Thanks for coming.
I told you. The flake was a one time thing. I'm trying to be your bestfriend not just your teammate.
I honestly appreciate it Damien.
And now that your current bestfriend is now your girlfriend... the position is open.
I wouldn't say that now. I still view Shauna as my bestfriend.
Well she still has some competition.
Haha, sure. She does.
So... anything new between you and Jasmine?
Ahhh, come on man. Let's not talk about her right now.
Oh... okay.
Let's sit for a second.
Now... you know I love Jasmine. I'm just stressed out and frustrated with a few things. I'd like to get away from those for a bit.
I understand Damien. I didn't mean to offend or anything.
Nah, it's not like that.
So... what should we talk about?
Whatever you want to... besides that one thing.
Hmm... Who would you say is your own bestfriend now? You and Lee seem close.
Yeah. Me and him are friends I guess.
Oh, seemed like better friends to me than an 'I guess'.
What's that supposed to mean?
Nothing... just that you two seemed like friends.
Mhmm...
Uhh... tell me about your past some. I don't know much about you.
What's with all the questions anyway? Can't we just have a normal conversation?
It is just a normal conversation Damien. If you don't want to talk about yourself then that's fine. Just say so.
Nah, you're just being a little weird about it.
I'm asking you very simple questions. You're the one being weird about it.
He's gotten defensive already. No point in keeping this going.
But it's whatever. Let me go tell them we're about to start moving stuff in.
[mcf] wait...
Sorry, I know you're just trying to get to know me. I'm just not good at talking about myself.
We're cool man. No need to be sorry.
[mcf], can I ask you something?
Of course you can.
Jasmine... if something happens between me and her...
Do you think she could stay with you until everything is figured out?
That's if anything happens.
I'd be happy to help in any way I can. Jasmine's a friend to all of us here. She's more than welcome anytime.
Thank you...
You didn't even have to ask Damien. You know I wouldn't say no to her if she asked.
Still... no matter what anyone says I care about that girl so damn much...
It's nice to know that she'll be okay [mcf]. Honestly thank you.
You're not planning anything are you?
No, things have just been rough.
Now let's open this truck up. We can tell them we're moving stuff in as we move it in.
Fair enough.
Damn Damien... you don't ask someone that unless you're on your last leg.
And I couldn't even ask you about your past but you can ask me if your girlfriend can stay with me.
It's not Jasmine's fault in any way. I just wish Damien was honest about everything.
If what I saw earlier is true... I can understand Damien's side. But fuck... it's going to suck when it comes out.
This is tricky to open...
Got it.
Damn, you weren't joking. Not much.
I'll climb in the back... let's get this brown couch first.
Sure thing.
You sure we shouldn't start with that table?
Nah, always start with the heavy shit and end with the easy.
If you say so.
A few minutes later
See, if we started with this we'd still have to move a couch... but now it's just the table.
I mean... we had to move the couch anyway.
But I see what you're getting at.
A few minutes later
All done! Let's do another!
Ha, that's all for today. Thanks again Damien.
No, thank you. Do you need anything else?
Nope, that's it.
Cool if I head out? There's still some things I have to do today.
Sure, I won't keep you. Just call if you ever need anything.
Same goes for you. See you at practice in the morning.
See you Damien.
That was easier than I thought it would be. But I'll probably have to help her move some more later...
At least now I get to spend some time with [am]. I miss having alone time with her.
Oh good, she's already waiting on me.
Mom.
Hey honey... are you all done?
Sure am.
Want to relax on the couch you just brought in?
I sure do.
It's been a bit since we've just talked.
It has. I've been meaning to ask you, how's the new relationship going?
It's great. Still feels strange at times but it's starting to go away.
Are you seeing any other girls?
Mom, I'm surprised you're asking that.
Rachael brought it up today, I told her that I didn't think that you were.
Why do you think that?
I've seen girls throw themselves at you since you were in middle school and you never paid them any attention.
I think it's more of the same now.
Do you really want to know?
No, not really.
I still see you as my baby boy. Even though you're twice my size now.
You've grown up so quickly... into a very handsome young man.
A handsome young man that I love to death.
I love you too mom.
You two are so cute.
Hey babe, want to cuddle with us?
No, no. I'm just passing by. I'm meant to be helping Rachael.
Just for a second... Come on.
Come on [g1]. Take a seat.
Okay...
There we go.
Man, I'm a little sleepy still.
Now is a good time to talk to [g1] about Bailey.
Hey [g1].
Yes baby?
I've been meaning to ask... that girl Bailey.
What about her?
Is it cool if she hangs out with us sometime? Not today, but just whenever.
That's fine with me. You should also ask Shauna just to make sure.
I will. Thank you [g1].
Anything for you baby.
Hmm, I should tell her about her sister and Willow too.
Hmm, now is a good time to tell [g1] about her sister and Willow too.
Hey [g1].
Yes baby?
I should tell you. I gave Willow a ride today... she was walking barefoot on the street at 5am. She looked lost.
I also checked on her when I got out of practice. Nothing happened. Well she kissed me on my cheek but it was nothing.
I just wanted you to know that.
That was very sweet of you baby. Thanks for telling me.
Did she say why she was out there?
No, I couldn't get her to.
And I think your sister is staying with her right now.
I don't want to talk about her right now baby...
I understand. I just wanted to let you know that she's safe.
Thank you.
Are you comfortable babe?
How could she not be? Have you seen her butt? Big ol' cushion.
Haha, says queen butt! Yours is bigger than mine!
It's not even close.
Stand up, let [mcf] decide.
No, that's a little weird... right?
It's only weird if you make it weird.
What [g1] said. If you call someone out then you have to back it up.
Are you sure? I'm your mom...
It's a fully clothed butt. It's no big deal unless you make it one.
Uhh... okay...
What do I do?
Just lean onto the couch. It'll be quick, don't worry.
Okay...
Hers is bigger right?
Uhh... it's actually hard to tell.
[am]'s butt is bigger than I thought it was... huh.
They're both big, but in different ways.
Uhh... what did I just walk into?
Butt competition. Want to join?
I don't think I'd win unless it's for smallest.
It actually is.
Then sure.
Built like a paper towel roll.
Ha, small can be cute too Stacy. But yeah, you win.
Win what?
Butt competition. Don't think you'll win Shauna.
I think Stacy has you beat. Want to compete against [g1] and [am]?
I mean, sure?
Same as before honestly. All big but in different ways.
Yeah, hard to pick a winner.
Actually... the winner is [mcf]. Two of them are his girlfriends and one is his mom. That's luck right there.
Ha, true.
Where did everyone go?
Uhh... butt competition.
Really? Stealing my help so you can look at butts?
Live a little Rachael.
Oh, I can live kid. Butt competition huh?
Who wins?
Damn Rachael. Not afraid to air it out in front of everyone.
Okay, okay. That's enough. Let's put our butts away.
Yeah, Stacy wins anyway. I don't want to try and sort out the others.
What do I win?
Bragging rights?
On being the most stick like? Awesome.
Okay, competition is over. Can I have my help back?
Yes you may.
Hehe, didn't mean for that to turn into an entire thing.
It was funny though.
Now just relax and spend some time with [am]. We'll handle everything else.
Thank you girls.
Everything okay mom?
Sorry if that was too far. I'm used to [g1] playing around like that...
What? No, I'm okay. Rachael just went a little too far.
Yeah, I wasn't expecting that.
Can I ask you something? It's kind of random.
Anything.
If that was your mom last night... are you going to find her?
Oh... I...
Yeah, I have to. I have to at least talk to her once. Ask her about my sister.
You should... find her [mcf].
You deserve to know your real mom.
Can I ask one more question?
Yeah, of course.
What is your future going to be like? Am I in it?
I know you're going to get married... have kids... all that.
Usually people don't include their moms in those plans.
Mom, stop talking crazy.
I've told you this before... I'm going to get through this year.
If everything goes as planned then I'll pledge for the draft... where I'll hopefully be picked early on.
We'll get a nice house in whatever city I get drafted to.
Yeah I want to get married and have kids... that's true.
But Shauna and [g1] both love you. You're a mom to them too. Plus we'll have a built in babysitter.
And I'll give you whatever you want. You deserve it.
All I want is to stay with you [mcf]. Doesn't matter where... I don't care about things or places. I just want to see you live the life that you deserve.
Mwah!
These kisses are getting stronger each time...
You'll get much more than that mom.
Now let's cuddle up and just talk some more... okay?
Yes please.
Many conversations and cuddling later...
And an accidental nap later
Oh, he's waking up.
Hey Shauna...
Tired huh?
Yeah, I guess we were.
What time is it?
A little after 8. Stacy and Rachael just left to get us all food.
Oh... oh fuck. The party was meant to start at 8.
It's okay baby... it's just a party.
I promised Zoe I would be there.
She'll be okay. You can rest if you want to. That's what today is about.
I should really go [g1]. I don't think she'd let me live it down all year.
And I'd feel pretty bad about flaking on her.
I'm going to slide out from under [am].
Are you girls going?
And leave [am] to wake up all alone?
Oh...
It's okay babe. Me and Shauna will stay. Go enjoy your party.
Yeah, we'll stay here and keep [am] company. Plus we have food on the way.
We'll put yours up for later.
Thank you girls.
Anything for you.
Mhmmm.
Mwah!
Mwah!
Enjoy the party [mcf]. We'll be here waiting on you.
If we are asleep when you get here then don't be afraid to snuggle up with us.
I won't girls. I'll be home soon. I love you both.
I love you too.
And I love you as well.
Bye girls.
Fuck... just remembered I don't have my car anymore either. Time to take a bus.
One bus ride later
Uhh... this doesn't look like a party...
Where is everyone?
Yesterday she said the party would be in here. Guess I'll just wait for a minute.
Knock, knock.
Oh, that was quick at least.
Hello? Zoe? Emiko?
Hey Kimmy.
[mcf]? What are you doing here?
Zoe invited me. I don't know where they are.
So you just invited yourself in to sneak around in their room?
I was just sitting on the bed waiting Kimmy.
...
Fuck... guess we're both waiting.
There's another bed over there. Don't sit next to me.
In fact you can even go home if you'd like.
Nah, I'm going to sit here.
Fine.
Kimmy. We've never had a conversation and you hate my guts. Can we talk about that?
No.
It's fucking petty. We have the same friends. We're going to run into eachother a lot. Do you really want to go through this everytime?
...
We're both here. We can talk about this. We can figure something out. You don't have to like me. But I don't want you to hate me.
I'm not here to ruin your life. I'm here trying to better my own.
I have a family I'm trying to take care of Kimmy. That's all I care about.
So I'm sorry if I come off as rude but see it through my eyes.
...
I'm here so I can make it to the league so I can financially support my mom and my girls for the rest of our lives.
So when there's just a girl who hates me and won't even tell me why... you can see how that pales in comparison.
You're taking care of your mom?
Adoptive mom. I don't know my real parents.
Are they alive?
My dad isn't. I think my mom is.
I have adoptive parents too.
Oh, I'm sorry to hear that Kimmy.
Do you even know what happened?
I can't say I do Kimmy.
I came to this shitty school for the same reasons as you. I'm a swimmer.
That's why this school has like four swimming pools. I was basically you before you came along.
So let me ask you. If suddenly there was someone else that came along and took all these things away that the school is giving you how would you feel?
Probably not great, I never came here for any special benefits though.
This was the closest college that accepted my bestfriend Shauna. It also accepted my girlfriend's sister Elizabeth.
... does your family live with you?
They did... but I was kicked out of where I was living. So they moved back home.
Where did you live?
That green house that you call home now.
Oh no, Kimmy. We have to talk about that. You don't under-
Woah! Not on my bed you two!
Get a room! Well... a different room!
Ughhh...
Bye Zoe.
Kimmy... come on. I was just joking.
...
Shit, I didn't mean to make her leave.
I really needed to talk to her Zoe.
She's not going anywhere. She'll stay for the party.
And hey...
You actually came!
Yeah, I'm sorry I was late.
You're not late for the party.
Sit down.
Party was at 8 right?
It's almost 9 now.
Party is at 9... and parties don't really have set times dude.
Why was I told 8?
So you got here early.
Oh...
Mhmmm.
So... do you see that bruise on my thigh?
What bruise?
Haha! Got you!
Hmmm... Zoe...
Hey, no talking.
I mean, worse pranks have been pulled on me.
Haha! Your face is so red!
Oh yeah?
Can't really do the same thing to her... Maybe a simple kiss out of nowhere will do.
Mwah!
[mcf]!
Damn Zoe... you said my face was red.
Uhh... is everything okay?
Yeah... I didn't say you could do that.
I didn't say you could motorboat me.
Come here.
Are you telling me the great Zoe can be rocked by a little kiss?
Shut up...
Haha, so it's true.
I said shut up...
Haha, okay. We're even now.
And I can totally kiss without getting rocked.
You just sneak attacked me.
Watch.
Mwah!
Woah guys... get a room.
Oh, hey Emiko.
She stole my joke.
Should I storm out now?
Haha, what's a party without a little drama?
Let me say hey to Emiko.
Come on Zoe. I'm not in the mood for pranks right now.
Party pooper at an actual party. How sad...
Woah guys... get a room.
That was my joke!
Hey Emiko.
Your little bump is looking better today Emiko.
Thank you [mcf]. I'm sorry I wasn't at tryouts.
Don't worry about it. You have all year to cheer me on.
And I will. Thanks for coming tonight.
I wouldn't miss it.
Emiko looks really nice in that dress.
What happened to your nose Emiko?
She's clumsy.
I slipped and hit a corner on our desk.
Oh damn, are you okay?
Yeah, I'm fine. Thanks for asking.
And thanks for coming tonight.
Of course.
Knock, knock.
Can you get that [mcf]?
Sure.
Coming!
[mcf]!
Bailey! And Rainn?
Hey.
Hi...
Damn, she looks so different without all the makeup on.
Give me a hug [mcf].
Come here then.
Mmmm..
*Whispering* I missed you.
I missed you too.
Bailey has tiny arms but she gives great hugs...
Doesn't look like Rainn likes me hugging her though.
I'm glad you're here.
I am too. Not really what I expected when I heard party though.
Party isn't in here. It's in the other room.
I'm going to say hey to Zoe real quick.
Okay, I'll talk to Rainn for a moment.
Rainn? You okay?
Huh? Yeah... I'm fine.
Can I help you?
I just wanted to talk for a second.
Oh... My bad.
What's up?
I just wanted to say I really like the no makeup look. You look a lot sweeter this way.
Thank you. I usually don't go out without anything on but... I felt like relaxing tonight.
You should relax more often.
Noted. Thank you.
So how's everything? How's the diner going?
Going well... Haven't seen you around anymore though.
I will be. Don't worry.
I'll take your word for it.
So Rainn. You're cool with me and Bailey being a thing right?
Why wouldn't I be?
I saw that little look when I hugged her. I just want to make sure.
Oh... no, you misunderstood. It's just everything me and her have went through. I'm worried for her.
What do you mean?
She hasn't told you anything?
No, not really. Nothing that matches anything that you're talking about.
I shouldn't say much then... just that-
Hey, hey... [mcf].
Uhh... ready to party?
Sure?
Let's go then. Let's get out of here.
Huh, so it's actually Bailey hiding something... not Rainn.
A party isn't the time to bring this stuff up though... I'll let it slide tonight.
I'm sure she has a good reason for it.
All right, let's go.
It's just right down the hall.
Hey, hey. [mcf].
Ready to party?
Uhh.. sure. We going now?
Why not? Mostly everyone is here.
Yeah, let's go ahead and head over.
It's just right down the hall.
What about Kimmy?
She knows about the party room. It's not what it used to be but she knows that's where we're going.
Okay... let's go then.
Just follow us, we're heading back into WVM.
We're allowed to do that?
No, but I have keys to get in and we won't get in trouble... so follow us.
Fair enough, lead the way.
Party room? Sounds interesting...
I wonder if Natalie knows about it...
Shhhh...
What the?
Shhh... turn around.
Stay quiet, the girls will head there without us.
There's something I want to show you.
What about the keys?
I already gave them to Emiko.
Now come on. We don't have a ton of time.
Zoe...
Less talking, more walking.
Fuck... okay.
There's no way the other girls don't notice, I don't think they'd mind though.
[mcf]?
Where are you two going?
Zoe said she wants to show me something... you girls go ahead. We'll be there in a minute.
What is she showing you?
I don't know, she just told me to follow her.
Oh... well, have fun. We'll wait on you.
We won't be long...
Come on [mcf].
A few moments later
Okay, good. We're finally alone.
You wanted to show me a classroom?
What? No?
Ever since you showed up here at WVM I've had to hear other girls talk about you.
All the nice things you've done and how you're helping them out... Where's mine?
You seem like a girl that has everything in order Zoe.
Hmm, fair enough... but these are what I wanted to show you.
Damn Zoe...
I like them, they're better than a classroom right?
Much better.
Remember that little shake I teased you with earlier? I bet it would be better without my top on.
Definitely feels better to do.
Fuck Zoe, you have great tits.
Just now noticing?
I have too much competition here...
So there.
Am I worthy of the great [mcf]?
Hmmm, is the back as good as the front?
Asshole, of course it is.
You've seen my girlfriends, they have great asses.
Hey, I'm not trying to be another girlfriend. But so do I.
Mhmmm, prove it then.
Fine.
Mmmmmm-wah!
Damn Zoe...
Who is rocked from a kiss now?
I'll play along with Zoe.
The kiss was okay, that ass on the other hand... I've seen better.
Mmmhmmmm. Sure you have. Need a better look or just an eye surgeon?
Let's start with a better look.
Here, now you may bask in the beauty of my ass.
It's okay.
Just okay? Get closer.
Amazed yet?
Hmmmmm...
What about now?
There's just something missing.
What's that?
Hold on, I'm enjoying this.
So you do like it?
Maybe, let's find out.
Oh! I said look not touch.
Do you want me to stop?
...
You can pull it down...
There we go...
Like it?
It's cute.
Cute? That's not what I was going for.
You can touch it...
I'm going to go for something else.
Oh! I didn't mean my tits.
You should be more specific then.
Most guys would be nicer to a girl that is fully naked in front of them.
I don't think I'd be in this room with you if I was most guys.
Good point. You wouldn't be.
[mcf]... you have really pretty eyes.
Woah, a compliment. So do you Zoe.
Mwah!
Uhmmm... I'm naked and you still have all your clothes on.
We can fix that.
Hehe, yes we can.
Can I call yours cute too?
I'd be flattered.
I might be taking off your pants but you have to take off your own shirt.
I'll take that deal.
Fuck [mcf]. It looks even better than last time.
Fuck [mcf]...
Is it cute?
Yeah, you could say that.
Can I... put my mouth on it?
Yes you can.
Mmm, Zoe's cherry red lips... I'm playing with her but fuck, she's gorgeous.
I wonder if she can go as far as Shauna.
That feels great Zoe, keep going.
Mmmnnggg*gag*uhhhhh...
Oh, damn. She's already struggling. She must have a sensitive gag reflex.
Don't laugh at me.
What? I'm not laughing. You were doing great.
No I wasn't.
You don't have to go deep for it to feel good. I prefer it when girls focus on the head anyway.
But let's switch it up. Stand up.
Was it that bad?
No, it really wasn't.
For some reason I just assumed Zoe would be great at all of this.
I especially didn't expect her to be insecure.
I just want to try something else. Take a seat on that desk.
Okay...
Now what?
Slide your cute bits to the edge of the desk.
You really do have a great body Zoe.
Thought it was just 'cute'?
I mean it is cute. It's more than that though.
Can I?
Mhmmm.
Ahhhmm...
Woah, that's different. I'm used to the feeling of being pushed out but she feels like she's pulling me in.
Mmm, keep going [mcf].
You can do another finger.
There's the Zoe I know.
Ahhhmmm! Fuck!
Fuck is right, she's squeezing the shit out of my fingers.
Fuck! That feels so..
So what? Good?
I mean, it's okay...
Not painful?
No, not at all.
Can you use your mouth too?
I don't even need to answer that.
OH! AMMMHHHnnnnnnmmm!!
Oh fuck, she's already squirming. She must really-
AHHHnnnn!!
Damn Zoe...
Just okay huh?
Holy... yeah, it was all right.
This girl...
Are you done?
No, not even close.
Flip around and get on your knees then.
She has a really cute butt.
Her pussy probably needs a little break...
There's another hole I can play with though.
Oh! [mcf]!
That feels...
Ahhmmm!
She's still sensitive so this is probably a pretty weird feeling for her.
[mcf]...
Feels good right?
Uhhh...
Fuck, she's going to make my competitive side come out with this.
Admit it Zoe.
...
I might end up regretting this...
Hey Zoe. Prepare yourself.
What do you mean?
Aah! What is that?
Haha, it's just a pen that was on the desk.
Why?
You were acting like my tongue wasn't enough. Figured you might need something more.
Ha, well it's doing more for me than your tongue was.
Mhmm, we'll see about that. Put your feet back on the floor and bend over the desk Zoe.
Mmmm, all of her teasing has me fucking ready.
She already showed me that it doesn't take much to get her off... I wonder how she can handle actual sex.
Are you ready Zoe?
Mhmm.
Just don't cum inside me.
Fuck... she's tight but I'm sliding right in without resistance.
If I go any more I'm going to push the pen further into her.
Mmmm...
That little moan isn't enough for me.
AHHmmmmmnnn!
There we go.
Mmmm... nnnhhhmmmm...
How is it Zoe?
Hmmmnnn... it's okay.
Mhmm, if you're going to lie then you should at least try to moan less.
Hmmm... Nnnnnn....
I'm going to start her out slow...
Fuck... It's...
Ready to admit it yet Zoe?
Nnn... It almost feels as good... Mmm... as my hand.
Mhmmm, I'm sure.
Fuck... MMMnnNN...
Hooolyyyy.... NNnnnnnnaaaaaa......
Okay... Mmm... It's pretty good...
That's not good enough for me Zoe.
Mmmm...
Ahh!! MMmmnnnnnaa!!
Fuck... her pussy feels amazing... the faster I go the more her muscles force me back inside of her.
I want to make her cum again... if I can last that long.
Fuck! Fuck! Ahhhhhmmmmnnngggg!!
AHHNNNNGGGGGGHHH!!!
Oh shit Zoe... I'm fucking close.
Fuck, she's kicking around... I have to climb up to stabilize her.
Fuck [mcf]... I don't... mmmm....
I'm almost done Zoe.
Just a few more quick thrusts...
AHHHNNNMMM!!
Fuck!!
You feel so fucking good Zoe...
I'm so close... Just a few more...
HHHNNNGGGHH!!!
AHHHHNN... fuck!
Oh fuck!
HHHHMMM!!
Fuck me she leaned too far into the chair.
As I was going to pull out she started to fall and I only halfway pulled out.
Fuck...
Zoe? Are you okay?
Hmmmm... Yeah...
I'm sorry. I didn't mean to make you fall.
Where did the pen go?
Fuck [mcf]...
Hold on, I'm climbing down.
Did you cum inside me? I feel it running on my leg.
Kinda... I was going to pull out but you lost your balance and I got stuck between doing that and trying to save you from falling.
Fuck... okay. It should be fine.
So? Still only almost as good as your hand?
Shut up.
Mwah!
You know I wasn't being serious. It was just fun to watch you try to one up yourself.
It worked. That was... intense.
You're telling me...
How many times did you? Four right?
Maybe... After the second one it felt like it never stopped.
Is sex always like that?
I mean... for you?
I'm just saying... I can hardly catch my breath right now.
It can be but no, not always. This was definitely pretty special.
I agree.
We should probably get back to the girls. They've been waiting for a bit.
True...
Do you think they know what we've been doing?
Anyone with a brain knows what we were doing [mcf].
You have practice in the morning right?
As always. Why?
We need to talk about some things. But I want to sleep on them tonight before we talk about them.
Oh... okay. Sure.
Good, now let's get dressed.
A few moments later
You all good?
Yep. What about you? Can you walk?
Walking isn't an issue. Sitting will be though.
Sorry about that.
Don't be. I'd do it again.
I mean?
Soon, come on.
Hey girls.
There you guys are.
We waited on you. Can you go down first?
Sure? Why?
On the off chance there's a murderer down there.
Be our savior.
Haha, sure. I'll be the sacrifical lamb.
Hmm, no questions about me and Zoe? That's surprising.
Though they may just respect Zoe enough to not ask.
We shouldn't Zoe. Let's just focus on the party.
Hmmm... Fine...
This the room?
Yup.
Can you go down first?
Sure? Why?
On the off chance there's a murderer down there.
Be our savior.
Haha, sure. I'll be the sacrifical lamb.
Huh, not what I expected.
Everything's clear!
Coming!
Like the room?
Lighting is cool, room is pretty bland though.
That's because they took everything away. We still use it though. There's a nice couch.
Hey, I'm just here to hang out so it's cool with me.
What are you going to do [mcf]?
What do you mean?
Like... do you want to play any games or anything?
Uhh sure. I'm down.
We should let everyone get here first.
Who all is left?
I think Penelope, Natalie, and Kimmy.
You girls go ahead and take a seat. I'll stand by the door so they know we're down here.
That's kind of you.
Yeah, thank you [mcf].
Not the party I had in mind but honestly I prefer this.
No alcohol or anything though? That's strange.
[mcf]?
Hey there Penelope. How have you been?
I've been good. Could you help me?
Sure? What do you need me to do?
Help me lift this cooler down these stairs...
Oh yeah, I can help with that.
Thank you.
A few moments later
Phew, it's heavy.
How many do you have in there?
I don't know. I just grabbed a few from the diner.
They sell alcohol at the diner?
It's not on the menu but those that ask do.
Ha, fair enough.
Oh, that's more than 'a few'.
I didn't know how many we'd need. You can grab one if you'd like.
Nah, I don't drink. Thank you though.
Oh, sorry. I didn't know that.
It's fine. I'm not against it or anything I just have practice early tomorrow and shouldn't drink tonight.
Do you mind if I do?
Not at all. Go for it.
I'm going to keep waiting at the door for Natalie and Kimmy.
Okay, I'll be over here.
Penelope looked nice. I like her hair more when it's not behind her ears.
Oh, I think I hear footsteps.
[mcf]!
Hey Natalie. You're looking great.
Thank you very much. You're looking very handsome yourself.
Can I ask you something a little embarrassing?
What is it?
Would you mind talking to my mom for a moment? She's upstairs.
Sure. What do you need me to say?
Just that you'll make sure I'm safe and all that. I'm sorry. She's making me ask.
Haha, it's fine Natalie. I'll go talk to her. You go ahead and get comfy.
Thank you very much.
A few minutes later.
[mcf]!
Hey Harp.
Come over here.
I'm sorry for interrupting your party.
It's fine. I like talking to you Harp.
Did Natalie tell you why I told you to come up here?
Pretty much...
Sit for a second please.
I promise you I don't like being the controlling mom but I can't help it.
I understand.
Is there a curfew or anything? It is a school night.
I mean, if you don't mind bringing her home then she can stay out a little late.
Hmm, that car is here. I could get it to take Natalie home.
Yeah I can bring her home.
You keep her safe. I'm trusting you on this. Also, no alcohol.
She's like her mom, she can't handle it.
Promise, neither one of us will drink any tonight.
Thank you. And before I let you go. Can I ask something?
Of course Harp.
Uhhh... not sure how to say it...
Just say whatever is on your mind.
How fucked are we?
Uhh?
I'm excited for this season. But I can't shake this feeling of dread. Like I'm going to fail and embarrass myself again.
Last year there weren't any expectations and I still let people down.
This year there's nothing but expectations...
There's even expectations from you... I don't want to let you down.
We're still scrapping together a team a week before the season starts...
I think it's easy to fall into the 'must win' mindset right now.
Our focus shouldn't be on that though. It should be on getting our team in order. Everyone is either all in or they're out.
The media is going to buzz. Our names will be talked about a lot. None of that matters though.
I didn't 'choose' you as my coach because I thought it'd be the easiest pathway to success.
I chose you because I could see there was a fire to win, to prove everyone wrong.
I can tell you care. You're here for more than a paycheck, just like me.
Really? You can see that?
Yeah, absolutely. Admittedly there's a lot of room to grow... for both of us.
And there's going to be growing pains. But I've got your back and you've got mine.
There's no reason we can't do this Harp.
Damn, she's squeezing my leg pretty hard.
I really needed to hear that [mcf]. Thank you.
This might sound strange but you remind me a lot of my mom [am]. Strong and caring.
That's about the best compliment I could give someone.
Thank you [mcf]. I'll get out of your hair now.
I know Veronica said you had to stay late tomorrow but... are you free after that?
I should be. Will you still be at the school around that time?
I think I will be.
Well I'll find you and let you know after I get done with everything.
Perfect. I hope you have fun tonight.
Thank you Harper. I'll have Natalie home soon. Goodnight.
Goodnight.
As dysfunctional as everything has been here... I don't think much of it has been caused by Harper.
She has a lot to learn but I think she's capable. It's going to be a tough year for both of us.
I should get back downstairs...
Oh, hey Zoe. What are you doing?
Seeing where you went.
Miss me already?
What if I did?
Then that would be cool with me.
Can you still not sit down?
Haven't tried. Don't think I will anytime soon either.
Still worth it?
Without a doubt.
What for?
This party kind of lives and dies with you.
I think you just missed me.
Keep flattering yourself.
I will.
Hey [mcf]. Where'd you go?
Had to talk to my coach for a second. I need to take Natalie home tonight. Where is she?
She's on the couch talking to the other girls.
Are you busy right now?
Nope, free as a bird.
Can we sit down?
That's my cue to head back to the other girls.
Sure Penny.
So what's up?
Nothing really. It just feels good to be here.
I'm sorry if I bug you or it feels like I'm trying to force my way into your life.
What? You're just being friendly Penny. I don't mind at all.
Good, good. It's just... ever since I went through a bunch of your interviews I felt like I should get to know you.
In a weird way it feels like I do... and that's weird because you barely know anything about me.
Well I'd like to learn more.
Like what?
Start from the beginning. We have a whole party.
Oh, I don't know. That's not a great idea.
Why?
Bad memories and things that shouldn't be talked about at a party.
Oh, fair I guess. If you ever feel like talking about it then I'm all ears though.
She has nice legs... I hadn't really noticed before.
[mcf]?
What are you looking at?
Oh... sorry. I was just thinking that your legs look nice in that outfit.
Oh... wow. Thank you.
Why are you two hiding over here?
Hey there Bailey.
Hey...
Have you been drinking?
Not much... want to play a game now?
What did you have in mind?
You two ever play 'Never have I ever'? Emiko wanted to play it.
I don't think I have.
It's fun. I'll explain as we go. It's simple.
What are we waiting for?
Damn, Emiko is drinking too. For some reason I thought she'd be the type to not drink.
We're coming. Have we asked the other girls if they'd like to play?
They said no but you can try.
I'll be right back.
Good, no drink in Natalie's hand.
Hey girls.
What's up?
Emiko said she already asked but I'm just making sure...
You girls sure you don't want to play whatever game Bailey was talking about?
I'd like to but...
But me and her are having a very important conversation right now.
Oh okay. I won't get in your two's way.
What about you Rainn?
...
Rainn?
Huh? Sorry. I was in my thoughts.
You're good, I was just making sure you didn't want to play whatever game we're about to play.
No thank you, I just want to chill on this couch for a bit.
Oh okay. We'll be over there if you girls need us.
Noted.
No one huh?
Nope. So how do I play?
Everyone puts a hand up. We each use four fingers.
We'll go in order and each one of us will say something we've never done.
If anyone here has done it. They have to put a finger down. And we go until someone is out.
Sounds simple enough. What happens to the loser?
Hmmm...
They have to do a lap around the school naked.
Haha, I'm down.
Uhhh... okay.
Then we can start. Who wants to go first?
You go first Penelope. I need to grab another drink.
How is this going to work?
You three keep going. I'll put my fingers down if I hear anything I've done. You guys need an advantage against me anyways.
Okay... uhhh...
Never have I ever had a threesome.
Nope.
Come on, you know I have two girlfriends.
I didn't know you had threesomes with them... but good for Shauna.
It's your turn [mcf].
Uhhh... Never have I ever put something in my butt.
Fuck.
Yep, same.
I mean, everyone's at least tried it before.
Hmmm... 
Never have I ever masturbated and thought about a celebrity.
Got me.
Me too.
Oh! Details!
I really shouldn't...
I will, it was sometime a few years ago, I was home alone. A movie I was watching showed a boob for like two seconds.
So I then spent the next half hour trying to find the perfect frame of the boob.
You know there's websites for that stuff right?
Ehh, I grew up poor. I took whatever I was given and that just happened to be a very blurry boob.
All right Penny, your turn.
Hmm... Never have I ever had sex with a man.
That's a no from me.
Same...
Hmmm... Bailey's actually a virgin? And so is Penny? Damn.
Let's not linger on this one. Go ahead [mcf].
I think I have a good one.
Never have I ever taken a nude picture of myself.
Fuck...
Yeah, fuck...
Oh wow, stories?
Nothing interesting. Took some pictures just to see what some things looked like from different angles. Never sent them.
Ahh, fair. Everything okay Penny?
It's just a long story...
Uhh, I was pretty self conscious growing up and there was a blog where people would post their bodies and people would say nice things.
Like everyone got nice things said about them. No matter what.
I put a picture of just my back and butt and not a single person liked or commented on it.
Damn Penny. Are you sure it actually uploaded?
I checked on my phone, laptop, and everything. It was up.
There's plenty of nice things to say. That's awful.
Thank you [mcf].
Damn, I can see how that could rock someone's confidence.
Can we get back to the game? I might be showing this body off if it keeps going like this.
Yeah, sure.
Your turn Bailey.
Uhh... Never have I ever broken a bone... sorry I'm out of good ones.
I haven't... surprisingly.
Me neither...
Penelope with the comeback chance.
I just have to get one of you then survive. I have a pretty cheap one. Sorry guys.
Never have I ever been on an actual date.
Oh fuck...
And we're all down to one.
I could cater an answer to knock one of you out.
Oh no...
I got one!
Zoe just reminded me of a great one. Never have I ever watched porn.
Well fuck.
She fucking boomed us.
Haha... shit.
So who first?
We can all go at the same time.
But really? Never watched porn?
Parents blocked all of the sites. I tried to though.
Well... let's get this over with girls.
Nervous at all?
Yes...
Only a little.
Easiest way to do this is to just do it.
Sound advice.
Let's do it then.
I'm just happy I'm not doing this alone.
We're both right here. We're all going through this together. And I'll keep my eyes up.
Okay...
So just a lap around the school? Back to here?
Yep. All at once or take turns?
I need to be careful to not get an erection right now. That'd make things a little more awkward.
[mcf]?
Huh?
Are we taking turns or going together?
That's up to you girls.
Well I say take turns! Me first!
See you soon Bailey.
Guess it's just us now.
Yep, that's cool right?
Yeah of course. I like Bailey but I'm more comfortable around you.
And... you can look if you want to...
You sure?
Mhmmm... you said there were nice things to say.
There's not a single thing wrong with your body Penny. You have nice legs, a tight stomach with good hips, and cute nipples.
Oh... [mcf].
That's... that was very kind. Thank you.
No problem Penny. And I'm being honest.
There's not a single thing wrong with your body Penny. You have nice legs, a tight stomach with good hips, and cute nipples.
Oh... [mcf].
That's... that was very kind. Thank you.
No problem Penny. And I'm being honest.
I shouldn't Penny. Maybe in a different scenario but us both being naked in a hallway isn't really where my head needs to be at.
Oh, no. I understand. That makes sense.
Fuck... this is a little awkward now.
I hope Bailey hurries up.
Almost there!
Done! My run of shame is complete.
Good job Bailey.
So... who is next?
Uhh...
Fuck it, I'll go next.
That's the spirit.
I'll beat your time too Bailey.
I'll be timing you! Go!
This should probably feel worse than it does.
Part of this makes me feel free.
This might be the most stress reducing thing I've done all week.
Oh my god!
Oh fuck! I'm sorry Lauren. I didn't know anyone was here.
I heard someone running around so I came to check...
Haha, get in the lounge and cover up.
Oh, I thought you'd be pissed.
I've had enough bullshit tonight. This is just funny now. Get inside.
Lose a bet or something?
Yeah, something like that. Am I in trouble?
You got lucky. You caught me on a night where I want shit to go poorly.
What do you mean?
Uhh, you should cover up before we keep talking.
With what?
Here, use my shirt. I have on my gym bra so it doesn't matter.
Now have a seat on the couch.
Thanks Lauren.
No problem.
So what's got you so worked up?
Charles randomly leaving at the start of the year and leaving me to figure shit out myself.
I think I might quit.
But I'm not worried about me... I've been meaning to talk to you for a few days.
This isn't how I envisioned it going but this is more entertaining.
I just wanted to ask how you're handling everything.
Decently. Things could be better but they could also be way worse.
What I've heard is there's a lot of people putting weight on your shoulders. Are you not stressed out?
At times. But I'm lucky enough to have a great people at home who help me in everyway they can.
That's good, really good. I'm sorry for getting personal.
I ran into you while I was completely naked. We started this pretty personal.
Ha, true. I took a few years of psychology and I'm thinking of pursuing something with it.
You're an interesting person to me.
Thanks?
Would you be interested in another chat? One where we both have more clothes on.
I think I could learn a lot from you.
Yeah sure. I guess I'm cool with that.
Great! But you should really go get your clothes back on.
Do you need your shirt back?
Nah, keep it. No one else will have to see my belly fat.
You have a perfectly fine body Lauren... Don't say things like that.
Thank you...
You really shouldn't say those things to me when you're nude though.
Oh, my bad Lauren. I see how that might come off weird.
In all honesty I'm probably a little too sensitive about it... it's just after the scandals last year...
You've mentioned those. What exactly happened?
A teacher caught sleeping with a student. Was a whole power dynamic thing.
Neither the student or the teacher are here anymore but that shit almost knocked WVM off the map.
So we do everything we can to avoid it. The smallest thing will be picked up by the media.
I understand... so I really shouldn't be talking to you while in my birthday suit.
No, you really shouldn't.
I'll see you tomorrow [mcf].
See you Lauren. And thanks for the warning.
Mhmmm.
All things considered that was lucky.
Lauren could've done a lot worse to me.
I wonder if Penny and Bailey are still there waiting on me.
Hmmm, nope. Their clothes are gone too so they must've gotten dressed and went back down.
Luckily my clothes are still here.
I was wrong about the stress thing, that was a little stressful.
And I was told to get an actual therapist and I got Lauren who hopes to maybe be one. Close enough?
Anyway, let's see what the girls are doing.
Oh... What happened?
There you are! Rainn, Bailey, and Penelope are looking for you.
Lauren caught me. I was in the lounge with her. What happened to Emiko and Natalie?
They both drank too much.
Fuck... I fucked up.
Natalie? You awake?
Yuuu.... yup. Inni donnaaa wanna sleepyyyy...
How much did you drink?
Two beers.
Harper wasn't lying.
Your mom is going to kill me Natalie...
Noooo... no. Sh... she think you cute... haha
Fuck... do I take her home like this?
What happened?
I wasn't supposed to let her drink any. Harper told me not to let her.
Fuck... is it a big deal?
Maybe? I guess we'll find out.
Take her and Emiko up to my room. Let them lay there for a bit and see if she sobers up at all.
I'll go find the other girls and let them know where you are.
Sounds like a plan... thanks Zoe.
Don't mention it.
A few minutes later
Luckily they're both really light. But I guess that also helped them get wasted so quickly.
An hour or two in bed should be enough to sober Natalie a bit.
I'll need to tell Harp the truth anyways.
Kimmy? What are you doing in here still?
Why is she crying?
Where did you guys go??
Watch out. I have to lay Emiko down.
What happened to them?
They drank too much. What happened to you?
I came back here... but it was empty. I thought you guys ditched me.
No, we just went to what the girls called the 'party room'.
I thought they took everything out of it and locked the doors?
Hold on, let me put Natalie down.
Is everything okay Natalie?
Mmmmmmhmmmmmmmmmmmmm... per... perfect. Lay with meeee...
Hold on Natalie. Just lay there okay?
Do you know what time it is Kimmy?
No, Zoe keeps an alarm clock in her desk though. Try looking there.
Fuck, it's already midnight. Tonight flew by.
Why is there an alarm clock in the desk anyway?
So they have to get up to turn it off in the morning.
Oh, smart...
Fuck... That's another day gone already.
Kimmy...
How long have you been in here?
I don't know...
Why did you think we ditched you? Couldn't you have called one of the girls to see?
...
Sit down...
I thought they ditched me for you...
Why would they do that?
Ever since you came here... they all just want to talk about you.
I had my issues with you... I wasn't shy about them to you or anyone else. I figured they would be there for me.
Instead of trying to help me they all just tried to change my mind about you.
Kimmy, I'm sure they would have helped... Did you tell them what you told me?
Not all of it, I don't think they would've listened anyway.
I don't think that's true Kimmy. You have to remember this is a stressful time for all of them.
It's easy to look past someone else's problems especially if they aren't completely forthright about them.
I just wish you were open about it with me earlier. I have some solutions for your problems.
We really need to talk about them.
I'm sorry for being a bitch to you...
I understand why you were Kimmy. Do you want to go fix your makeup before we talk?
Yes please...
I'll be in here.
There's two empty houses Kimmy can stay in... So that's one problem fixed.
Damn, Emiko is out... At least she had a fun night.
[mcf]... Comeee...
Co.. come lay with meeee...
Okay, okay. I'm coming Natalie.
I'm... drunk.
I hadn't noticed. Your mom is going to be mad at me.
Nuhh uhh.
Did she tell you that you could drink?
Nuhh uhh.
That's what I thought.
Kiss meeee...
Not right now Nat. I will after you sober up okay?
Okayyy...
I'm sleepyyyy...
Do you want to rest for a moment? I need to take you home soon but a little rest can't hurt.
Mhmmmm... lay with meeee...
Uhh, sure.
You're cuteee...
Thank you, you are too.
Now go ahead and get some sleep. I'll be here.
[mcf].
How's everything?
Everything is handled. Harp is going to kill me but everything is okay.
That's good... the everything is okay part... not the killing.
Oh Zoe, you're sitting down.
Mhmmm, I'm still not comfortable but my legs don't go numb everytime I bend them now.
That's good. Hey...
What happened to that pen by the way?
What pen?
The one I put a certain somewhere... you fell and I never saw it again.
Oh my god I forgot about it!
I think it probably just flew across the room. You would know if it was still there.
I'll be back soon. I gotta check something.
Uhm, okay. I'll be here...
I just came to check on everyone. I'm still cleaning everything up.
Do you need any help?
No, no. Bailey and Penelope are already helping. They'll be over here soon.
I should head back to them.
Okay, I'll be here.
See you soon.
Zzzzzz
Oh damn, she's already out.
I hope it isn't weird but I want to lay down for a second myself.
I might as well make her comfy too.
There we go.
This is a pretty cute moment...
If you take away the part where I fucked up and didn't keep track of Nat so I could run around naked...
It's still peaceful...
*Loud snoring sounds* Hggghhhkkkk ahoo
Well... not as peaceful... but still cute.
This is a good time to check my phone. Nothing else to do.
Oh, I have a lot of messages...
There's one from Jasmine.
Hey [mcf]. I was just checking out your profile and it says you haven't logged in any in the past few days.
Did you ever check it out?
Do you want to check your social media? (Other game shoutouts)
I'm on it right now Jasmine... I totally didn't forget or anything...
Oh, cool. It's just some people showing their support.
Dev here... This is just me shouting out some fellow developers who were kind enough to make a selfie render for me.
Some of these are from months ago since that's when I asked for them... they were meant to be in Day 3. But I ended up losing data on release day and didn't have the time to re-add it.
So I would greatly appreciate you guys checking any of these games/devs out :)
This is Alison and Alice. Both are made by {a=https://www.patreon.com/onemanVN}OneManVN.{/a}
OMVN has given me advice when he really didn't have to. Advice I really needed at the time. He was also the first one to send me a selfie render.
His games are criminally underplayed. I urge you to check him and his games out. :) {a=https://www.patreon.com/onemanVN}OneManVN.{/a}
These two girls are from the game Fetish Locator made by {a=https://www.patreon.com/fetishlocator}ViNovella.{/a}
We use a lot of the same assets, so ViNovella clearly has some taste. ;p
And these two are from the game Healslut made by {a=https://www.patreon.com/dizzy}Davie Zwei.{/a}
Both him and ViNovella were also meant to be included in day 3. OMVN, Davie, and Vinovella never complained to me about the delay.
I owe them big time since I took time out of their development for this only for it to be delayed for months. That's on me.
So I highly urge you all to check them out.
Now finally we have...
These two girls who are from The Awakening and it's made by {a=https://www.patreon.com/SLim_Games}SLimGames.{/a}
He's recently declared me as his archenemy but his girls are hot so you should check his game out :D
Now back to WVM :)
Fuck, I haven't. I'll check it soon though.
Oh, I have a message from [g1].
Don't you miss this ass?
Shauna must've sent this from [g1]'s phone.
Hey Shauna... and damn right I do.
Hehe, how'd you know?
Check this other one out.
Her butt looks great even from the front.
Everything about her looks great. I miss you girls.
We miss you too.
That's only one of my girls' butts. I wouldn't mind seeing the other one...
Nope! Come home if you want to see it. You can even touch it if you want to.
Sounds like a plan then.
Here you go baby. She didn't notice me take it.
Haha, thank you babe.
And another one of me. We're thinking about you.
I hope you're having a good time but I also hope you're home soon.
You girls are both perfect. You're amazing and sexy as hell [g1].
And I'll be there soon. Get some rest though. I'll just snuggle up when I get there.
I might wake you up the same way you did me today.
I can't wait baby. xoxo <3
I fucking love those girls...
Oh shit, there's a message from Anna.
Hey [mcf]... I don't really take these kind of pictures but I was thinking about you.
I want to meet up again soon... if you don't mind.
I had a really good time last time.
It wasn't what I thought it would be. You were very kind and made me comfortable.
I would like to do it again... soon.
Like really soon...
I can't get you out of my head...
I want you [mcf].
I'd like to see you again Anna. Those were some great pictures.
You're so sexy. Just message me a time and day that's good for you.
It's late... doubt she'll reply until in the morning.
I have a lot on my plate right now Anna. We'll make sure you get your baby but it might take a few days until I'm free.
It's late... doubt she'll reply until in the morning... or at all.
I don't think I have to do these dates unless Rachael sets them up... I should clarify that with her.
Hmmm... there's a message from someone named Carly. I don't remember putting that contact into this phone.
Hey, just wanted to report in on the weight loss. Things are going great.
I'm hitting a wall and my number hasn't moved much but I'm working through it.
I'm finally fitting into some older clothes...
Oh my god! Wrong number! I'm sorry!
Huh, it's cool that she's losing weight. She looks good as is to me though.
But good for her. I wonder who she meant to send that to.
Oh shit, there's one last message... and it's from Alexis.
Hey [mcf]. How is WVM going?
Sorry for messaging you out of nowhere... I just saw something on the news about you and it made me think about things.
I never made the trip to my college. I'm still here at the diner...
Remember what we did in this bathroom stall? I've thought about it everyday.
You had me all like this... it was so great.
My face was stuck like that for like an hour.
Anyway... text me sometime.
Hey Alexis! What made you not go to college?
That's simple enough of a response... it's late though so I likely won't hear anything from her for a while.
Hmmm, I'm too busy with stuff here to keep talking to Alexis. For now anyway.
Zzzzzz....
Huh, I never really saw much of a resemblance in her and Harp... I can see it right now though.
I really need to get her home soon.
[mcf]?
Oh, Kimmy. Come here.
I'd come to you but I'm a little stuck...
Feeling any better?
Yeah, a little... I'm just really tired now.
I'll keep this short then.
Before anything... Can I count on you to be honest with me from here on out?
If something is bothering you then we can talk about it. No more crying in a room alone... just come find me or one of the girls.
I promise. I was a total bitch to you... I just could see my future slipping away from me.
I think this is more of a Charles issue than anything. He's tried to be my friend by gifting me things.
Yeah, I know what that's like... at least I used to. Enjoy it while you can.
I'm already trying to distance myself from him Kimmy. His 'friendship' will only last as long as I'm bringing him money and attention.
You said you were living in the green house? It was empty when I saw it... do you have the furniture?
No, I heard it was being moved to some storage building.
Well then there's another house and it's fully furnished. I'll take you there tomorrow and it will be completely yours.
[mcf]... that's too much... I don't want to uproot you from anywhere or anything...
I'm not living there Kimmy. I'm staying with someone else for right now and we're about to look for our own place. I'd be happy to give you the keys to that house.
That's... very kind of you... I don't know what to say.
You don't have to say anything. I just want you to be in a relatively safe place where you don't have to work multiple jobs just to get by.
Thank you... The other girls might've been right about you.
No problem Kimmy. I'll take you there tomorrow okay?
I look forward to it... you're helping me more than you'll ever know.
Woah! First you two were in my bed and now it's a threesome?
I'm going to head to bed [mcf]. I'll see you tomorrow... and thanks again.
Goodnight Kimmy, rest well.
I think she ignored me.
It's better than her storming off.
True.
So... did you find what you were looking for?
My search was unsuccessful. Which is a good thing.
Ha, well that's good. I'll refrain from using pens for now.
Hey [mcf]?
What's up?
Thanks for coming... it was nice having you around tonight.
I had a good time Zoe. I wouldn't mind doing this again soon.
Hey [mcf]?
What's up?
Thanks for coming... it was nice having you around tonight.
I had a good time Zoe. I wouldn't mind doing this again soon.
We'll be doing it again soon, don't worry.
What are the other girls doing by the way?
Rainn is asleep. Bailey and Penelope are just waiting around. Bailey is in the hall.
If you want to go talk to them, I can handle watching these two for a bit.
Are you sure?
Absolutely. I wouldn't mind laying down for a moment myself anyway.
Thanks Zoe. I'll be back soon to take Natalie home.
Mmmhhmmm.
Oh Nat, you're awake...
Nuh uhh... I'm asleep...
Oh... well I'll be back in just a moment. Just lay here and finish getting some rest okay?
Mhmmmm...
Mwah!
Oh, she just kissed me... A very inebriated kiss...
I'll be here... sleep...
Good girl, I'll be back in a bit.
That's cute... seeing Zoe checking on Emiko like that.
I get the feeling that she'd protect her through anything... total mama bear vibes.
Let me see what Penny and Bailey are up to.
Hey Bailey.
Hey [mcf]. How did flashing Lauren go?
All things considered I'd say it was a resounding success.
Oh yeah? Is that what you call it when you flash random women?
Isn't that how I got you?
You think you're funny huh?
I try my best.
Not to make it weird or anything... but have you told anyone besides Rainn about us?
Not directly... I don't want to make them jealous.
I assume they probably know though.
Oh, I was just wondering.
What makes you ask?
I don't know... just the lack of any mention of it I guess.
I didn't know if you'd be comfortable with it.
I wouldn't mind at all.
Well that's good to know.
Do you like my outfit?
It looks great on you. I like the shorts showing off your legs.
Is that all you like?
No, I like the way your nipples are poking through your shirt.
So you like the parts that show you what's underneath?
Pretty much, yeah.
I'm okay with that.
[g1] said she was okay with you coming over. As long as Shauna is cool with it too, then maybe I can see more tomorrow.
If you tell me to be there... I'll be there.
I'll let you know in class later.
I'm excited... there's a lot I want to do with you.
Now I'm excited too.
You should be. I won't be so shy this next time.
I'll hold you to that.
Mwah!
Oh shit, maybe she isn't joking about not being shy...
That's just a very short preview of what's to come.
Okay, now I'm really excited.
Uhhmm... [mcf]?
Ha, if that's what you want to call it.
Uhhm... [mcf]?
Oh, uh. Hey Penny.
I'm sorry you got caught... I should've went second.
Nah, I'm happy I'm the one that got caught. Lauren was very nice to me and I needed to talk to her.
So... I'm assuming you never did a lap?
I mean... no...
You owe us a lap then.
What?! You didn't finish your lap either!
I guess you both have to do a lap then.
I already did mine... so it's just you two.
I doubt we could get back into WVM.
We can do it here. Start on one side and run to the other.
Do we have to?
You've already seen eachother naked. What does it matter?
Everyone else is asleep. No one will see you.
I guess I'm down if you are [mcf].
I mean, got to live up to what we said we'd do earlier...
Ha, great. You two can start in the exercise room and run to the bathroom on the other end.
Doesn't sound too bad.
Just don't get caught this time.
Not planning on it.
Let's get this over with... again.
Ha, lead the way Penny.
There's worse things in life than running through a hall with a naked girl...
Especially when they have an ass like Penelope does.
Yep, I'm not mad that I get to look at that again.
[mcf]! Are you checking Penelope out?
Uhh...
Penny already told me I could look if I wanted to... that was earlier but I doubt she cares now.
Yes I was.
You were?
Like actually?
Yeah, I think you have a great butt Penny.
Thank you... you do too... I mean...
Thank you.
Is Bailey checking herself out?
She's got a smaller butt but it's still cute.
Oh! [mcf]!
I love your butt too Bailey.
You went from a peeper to a pervert!
Says the one dating a pervert.
But really, you have a great butt too Bailey.
Mwah!
Thank you. I want to see yours now.
So go get naked cowboy. Follow Penelope's butt.
You can look whenever... now follow me.
This is where we're starting?
Yep. Sure is.
As much as I wouldn't mind seeing you two undress. I'll go wait at the finish line.
You can stay if you want to. You've already seen us both already.
Yeah, but this is exciting for me.
Ha, fair enough.
Didn't think we'd be in this position again...
Still nervous?
Not as badly, no.
Let's do this then.
Penny's body language is more confident than before.
Oh shit, there's a mirror over there. She can see me checking her out.
Ehh, I got caught peeking at her ass already. Might as well get caught peeking at everything else.
[mcf]?
Mhmm?
I like it when you look at me like that...
I think you're beautiful Penny.
Is this how you make Shauna feel all the time?
I hope it is.
You can get a better look.
I wish they were bigger...
I don't.
Small can be sexy... and you're definitely sexy.
You can touch them...
Mmmm...
Very different than grabbing [g1]'s or Shauna's... but still nice.
A small handful with a firm bud poking your palm in the middle.
Do you like them?
I love them Penny.
I wouldn't mind... if we did this again...
I wouldn't either... but Bailey is waiting on us right now.
True. Let's finish getting undressed.
There's that ass... out of clothes. Wouldn't mind a better view of it either.
Don't want to give off the wrong impression to her.
Now to just finish getting undressed... looking this way.
Ready to run down this hallway?
Ready as ever.
Let's do this.
I went first last time. You go ahead.
Let's go at the same time [mcf]. I'll lead the way though.
Deal. I'm right behind you.
Damn, she's running for it. Probably more embarrassed than she's letting on.
Fuck, she's pretty fast actually.
Wait... did that door just open?
AHHH!!
Oh fuck!
AHH!!
Oh my god, I landed where I'm basically thrusting into her... shit.
I'm so sorry Ruby... 
Let me help you up...
...
Are you okay?
You scared me.
Oh thank god she isn't mad.
I'm sorry, I didn't mean to.
Why are you naked?
Lost a bet essentially.
Damn, Penny is already gone. She was probably just focused on finishing.
Do you need some clothes? I have an extra pair of shorts you can wear to get back.
If you don't mind then sure...
That would help me out a ton.
I don't mind at all. Just step into my room for a second. But be quiet... my sister is sleeping.
Okay, I'll be quiet.
My bed is the one on the end. Just don't be loud... she might freak out if she saw you.
That must be her sister.
She seems somewhat familiar.
Do you think those will fit?
Only one way to find out.
They definitely don't do me any favors but they'll work. Thank you Ruby.
Good... you can sit for a moment...
I didn't expect to run into you tonight.
Technically I ran into you.
Hehe, true. So how did you like that gazebo I recommended?
It was perfect. Thanks for that again Ruby.
Anytime... and now that you're somewhat clothed I can give you a hug.
Huh, it's been a minute since I've had a proper hug. I guess that's just because I'm not around [g1] or Shauna. I miss all my hugs.
I want to talk to you some more. But you should go get all your clothes on first.
Carly could come home any minute and I don't want to explain why you're half naked in my bed.
All right, I'll be back in a minute.
I'll walk you out. Let me go first.
Those are the same shorts she handed me... I think Liz was wearing them too. I guess WVM gives them out.
Damn, her sister is barely still on her bed.
Is she okay?
Yeah, she tends to sleep half off the bed.
If you say so... it's a bit stressful though.
Oh shit!
Damn, that timing.
AHHH!!
It's okay, I got you. You just fell off your bed.
Oh wow! Nice catch [mcf]!
Oh my god! You're [mcf]!
That's me.
Damn, that mood switch.
I've talked about you so much that I started to feel like you weren't even real.
Oh! You're the girl I saw on the news earlier.
That's me, Moon.
I think you can sit her down now [mcf].
Oh, right.
Thank you for saving me. It isn't the first time I've fallen out of bed.
Oh... uhh... Why are you in my sister's shorts?
I lost a bet and had to streak down the hallway. I accidentally ran into Ruby. She helped me out with the shorts.
She's been looking for quite a long time.
That was nice of her.
Yep, she's great.
Thank you.
If she's looking then I might as well take a look at her myself.
Wow, she's a little bigger but she still has a nice body...
Ahem... [mcf].
We should be heading out. Don't you think?
Uhh, yeah. Sure.
Damn, Ruby wasn't a fan of that.
Wait, wait.
I'm sorry for asking but is there any chance you'd be willing to do an interview sometime?
It would be for the WVM news. You'd be helping me out a ton.
Sure, I'm down to do that.
Oh wow! Thank you! I'll get in touch with you soon okay?
Sounds perfect. Goodnight Moon. Be careful.
I will, goodnight [mcf].
I'm sorry Moon, I don't want that much of my personal life out there.
Oh... I understand. If you change your mind let me know...
I will. Goodnight Moon and be careful.
Mhmmm... goodnight.
Time to go get my clothes... I wonder what Bailey and Penelope think happened to me.
Ruby is walking ahead pretty quickly... like she's avoiding anymore conversation.
Although it's likely she's just uncomfortable since I did just run into her while I was completely nude.
I should make sure she isn't upset about me looking at Moon.
Ruby.
Is everything okay?
No... I was helping you out so no one would ogle at you.
Then she goes ahead and does it anyway... I'm sorry.
Oh no, it's fine Ruby. I knew the risks when I ran through here in my birthday suit.
She was also probably pretty shocked to be woken up like that with me holding her. So everything is fine.
And thank you again for helping me, I'm sorry for putting you through this.
I'm happy to help. I think you'd do the same for me.
I would, I don't think you're the type to run around without clothes though.
I didn't think you were either.
Heh, fair point.
Now let's get you into some clothes that fit.
For a guy dumb enough to get caught streaking twice in the same night, things couldn't have gone much better for me.
Ruby is cool, I don't think she's even peeked below my shoulders. Lauren definitely wasn't as courteous but that isn't a big deal to me.
I am the one that flashed them after all.
There he is!
Seems like someone can't help but get caught...
Oh my god... those look really cute on you [mcf].
Yeah, yeah... I got caught again.
I can't say I'm surprised.
Is everything okay Penny?
I can't find my sweater...
What happened to it?
It's just missing...
Just use my shirt. I don't mind.
So what happened? Penny said she didn't see you get caught.
That's because of how quickly she was booking it through the hallway. I ran into Ruby as she was leaving her room.
Holy shit!
He got me pretty good. But it's not a big deal.
She helped me out with these shorts.
They look great on you.
Are you sure about your shirt?
Go for it. I've only had four people see me nude. A few more seeing me shirtless won't kill me.
A few moments later
Thank you [mcf]. You're a life saver.
Don't mention it Penny. I'm just curious where your sweater could've went.
Yeah, me too.
Hey [mcf]. I think I'm going to head home.
Yeah, I'm about to do the same. Where's Rainn?
She's already in the car. She needed to lie down.
So yeah... I'll see you in a few hours at practice.
Goodnight Bailey.
Goodnight [mcf].
I think it's time for our first kiss in front of others...
Mwah!
[mcf]...
I'll see you in a bit Bailey.
Mhmmm... you sure will. Goodnight.
Goodnight Bailey.
Seeing her face light up like that is always insanely cute.
I'll mess with her some at practice tomorrow if I can.
You two are a thing?
Oh, uhh. Yeah, only for like a day and a half now though.
I can't say I expected that.
Is that a bad thing?
No, not at all. It's your life. Why should I have a say in it?
But...
[mcf].
I think I'm going to head back as well.
Okay Ruby, thanks again for helping me. I owe you.
You don't owe me anything.
Goodnight [mcf].
Goodnight Ruby, I'll see you in class tomorrow.
Are you leaving now too?
Uhh, I'm not in a huge hurry. I'd like Natalie to be as sobered up as possible before I take her home.
So if you'd like we could chat for a minute.
Of course, I'd love to.
Let's sit for a moment then.
So what would you like to talk about?
Uhh, tonight's been a little crazy. I didn't anticipate streaking twice.
You weren't weirded out by any of it were you?
No, it's been a good experience. I was incredibly nervous but I think it's a good thing for me to break out of my shell some.
Good, I'm glad to hear it.
It's all pretty surreal...
I went from reading articles about you to running naked with you...
If I went back in time and told that girl reading those articles that tonight would go the way it did, she would never believe me.
There's a lot I want to say to you...
About how you've changed my life without even being a part of it.
I just don't know how to form the sentences to not make me sound crazed.
Don't worry about that. You don't have to tell me anything you're not comfortable talking about.
I'm happy I've had an effect on your life already, I hope to have a bigger effect on it this year.
Look at me Penny.
It's going to be a good year. We're going to get you out of that shell some more.
I'd like that...
We should set up some time to-
Mwah!
Oh... oh my god I'm sorry.
I shouldn't have done that [mcf].
It's fine Penny.
Goodnight.
Penny?
Wow, she's sprinting out of here. That must've really embarrassed her for some reason.
Fuck, I really wanted to ask her more about those articles she keeps talking about.
Some other time, then.
Guess it's time to take Nat home...
Yeah, I should really be getting Natalie home now.
Oh... okay. I'll see you tomorrow then [mcf].
Goodnight Penny.
Goodnight.
I wonder what I've missed over here.
I better be quiet as I go inside.
Hey there... I've stolen your role of bed cuddler.
Yeah, I see that.
It's pretty damn comfy.
Ha, well I'm going to have to ruin it. I'm going to take Natalie home now.
I gave her some water, hopefully it helped.
You're taking me home? Why are you shirtless?
Oh good you're already awake.. and it's a long story.
And she sounds way less drunk.
Yeah, it's really late. Harper is probably worried about you. You ready to go?
Mhmm...
Goodnight Zoe. Thank you for inviting me.
Woah... you can stick a pen in me but can't even give me a goodbye kiss?
Very classy.
Mwah!
Thank you.
I thought you said you didn't want to be treated like a girlfriend?
That's not what I said, you can treat me like one as much as you'd like.
You're going to cheer for me even harder than you would before, right?
I might, might not.
I expected no other answer.
Goodnight pen boy.
Goodnight pen girl.
Thank you for coming. Would've sucked without you.
I'll see you at practice?
You can count on it. Goodnight [mcf].
Goodnight Zoe.
You have everything you need?
My jacket is still downstairs but I can get it tomorrow.
Are you sure?
Yeah, it isn't very cold tonight, which is a good thing for you.
Can you walk to my car or do you need me to carry you?
I could probably walk but I won't say no to a piggy back ride.
Ha, let's get going then. The sooner I have you home the better.
About 20 minutes later.
Is she asleep?
Yeah, she must've fallen asleep waiting on me to come home.
Should we wake her?
She doesn't like to be woken up.
I should really tell her about how tonight went.
What? That I drank a few beers?
I know you promised her that you'd watch over me, but I'm not some little child.
I'm home, I'm safe. We don't need to wake her.
Yeah... okay. I'll just head home then.
You don't have to do that...
At least not right away... it's hard for me to sleep alone.
Nothing funny, just can you lay down with me until I fall asleep?
Natalie, what would Harper think if she saw me shirtless in bed with you?
She's a very heavy sleeper. Come on, I'm really sleepy. It won't take long.
Okay, okay. Two rules. I stay above the cover and no touching. I don't want to get murdered tonight.
Deal. Thank you.
Which side do you usually sleep on?
The one with the wall. Mom likes to be on the outside just so she could defend me if something happened or whatever.
Oh... makes sense.
So... did you have fun tonight?
Yeah, nothing went how I expected it to. Although that's a good thing. I just wish I would've kept a closer eye on you.
I'm totally fine [mcf]. I had two drinks while I was with friends.
I know that, but I promised your mom I would watch after you. It doesn't feel good to break that.
You did. You got me home safely, you were even nice enough to stick around and help me go to sleep.
Mom can be over protective...
Yeah... I'm just afraid of how she'll react. I want to maintain a good relationship with her.
AHHHHHHHH!!!
Was that Harper?
Yeah, yeah. It's okay [mcf].
She has nightmares, and sometimes she screams in them. They're worse this time of year... She hasn't had one recently though.
Should we do something?
No, they don't last very long usually.
Me being out for the night probably just has her nerves in a bunch. Everything is okay.
Are you sure?
Absolutely.
AHHHH!!! HELP!!
GIVE HER!!!
Oh wow, she hasn't been this loud in a long time...
I can't listen to this Natalie. I have to wake her.
[mcf]...
Harper...
AHHhhhh!
GIVE HER BACK!!!
Fuck, I don't want to have to scream over her to wake her up.
I wish she wasn't in her underwear, I wouldn't feel weird about shaking her then.
AHHHHHH!!!
Harper! Wake up!
AHHhhh!
Oh fuck.
[mcf]!
Fuck, she got my nose. She pulled her punch back a bit before she connected though.
Oh my god! [mcf]? Are you okay?
[mcf], I'm so sorry!
What happened? Are you okay?
I'm fine Harp, you just made my eyes a little watery.
I didn't mean to, I'm so sorry!
It's fine, I was just trying to wake you up from your nightmare. I should've been ready for that.
Are you okay?
Where is Natalie?
I'm right here mom.
I'm okay, [mcf] got me home completely safe and sound.
Oh honey...
It's okay mom, everything is okay.
I'm safe. I promise. No need to worry.
I'm sorry honey, I didn't mean to ruin your night.
You're not. I had a great time.
Good... just next time don't stay out so late. You had me worried...
I'm sorry mom, we lost track of time.
I wonder if Harp can smell alcohol on Nat's breath...
Are you ready for bed honey?
Yeah, we can head to bed.
That my cue to leave?
Why are you shirtless?
Uhh...
He let me wear his shirt since I was chilly... I accidentally left my jacket.
He was just walking me inside so I left it in his car.
Oh, that was very sweet of you [mcf].
I don't like lying to her... but it's the best way to handle it right now.
I'll walk you out [mcf].
Wait... let me say something to him first.
I'll be by the door.
Thank you for keeping an eye on her... I hope it didn't ruin your party at all.
No, we both had a great time. I'm sorry I got her home so late.
Don't worry about that right now... I might punish you with some laps later but nothing tonight.
I'll take that.
I'm sorry you saw me like this too... not my most flattering of moments.
I've had some weird dreams here lately too Harp. I understand. No need to feel embarrassed.
Trust me, don't worry about this at all. We don't have to ever talk about this again.
There's some things I do want to talk about. Just not tonight. We should all be in bed.
You're right.
I'll see you at practice Harp.
We're going to start out in the actual gym tomorrow. Get all of you guys on some weights.
Good, it's been a minute since I've truly exercised. Goodnight Harper.
Goodnight [mcf].
Your interesting night continues.
That it does, should be ending very soon though.
I'm sorry you had to go through this. I didn't know that would happen.
It's okay, I don't want to be nosy but are the nightmares always that extreme?
It depends... they can be.
How long have they been a thing?
Since I was a kid.
I guess I can tell you why... Promise not to tell anyone else?
I promise.
When I was a little girl it was just me and my mom... we were in the store one day and I wandered off to look at the cereal.
A guy ended up grabbing me and tried to run off with me. I screamed and my mom came running.
The guy ran out of the store and threw me into the passenger seat from the driver's side. The car was already running and he slammed on the gas.
I remember looking back and seeing mom running as fast as she could at the car. The look of dread on her face...
There was an immediate police chase. The guy never broke the speed limit, never talked to me, anything.
We went until he ran out of gas. Which was a few hours. I'm confused about it to this day and I know how awful she must've felt.
And I understand why she's protective. But I still have to live my life.
I'm sorry you went through that Natalie. That's awful.
Looking back on it, yeah. As a kid I never understood what happened.
I'm just happy everything turned out okay and that you're here now.
Yeah, me too.
Mwah!
Hehe, so yeah. That's a story I haven't told anyone in a long time.
Thank you for telling me.
Like I've said before. I think you're going to be a big part of our lives. So might as well be open about things.
I appreciate it Nat, I really do.
Now you should be headed home. I'll see you at practice.
You're going to be there?
Yep. You'll see.
I'll be sure to wear a cup then.
Very funny.
Haha, goodnight Nat.
Goodnight [mcf].
Time to head home...
A few minutes later
You're still awake mom?
There you are!
Did you stay up for me?
Maybe... we did sleep for a few hours in the middle of the day. Sit down.
How was the party?
It was fun. How was chilling here?
It's fun too...
But?
I miss working. I've never been one to just sit around all day.
Speaking of, I need to stretch.
Ohhmmmnnnn... that feels good.
Good stretch?
Mhmmmm...aaahhh
I'm getting old.
Oh, woah.
What is it?
Nothing... it's just your hair.
What about it?
The entire time you've been my mom I've never seen it change.
You're being silly.
I'm being serious.
Well? How does it look?
I like it. I'm not saying you need to change anything. I just didn't realize that you've always rocked the same style.
You know I don't care that much about my looks...
Although I've been noticing some small things recently. I think it's just my mind having more time to think about the little things.
I have an idea.
What is it?
It's to solve that issue and your cabin fever.
Me and you, spa day and dinner one night soon, just the two of us.
Honey, I'd love to but you have two girls to take care of. You don't need to worry about me too.
Nonsense. Come on mom. I insist.
I'll never say no to that honey.
Great! Tomorrow night sound good with you?
Anytime you want to go honey. Whenever is good for you.
I'll let you know for sure sometime soon.
Mwah!
Once again, these kisses continue to linger.
I couldn't ask for a better son.
And I couldn't ask for a better mom. You must be exhausted waiting this late for me.
Yeah... a little.
I just wanted to see you again before I slept. With you going to school I wouldn't see you for a long time.
When you have a son like I do, you want to see him as much as you can.
Mom... what if you had another son?
What do you mean?
Like what if you just had a dream one night that you had another son? And then things start playing out that proves it's true?
I think we both need to go to bed.
I'm being serious mom.
That's hard to answer. I don't want any other son. You're all I need.
Plus, we don't have to worry about anything like that.
Though, if it does turn out that you have a sister and she wants to be in our lives, then I'll treat her like a daughter.
Well I feel the same way mom, all of a sudden there's another mom in my life. But you're all I need.
But I still feel like I have to meet her.
I'd imagine I'd feel the same way. It's okay honey.
We'll get through all of this together. I'll always be your mom.
Damn right.
Language.
Ha, sorry.
I'm sleepy...
Close your eyes, get some rest.
Goodnight honey.
Goodnight mom.
I'm pretty tired myself... I don't even know what time it is.
I should stay awake...
But sleep sounds very nice.
...
...
An hour later
Pssst, get up.
Hmmm?
Rachael?
You two should cuddle more often, it's cute.
Thanks? Why did you wake me up?
Get up.
Okay?
I have to be on a flight soon. I'll be back tonight. I just need to talk to you about a few things first.
Oh, okay.
Come to my room.
Sure.
Fuck... I feel groggy.
[mcf]!
What are you doing up Stacy?
Talking to my mom. She works nights so I'm keeping her company.
Come say hi to her!
One second Stacy. Rachael needs to talk to me.
Okay, we'll be here.
So first off, good morning.
Good morning.
Take a seat.
Okay... so all woken up? Ready to talk?
Yeah, I'm ready.
Okay, this has to be quick. So we're going to do this rapid fire like.
Let's do it.
So a few things. First the housing arrangement... I have an idea that would make it easier on everyone.
I stayed up pretty late considering it.
What is it?
Well... what if we all moved in together?
Here?
No, as much as I'd love for you all to stay here... I need my office space.
I also don't really want to live here.
If the girls are cool with it then I am Rachael.
Perfect. I didn't want all of you to leave me.
Do you have any places picked out?
There's one. We'll go look at it tomorrow.
Sounds good with me.
Oh also, about your mom. Your biological mom.
She did purchase a plane ticket to here two nights ago. So that was almost definitely her you ran into.
Wow... okay.
Any other news on her?
My guy hasn't talked to me today yet... so nothing as of right now.
Dev here. Sorry for the interruption but due to a little accident where I put one too many '=''s to save the variable. I need to ask again.
Did you accept Rachael's offer to work for her to impregnate clients? (This will only be here for day 6)
And finally... time for a client.
Now I can't tell you her name yet. And I can't tell you why... and I need you to sign a contract before you leave.
Okay... that's a lot of things.
All you have to do is tell me if you're interested.
Here look.
She's very beautiful.
Yeah, she is. Are there more photos?
Three more.
She has a nice butt.
Watch your tongue.
Oh... sorry.
Didn't think that was that crude of a comment... considering she's showing me images of a client.
She has a very soft vibe.
Yeah, you don't even know.
I can't look at this last one.
Oh wow...
Shush, I don't want to hear it.
So what do you say? Are you interested in her?
Yeah, absolutely. Set it up.
Perfect! I'll text you more details later today.
Sounds good Rachael. Thank you.
No, thank you.
Uhh... I don't know Rachael. I'm not feeling it.
Hmm... okay.
Sorry Rachael.
It is what it is... you're good. Not going to force you into anything.
And finally... time for your first client.
Now I can't tell you her name yet. And I can't tell you why... and I need you to sign a contract before you leave.
Okay... that's a lot of things.
All you have to do is tell me if you're interested.
Here look.
She's very beautiful.
Yeah, she is. Are there more photos?
Three more.
She has a nice butt.
Watch your tongue.
Oh... sorry.
Didn't think that was that crude of a comment... considering she's showing me images of a client.
She has a very soft vibe.
Yeah, you don't even know.
I can't look at this last one.
Oh wow...
Shush, I don't want to hear it.
So what do you say? Are you interested in her?
Yeah, absolutely. Set it up.
Perfect! I'll text you more details later today.
Sounds good Rachael. Thank you.
No, thank you.
Uhh... I don't know Rachael. I'm not feeling it.
Hmm... okay.
Sorry Rachael.
It is what it is... you're good. Not going to force you into anything.
Where are you going Rachael?
That's all I had to talk about. Going to go take my shower now.
Uhh... Rachael.
What is it?
Oh, haha. They have a mind of their own sometimes.
I don't mind.
Well I'm sure you don't.
You know... with us living together, we could have a lot of fun.
Why do you think I said yes?
My charming personality and big green eyes?
Yep, absolutely those things. Nothing else.
Oh, she's sucking on my neck.
That feels fucking good too.
Think about that today... While you're in class even. Think about how it would feel other places.
I didn't take you for the tease type Rachael.
I can be a bit of everything.
I'll see you tonight.
Sorry about that. You might should get used to them if we're going to live together though.
Boobs are boobs Rachael. You're not offending me.
Good. Now time for my shower.
Rachael sure is always entertaining to say the least... 
Guess it's time to go meet Stacy's mom... and hopefully it isn't how I meet my own mom either...
I wonder how Stacy would react.
Hey Stacy, you still talking to your mom?
Hey, yep. Sure am...
She's excited to meet you.
Hey mom! He's back.
Say hey to her [mcf]. Her name is Margaret
Not even close... Thank god.
Hey Margaret. It's nice to meet you.
It's nice to meet you too young man. Are you taking care of Stacy?
Yes ma'am. She's in safe hands.
That's great to hear. She seems happy.
I hope she is. How is your night going?
Boring, but thank you for asking. I'm about to have to focus on work.
I hope you get through it quickly.
You're a very polite young man.
Get closer to the screen. You have the most amazing eyes.
Momma stop.
Sorry honey. It was very nice to meet you [mcf].
Pleasure is all mine Margaret.
I'll be visiting soon. You two have a good night now.
You're leaving mom?
I have to focus on work. I'll call you in the morning.
Goodnight momma.
I think you made her shy. She didn't have to leave just yet.
Maybe she didn't like me?
No, no. She likes you.
Any questions?
What do you mean?
About her age...
I mean, she was older than I imagined.
She's actually my grandma. But she raised me.
Oh, why didn't you tell me that?
I don't know...
Don't you think I'd understand? Considering my whole mom situation.
I know, I should've told you sooner. It's silly.
Thank you for talking to her.
I didn't mind at all Stacy. She seems like a lovely lady.
She is.
Are you heading to bed?
Yeah, gonna try to sleep until I have to get up for practice.
I suppose I'll see you in class then.
Yes you will. Goodnight Stacy.
Goodnight [mcf].
Time to find my girls.
There they are. Damn, they look comfy.
I wouldn't mind just laying down in between them.
I did tell [g1] that I'd return the favor when I got home...
But it's really late...
Wearing the black and yellow to sleep even... The yellow has to go.
She's absolutely perfect... I'm lucky that she's mine.
She barely even moved when I took her shorts off.
Fuck... she's out cold. I did keep them up really late and made them sleep in due to me passing out...
I shouldn't wake her up... no matter how badly I want to.
I'll just cuddle up with them and call it a night. I'll leave her shorts down just to make her think I did something.
That'll be funny.
This is fucking cozy... I wish I could turn the lights out... not really sure how to do that in this place.
Oh well. I'll be fine.
Oh, [g1] just cuddled up to me in her sleep.
I fucking love this girl. She's everything I could ever ask for.
Shauna is too... I'm going to give them both a kiss on the head goodnight.
Mwah.
Mwah.
Now, it's time to sleep... again.
Zzz...
Zzz......
Hmmm? That feeling... again?
Wake up baby.
Goodmorning.
Goodmorning babe.
It was a nice surprise waking up next to you. I thought you might wake me up...
I was going to, then felt guilty since I've made your sleep pretty sporadic these last few days.
Is that why my shorts were down?
Ha, yeah... it took a lot to stop myself.
Where's Shauna?
She's probably catching her breath. We've been trying to wake you up for a bit.
So she's under the- Ohhhhh....
Is she back at it?
Mhmmm... she's doing a great job too.
She's getting you ready for me.
I woke up hard as diamonds... I'd say I've been ready.
She's definitely getting the job done.
I had more dreams about us. Some of them went a little like this. So I'm very ready myself.
I am too baby.
It's hot under here.
We don't need the blanket anymore.
What do you think Shauna? Is he ready?
Mmmm... just a second.
I think she's just having fun at this point.
Sorry [g1]. It's easy to get lost in doing that. I could bob my head up and down on it for hours without even thinking about it.
I want to bob my entire body on it...
He's ready.
I love you [mcf].
I love you too [g1].
I'll help you two out.
Ahhhhmmmmnnnn.....
Oh wow, your cock is throbbing [mcf].
Tell me about it.
Aaahhhh... this hasn't gotten any easier yet [mcf].
It will. It's gotten somewhat easier though right?
Mhmm. It has. I just have to relax and let it slide in me...
Hmmmm....
Ahhhmmmm... it's harder when you're not in control.
We can change positions [g1].
Nuh uh, I want to do this.
Oh my god... it feels like it's going to go on forever.
You're almost there, you got this... just relax.
Shauna is rubbing my balls as [g1] tries to slide her way down to them...
These are the kind of memories I want to have.
Was this worth being woken up for?
Absolutely. I'll return the favor one night.
Hehe... there's something missing though.
What is it?
Boobies!
Oh! Shauna!
Was I right?
You definitely weren't wrong. The more times I get to see [g1]'s breasts, the better.
Thank you baby.
Now that you two are appropriate, get on down [g1].
OHHHMMM....
Moan it out... He's going to end up stretching us both out.
Mmmmmmmmmm... I don't think I can move any...
My legs are too shaky.
Just rock back and forth babe... trust me. It'll feel great.
Okay...
Ohhhh baby... That feels fucking good.
You're so tight [g1].
These subtle movements are crazy... they're making me want to flip her over and just fuck her...
It's good though... just not what I'm used to.
Fuck baby... You're so big.., Mmmmmm...
It feels so fucking.... Mmmmm.... so fucking good...
She's right... it feels fucking great. I don't think I could cum from this but it's still good.
Oh [g1]... your face is getting all red.
Are you about to?
OHHHMMMAaaaa!!
Fuck baby...
Damn [mcf]. That was fast...
I'm not done... I can go more.
Oh fuck baby!
Damn [g1]! Ride him!
Fuck [g1]! Keep going!
AHHHNNNNNGG!!
AHHHHNNNGGGGGGG!!!!!
Damn [g1]!
Oh my god!!!!
Just a few more thrusts! I'm...
AAAHHMMM!
Oh wow! [mcf]!
Holy shit...
Holy shit is right... that was amazing.
You came inside me again... really deep.
Sorry, I couldn't control myself [g1]. You just felt so fucking great.
No, no. I wanted you to.
Should we start buying condoms?
No, we don't need them.
Oh...
How was I?
You were great, did you like being on top?
I liked seeing you react and it felt just as great as everything else...
But I like it more when you're in control.
You sure you're done [mcf]? You're still hard.
Huh, I am... I feel finished...
Could you go again?
Fuck it, we can try.
I want to suck on it some more.
Go for it Shauna.
Oh fuck...
That's great Shauna, I'm absolutely still able to go.
Let me help...
Oh, [g1]...
These girls are too much, doing whatever they can to please me...
I'm grateful for them but I can't help but feel guilty having them focus this much on me.
I like that babe.
There she goes with her serious face again.
It seems to be everytime she uses her mouth in a sexual way, it's really cute.
Why are you looking at me like that?
I'm just admiring you is all, thinking about how much I love the two of you.
We love you too baby.
But uhh... don't you think something is missing with Shauna?
Boobies?
And butt. I'll get the shirt, you get the shorts.
Shauna didn't even react to us taking her clothes off, she's just going at it.
And fuck, she's getting even better at it. Just long and slow strokes followed by her going all out for a few seconds.
She keeps mixing it up.
I wouldn't mind playing with her a bit as she continues.
Just going to pull her on top of me.
There... and again she doesn't react.
Is she really that into sucking me off?
She's better than me when it comes to blowjobs.
Babe, you're great too.
It's okay. It's good that she is. We can offer you different things.
Were you about to do something to her?
Well, uhhh. Yeah.
Give me your hand.
Woah... either she wanted to show off her sucking skills too or she just really likes my finger.
Or she's just lubing my finger up for Shauna...
Go for it baby...
Don't mind if I do.
Oh, that went in easier than I expected...
Ohhhh!
Well that got a reaction out of her.
What are you doing [mcf]?!
Having a little fun of my own back here.
I was having fun [mcf]...
Oh, I didn't mean to ruin your fun. You were doing a fucking fantastic job.
Why did it ruin it though? I was just trying to pleasure you some too.
You didn't ruin it... I was just really into what I was doing.
I was into it too. I didn't mean to take you out of it.
Why is it so bad that I did?
[mcf]... it's embarrassing.
I can step out for a second... I have to use the ladies room.
[g1]...
What? We're all still new to this. We're not going to all be perfectly comfortable right away.
There's still things I don't want to say in front of Shauna yet.
We'll get there, but it's okay not to be there right now. In fact there's some things I'd like to talk to you about...
You can talk to me whenever you want to [g1]. But thank you.
Her level of maturity about all of this is crazy.
I'll be back in a few minutes... just let me know if I need to leave when I come back.
I will, thank you again [g1].
No problem baby.
She really is perfect huh?
She's definitely as close as anyone could get.
So tell me Shauna. It's important to be open and honest about what you are and aren't comfortable with.
[mcf]... it's not like that.
You couldn't make me uncomfortable. I'm willing to do anything with you...
It's just a little personal thing.
It might make me sound crazy... but I really like doing what I was just doing...
For more reasons than just making you feel good... it makes me feel good.
You helped me throughout my entire life.
You never expected anything from me but you'd do anything for me.
And I always wanted to be your girl...
We've been through a lot... and through all of those things I've grown to love you... immensely.
And through that love came other feelings... I used to dream about pleasing you... about how it would be.
How my lips would move on you... the sounds you would make.
Now the crazy part... when I'm going down on you I forget about it all. All of the shit we've gone through.
All of the people you've had to protect me from. All of the negatives... just gone.
I'm just your girl, fixated on pleasing you. Doing what a good girl would do.
You are my good girl...
You'll always be my good girl Shauna.
Do you not feel that way when we have sex though?
Of course I do... there's different elements to that though.
I like it when it's just my mouth and your penis... it's simple, I love feeling it slide on my tongue. The heat of it...
Sex is amazing... it's equal to me blowing you. But I do really like losing myself in it...
I think that's a good problem to have... I like sex though because we're both getting pleasure.
True... I like it too.
Do you want to?
Of course I do. Lay down.
You have such a nice pussy Shauna.
Thank you...
I'm ready...
Your cock is so big [mcf]... especially next to me...
Oh! Looks like I missed a lot.
Is it okay for me to be back?
Mhmmm... it is. Thank you [g1].
I assume everything is okay?
Everything is perfect.
Well then don't let me interrupt. Go ahead and let her have it.
Please baby?
Where did that please come from?... I liked it though.
Ohhhhmmm! Fuck!
Ohhh, thank you baby.
Fuck, fuck... mmmmmm...
Are you okay Shauna?
Mhmmm... just give me a little more warning next time.
Wow... give me a second to relax and then you can start... you're so fucking big.
Come on Shauna, be his good girl.
Mhmmm... I'm ready [mcf].
That was a little too quick... I'm going to start out real slow.
Oh fuck [mcf]... MMmmmm...
How does she feel [mcf]?
Tight... very tight. In a very good way.
And he's big... very big.
Fuck [mcf]... Mmmmmm... Keep going...
Fuck me harder [mcf]. You don't have to go easy.
Are you sure Shauna?
Fuck me hard [mcf].
I'll fuck her... but not as hard as I can. Not yet anyway.
OHHH!! Fuck!!
Fuck her baby... cum deep inside of her just like you did me.
FUCK! That's so fucking good!
[mcf]... I can't! You're gonna...
OOHHHHHMMMM FUCK! I'm gonna cum!
Cum with me Shauna!
AHHOOOOHHHMMMMM!!! Fuck...
OHNNN...
Did you give Shauna a lot too?
It feels like it.
I'm not sure how much I had left in me after you, but she got all I had.
Which might not have been a lot...
That was fucking great [mcf]!
Fuck yeah it was... how's your legs?
Not as shaky as last time...
Let me try to sit up...
Oh yeah, they're still shaky...
Take it easy Shauna, we'll get better at it.
There... and again she doesn't react.
Is she really that into sucking me off?
She's better at that than me.
Babe, you're great too.
It's okay. It's good that she is. We can offer you different things.
Were you about to do something to her?
Well, uhhh. Yeah.
Give me your hand.
Woah... either she wanted to show off her sucking skills too or she just really likes my finger.
Or she's just lubing my finger up for Shauna...
Go for it baby...
Don't mind if I do.
Oh, that went in easier than I expected...
Ohhhh!
Well that got a reaction out of her.
What are you doing [mcf]?!
Having a little fun of my own back here.
I was having fun [mcf]...
Oh, I didn't mean to ruin your fun. You were doing a fucking fantastic job.
Why did it ruin it though? Nothing changed.
Yes it did...
Let me sit up.
Sorry Shauna, you didn't react to me pulling you on top of me, I thought you knew where I was going.
I was busy...
Why is it a big deal though? It's not our first time doing something together now.
[mcf]... it's embarrassing.
I can step out for a second... I have to use the ladies room.
[g1]...
What? We're all still new to this. We're not going to all be perfectly comfortable right away.
There's still things I don't want to say in front of Shauna yet.
We'll get there, but it's okay not to be there right now. In fact there's some things I'd like to talk to you about...
You can talk to me whenever you want to [g1]. But thank you.
Her level of maturity about all of this is crazy.
I'll be back in a few minutes... just let me know if I need to leave when I come back.
I will, thank you again [g1].
No problem baby.
She really is perfect huh?
She's definitely as close as anyone could get.
So tell me Shauna. It's important to be open and honest about what you are and aren't comfortable with.
[mcf]... it's not like that.
You couldn't make me uncomfortable. I'm willing to do anything with you...
It's just a little personal battle.
It might make me sound crazy... but I really like doing what I was just doing...
For more reasons than just making you feel good... it makes me feel good.
You helped me realize who I really am. I'm a girl.
But it's more than that. I'm your girl... I've always wanted to be.
I don't always feel like one though...
I don't like my lower half... I don't think I ever will... I'd like to forget it was there.
Now the crazy part... when I'm going down on you I forget about it all. All of the shit we've gone through.
All of the people you've had to protect me from. All of the negatives... just gone.
I'm just your girl, fixated on pleasing you. Doing what a good girl would do.
You are my good girl...
I've told you before that your lower half doesn't make you any less of a girl to me.
It doesn't make me think differently of you in any way. I wouldn't change a thing about you Shauna.
I think you would be happier if I had a vagina...
Shauna...
I can't give you kids like [g1] can.
I'm happy with exactly how you are... if you weren't who you were then we may have never met.
Maybe I wouldn't have noticed you on that day, there may be a reality out there where we don't know each other.
Fuck that reality. I only care about you Shauna, not about what sexual organs you have. I love you for you.
I love you too [mcf]... I always have. It's just a struggle I have...
You'll never be comfortable with me in a sexual way until you're comfortable with yourself.
If you want to make changes then that's up to you. It's your body...
But I want you to know that I'll love you the exact same no matter what. It doesn't mean anything to me Shauna.
Let me see.
[mcf]...
It's just a cock, nothing wrong with it.
You didn't choose to have one, so don't feel guilty for having one.
It doesn't change the fact that I'm having very impure thoughts of what I want to do to the other side.
You are?
Of course I am Shauna... 
We could... if you really mean it...
Let me prove it. Lay down.
I wouldn't mind touching her some right now... but I don't think she's ready for that yet...
What are you doing [mcf]?
I'm just thinking about the things we'll do in the future.
Like what?
If you're ever okay with it, there's some things I'd like you to try.
I wish she'd realize that it really isn't a big deal to me...
It's a big deal for her personally, but I don't like her stressing about what I think about it.
What are you doing [mcf]?
Just thinking about some things. Like how I wish you knew that I'm happy with exactly how you are.
But let's just focus on each other right now.
Your cock is so big [mcf]... especially next to me...
Oh! Looks like I missed a lot.
Is it okay for me to be back?
Mhmmm... it is. Thank you [g1].
I assume everything is okay?
Everything is perfect.
Well then don't let me interrupt. Go ahead and let her have it.
Please baby?
Where did that please come from?... I liked it though.
Ohhhhmmm! Fuck!
Ohhh, thank you baby.
Fuck, fuck... mmmmmm...
Are you okay Shauna?
Mhmmm... just give me a little more warning next time.
Wow... give me a second to relax and then you can start... you're so fucking big.
Come on Shauna, be his good girl.
Mhmmm... I'm ready [mcf].
That was a little too quick... I'm going to start out real slow.
Oh fuck [mcf]... MMmmmm...
How does she feel [mcf]?
Tight... very tight. In a very good way.
And he's big... very big.
Fuck [mcf]... Mmmmmm... Keep going...
Fuck me harder [mcf]. You don't have to go easy.
Are you sure Shauna?
Fuck me hard [mcf].
I'll fuck her... but not as hard as I can. Not yet anyway.
OHHH!! Fuck!!
Fuck her baby... cum deep inside of her just like you did me.
FUCK! That's so fucking good!
[mcf]... I can't! You're gonna...
OOHHHHHMMMM FUCK! I'm gonna cum!
Cum with me Shauna!
AHHOOOOHHHMMMMM!!! Fuck...
OHNNN...
Woah! That's a lot Shauna.
What about you baby? Did you give Shauna a lot too?
It feels like it.
I'm not sure how much I had left in me after you, but she got all I had.
Which might not have been a lot...
That was fucking great [mcf]!
Fuck yeah it was... how's your legs?
Not as shaky as last time...
Let me try to sit up...
Oh yeah, they're still shaky...
Take it easy Shauna, we'll get better at it.
My legs are shaky too.... they even got shaky the times you just used your tongue.
You seemed to walk to the bathroom without any issues.
It was harder than it looked.
So... two cumshots to start your day... not bad huh?
Unless you want to make it three...
He has to get ready for practice, he needs to be there soon.
Wait, really? What time is it?
Don't worry baby, you have time. You have about 45 minutes before you need to be there.
Oh, okay... I got worried for a second.
Well then if we're done, I guess it's my turn to use the ladies' room.
Thank you for this morning [mcf]... I'm living my dream with you two.
Thank you Shauna. I'll be in the bathroom soon to take a shower.
Am I allowed to peek now?
Ha, you're allowed to join now.
Deal. See you in there soon.
You two are perfect for each other. You make a great couple.
You could say the exact same thing about us.
Hehe, I guess you could.
So, what did you want to talk to me about?
Oh... it's nothing big. I just don't want to be a downer.
What is it babe?
I miss my sister... I'm worried about her.
I don't care if we fight... I want her to stay with us. I want to know she's safe.
[g1]... come here. Let's lay back down for a moment.
Okay...
I wish Liz was here too. I'm not entirely certain why she isn't.
We've tried to be on her side and support her through this. If she can't respect simple rules then it makes it really tough on us.
She's not a bad person [mcf].
I know, she's just confused... we can't force her to do anything though.
And she's with Willow, I know that's not the most comforting thought but she's safe.
I want to see her... I want to talk to her...
We haven't been apart this long our entire lives...
It's going to be okay [g1].
Maybe we should both try talking to her... at the same time.
Just air it all out. Say whatever we need to say.
Mhmmm... yes please.
I'll talk to her about it at practice. Hopefully we'll have a moment to do it during or after class.
We're going to fix everything [g1]. Don't worry.
Thank you baby... I just want my sister back...
We'll get her [g1].
I have one more question...
What is it?
You said Willow kissed you?
On the cheek. As a thank you for driving her home, she also sat on my lap for a moment.
It wasn't anything, I didn't want it. It was just a weird scenario. She was clearly going through something and I wanted to be there for her.
And she did tell me to tell you that she was sorry for the insults, that she was just trying to be funny and didn't mean it.
You made her apologize for me?
Thank you baby...
Uhh... not exac-
Mwah!
Was that all you needed to talk about?
Mhmm, thank you for listening to me.
Of course.
Now let's go get you cleaned up and ready for practice.
I still can't shake the feeling that [g1] is putting on a brave face for a lot of the things we're going through.
She's doing everything she can for me and I need to let her know how much it means to me...
Hey babe, wait a second.
Huh?
What's wrong?
Nothing is wrong... I just wanted to say something real quick.
[g1], you're the best girlfriend I could've ever asked for. You're kind, honest, caring, insanely beautiful, and you put me ahead of yourself even though I don't ask you to.
I don't take a second of it for granted [g1]. I love every moment with you.
I never want to lose you. I never want to see you care for anyone else like you do for me. I love you so much.
[mcf]...
Awh [g1]... don't cry. Come here.
I never want to lose you either [mcf]. I don't want anyone else.
You're my first and last... and I love you so fucking much.
I want you to know just how much you mean to me. You've been absolutely nothing but perfect.
You've done everything you could do for me. Without questioning it.
None of it goes unnoticed, I don't deserve you.
I don't deserve you either. I feel the same way about you, I believe it when you say you'd do anything for me.
I absolutely would... without a doubt.
Now let's go get in that shower, Shauna's been waiting for a few minutes already.
Mhmm.
I hate seeing her cry... even if it was happy tears.
It was nice to share that moment with her... we used to have those moments many times a day... things have just been so busy lately...
I need to refocus though... it's time for practice, whether I'm ready for it or not.
Around 30 minutes later
Thank you for this morning girls.
Hopefully we didn't wear you out... not too bad at least.
Nah, it's exactly what I needed to wake up and be energized for the day.
So we're your coffee?
Something like that. Give me a kiss before I leave.
Gladly.
Mwah!
Have a good practice [mcf]. We'll see you in class.
Yes you will, I love you Shauna.
I love you too [mcf].
Mwah!
See you soon baby. I love you.
I love you too [g1]. I'll see you girls real soon.
Off to practice... I hope nothing is awkward between me and Harp.
I need to find Liz at some point as well.
It's time to go, Harp said to meet in the actual gym first.
A few minutes later
Oh, looks like it's only Harp in here.
Coach!
Good morning [mcf]. Any chance you forgot about what happened a few hours ago?
No, but I can pretend like I did if that would make you feel better.
No, no. We should talk about it.
But not now, everyone else is about to be here and it's not a conversation to stop halfway on.
That's fair. So we'll pretend like it didn't happen until we hang out later. That sound good?
That sounds perfect.
Great. So what's the plan for today?
For practice? An overall workout to test you guys out.
Then we'll head over to the gymnasium and do some shooting drills.
Which you'll be doing extra of.
Why's that?
Natalie told me about those beers she drank.
Oh, Harp. I'm sorry. I was going to tell you last night but-
She also told me that... which is why I'm letting you off easy with only a few more drills.
It won't happen again.
Haha, sit down.
Huh?
It's not that serious [mcf]. I'm joking more than anything.
She told me she snuck them and that you were there for her the entire time.
I can't be too mad at you for that. Plus I don't want to ruin this morning for her.
What's this morning?
Oh! She didn't tell you?
She said she would be here... not why.
Speaking of her... there's your answer.
Hey [mcf].
Oh my god, Nat...
Surprise! I'm going to be your cheerleader... I mean a cheerleader for you.. your team.
Wow, that's awesome Natalie!
I can't say I was expecting it.
I wasn't either... but that's what me and Zoe were talking about last night.
I drank those beers to celebrate...
You're going to be a great cheerleader.
As long as you wear a cup right?
Exactly.
This way I get to cheer for both my mom and you.
Have you done anything like this before?
Nope... but Zoe said she needed another girl and that she'd teach me everything that I need to know.
I'll help in any way that I can as well.
I'm so proud of her.
She's going to be the best cheerleader out there.
Hmmm, that does work out really well. Natalie is able to experience something new and Harp can still keep a close eye on her.
It works out for both of them.
Mwah!
Mom... stop it...
You two are very cute.
Sorry honey, I'm just so happy for you.
Keep your head to the side for a moment mom.
Really? Right now? Fine...
I think that's my cue to kiss her.
Mwah!
Sorry [mcf]. We don't mean to be gushy in front of you.
I don't mind at all Natalie.
Okay, I'll stop embarrassing her for a moment. I'll let you two talk.
[mcf]. Do some warm ups when you're done talking.
Yes coach.
Thanks mom.
So... yeah. I'm happy I'll get to cheer for you.
I'm happy you'll be cheering for me. Are any of the other girls here yet?
Just Zoe and Emiko... I should be getting back to them.
All right. You're going to do great. Zoe is a good teacher.
Thank you [mcf]. I'll see you soon okay?
Mhmm, see you Natalie. Good luck.
That was a welcome surprise. I think she'll do a great job.
She might can even help me with Liz at some point.
I wonder why Zoe needed another girl though...
Well, Harp said to start with a warm up...
I'm excited to lift some weights again.
[mcf]?
Oh, hey Jasmine. How are you?
I'm doing well. How is Stacy? Last time I saw you two things were a little strange...
She's doing just fine. She's staying with me right now.
Where's the cheerleader uniform?
Oh... uh...
That's what I'm here to talk to you about...
I wanted to be the one to tell you that I'm taking some time off from cheer.
There's just too much going on in my life right now... I need some time away.
It has nothing to do with you or anything.
Jasmine...
You don't have to worry about how I'll feel if you take time off. Do what's best for you.
Sure, I'm a little sad that you won't be cheering for me for a bit... but you doing what's right for you is so much more important than that.
Thank you [mcf]. I'm not sure why I was nervous to tell you.
You shouldn't have been. I'm never going to try to lead you into something that could be harmful for you.
I knew that... I guess I was just excited to cheer for you...
It's a long season, I'd bet you'll find your way back before then.
I hope so... hey...
Would it be cool if I came over to hang out with you and the girls today?
Sure Jasmine, we'd love to have you around. We're going to be pretty busy today but I'm sure at least the girls will be free some today.
Awesome, thank you. Message me whenever I can come over?
Sure. I will. Will Damien be coming with you?
I'll see you later today [mcf].
Oh, uhh. See you Jasmine.
Guess she didn't want to answer that one.
Today's a little rough. We're all pretty busy. Maybe tomorrow?
Oh... okay. I understand. I'll leave you to your workout then... I'll see you in class.
See you Jasmine.
Jasmine is really fond of tight pants... not that I'm complaining.
Just baffles me as to why Damien is acting the way he is...
Ahem...
Oh Damien...
What's up?
I hope he didn't notice me staring at Jasmine a little bit...
Nothing much. Was just about to hit some weights.
That's going to have to wait for a minute.
Why?
Charles is back, he wants to talk to both of us for a minute.
What about practice?
He said it won't take long... it's best just to get it over with.
Fuck... okay. Let's do it then.
Follow me.
I already miss Charles being gone... though Lauren mentioned him being gone added a lot of work onto her...
So at least she's happy... if she's even still here.
Where are you two going?
Charles is back... he wants to talk to us.
We're about to start...
We'll be right back Harp. And we'll make up any time lost.
Hmmmhhh... I wish he would've stayed gone.
Yeah, me too. Sorry coach.
It's not your fault. Hurry back please.
We will.
A few moments later
Charles.
We're both here now.
Who is Charles talking to?
Did you miss me?
Oh fuck, that's the girl from Charles' office.
Yeah, totally. What do you need from us?
A few things. First I want you both to meet my niece. Katie.
Hi.
Hey Katie...
Niece huh? Does that mean she's Ryker's sister?
Actually we've already met the other day.
Oh, you have?
I met him in your office uncle. Before his rally.
I just wanted to let him know how happy we are that he's here.
Oh... all right then. I didn't know.
It's nice to meet you.
The pleasure is all mine.
Me and my uncle are both very happy that you chose WVM.
Yes, we are very happy he's here.
Now if you two could follow us... we have a lot to talk about.
We have to get back to practice Charles.
It won't take long. Come on.
Yep, I feel the same way as Damien. Nothing can ever go simply with Charles.
It really won't.
We just need to run you both through a few things. And we'd like some feedback on a few things.
Can it not wait until later today?
I'm sorry but it really can't.
Follow me.
*whispering* Let's just get it over with... another day... another set of bullshit obstacles.
Fuck, he's right though. We're already here and it's not worth fighting at this point.
Thank fuck that's over for a second.
Huh?
What? You're going to tell me you actually like my uncle?
I didn't say that.
That's what I thought, now let's walk.
Respect points for calling me out.
I thought you might not like that.
Ehh, shows me you're not a pussy. Not afraid to fight back.
I'm not your enemy though.
Thanks for not calling me out...
Why didn't you?
Why would I?
I like it when someone is honest.
Would you have told him why you came into his office?
Hey, I said I like it when someone else is honest. Not myself.
I have a question.
Hmm?
Are you Ryker's sister?
Sadly I am... Older sister.
He doesn't like you.
I don't like him, so it works out.
And I'd tell him that too if he ever showed up to practice.
No one likes him...
But...
I'm excited to finish what we started...
I've thought about it a lot since...
I didn't know you were Charles' niece when I agreed to that.
It doesn't change anything. We truly do want you to be happy here.
And I can do some things that I don't think you'd want Charles to do.
We'll talk about this more later.
But...
Why did you say no to me?
You were a stranger and I have a girlfriend. It wasn't a hard choice.
I've heard you're in an open relationship.
I wasn't at the time.
Aah, so if presented with the opportunity now... you'd change your mind?
Katie...
Think about it. We'll talk about it more later.
Damn, every day there's some new element to all of this.
And if Ryker found out there was anything between Katie and me... who knows what he'd do? It's risky.
Add Charles on top of that as well. I'll admit I like her attitude... but is she worth it?
Not that it matters right now. I just want to get back to practice. And that means doing whatever the hell this is.
A few minutes later
Shit, this is the room me and Bailey were in the other day... it's a lot emptier now.
So what's up Charles? What do you need?
I told you, we have a few things to talk about.
Why do we have to talk in here?
It would be rude of us to not have a proper place to talk.
There wasn't anything wrong with the lobby.
It won't take long Damien.
It honestly won't. Just a few things...
Could they honestly not wait until later?
*Whispering* They could've.
At least she's honest about it... Why is she taking her glasses off?
Like I was saying...
What the fuck is Katie doing?
First off, you have a new teammate on the way. He'll be here today.
His name is Skye. I hear he used to be a woman.
A new teammate?
I don't want to hear of any shenanigans with him. He's your teammate.
Yes sir.
Huh, female to male? I'm excited to meet him.
Secondly, there's some changes being made. Katie will be taking a more active role this year. Taking after her 'ole uncle.
I think Katie and Charles have different ideas of what an 'active role' is... there's no way no one notices her right now.
Katie will be supervising the team for me. Just to keep me up to date on how things are progressing. She'll make a good middle man.
Well, Damien noticed...
Really [mcf]? Haha
Aah! Damien seems into it!
How do you feel about it [mcf]?
Huh? About what?
About Katie taking a role as supervising the basketball team. Just to help out.
Oh... fuck.
Well that depends... what all would that entail?
Katie certainly seems pleased with herself... she doesn't seem to follow Charles blindly so maybe this isn't entirely bad.
Well take a seat, we'll all talk about it.
So I'll be the first to ask... will she be making any decisions that will have an effect on our team?
No, she's just going to give me reports and let me know what's going on. I know I'm not welcome there.
You know we could have an open dialogue about any concerns or changes? That way there isn't any clashing.
We can both get what we want Charles.
We've been talking about that. Getting feedback from the players and making changes is a top priority for us.
We won't do anything without approval from the players first, unless it's necessary.
So you will have a say in making changes then?
What? You want me to be a robot that just sends information Charles' way? I have a brain and an opinion, let me use it.
Doesn't mean I'll have the final say or anything, just advice from the main source.
Is that a problem?
In theory? No. In practice? Maybe.
Come on, it's not that serious. We respect your wishes and your loyalty.
What? Took two hours for you to get latched to Harper? I hope you'd have the same attitude if someone was gunning for my job.
Aah, who am I kidding? Of course you would!
.....
So are we in agreeance? Katie can be a supervisor? 
Fuck it, sure.
Hmmm, is it worth fighting? At least he's letting us know and asking us how we feel about it.
That's got to count for something...
We're in agreeance, but that's if things stay as were stated here.
Congratulations darling! You're now the supervisor!
... thanks uncle.
That's all we should need from you.
But uncl-
Me and the boys have something to discuss. No ladies allowed.
She can stay. I don't mind.
Not a conversation I want my niece hearing.
It's okay, I'll leave...
See? The lady is fine with it.
[mcf], can you find me before you head back to practice? I'll be in the hall.
*Whispering* There's some things I'd like to discuss that I don't want my uncle to hear.
Uhh, sure Katie.
Great, have fun.
Every girl huh?
Shh Damien... it isn't like that.
Haha, you don't have to explain anything to me.
All right, now that it's just us three...
Do you remember what we talked about before I left [mcf]?
Slightly, why?
You agreed to make plans after I got back. So let's make plans.
Tomorrow night, us three.
Doing what?
That's the fun part. Whatever we want. I was thinking we throw a little thing at my place.
Invite some working girls, party a little bit.
Hell I'll even hire some working men for our buddy over here.
Charles!
Oh shit, did Charles just give Damien away?
So that all but confirms what I saw in the locker room...
But I'm not going to let Charles be the one that outs Damien. Even if what he's doing is hurting Jasmine.
He still deserves better than it coming from Charles.
Huh?
What did you say? I couldn't hear that last bit.
That wasn't the greatest cover but at least it gets the conversation off of it. And I can just play dumb for now.
Oh uhh, that we can get some girls and party a bit tomorrow night. Just have fun.
You promised me [mcf].
Did I really promise? Fuck it, he's trying to make something work, so I'll give this a shot.
Sure Charles... just chill with the girls, we can hang out and find something to do.
We'll see about that. I'll call you and tell you when to come by tomorrow.
Sounds good, can we get back to practice now?
Yeah, there's some work stuff I need to get done. I have to redo some documents...
Lauren fucked a few things up that I have to fix. Typical...
It's not worth it... just let his shit slide... get back to practice.
Thank fuck this is over... hopefully shit isn't weird with Damien now.
Are you good Damien?
...
Damien?
[mcf]. I have to tell you something, we need to talk.
We'll talk after practice. This took up enough time okay? I just want to get back there.
Hopefully Damien doesn't take that as me not caring. I just want him to control how he tells me this.
Not in this empty office off the back of Charles' bullshit.
I promise we'll talk after... let's just get back for now okay?
Sure [mcf]... sure.
So... Katie as our supervisor? Honest opinion?
Seems like a future headache, but it's either this headache or another one and things could be worse.
And this headache has big tits and flirts with you so you chose it?
If I remember right you chose her too.
Told you, gunning for the best friend position. And maybe you can flip her to our side and have her work for us. Who knows?
Don't get your hopes up...
Hey... I'll be back at practice in a second okay? I'm going to hit the bathroom.
Oh, that's fine. See you in practice Damien.
Yup, see ya [mcf].
[mcf].
Thank you for agreeing to my niece.
Part of me thought you'd argue about it.
It's how you told us Charles. You let us know and asked our opinion on it instead of trying to just make it happen.
That goes a long way with me.
Good, good. Now get to practice, we need you to be at the top of your game.
You got it.
But first... Katie.
Katie, you okay?
Oh, hey. That went quicker than I thought it would.
And yeah, I'm fine. I've dealt with Charles my whole life. You learn to just go with it at times.
Oh, was Charles in your life a lot as a kid?
Something like that.
What about your parents? Where do they fit into all of this.
Jeez [mcf], you sure are asking a lot of questions.
Oh... sorry Katie, didn't mean to ask anything too personal.
Mmhmm, mmhmmm...
Are you okay?
Huh?
Me? I'm perfect.
Are you sure? That wasn't exac-
So! We need to talk.
Guess anything too far about her is off topic for now.
Fuck it, I won't make this weird.
What about Katie?
Our last meeting, I don't like how it ended.
We were just getting started before we were interrupted.
I have some free time. We should pick up where we left off.
Katie, I have to get back to practice.
We'll be super quick, I promise. You won't last long with me.
Katie...
You're thinking with the wrong head, let me see what the other one thinks.
Oh wow... something is telling me you want this [mcf].
Your cock is growing in my hand...
Katie, do you know where we are right now?
Doesn't that just make it that much more exciting?
Tell me you don't want this and I'll stop.
You didn't know me last time... now you do.
I have some free time. What do you say? How about we make up for last time?
Katie, I have to get back to practice.
We'll be super quick, I promise. You won't last long with me.
Katie...
You're thinking with the wrong head, let me see what the other one thinks.
What the fuck Katie?
Oh wow... something is telling me you want this [mcf].
Your cock is growing in my hand...
Katie, do you know where we are right now?
Doesn't that just make it that much more exciting?
Tell me you don't want this and I'll stop.
Quickly Katie. Where can we go?
Hehe, do you know the party room? Or what used to be the party room?
Yeah, I do.
Of course you fucking do. Why'd I even ask? Follow me there.
This really does have to be quick. Hopefully I still beat Damien back so it doesn't look too bad on me.
Yep, this is the same room I was thinking about.
I wonder what's all happened down here.
Huh, it looks different down here.
Hell, it looks different to me too. A lot less purple than last night.
You said quick right?
Let's take our clothes off then.
We're safe down here right?
Yep, the door is locked.
Oh man, that shirt was not comfortable.
You still like them [mcf]?
They're great Katie.
There we go, completely nude.
So am I... and I did say we had to make this quick.
No time to waste.
Oh! [mcf]!
Fuck Katie, you're fucking wet.
And you're fucking hard.
But what do you think you're doing?
We have to be quick Katie. No time to play around.
Awh, but I really wanted to suck your cock, then you can fuck me.
We really don't have time Katie.
Pretty please [mcf]?
Don't make me beg... just sit down for a moment. It won't take long.
Let me suck your cock [mcf], pleaseeeee!
Okay Katie, fine. Just... be quick.
I know... sit down.
You may not get to fuck me though, you may not make it through my blowjob.
I wouldn't worry about that Katie.
So confident... I could make you cum without even using my hands.
Do it then.
You asked for it.
Mmmmm... damn Katie.
Mhmmmm...
She's a nice change of pace... she's definitely not timid.
She fucking knows how to use her mouth too.
Oh shit, she's not shy with her tongue either.
Fuck, who knows... she may actually make me cum from this.
Mmmm...
Mmm... nothing beats that first touch... where you can feel their hot breath and then two soft lips wrapping around your dick.
Fuck Katie... You're not joking when you say you're good at this.
Mhmmmm...
Are you going to play with the head the entire time?
Uhhh-uhhnnnmmmm.
Fuck.... Katie.
Her mouth is actually like a vacuum right now... feels like she's going to suck my dick right off my body.
MMMMmmm....
Keep going Katie... that's fucking great.
Hnng...
Have to think about other things... I can't cum from this, not yet.
Puppies, old memories... anything.
MMMMmmmmnnnnn....
Oh fuck... I won't last much longer.
Fuck [mcf]... were you even about to cum?
Nope, not at all... not even close.
Mhmmmm... I could feel you squirming and your cock throbbing and fighting. You're not fooling me.
But... I want you to fuck me. So I went easy on you.
Well shit... I'm not complaining.
What are you waiting on? Come fuck me.
Say please.
Pretty please... come on.
Mmmm... don't tease me. Just fuck me already.
And don't be afraid to cum inside... I'm on the pill.
You sure you're ready?
Stick it in me already.
OH! Fuck! Fuck...
Your... cock is so fucking big [mcf].
It feels even bigger inside of me.
I'm not even fully in her... this is as far as I can go.
I'm bottoming out... but fuck it. She's tight and feels great as is.
Fuck me [mcf]!
Fuck, you feel fucking good Katie.
Fuck my tight pussy [mcf].
Make it yours.
Fuck me harder...
Harder [mcf]!
Fuck me! Fuck me! Fuck me!
OH FUCK YESSSS!
FUCK ME JUST LIKE THAT!
OH FUCK... KEEP GOING!
DON'T YOU FUCKING STOP!
I'M GONNA!
AHHHNNNNNHHHHHHGGGG!!!
I'm going to cum too... fuck. Where should I finish?
HHnnnngghh!
Fuck [mcf]!
HHnnnngghh!
Fuck [mcf]!
Fuck [mcf]... that was good....
Really fucking good.
Your cock is fucking magical... give me a minute.
I'll let you fuck me again...
I have to go Katie.
Oh right... then soon. You'll fuck me again soon.
Go ahead without me... I'm going to lay here for a minute.
I'll lock the door on my way out.
Thank you. See you soon... real soon.
Bye Katie.
A few moments later
Fuck, as risky as it was I'm glad I did it.
I'm a little tired after... but she felt so fucking good... I'll take the trade off.
I have to get to practice now... before I look too bad.
No Katie... I don't want this. I have to get to practice.
It's not that I'm not attracted to you or anything... but with you being related to Charles and Ryker, it's too risky.
You're making a mistake [mcf].
I don't think I am Katie.
Well then why the fuck are you still talking to me? Fuck off.
Katie...
Go to your precious practice, fucking jerk.
Sorry Katie... I'll see you.
It feels like I've been awake for days now. I didn't sleep much last night and I still have so much to do today.
Just have to take things one at a time.
Yeah, she's always bitching at me for some reason.
Willow?
Oh! Hey [mcf].
How's it going girls? You're both here early.
I have to talk to Lauren...
And I just came with Bailey.
Why aren't you in practice?
Me and Damien had to go talk to Charles.
Oh that sucks, I'm sorry.
Ha, it could've been worse.
It didn't have anything to do with the party last night did it?
No, no. It had to do with the basketball team.
Oh good... But uhh... I should be going.
Oh okay... what do you have to do?
There's just something I have to get done.
I'll see you in class [mcf].
Yeah, I'll see you Rainn...
*Whispering* Thanks for saving me...
From what?
Willow, she caught me alone and I didn't know how to exit the conversation.
I appreciate it... see ya.
I didn't... bye Rainn.
That's kind of fucked up...
Soooo...
Why are you scaring off my friends for?
And what's that about a party last night? Where was my invite?
Zoe and Emiko were hosting it... I think you can understand why they didn't invite you.
It wasn't my party to invite people to... Zoe and Emiko were throwing it.
Aah... fuck 'em. Invite me next time anyway.
Or you could try and be more friendly to them... that might help.
Why would I do that?
Does it not get tiring having everyone think that you're a bitch Willow?
.....
Oh fuck, that was a little too far.
I didn't mean it like that Willow.
I shouldn't have said it like that, I meant that being the 'bad guy' must get tiring.
They aren't bad people and neither are you. There's no reason why we can't all exist harmoniously.
Willow?
First Katie now Willow... today isn't my day.
There's no way I'm the first one to insinuate that she's been acting like a bitch at times.
Are you okay Willow?
I'm fine.
Woah, didn't expect a smile.
I'm just me [mcf]. I'm brash and I don't mince my words. I know that.
Among other things... but that's just who I am. Some people hate me for it but at least I'm not fake.
And think about it, if I was just another one of these girls that fit harmoniously together, would you even be talking to me right now?
Or is it because you know what you're going to get from me?
I'll be honest and real with you, you'll get my honest opinion always. That's got to count for something right?
Of course it does. I think you could go about things in better ways though.
And I think I'd be talking to you all the same no matter what to be honest.
Ehh, but you're a weirdo. You're one of those people that actually help people to help them and not expect something in return.
It sort of makes you seem foolish and I don't understand it but it makes you an easy target so I'm all for it.
Is that what you'd call me helping you out the other morning? Foolish?
No, what you did for me is the only reason you didn't get slapped for calling me a bitch. So it paid off in that way.
Haha, worthy trade.
We should hang out sometime [mcf].
Just as friends... What do you say?
Don't you have a boyfriend?
Huh? No? And I didn't mean it like that. I meant as friends.
You said I knocked out your boyfriend? Ryker?
Hehe, I said that just to piss you off... I heard that you two fought and I needed a favor. I tried to use it to my advantage but you didn't really bite.
That guy is a fucking creep that has hit on me for years. So I figured it was an easy sell.
I'd be lying if I said I wasn't relieved that she wasn't dating him.
Oh... You know if you just asked you were more likely to get me to help right?
I realize that now. So what do you say? Down to hangout?
I don't think [g1] or Shauna would be okay with that.
Even after I apologized?
You apologized to me... not them.
If you want to hang out then you'll have to tell them sorry and ask yourself.
That's not something I should be very involved in until you do.
I'll think about it...
Now give me a hug before anyone else shows up.
You'll be in class today right?
Yeah. I'll be there.
See you there then. I have to go find Lauren.
What are you talking to her about?
Can't say... Bye [mcf].
Oh... bye Willow.
Never a dull moment when talking to her...
Fuck... I should've asked about Elizabeth.
Oh well... at least she didn't have any bad news she had to share so things probably haven't changed much.
Guess I'll find out soon though.
Time to go back to practice... hopefully Harper isn't too pissed.
Well... at least the other guys are here.
We'll worry about that later okay?
Yes coach.
Hey Harper.
Hey [mcf]! You actually made it back.
I'm sorry it took so long...
That's okay. I'm honestly shocked I'm seeing you again right now. I figured he'd keep you busy for a few hours.
Do you know where Damien is?
Damn, Damien still isn't back? That's a long trip to the bathroom...
Oh wow [mcf]. He didn't keep you for very long.
We got out as quickly as we could.
Where's Damien?
He said he'd be here in just a minute, he had to use the restroom.
Oh, okay... so what did Charles talk to you about?
Do you really want to know? There's good and bad.
Should I know?
First the good, we have a new teammate on the way. His name is Skye.
Skye? He's here already? I heard he wouldn't be here until next week.
It's what Charles told me. Now for the bad.
There's a woman named Katie... she is going to be watching over us and reporting everything back to Charles.
Sorry coach...
Why are you sorry? I know Katie... She's not that bad.
She's way better than Charles and we both knew he'd try something eventually... this is pretty mild.
I guess you're right. And yeah, Katie does seem like a big improvement over Charles.
Exactly... so you ready to finally hit some weights?
You know I am Harp.
Perfect, we'll get you set up ove-
Uhmmm... excuse me?
Oh, can I help you?
Huh?
It's nice to meet you... my name's Skye.
Oh, I'm sorry. I didn't know you were behind me. It's nice to meet you, I'm [mcf].
I've seen and heard a lot about you...
What are you here to do Skye?
I heard you were holding tryouts for the team?
Yes we have, but that's already passed.
Oh... I'm a few days late making it here. I just got in last night.
Charles told me to come here and ask. I'm sorry for the interruption.
So you're saying you'd like to join the team?
Yes ma'am I would.
Are you capable?
In what sense? Yes I'm able to and I've played over 6 years of basketball in middle school and high school.
Were all of those on men teams?
No ma'am. The last two years were and I was a starter both years.
Oh, now it makes sense.
He's definitely built... Still curvy but that shouldn't matter... as long as he can play.
What are you thinking [mcf]?
I think we're not in a position to turn people who could possibly play away.
I agree. Would you mind taking Skye and test him out like you did Kenji and Dubaku?
There's no one else capable right now... I have to stay in here and run the others through everything...
Sure coach. Anything for the team.
Head on out to the court Skye. I'll be there in just a second.
Yes sir. I'll be out there.
No 'sir's. Just call me [mcf].
Yes sir... I mean okay [mcf].
Ha, I'll be right behind you Skye.
Thank you [mcf]. You're not pissed are you?
No, like I said. It's for the good of the team. Skye seems polite and hopefully he can play.
I know you were excited to hit the gym though...
Which is why we're going to come back here after class. Sound good?
Ha, not my ideal spot but that sounds great to me [mcf].
I'll be over to watch you two play as soon as I can. I trust you to give me honest feedback on Skye.
Of course I will coach.
I really appreciate you [mcf].
Don't mention it Harp.
Just remember, we're not looking for the best ever. We need players to fill out our bench.
I know Harp. I'll let you know if I think Skye is good enough for that role.
I'll be over there shortly.
A few moments later
Nice court huh?
Absolutely.
So what do I need to do? Tell me and I'll do it.
We're going to play a quick 1v1. Just to get a feel of what you can do. Then I'll run you through a few drills. Sound good?
Hell yeah it does.
You'll need to change first. They keep extra pairs of everything in the locker room. You should also have some things in your personal locker.
What's wrong with what I'm wearing?
Do you really want to try to 1v1 me in jeans?
I do everything in jeans. I'd probably play better in them than I would in anything else.
Sorry Skye, I want to at least give you a chance. Plus you won't be playing in jeans in any actual game or practice.
Haha, I think I could take you on in jeans...
I can take you on in basketball, wrestling, anything. Name it and I'll beat you at it.
Ha, I like the competitive attitude. But you've gotta go change.
Are you admitting that I'd win?
Will that get you to go change?
Hell... probably.
Then sure, let's go with that.
Not much of a fighter are you?
Depends... on something that matters to me I absolutely am. On getting you to change out of jeans... not so much.
I assume you bring more energy when you actually play?
Go change and find out.
Oooh, there we go. I'll be back.
He's tall enough... about the same height as Dubaku and Ayden.
If Skye pans out... how many teammates would that make?
Me, Damien, Lee, Mackey, Ayden, Kenji, Dubaku... and I guess Ryker. So with Skye 9 total?
I'll feel more comfortable when we're around 12 total. Which may happen when I finally meet the old bench players.
I don't even know how many are left... and why is it taking so long for them to be here?
Stars... made up of whatever we can find.
Could they have not picked any other name?
[mcf]!
Hey Zoe... and Elizabeth.
Why is Zoe bringing Liz to me?
Good morning. Have you heard about Natalie yet?
Yeah, she told me this morning about the news. How is she doing?
Not bad, she's still too shy but she's working through it. We're taking a break right now.
Which is why we're here.
She needs to talk to you. I can't have one of my girls going through whatever she's going through.
Thank you for bringing her to me, I need to talk to her too.
I figured as much.
Give me a hug and then I'll leave you two to talk.
What are you doing in here by the way?
About to try out someone else for the team.
Man, Liz looks really torn up...
Well good luck with that, I hope it turns out well.
Who are they?
A new guy, named Skye.
Cool name...
But yeah... send her back to me after you two talk. Take your time.
Thanks again Zoe.
Anything for my girls... but you owe me one.
Agreed, I do. I'll have her back to you soon Zoe. See you.
Bye [mcf].
Hey Liz...
...
I'm glad you wanted to talk to me, I was going to find you this morning.
For what?
[g1] and me talked this morning. We miss you Liz. She doesn't like not having you around and I don't like it either.
We three need to all talk together. Air everything out.
I can't.
Why can't you?
What I have to say will hurt her... I don't want to hurt her.
Can you tell me?
I already have...
I have feelings for you [mcf]... it hurts too much to see you with her and Shauna. There's no fixing that.
Come here Liz.
Huh, she's not hugging me back.
All we can do is be honest with each other. I think [g1] already knows that.
Maybe talking to us both about it will help. It can't hurt to try.
Remember, that's all I'll ever ask of you... is to try.
Oh, there we go.
You mean a lot to me Liz. We've grown up together.
You're smart, beautiful, and you're strong. You've been through a lot and I want to help you in whatever way I can.
I love you [mcf].
I love you too Liz.
When did you want to talk? All three of us?
Either before or after school? Or you can come to where we're staying.
You're not at that house anymore?
No, we're staying with [am]'s old boss Rachael.
How long have I been gone?
Ha, let's sit down. I'll tell you about it.
Okay...
A few moments later
Yeah... that's pretty much it. So we're at her office right now.
Would you rather talk there or in class?
Whichever one works for you Liz.
Is [g1] mad at me?
No, she's just worried about you. And I am too.
Why?
We're in a new place. And we don't know exactly what you're going through.
We just want to know you're safe and we don't want you to hurt.
We both care about you a lot.
Oh, there's a smile.
I thought you'd both be more upset with me...
We're not angry Liz.
And now that things aren't as heavy... I really like the new haircut.
Thank you [mcf]. Willow took me to a salon last night.
I really like it too.
I don't think I've ever seen you with bangs before.
So how has staying at Willow's place been?
She's a lot different when she's at home.
I think you saw that for yourself. I actually relate a lot to her.
That's good.
She told me about what you did for her after I kicked you out. That was really sweet of you.
Did she tell you anything about why she was out there in the first place?
No, she wouldn't tell me anything.
Yeah, me neither.
Still, whatever happened... it's good you were there.
It's probably good you were there too. It had to have been good for her having you there.
I didn't really do anything.
Sometimes all it takes is knowing that someone is there.
Yeah, I know what you mean.
You're kind of giving me credit for crashing at her place though.
And you're not giving yourself enough credit.
Maybe...
So... it's okay if we talk in class? Probably after?
That would be awesome Liz.
Okay, I'm cool with that. Could you let [g1] know so it's not a surprise or anything?
Sure, that's no problem.
Great, guess I'll head back to Zoe now.
Thanks for talking... it's already helped a lot.
You can talk to me anytime. About anything.
But I'll see you in class. Love you Liz.
I love you too [mcf].
I really do owe Zoe. And Liz actually talking without getting defensive was nice.
I just wish it could always be like that.
Yo! [mcf]!
One leaves... another shows.
What's with the outfit?
My locker only had girls clothes in it.
Oh... So are you ready to play?
Of course I am.
But are you never going to ask about me? I've been waiting on it.
I don't want to seem disrespectful.
It wouldn't be. I don't mind talking about it.
It's going to be brought up eventually. I was born a girl but I identify as a guy.
It's why I have boobs... and why they gave me girl clothes.
We'll get you proper gear Skye.
It's not a big deal to me. I don't care what I wear as long as it covers me up.
Want to know anything else? If not we can get started.
First off, thanks for telling me...
No problem. Ask me anything. There's nothing I won't answer.
Uhmmm... if you don't mind me asking. When did you realize you wanted to be a guy?
Pretty much as soon as I started going to school. I never understood girls.
I grew up with three older brothers. My dad treated me like a boy too, he let me do whatever they did.
So when it came to playing with dolls and talking about boys... I just couldn't do it.
Then in highschool, I was asked to play on the boys team. From there I just realized who I really was.
Not to be crude or anything, but do you plan on doing anything to your body?
Like get my boobs reduced? No. There's plenty of guys with bigger boobs than me.
Plus, who is to tell me what my body is meant to look like? I'm who I am.
So fuck 'em if they think I have to look a certain way.
I respect that. And yeah... fuck 'em.
I won't make you talk about yourself... we just met.
And you don't have to explain yourself to me, all that matters is if you can play basketball.
That works with me.
I think you're going to be surprised.
I hope I am.
So... we're going to 1v1? Don't we need a ball?
Yeah, they're kept on the side of the court. Do you mind grabbing one?
Sure.
Was cool of him to be upfront with me about it. Relieves a lot of the weirdness.
I just hope I'm not wasting my time right now. I've been here for 5 days now and have barely trained myself.
We've been too focused on the team for me to worry about myself.
But it can't be like this long term.
Woo! Haven't lost a beat!
Nice shot.
So did I make the team? Haha
Ha... Yep, that's all it takes.
Let's play Skye, it's good that you can hit a three but it'll take a lot more than that.
I know, I know. I was joking.
You're about to see what I'm made of.
Who gets ball first?
You first. No pressure.
You couldn't pressure me if you tried.
So what are the rules? What are we playing to?
11. Like I said, quick game to get an assesment of your skills.
You ready?
Yep, good luck Skye. I'm not going to hold back.
You better not, I don't want to embarrass the star too badly.
Enough talking, start dribbling.
If you miss we switch and I get the ball.
I just won't miss then.
We'll see about that.
I've never seen Skye play but his personality makes me think he's going to try and power through me.
Either by picking a side and just driving or by trying to catch me leaning.
What the fuck...
Nevermind, he's literally just going to try and run through me.
He caught me off guard with that...
Damn, he's going straight for it and has me falling back.
Okay Skye...
Yes! Woo! What now star boy?
Not bad Skye...
I wasn't expecting that... but now that I know you play like that. Don't expect it to work again.
Is that what you say to everyone after you foul them? Do I get a free throw?
If you want one, I did push your shoulder. Won't catch me doing it again though.
Nah, I don't need it. Pass me the ball.
Hmmm... If I was Skye I wouldn't try the same thing twice.
I'd probably try to get me running back and then pull up for a jump shot...
Which I do need to see Skye's jumper... Maybe I'll let it happen.
So 2-0 right?
Yep, but not for long.
We can agree on that.
He's going for the same thing... we'll see if he tries to switch it up.
Okay, good shit Skye.
Not the best jumper but not as bad as Ayden's was...
Fuck!
Oh, so close... my turn.
I usually make that. I had you fooled thinking I would attack the basket again at least...
Mhmmm... So, ready to defend?
[mcf]!
What's up Ayden? What are you doing over here?
Harp told me to come here. They're about to head over here for drills.
Oh, okay... uhhhm. Ayden, meet Skye.
It's nice to meet you.
Likewise, Harp was just telling me that you're going through the trial of fire I had to go through.
Ehh, it's not that bad.
So Ayden, why did she send you over early?
Oh... I fucked up man. I slept in this morning and just got here.
I stayed up too late last night... it's my fault. Sorry.
You don't have to apologize to me, that's between you and coach. Why were you up so late?
Training... watching videos on techniques, memorizing the playbook, all the good stuff.
I just lost track of time... the other day was a real wake up call.
Damn man, yeah... definitely no need to apologize.
Seriously though, won't happen again.
It's okay Ayden, I'm happy you're taking this seriously.
History doesn't get made by those that lay around.
That's the truth... we were just starting a little 1v1, mind just watching us for a bit?
Sure, I'll be the ref or something.
That works with me. It's my ball.
Show me what you've got. I'm ready.
Skye seemed to rely on power to do anything...
Probably grew up being told he would never be strong enough... but we have to break that way of thinking.
And if that takes a little bit of embarrassment... then so be it.
I'll just stare at Skye and react to whatever they do... scoring isn't enough.
I need to send him to the ground.
A quick cut right, get him to bite that way...
He planted his foot, hips turned...
Time for a cut back...
Force him to recover so he can fully change momentum and turn his body back this way.
And as soon as those hips are back facing me...
Another cut to my original side... he won't be able to recover and his momentum should send him to the floor.
Easiest way to beat power...
And finish it with an easy roll in.
Woo! [mcf] for 2 points.
All right, you got lucky...
This is the perfect moment for a 'The sky is falling' joke.
Let's see who is laughing at the end.
Around 30 minutes later.
[mcf]... I'm getting tired, what's the score anyway?
Uhhhh... no clue. I've just been having fun.
How have I been doing?
I'd say you've been just as good if not better than Kenji. And I'd say he's one of our better teammates.
Really [mcf]?
Hey coach.
How did it go [mcf]?
I'm impressed, he plays hard.
Definitely needs work, but then again we all do.
But absolutely good enough to be on the team.
That's fantastic!
All the other boys are on their way here now. We're going to run through some drills.
But congratulations Skye.
Thank you... both. It really means a lot.
Thank you for treating me like just another guy. This felt... fair.
I can't say it was fully expected... you won't regret it.
Of course Skye. That's the last thing I'm thinking about.
You'll get the best out of me every single day. but uhh...
Could I use the restroom before we get started on drills?
Sure you can Skye.
Thanks coach! I'll be back.
Okay... that was a pleasant surprise.
It finally felt like I was playing basketball again... and not just along for the ride.
Is there anything else I should know about?
With Skye? Not really.
I didn't get to see him play at all. Should I manage my expectations at all?
I don't think so... it felt a lot like playing Damien. We lucked out Harp.
I don't know what to say [mcf]...
Thank you for everything, I'm asking more from you than a coach should have to and you haven't complained at all.
We both want to win... so it's whatever it takes to get there.
Damn right.
Are we running drills or relaxing on the floor?
A little of both I suppose.
Ha, how's the new guy?
He could probably beat you in a 1v1.
I'd like to see him try.
I would too honestly.
I was keeping score by the way...
Really? What did it end up being?
You scored 43, Skye scored 19.
We went that long? We were only meant to play to 11.
Well... no rest for the wicked. It's time for drills.
Many drills and some time later
I'm proud of you all. This felt like our first real practice.
Our team is finally coming together. We don't have long to fully fix this ship though.
Everyone needs to be here on time tomorrow... no excuses. It's time we get serious.
It's going to be a long season full of hard times. And we have to be prepared. That starts here.
But on that note, today's hardship is over!
Hit the showers, then hit your classes. I expect to see every face in here bright and early.
I'll see you later everyone, see ya [mcf].
Take it easy Damien.
Thanks again for helping me out today. It was a lot of fun.
And I'm really excited to be a part of the team.
And we're excited to have you Skye. We're going to do great things here.
See you in the morning.
See you Skye.
Hopefully tomorrow's practice is more coordinated, though I'm sure it will be.
Having everyone on schedule should help tremendously.
Hey [mcf].
Yes coach?
Practice is over, I'm Harp.
Did you still want to hit up the gym after classes? You know you don't have to right?
I'm the one that asked you to do this.
I like the gym Harp, part of me wants to do it. Do you not want to?
It's not that I don't want to. It's more that I want to celebrate with Natalie.
Zoe told me she did really well today. I want to let her know how proud I am.
Oh, of course Harp. Be with your daughter.
I'll just find a different gym.
Thank you for understanding... but is it too much to ask for you to celebrate with us?
I don't believe Nat would be a cheerleader today if it wasn't for you being on the team.
What did you have in mind?
Whatever works for you. We'd just like to spend time with you in a place we could celebrate.
It's hard to say right now, what do you say we make a deal?
I'll call and let you know a place as soon as I'm free, if you agree to show up an hour early to practice tomorrow and accompany me in the gym.
That's an easy deal. That sounds perfect to me [mcf].
I'll look forward to your call. Now head on to class, I'd hate to make you late.
There's still plenty of time before classes, but you're right. I'll see you later today Harp.
Bye [mcf]. Good work today.
A shower and a clothes change later.
Hmmm, no Tia in the showers today...
There's still a good chunk of time before class starts as well.
Which is good because I'm fucking tired... I haven't been sleeping very well these last few nights.
[mcf]... Got a minute?
Oh, good morning Lauren. Yeah I have a minute.
It's funny seeing you in clothes now.
Sorry for interrupting your day... I just wanted to ask about the whole therapy thing...
It's no problem... and what about it?
Would you like to start tonight? I can come by your place and we can get this ball rolling.
Uhh... how long would it take?
Not very long at all. An hour tops.
Sure Lauren, I should have an hour free tonight.
Perfect... just call me whenever you're free and I'll come wherever you need me.
Sounds good Lauren... So, Charles is back. Is that helping you out at all?
When he's here I wish he was gone and when he's gone I have way too much work on my hands. There's no winning.
Don't worry about that though, I'm getting through it. I'll see you tonight [mcf].
Bye Lauren. Take care.
A few moments later
Good morning Veronica.
[mcf]? What are you doing here early?
Practice let out a little bit earlier than usual and I didn't take much time in the shower.
Not to sound rude but you know showing early doesn't exempt you from having to stay late right?
Of course Veronica. I'm staying over today.
Good... and don't worry. It won't be too bad.
You won't hear any complaining out of me.
I'm glad to hear it... uhh, there's a few things I have to get in order before class starts but feel free to take your seat.
Sure thing Veronica, just act like I'm not even here.
Give me a hug real quick.
What's this for?
It's just a hug, it's not for anything.
Friends hug friends.
Now take your seat.
Yes ma'am.
She didn't seem to like me questioning the hug... my bad.
I'm strangely excited to have a moment to just sit by myself.
I haven't gotten to do that much recently.
It's nice and warm in here too...
If I'm not careful I might end up taking a nap.
Phew... I really am tired, my entire body is feeling sluggish.
It wouldn't hurt to lay my head down for a moment... I just need to shake my foot or something to stay awake.
Oh yeah... this is what I need.
Just have to focus on my foot so I don't fall asleep.
Focus... focus...
Focus....... foc-
Zzzzz...
Zzz......
Baby?
Baby, wake up.
Huh? I'm awake.
Awh, you look so tired.
Practice that rough?
No, I just haven't slept as much as I'm used to and my body is letting me know about it.
I'm sorry baby, we wouldn't have woken you up this morning if we would've known.
No, no. Never apologize for that. I enjoyed that very much.
So did we... but your sleep is important... and we just woke you up again.
Not as fun this time around though.
Sadly not... but I'm happy to see you both.
And we're happy to see you.
How was your morning?
Uneventful. [am] was still asleep when we left so it was pretty quiet the whole time.
But we did come up with a few ideas for surprises...
Any hints?
Nuh uh, you'll have to wait and see.
I'm excited to find out. I love you girls.
We love you too.
Hey [mcf].
Oh, sorry Stacy. I didn't realize you were behind me.
It's okay, I just wanted to tell you good morning.
And to thank you again for meeting my mom last night.
Good morning to you too Stacy. And Margaret seemed like a lovely woman.
Did you manage to get any sleep after?
Not really... but it's okay. I don't usually sleep very much so I'm used to it.
Guess we're both tired today then.
I'll keep you awake if you do the same for me.
Ha, deal.
Babe, are you still staying after class?
Yeah, I'm not sure exactly how long that will be either.
Hopefully not too long...
Yeah, hopefully not.
Where did Shauna go?
She's just grabbing another chair. There were only three here.
Oh, yeah... I forgot about that.
Hehe, you're really sleepy. I can tell.
I'll help you stay awake through class... don't worry.
You all ready for class?
I know you all missed out yesterday. But it was mainly another introduction day.
We went over what we plan to achieve over the course of the year and what realistic expectations are for the class.
Is that what I'll be making up?
Heh, Not really...
Being completely honest with you... you're only having to stay over because you're the only guy in the class.
I want everyone to know that you have to follow the same rules as them and that you're not getting special treatment.
I know that seems weird seeing as it's only you being punished...
No, I get it. It's to show everyone and set the example for it.
Thank you for understanding. So, ready for class?
Yes ma'am.
We're ready.
Good, let's get started then.
Good morning everyone. Today marks our first lesson into communication.
Every kid is taught that everyone is different. That every race, culture, and belief were all meant to be treated with the same respect.
Yet far too commonly that lesson falls short when it comes to communicating.
Everyone wants conversations to go a certain way. Most commonly either through emotions to build a relationship or facts to gain information.
Identifying what the other person wants to achieve from the conversation is vital.
And to do so, the first thing we have to learn to do is listen to them.
Halfway into the lesson later
Hmm... the beginning was pretty interesting but she's been repeating the same idea just in a lot of different ways.
I guess it's really important to her lesson plan that we understand this.
Psst...
Not falling asleep are you?
Not yet... if it keeps going this way then maybe.
I know what you mean... want to play a little game?
We should probably pay attention babe.
We'll just play for a second, we won't miss anything.
Okay, what do you have in mind?
Let's look around the room... tell me what you think about the girls.
Uhh, [g1]. That's a bit too far don't you think?
It's just passing the time. I'll tell you what I think about them too.
Okay, if you really want to then we can do a few. Who first?
No one specific. Just start on one side of the room and work your way to the other.
Okay... what do you want to know about them?
Just what you think about them... if you're interested in them.
It would help a lot to know what girls you're into.
Okay, sure. We can do that.
Still feels a little strange but it'll help pass the time.
How do you feel about Stacy?
Could you ever view yourself in a relationship with her or is she more of just a friend to you?
I wouldn't say I'm actively looking for something with her. There's some things I have to figure out first...
But there's no reason for me to say no. She's sweet, affectionate, cute, and kind.
I feel the same way about her. I'm happy she's been staying with us.
And I don't think it needs to be said but I think she really likes you, so I'm happy you like her too.
Stacy is cool, she's a lot of the things I would look for in a girl.
But I don't know, I can't see myself being in a relationship with her.
I think you two would be really cute together... but if you're not feeling it then you're not feeling it.
There's Bailey... but I think we already know the answer to that one.
Is she coming over today? I already talked to Shauna about it... she said she was fine with it as long as anything uhh... more private happened behind closed doors.
I'll talk to her after class. But yeah, I think she'll be coming over.
And of course, if anything happens we'll be respectful of any rules set in place.
We'll talk about it later, I personally don't mind...
There's Bailey... but didn't you already say that you just wanted to be friends with her?
Yeah, I really like her. It's just not like that.
Can I ask why?
A few reasons, I just can't see myself being intimate with her. That added onto the fact that she cheers for the team... it just sounds risky.
She's really cute though.
Ha, she is... she just isn't what I'm looking for though.
Okay... what about Kimmy?
Is she still mad at you? Did you ever find out why?
We're on good terms now. I'll explain it all later but I'm going to help her out with something.
And yeah... I think I'm interested in her. At least what I've seen so far.
I've only had a few interactions with her. But from those I think I like her.
Mmmm... well, maybe try making a move when you help her with whatever?
I'm barely on her good side right now, it's a little early for that.
I don't really know anything about her yet. I'm excited to get to know her though.
She's got a lot going on and I'm more than happy to help her through anything... but I don't see it ever going past where we are now.
I think me and her have a lot in common but I also don't think we're compatible at all.
I haven't really gotten to meet her yet. I've heard good things about her though.
One I'm personally very curious about... Jasmine.
[g1], that's Damien's girl.
I know, it's not that serious though, we're just playing a game.
Imagine Jasmine was single. Would you want to date her?
If she was single then yes. I think she's a very beautiful woman with a big heart.
Mmmm... I thought so. She deserves better than Damien [mcf].
That's for her to decide. And that's a bridge I'm scared to cross.
You know it's coming right?
Yeah, it certainly feels that way.
What is she writing? There really isn't anything to take notes on... at least not anymore.
I honestly can't say [g1]. I just can't think of her in that way when she's in a relationship with Damien.
I understand babe... I think you're exactly what she needs. But that's up to you two.
What is she writing? There really isn't anything to take notes on... at least not anymore.
Oh! What are you doing babe?
Nothing baby, I just wanted my hand right here.
Uh huh... and why's that?
I was just checking to see if you were as excited as me.
How excited are you?
Talking about this is fun [mcf]...
Let's keep going.
Who next?
Nothing baby... I just think it's sweet.
What is?
You're sitting here telling me all these beautiful women aren't for you.
I know you don't mean it that way... but it makes me feel good.
You know you're special [g1]. Not many girls could ever compare.
I love you
I love you too.
But there's surely at least another girl here that you like.
Let's keep looking.
Who next?
Oh, she looks like she's asleep. But what about Penelope?
Damn, she's a lot like me right now... sleepy.
I wonder how she feels about that kiss last night...
She went running before I could really say anything.
Yeah, I like her. She reminds me a lot of Shauna.
Really? I heard Shauna talk about her.
Once again I don't really know much about her. But I'll make an effort to learn.
She reminds me a lot of Shauna...
Really? I heard Shauna talk about her. So you're into her?
She's nice. She's someone I hope Shauna can get to know. They've been through a lot of the same things.
But she's a bit too much for me... she's read a lot of interviews from me and already knows a lot about me.
It feels strange.
Oh yeah, I can see that being weird. Then again it's kind of cute.
What about her? I don't think I've learned her name yet...
It's Carly. And I haven't had a real conversation with her yet so I really can't say.
I'm sure she's a nice girl.
I think so too. But I have no clue in all honesty.
All right, so next... uhh...
Oh, just skip them babe.
I wonder what they're whispering about.
It's okay... you can say.
[g1]...
Like you said, they're off limits. I'm not thinking about them like that.
I don't like limiting you...
You're not... in any way. I promise.
Also I meant to tell you, I talked to Liz. I don't know if you've already heard but she agreed to talk after class.
She did? Thank you...
Yeah, she actually came to me. She's hurting just like you [g1].
Not for much longer.
What are you two talking about?
About our plans for after class.
Oh? What are they?
Excuse me.
Please pay attention you three.
Sorry Veronica. You have our attention.
Thank you.
At least now I'm excited for after class.
I am too [g1]. We should focus before we get in trouble though.
True.
The rest of class later
Okay everyone, that should do it for today.
You're free to leave, I'll see all of you tomorrow morning.
Finally... I don't mind class.
Just not when I'm half asleep.
Hey [mcf].
Hey Kimmy. How are you?
I'm tired... but I wanted to ask.
Did you still want to show me that house today? If you're busy it can wait.
Of course Kimmy. I just have to stay with Veronica and make up for yesterday. If I send you the address could you meet me there later?
Thank you! Yeah. I can meet you there. Just let me know when.
Will do Kimmy. I'll see you soon.
Bye [mcf].
It's really nice seeing her smile.
[mcf]?
Hi.
Hey Bailey. Where did those glasses come from?
Oh, I sometimes wear them in class. My eyes started to hurt halfway through.
Do you like them?
They look great Bailey.
Thank you.
So what's up?
Just killing some time, they're doing some work to the diner so it's really loud there right now.
Just come and hang with us for a bit.
What's happening?
Bailey doesn't want to go home yet. So I said she could come hang out with us.
Are you sure?
Yeah, I have to stay with Veronica but I'll be there soon.
Are you sure [g1]?
We'd love to have you over Bailey. You're more than welcome.
Thank you so much [g1].
What's this about hanging out?
Hey Jasmine, you still coming over?
If you'll have me.
You're always welcome to come over anytime.
That's sweet of you. Yeah, I'd love to come by.
I have to give Rainn a ride home first... I know she'll want to take a nap.
So I'll be there soon.
Something is wrong with her.
You leaving now?
Yeah, so I can get it out of the way.
Let me walk you out.
What's wrong Bailey?
It's dumb... just me being selfish.
I was hoping that when we hung out that we'd have some alone time.
We will, I promise. [g1] and Shauna already agreed. So I better see you there. Okay?
[mcf]... I'm excited. I've been thinking about you all class long.
I'm excited too.
I'm going to go home and get ready...
We're going to have fun.
Yes we will. I'll be home as quickly as I can.
Don't make me wait too long.
I want it as badly as you do Bailey, so don't worry about that.
Good... I'll see you soon. Very soon.
Bye Bailey.
You leaving now?
Yeah, I'll be by your place soon. Bye everyone.
See you soon Bailey.
Me and [mcf] are going to stay and talk to Elizabeth.
If you two want to go ahead and take Stacy and head to our place then we'll meet you there.
Are you sure? We can wait.
It's fine. It may take a minute, I'm not sure.
If you change your mind then just give me a call.
I will. Bye Jasmine.
Bye everyone.
Guess that includes me. Do you need me to do anything?
What do you mean?
While I'm home. Do you need your clothes washed or anything?
Don't worry about that Shauna, I'll take care of it.
I'm just offering. You know I can-
Come here.
Mwah!
If you keep shutting me up with kisses we're going to have some problems.
Yeah? What are you going to do about it?
You'll see. Bye [mcf], I love you.
I love you too Shauna, be safe getting home.
You know it.
Excuse me.
I hear you're going to be taking my friend away.
Hey Willow, and that's the hopeful outcome.
Well let me apologize to [g1] real quick. I don't want her to hold me from talking to Elizabeth at all.
Oh, I mean. Yeah, go for it.
Did I hear my name?
Yes you did.
Oh, Willow... it's nice to meet you.
I won't bullshit you [g1]. I said something I regret saying the other day. I didn't intend to hurt your feelings.
I didn't mean it and I was just trying to make Rainn laugh.
In fact I think you're attractive, and I was jealous of your boyfriend.
And for all those reasons, I apologize and I hope we can start over.
Oh... Willow. Thank you.
So? Apology accepted?
Yes. Thank you for apologizing.
What about you [mcf]? Do you accept my apology?
It's your girl, I figure the apology extends to you as well.
I appreciate the apology and honesty Willow. Apology accepted.
Cool, I'll talk to you soon then. I'm out of here.
Oh, bye Willow.
Bye. Oh... if Elizabeth needs anything that she left at my place just call me and I'll bring it.
Will do, thanks Willow.
Did you ask her to do that?
Kind of, I told her that if she ever wanted us to be friends with her that she would have to apologize.
Well that was nice of her...
Guys...
Oh, Liz. You came out of nowhere.
I want to apologize too... I fucked up [g1]. I let my emotions control me again.
Liz... it's okay.
It's not... I shouldn't have called you those names. You know I didn't mean it.
Oh...
It's okay sis. I forgive you. It's nothing we can't fix.
[g1]... please just be mad at me. I deserve it.
No, you're my sister and you're hurting. I'm here for you.
I'm so sorry... I should've never called mom.
Don't worry about that right now.
All I care about is knowing that you're safe and that you're happy.
What was that about calling their mom?
Come back home Liz. We can work through whatever. You can yell at me, you can do whatever. Just please don't leave.
[g1]... I can't promise anything. I'm not perfect.
You don't have to promise or be perfect. I just want you to keep trying.
Please... for me.
Okay... but we have to talk. About a lot of things.
We can do that there. Tell me whatever you have to tell me Liz. I won't judge you.
Just please come home.
Are you sure that's okay with you [mcf]?
Am I worth the headache?
Damn right you are. Come home Liz.
Thank you baby.
I honestly don't deserve your two's forgiveness.
You deserve more than you think Liz.
If you two don't need me then you can go ahead and head home.
Go ahead and talk about whatever you two need to, and if you need me for anything I'll be home soon.
Are you sure?
Absolutely. You two have got this.
Can I have a hug before we leave?
I owe you [mcf].
Not many people get tenth chances.
I'll do my best not to let you down again.
I know you will.
Bye [mcf].
Bye Liz.
I can't help but feel that this is temporary.
I've seen it too many times, Liz is good for a few days then we're right back to her hating everyone.
Maybe this is the time it lasts?
I'm sorry, we were all meant to talk and I kind of took it all on myself.
That's totally fine.
I couldn't help myself... I just really wanted to hug her.
You're precious [g1]. Get home safe okay? I'll be there as soon as I can.
I'll be safe. I promise. I love you.
I love you too.
Mwah!
Bye [mcf]
Now just to get through this last bit of class.
At least Veronica is cool. This shouldn't be too bad.
Are those Jasmine's notes? She must've forgotten them. I should bring them to her.
Oh...
That's what she was writing the whole time...
Looks like she wrote it until her pen gave out.
Should I take it with me?
I'll take it. She's clearly hurting more than she's showing.
She needs to talk to someone about it. I can confront her with it.
I shouldn't. It's not a good look for me if she finds out I took it.
I'll just flip it over so hopefully no one messes with it.
Phew, I think that was all of them.
Yep, I believe so.
Damn, Veronica has a nice figure... and she's not wearing shoes again... I wonder why?
Sir?
What were you doing?
Uhh...
I was just thinking about why you don't usually wear shoes... it's not a big deal though.
Fuck, [g1]'s game made me want to just check everyone out I guess.
Oh, yeah... that.
My bad...
I don't like wearing shoes. They hurt my feet.
Especially the ones I tend to wear to work.
So when I'm in my own classroom I like to be bare foot.
That's totally reasonable.
But I'm a little tired of this classroom today. What do you say I throw some shoes on and we head to the park?
Really? I'd much prefer that.
I figured so. Let's go.
That's exactly what I need. A little fresh air and sunshine.
A few minutes later
Wow, it's nice out here today.
It's easy to forget how beautiful outside can be.
Let's sit for a moment.
Sure.
So how did you like class today?
Today was a little rough, I didn't sleep well last night so it was a little hard to focus today.
I hope that's not a common problem.
It's not. Just a one time thing.
So, how do you think I am as a teacher?
I don't have much to go off of but you've done well so far. I enjoy your class.
I think you as a person aren't bad either. I don't mind spending time with you in a park at all.
That's all very sweet of you. You're not bad company either.
Thank you Veronica.
So is there anything I should know about yesterday?
We went back over a lot of it today. Do you have any questions?
No, I think I have a pretty solid grasp on everything.
Oh, how's Nathan and his mom doing?
He bugs me everytime I see him asking if he can hang out with you again.
Set it up and I'll be there.
I still have to talk to his mom about it. But it really warms my heart knowing you want to see him again.
I still owe you for doing that the first time.
You don't owe me anything.
How did I know you would say that?
It's what I do.
It's very charming...
Carly?
Huh?
Oh, hey there Carly.
She seems to be taking that weight loss thing very seriously... that's cool.
Still hiding from me though...
Oh... Bye Carly!
Have a good day!
That poor girl...
What about her?
Oh, nothing. She's just been through it recently. Seeing her run here is a very nice surprise.
If I may ask, what's wrong with her?
It's not my place to say [mcf]. I don't have all the facts anyway.
It does make me feel lazy though.
Would you like to walk some?
Sure, we can do that.
I wonder what all that was about... I haven't heard anything about Carly.
I just figured she was a shy girl.
Don't worry, I won't keep you for much longer.
It's just nice to have some company.
We can do this anytime you want to Veronica. I'm having a good time.
I'm very glad to hear it, now let's walk.
She's a very beautiful woman... why does she sound lonely?
Not my place to ask... so I shouldn't worry about it.
I should just try and give her an enjoyable time.
So what would you like to talk about?
One walk and conversation later
Phew, that was a walk... my feet are sore.
I just don't think you were made for shoes...
Yeah... me neither...
Add it to the long list of things I wasn't made for.
Woah, that sudden mood change.
Are you okay Veronica? Did I say something?
No, I just get to thinking about things on walks...
How did I end up here? This isn't my passion.
Oh...
You have your whole life ahead of you kid... never settle.
That's the best advice I can give you.
Hey Veronica... it's okay.
What's got you feeling this way?
I don't think I'm happy.
With what exactly? If I can help in any way please let me know.
I need to go...
Veronica... wait, we can talk through some of this.
Just vent a little.
I can't right now [mcf]...
Wait, wait... talk to me. What happened?
This is the first time I've actually taken a step back from everything...
I've been so caught up in it all that I didn't realize how sad I am...
I don't want to go back...
It's okay Veronica. Do you honestly hate it that much?
I don't know... I may just be stressed out...
Maybe... and even if you aren't. You're still an intelligent young woman with her entire life ahead of her.
This job isn't who you have to be.
You're not stuck...
I think you may just need some rest. A good night's sleep.
Yeah... you may be right.
I don't really see myself making it through the year at this rate... but being emotional in front of my students isn't going to help anything.
I really don't mind Veronica.
I know... and that makes it worse.
Do you need a ride home?
You're leaving? And no... I don't have to go far from here.
Yeah... I'm going to head out. I really do need to lay down. I'm sorry if that's rude.
No, I understand.
Good, I'll see you in class tomorrow.
Yep... right on time. Bye Veronica. I'm only a phonecall away if you need me.
Well shit... it was a really nice time until that happened...
I wonder what got to her? Maybe she is just stressed. Not like I can judge on that.
Guess it's time to text Kimmy. And I might as well go ahead and text Bailey as well.
Oh that's right... I messaged Anna this morning. I have a message from her.
That's so great to hear!
I'll message Rachael right away and have her set it up!
I'm so happy to hear that you want to see from me again.
I had a really great time with you Anna. And I'm looking forward to seeing you again.
I think we'll both enjoy the time very much. I'm going to call Rachael. I'll message you soon. xoxo
Oh, a message from Alexis...
Why didn't I go to college myself?
Cold feet. Got scared and decided against it. So I'm still just working at this restaurant.
Do you regret it?
I'm not sure yet... it could be leading to something great...
What are your plans now?
To go where my heart takes me.
My boss will be mad at me if I'm on my phone for too long. Message me later. <3
Hmmm... I wonder what she meant by that.
I'll message Kimmy first.
Hey Kimmy... are you good to go look at that house now?
Yes please... I want out of this room for a bit. Where is it?
I'll send you the address... I'll see you there soon.
I'll be there real soon.
Now to text Bailey.
Hey Bailey. I'll be headed home soon. Are you still coming?
Absolutely... I just have to do a few errands first and then I'll be there. Is that okay?
That works out perfectly. I'll see you soon Bailey.
You'll see a lot of me soon... be ready. ;)
Trust me, I'm ready.
See you [mcf].
I believe that's all I had to do. Guess it's time to meet up with Kimmy.
I'm only a few minutes away... I hope she'll be happy with the house.
A few minutes later
There she is... and I like her outfit.
You like the place Kimmy?
Oh, you got here quicker than I thought you would. Is the park that close to here?
Closer than you think it is. I plan on jogging there in the mornings sometimes. Any chance I'll see you there?
There's a good possibility.
Good, so... have you peaked through the gate to check out the house?
I was about to. I just got here myself.
Are you excited?
Of course I am. But my family are the ones that are going to be super excited [mcf].
They won't have to stay in that crappy motel anymore.
Are they here?
No, I told them I'd come check it out and I'd call them if everything went okay.
Do you think something is going to go wrong?
It's not everyday someone offers you a house for nothing. I'm skeptical.
Well let's put that worry to rest. Head on inside.
It's nice right?
Wow [mcf]... It's really nice... too nice.
The door should be locked. Let me open it.
I'm excited... how many rooms does this place have?
Plenty. As many as you'll need and then some.
Huh... the door isn't locked... did I forget to lock it when I left?
Was I even the last one to leave?
What's wrong [mcf]?
Uhh... nothing, just stay behind me when we walk in.
Okay?
Hmmm, nothing seems out of order...
*Indistinct whispering*
What the hell [mcf]? Is someone in here?
What the fuck? Who is in our house?
Who could it be? A burglar? Or just someone looking for a house to squat in?
Stay behind me Kimmy.
Fuck... it sounds like a guy's voice... and it sounds like it's coming from the next room over...
I won't find out anything standing here...
*Whispering* Just get through it.
Damien?! What the fuck are you doing here?!
[mcf]?? Oh fuck!
Oh fuck is right! Why the hell are you in my home?! How did you get in?
[mcf] I can explain.
What's going on [mcf]?
Stay behind me Kimmy... I don't know.
Is that him I hear?
Honey... you're home!
I've been waiting a long time to meet you.
What the fuck... Ryker? Why are the two of you in my home?
Not yours... mine. We were just letting you stay here.
But clearly you didn't appreciate that.
So how can we help you?
What the fuck is going on Ryker?
Hi Kimmy... you seem a little upset.
Men are talking right now, do you mind waiting outside?
I don't believe there's any seats for average swimmers here.
Unless you want to sit on my lap, then we might could make something work out.
I want to knock this motherfucker out again...
I don't know what's going on though. There may be more people in the house.
I need to see what's going on before I let my temper take control of me.
You're a fucking disgusting pig Ryker.
I hope you choke on all of that shit you talk.
So you'll be waiting outside then?
Fuck you.
Hmmm... Damien. Take her outside.
Boss...
I said to fucking take her outside. Do not make me repeat myself.
Do I have to make a phonecall?
No sir...
That's what I thought.
Now take her outside... stay out there with her. I need to talk to Mr. [mcl].
Yes sir.
What are you trying to do [mcf]?
I thought you were trying to help me... but you just brought me here to be made fun of by captain shitface.
No Kimmy. I promise I didn't know they would be here. I'm as mad as you are right now.
Just go outside. Let me talk to him and figure things out.
If you don't trust me then you can leave. But no matter what I'll have a place for your family to stay tonight.
Even if it's with me.
Fine... but if you fuck me over... you'll regret it [mcf].
You're one tricky son of a bitch [mcf].
Damien... I don't know what the fuck is going on but you better not-
Don't listen to him Damien. He's not your boss. Take the girl outside... but don't hurt her.
And you Damien... I thought you were one of the few good guys here... You're just another one of them.
You no spine having bitch. Jasmine should've ditched your ass months ago.
Come on Kimmy...
This is such a fucking joke.
Not the cleanest of introductions.
Women... am I right?
So what? You bring her here to bang her or something? You can do better than her [mcf]...
...
No comment? Oh well.
Now that that's out of the way... let's take a seat.
Hmmm... he turned his back to me and he's made it incredibly easy for me to try something.
I don't feel like he's that dumb... maybe he's just that cocky?
Or he wants me to try something. He's already tried to claim assault once... and this time he would be right.
Sit down star boy. It's time you realized a few things.
I'm good. I'd rather stand.
It's really in your best interest to sit down. Come on.
Don't you want to know why I'm here? Why Damien is here?
That only happens if you sit down. Or else I'll have to kindly ask you to get out of my house.
Fuck it... I'm already here. And I want answers.
Good, good. I've been trying to have this conversation for a while now.
First time was when you were in the nurse's room after Harper's daughter landed on you. I was on my way when that girlfriend of yours showed up.
Then I was told that you were walking down the street by yourself at night. I thought luck was on my side until I arrived and that redheaded girl was talking to you.
I tried to get her to leave and she refused. I tried to scare her off and she refused. I tried to creep her out and she refused.
Then after all of that I finally get you back to my house and next thing I know I'm waking up on the floor and you're nowhere to be found.
That fucking bitch.
Deep breaths... stay calm. He'll pay for these comments later...
Why did you make me bring Stacy to meet you and Charles? And why did you try to talk to her at the motel?
To get under your skin. To see how you'd react.
To learn your weaknesses. And I learned a big one.
It was also to see where Charles' fell... To see if he would side with me or you.
See... I had a good thing going. I had everything set up and good to go. Then you decided to come here.
I convinced Charles to hire Harper... I told him that the players on the bench were making the starters worse.
I got the playbook altered several times. Everything was falling apart and it was perfect.
I had the perfect scapegoat, the perfect follow through, it was just the perfect plan.
Why? Why do all of that?
Do you know what the betting line is like when a team with no wins goes against one of the best teams in college basketball?
Do you know how much larger that betting line is if the team goes completely defeated two years in a row?
One win against those teams and everyone is swimming in money. All it takes is a little bit of convincing.
And then you show up...
I don't think you can be bought... not like Damien.
In fact I don't know what to do with you. 
What if you just weren't here? You came here because of that weirdo Shauna right?
Ryker... you better watch your fucking mouth.
Hmm... let me finish [mcf].
It's you, that girl with the big eyes, the freak, and big tits right?
One more fucking word Ryker... I'll send you through the fucking wall.
Your face is getting all red [mcf].
You're a lot like your dad. You know that?
What the fuck do you know about my dad?!
I looked into your past. Your father had anger issues.
You should really see someone about that...
Fuck... he's right... I was about to lose it.
What do you say? I'll try to get you all transfered to another school. It would've been easier if I talked to you sooner but I still think it could happen.
It would be a lot easier if there weren't people talking about your life to hundreds of thousands of people every single day.
But that doesn't mean it's impossible.
What do you say?
You haven't explained why Damien was here yet.
It's very rude not to answer me [mcf].
You told me you'd explain it to me. I'm not answering until you do.
He's my employee.
What do you employ him to do?
Whatever I ask him to do... hmmm.
Why does he do that?
He has a lot of the same weaknesses you do. Including a sick mother... very easy to manipulate.
We pay the medical bills, he does a little spying, gives me info. Fair trade.
I don't believe you.
Are you calling me a liar?
Not really, I think you're hiding the real truth behind a half true answer.
Want to hear it from the man himself?
Gorg! Come here!
So there was someone else... and his name is Gorg.
Ryker knew I was coming here.
Yes boss? Is it time?
No, go get Damien. He's outside.
And watch the girl he's with. Don't touch her.
Yes sir.
It's a good thing I stayed calm. I'm not sure if I could take on Ryker, Damien, and this guy.
He raised a good question about getting me to transfer though. All of this could be made so much simpler.
But then Harp would be stuck with them... unless I could get her in the deal too. But who even knows if she would agree?
And Rachael moved her business here... things are already in motion.
Didn't expect him huh?
Actually I did. Maybe not the red beard... but I was definitely expecting him.
Not as dumb as you look then.
I mean you can't blame me for assuming. You've fallen for pretty much everything else.
That guy right there being the worst one you've fallen for so far.
Damien... buddy. Our friend here doesn't believe you've been following his every move.
...
Go ahead don't be shy. Tell him about how you've stabbed him in the back multiple times.
Tell him about how after you met him you told him that you would be resting. Only to then follow him around all day.
...
I said tell him!
I'm giving you a chance to put a positive spin on it... how I put it won't be so kind.
...
I've been following you around [mcf]. It's why I'm rarely available.
Why Damien?
I had to.
I don't like that answer... what about you [mcf]?
He didn't even talk about any of the fun stuff.
My personal favorite being that pool date you were meant to have.
I made him miss it so he could watch you be with his girl.
Sadly you're a goody two shoes so nothing happened... but it's the thought that counts.
Isn't that right Damien?
...
Heh, even I won't make you answer that one.
I'm going to be on my way. You think about what we talked about [mcf].
I'll ask you how you feel tomorrow... sleep on it.
And my key is sitting on the dresser over there. It's my only one. Give it to Kimmy.
I don't need this place. And I won't be back to bother her.
Really Ryker?
Call it an act on good faith that you'll do the right thing. Kimmy isn't a part of our problem.
I'm glad you see it that way.
See you tomorrow [mcf]. I'll leave you and Damien to talk.
Yeah... I guess you will.
Oh... and a little heads up. Damien isn't the only one watching you. And whoever else is doesn't work for me.
What the hell?
So watch your back... see you around [mcf].
That's surely just him trying to get in my head.
Are you okay Damien?
Yeah... I'm sorry [mcf].
I know... and we're going to talk about it.
But we should check on Kimmy first.
Yeah.
So much for trying to be my best friend... but I don't think it had anything to do with me. He's just doing what he has to do.
If I had to spy on someone to make sure [am] was okay then there's no doubt that I'd be doing it.
I mean I'm pissed at Damien... but I'm going to hear him out.
No matter what I won't be able to trust him from here on. Ryker is a fucking tool.
I'm not excited about Kimmy living here now. I'll leave the decision up to her though.
Kimmy? Are you okay?
Did Ryker and... Gorg leave?
Why did you bring me here?
I was so excited... I told all of my family...
Now I have to go back to the motel and tell them all that I was wrong...
No you don't Kimmy.
What do you mean?
Ryker was just trying to get to me. This didn't have anything to do with you.
I'm sorry it went down this way but it should be over. Ryker left his key and said you're free to stay here.
What if he comes back?
Then you call me instantly and I'll be here as quickly as I can.
I don't think he'll bother you though. I would still stay on alert for the time being.
You didn't have to agree to anything did you? He's not making you do anything?
Do you really think I would ever work for him Kimmy?
I don't know what to think anymore [mcf].
Well I'll tell you what I think then.
I think you should go inside and check out this house. If you think it's worth the potential trouble then call your family and have them head on over.
Me and Damien need to talk alone for a second anyway.
Thank you [mcf]...
And I'm sorry Damien. I didn't know the situation you were in. I shouldn't have called you those names.
I wish I hadn't.
It's okay...
Everything is going to be okay. But Ryker can still inhale a dick.
You need to make things right.
I know...
Listen to him okay? He explained what's going on to me.
Things aren't as bad as they seem. Just go easy on him.
I will Kimmy.
I'll be inside if you need me.
I'll be in there in a second.
So, where do we start?
I didn't want to do it [mcf].
I only told him what I had to... the absolute bare minimum.
What all did you tell him?
Pretty much just where you were and where you were going to be.
Every day?
Yeah... everyday. Not all the time though. There were some nights that I didn't 
I mainly only saw you when you were heading somewhere else. I didn't really try to spy on you when you were at home.
And me doing that wasn't personal. One of my parents is sick. I work for Ryker and in exchange she doesn't have to worry about medical bills.
I'm sorry to hear that Damien. How bad is it?
Bad.
He told me we're moving onto other things. I won't have to watch you anymore.
And... about that day when we were meant to have a date at the pool.
What about it?
Thank you for being there for Jasmine. I heard everything you said to her.
She's at your place now right?
Yeah, she's with [g1] and Shauna. But Damien... I have to ask you something.
I never planned to ask you. But since we're here and we're being open and honest.
Are you cheating on Jasmine?
...
I think you already know the answer to that...
I don't know who I am anymore [mcf]. I don't act like me.
I have so much that I have to come clean for. I just don't know how to explain it.
You don't have to explain anything to me. It's Jasmine that you have to explain to.
You can't keep going on like this. You're hurting yourself and her at the same time.
You're right. I need to go [mcf].
I have to set some things straight.
Can Jasmine stay at your place for a bit? I'll call her when I'm ready.
You know she's always welcome to stay as long as she needs to... I've already told you that.
Okay... uhh...
Are we... good?
We're teammates Damien. I'm upset at what you did but I understand why. That doesn't mean I'm magically okay with it though.
I'll make things right [mcf]. Trust me.
We'll see Damien.
Oh man... what the fuck just happened?
I just came to make Kimmy happy... and now I have three more headaches to deal with.
Fuck it, let's go see what I came here to do.
Kimmy?
Huh, she must've went upstairs.
Kimmy??
She's not here either...
Oh. I think I know where she is.
It's not the biggest pool. But it's not bad.
You've got to be kidding me.
What? Don't like it?
I've always wanted a pool. The water keeps me calm.
Oh, so you do like it?
It's the best [mcf].
Good, what about the rest of the house?
It's amazing too. That green house was the nicest house I've ever lived in.
This one blows it out of the water.
I know that feeling.
So everything is good?
Yeah, I believe it is. I'm about to call my family. You can stay and meet them if you want to.
I would love to Kimmy... but I have to get back to my own family.We had some things planned today.
Okay... maybe some other time then.
Absolutely Kimmy. And don't forget to call if you need anything.
I will... and you do the same.
You can count on it.
I wish I was nicer to you from the start.
Eh, better late than never.
Thank you again... truly.
I hope your family is excited Kimmy. Let me know how it goes. I'll see you in class tomorrow.
Goodbye [mcf].
Okay... that's over...
I'm still so tired... I just want to go home and cuddle up with my girls and go to sleep.
But there's still so much to do... at least it will all be at my own place.
A few minutes later
Oh mom... what are you doing waiting by the door?
What do you think? I'm waiting on you.
Oh, that's sweet of you. I missed you too.
Is something wrong honey?
What? I'm doing okay.
What happened?
What? Do I have a cut on my face or something?
No, I'm your mother. I can tell when something is bothering you. What happened?
I just had to deal with something. I promise I'm fine.
Tell me already... Did you have another dream?
No, no. It wasn't anything like that.
What's going on? What's wrong [mcf]?
Nothing... [am] is getting worried about nothing.
Oh my god [mcf]... did you have another dream?
No... nothing like that at all. I promise.
You know Kimmy? The girl in our class? She needed a place for her and her family to stay.
I was going to let her stay at the last house we were at. Since we have no intentions to go back.
But when I got there I noticed that the door wasn't locked. When I went inside I found Damien and Ryker.
Why were they there [mcf]? And who is Ryker?
He's a jerk. But that's not the worst thing. It turns out that Ryker has been paying Damien to spy on me.
What do you mean spy on you?!
Exactly what you think. Turns out Ryker wanted to talk to me. He wants to try and transfer us all to a different college.
That's not even possible. He's trying to trick you [mcf].
Fuck him and Damien. Remember he told me he was going to be your bestfriend?
It's not that simple Shauna. Damien is only doing it so he can pay for his mom's medical bills.
Do you really believe that?
Yeah, I do. I don't think Damien would lie about that.
Are you going to tell Jasmine?
No, it's not my place. Damien said he was going to tell her everything.
Do I need to talk with someone at the school?
I'm afraid that wouldn't help mom.
What happened with the girl? Kimmy?
Ryker ended up leaving his key. She's staying there now.
Is she safe?
I think so... I told her to call me the second she felt she was in any danger.
Can we sit down to finish this? My legs are killing me.
Of course.
So... we're all safe?
Yes, I'll never let anyone touch a single one of you.
Is anyone trying to hurt us?
No mom, it's nothing like that. Ryker isn't trying to hurt anyone... he's just trying to help himself.
How can you be sure?
I wouldn't lie to you.
Hey... hey... it's okay. I know you're worried. It's a scary thing to hear.
But we have to trust [mcf]. I believe him when he says that he'll never let anyone hurt me.
I do too... I'm just worried for you girls.
I know... and I'm worried for you too. But all we're going to do is stress out [mcf] if we keep going.
Am I stressing you out honey? I didn't mean to...
It's okay mom... I know you're worried. But I'm telling you all that I know.
I'm going to get everything sorted out. So try not to worry about it.
I think I need to calm down... I'm going to go finish the laundry. I'm sorry [mcf].
You can stay mom. We can talk about it.
No... I trust you. And you need to rest. You've had a long day.
I did your laundry by the way... or at least I helped [am] do it.
Thank you Shauna.
No backtalk or protest saying I shouldn't have done that?
Nope not today... I'm just thankful for you.
I'm happy to help... I need to learn all these things anyway.
So now that it's just us two...
You sure there's nothing to worry about?
I mean... you girls should stay alert just in case. But no, I don't think anyone is in any danger.
Okay... that's all I needed to hear.
So how was your day?
It was another eventful one. Is Jasmine here?
Yeah, Jasmine, [g1], and Liz are all watching a movie.
So [g1] and Liz are getting along?
It certainly seems like it.
Well that's great. Why aren't you watching it with them?
It's a scary movie... I don't like them.
Heh, I forgot about that.
If you were here I might've watched it.
If I held you?
Mhmmmm...
Babe... you're home!
Hey [g1]. How's everything going?
Everything is fantastic. Everyone I love is here.
I'll wait until later to tell her about Ryker. I want her to enjoy her evening.
Is that a new outfit?
Uhh not exactly... It was in Rachael's room and I tried it on for fun...
I really like how my butt looks in it.
Well now you have to show me.
Damn, you weren't joking.
You really do have a great butt [g1].
I wish I had a butt like this.
Please... it's not like you don't have a great one too Shauna.
Yeah, I have to side with [g1] on this one.
It's a shame that we aren't all alone right now... so I could get better looks.
If Jasmine wasn't here I would take you up on that offer.
Yeah, it's too risky with her here. Liz too.
Elizabeth fell asleep already. She's not one to get scared and she fell asleep halfway through it.
She said she was tired... that she didn't sleep very well at Willow's.
Oh well then it's good she's resting some.
That's what I said.
Hey babe... guess what?
What's up?
We have our next surprise ready for you... we're saving it for in the morning.
Ha, that's not fair. You can't tease me like that.
Should we give him a hint?
Hmmm... sure...
It has to do with what we were talking about before.
And that's your only hint.
Oooh, that's exciting...
And hey there Jasmine.
Hey [mcf]. How did the rest of class go for you?
It wasn't bad. Me and Veronica went to the park.
Ha, I was wondering what you two would do.
Hey... I'm going to go help [am] finish the laundry.
*Whispering* And I'll help them out too. You should spend some time with Jasmine. She needs some attention.
Okay, I can do that. Bailey should be here soon also.
Well we'll be back there if you need us.
Love you girls.
We love you too.
So how's it going Jasmine?
Fuck... it's pretty awkward interacting with her after my talk with Damien... I wonder what's going to happen between the two of them.
It's pretty good. [g1] and Shauna are always a blast to hang out with... it's nice to just have some girl time.
Yeah... I bet so. Anything new with Damien?
Can we please not talk about him?
I came here to get away from that... let's talk about other things.
I'm sorry Jasmine. That was insensitive of me.
Woah Jasmine...
What's going on?
Why am I always asked about Damien?
Is that all anyone cares about? If I'm making him happy or not?
No, no, no. Jasmine. That's not at all what I was asking.
I asked about Damien because I know it matters to you. It has nothing to do with him.
It has everything to do with the fact that I want to see you happy.
But no more talking about Damien. I want to learn a few things about you Jasmine.
Promise? Nothing about Damien?
Yes, I promise.
Well what do you want to know about me?
Well I just realized something... turn your head to the side.
What is it?
Is there something on my face?
Is that a heart shaped birthmark on your cheek?
Heh, yes. It used to be by my ear but it keeps sliding down towards my lips.
I think that's adorable Jasmine.
Hehe, thank you. Not many people comment on it... especially guys.
But back to actual questions...
Hmmm... what are some of your goals?
Oh wow... not starting out easy huh?
Uhmmm... I sort've always imagined myself as Damien's manager. Or a sports writer.
Outside of jobs I want a family. I grew up with a strong sense of family values and I haven't even seen my family in a few years now.
It really makes me want to start my own.
I can understand that... I feel that way myself sometimes.
I never really knew my real family, except for my dad. Part of me wants to have a child just so I can give them everything that I never had.
That's really sweet.
I can see you and [g1] having really cute babies.
Shauna too. They're lucky girls.
All three of you being parents. They're both very lucky.
What makes you say that?
They know what they have. They know you're going to take care of them and the kid no matter what. To me that's invaluable.
Well thank you Jasmine. I think you'd be a good mom. You definitely have a nurturing presence.
I think so too... hey, is it cool if I take this shirt off? I have a top on underneath.
It's just a little hot in here.
You don't have to ask me that Jasmine. Go for it.
I just didn't want anything to be weird.
Ahh, I see what she was saying now. This would be a little weird if she didn't say anything.
Man, her body always shocks me a little bit. There's so many great asses in this office right now.
[mcf]?
[g1] is asking for you. Could you not hear her?
Huh?
Oh, I'm sorry. What is it [g1]?
I came to tell you that Bailey just called and said she was on her way.
Bailey's still coming? Awh, that's too bad.
Why is it a bad thing?
Because I was about to head home.
Come on Jasmine... you can stay for a little longer.
Hmmm... fine. But you have to join us.
Yep, come cuddle up with me babe.
I won't say no to that.
You two are so cute together.
You know me and [mcf] were just talking about babies. I was saying how you two would be excellent parents.
He didn't disagree with me.
I know he would be the perfect dad. It warms my heart just thinking about him pushing a child on a swing...
If that is us one day, I don't think I'd ever stop crying, just because of how happy I would be.
Bzzz, Bzzz
I'm sorry... I'm getting a phonecall.
*Whispering* Aah, I see why you didn't hear me at first now.
Yeah, my bad on that one.
Sorry again guys...
You're fine.
Hello? Who is this?
Oh... hey Damien. Why are you calling me from this number?
Oh shit...
What do you mean?
Are you drunk Damien?
What do you mean?! Why?
Damien I swear to god...
What happened Jasmine?
...
He told me not to come home!
Why?
I don't know!
Well fuck him... you can stay here.
What [g1] said. You're free to stay here with us.
It's okay Jasmine... look on the brightside. You don't have to put up with anymore of his antics. You can be your own person again.
...
We're here for you Jasmine... wether you need us to support you or to give you space. Just let us know.
Exactly what [mcf] said.
Fuck... I didn't expect that.
At least me and [g1] are here for her.
I'm fine...
Huh?
I knew it was going to happen sooner or later... I was prepared for it.
Are you sure I can stay here?
Absolutely Jasmine.
Can I go to sleep? I really just want to lay down.
Are you sure? Shouldn't we talk about this?
Yeah... we can lay down in a minute.
We just want to make sure that you're okay.
Can I please just go to sleep?
I really don't want to talk about this right now.
Jasmine...
It's okay baby... I'll take her back there to lay down.
*Whispering* I'll make sure she's okay... just spend some time with Bailey.
Are you sure?
Mhmm.
Thank you for letting me stay... I don't know what I'd do without you two.
You're absolutely always welcome here. If you need anything from me I'll be in here. Goodnight Jasmine.
Goodnight [mcf].
Fuck... why did Damien have to do it like that?
I thought he was actually going to own up to his mistakes...
I'm just glad me and [g1] were here for her... and that may be why Damien chose to do it like this.
Fuck... and now Bailey is about to be here... I can't tell her about what just went down.
Why? I'm at [mcf]'s house.
Oh... if you say so... I'll be there soon.
Everything okay Jasmine?
Yeah, Damien is being a little weird. He just called and said that I need to come home.
He probably just needs me to do something.
I'll see you two in class tomorrow.
Yep... we'll be there. Drive safe Jasmine.
Welp... that didn't last for very long.
Nope. But next up is Bailey.
Speaking of... I think I'll give you two some time alone. Me and her aren't that close yet and she's coming over to hang out with you.
You know you're free to hang out too [g1].
I know... I might pop in from time to time.
Plus there's a few chores I need to get done.
Mwah!
Just let me know if you need me.
I will baby.
Now just to wait on Bailey...
I do hope everything goes well with Damien and Jasmine...
I wonder how long I have before she shows...
Knock, knock, knock
The answer was not long at all.
Coming!
Hey [mcf].
Mmmmm... you're exactly what I need right now.
She really is... sweet and sexy to rid my mind of this strange night.
Oh yeah... why's that?
There's way too many reasons to count.
You're not wasting any time...
In a hurry are we?
I think you're somehow hornier than I am.
I think you're right...
Well let me show off some more then.
Mmmm... I love those shorts.
I'm sure you do... they basically show the top of my ass.
Are we alone?
There's girls in the other room. But they shouldn't bother us.
Good.
This is a nice place [mcf].
A lot of open space...
Tons of space to stretch out even.
I know exactly what she's trying to do... and it's working.
Oh! [mcf].
It's time to finish what we started in that kitchen Bailey.
There's that beautiful innie.
You have a perfect thigh gap too.
Ohhhhh....
Heh, you're soaking wet again Bailey... maybe you are hornier than me after all.
Mmmmm... deeper [mcf].
She's not pushing me out as much as she was last time. She's ready for this.
OHHHmmmm! Yes! Oh fuck!
Oh shit... I must've taken too long. She just pushed herself back into my thumb.
Keep... going [mcf]...
I want more... Please give me more.
Mmmm. I can give her more... but from a different angle.
Ohmmm... what are you doing?
You said you wanted more. There's better positions for this.
What were you thinking?
You said you like it a little rough right?
Mhmmm..
Let's get a little rough then.
[mcf]!
You're so fucking sexy Bailey.
Shouldn't we go somewhere more private?
Scared?
Liz is the only one that would be mad at me for doing this and she's asleep. [am]'s already walked in on me before.
[g1] knows we're in here too. She'll probably keep the others occupied.
No... I'm not scared.
Let's get started then.
You have a perfect pussy.
It's yours [mcf].
Mine? So I can do whatever I want to it?
Mhmm...
I know exactly what I want to do...
OHHH!! Fuck [mcf]!
How does it feel?
Mmmmm... I love it...
Do you want me to add another finger?
Mhmmm.
Say please.
Please [mcf]. I want you to stick another finger in me... pretty please. I'll do anything.
Ohhhhh.... Fuck.....
You're so tight Bailey.
I want to go deeper but I don't want to do too much too quickly.
Deeper! Oh fuck!!! OHHHMMMnnnnnnggghh!
Holy shit.
AHHNNGGGGHHooo!! Ooohhhhh.....
Did you just? Already?
Ohhhnnnnmmmm....
Holy shit... I'm sorry [mcf]. I didn't mean to.
Don't apologize. It was hot. You're good to keep going though right?
Of course.
Take your top off Bailey.
Mhmmm... yes sir.
I can't believe that's all it took to make me cum...
You said you've been thinking about this all day. You worked yourself up.
Or you just have magic hands... but I want more than hands.
You have such a nice body Bailey.
Please...
You're surrounded by boobs and butts twice the size of me.
I'm like the fun sized version chocolate bars compared to them.
Maybe I'm a fan of fun size. Show off for me a little Bailey.
Not much to show off... but here you go.
You say that like you don't have an amazing ass.
There's a lot I want to do to it right now.
Really now?
Then why am I showing off for you?
Because I wanted you to.
Oh... Well what do you want me to do now?
Call me Daddy.
Daddy? Hmmmm....
What do you want me to do now Daddy?
How rough do you want to get?
However rough you want to get.
Hmmm... Tell me to stop if I go too far.
I'll start off with a light squeeze.
AHhhh-
Do you like it?
Mmmmmhmmmmmm....
Good girl.
Ehh, let's keep it relatively light for now.
Oh... [mcf].
I love how firm your ass is.
I love how firm your entire body is.
Daddy... can I suck your cock?
[mcf]... can I suck your cock?
I want to make sure you're ready for what's next.
Oh, I'm ready... but yeah. I want you to.
Do you like me being on my knees for you?
I love it...
I want to feel your cock on my lips...
Just have to get these pants off...
Wow... you really are ready.
Told you so.
I swear it's even bigger than last time.
I'm happy I'm here.
I'm happy you're here too.
Do you say that to every girl that has your cock in their hand?
Hehe... I can't wait anymore.
Oh... Bailey...
That feels so good... have you been practicing?
..... Mhmmmm.
Heh, it fucking shows.
Keep going just like that Bailey.
Mmmmm...
Fuck Bailey...
She's letting me control her... she clearly can only go so far so I'm not pushing her past that.
That's something we can try after we've both had a few experiences together.
Mmmmm....
You're doing great Bailey.
As great as this is all I can think about is doing more.
Bailey... I'm ready for more.
I don't want to wait anymore. It's time.
Hehe, I thought you'd never ask Daddy.
Hehe, I thought you'd never ask [mcf].
How do you want to do this?
How experienced are you Bailey? I don't know how much you can handle.
I can handle anything... whatever you want to do.
We'll see about that. Here goes nothing.
Ahh! What are you doing?
Ha, It's pretty self explanatory.
Is this how you want to have sex?
As interesting as this position is... I just wanted to see how easy it is to throw you around.
What do you mean?
AHH! [mcf]!
Haha, it's as easy as I thought it would be!
Oh my god! You scared me [mcf]!
[mcf]?
Oh, I'm sorry... I meant Daddy.
You know I wouldn't hurt you Bailey.
I just wanted you in a better position for this.
Oh...
You sure you're ready? And you're sure you want this?
Absolutely.
Here we go Bailey. Let me know if I need to stop.
Okay...
Mmmmmm..... Mnnnn....
Hmmmm... Keep going...
AHHmmmmmnnnnggggg.....
Are you okay Bailey?
Mhmmmm....
It's a.... good pain...
I'll give her a second to get used to it...
Hnnggg...
You can start [mcf]... I'm fine... Hmmm....
I like the pain...
Ohhhhhh..... fuck....
You're so fucking tight Bailey.
I love your cock... Mmmnnnnn....
Stretch me out [mcf]...
Can I go faster Bailey?
Please fuck me harder Daddy!
Please fuck me harder [mcf]!
HOLY FUCK!!! HNNNGGG!!!
FUCK ME [mcf]! HMMMMGGG!
KEEP GOING! PLEASE DON'T STOP!
I'M GONNA....
Fuck Bailey! I'm close too!
AHHHNNNGGGG!!!
Holy fuck Bailey...
HHHnnnngghhhhmmm......
Hnnghh... fuck...
That was so fucking good.
I'm glad you thought so... because we're not done yet.
Oh!
I'm close Bailey.
Daddy... it's hard to stand...
[mcf]... it's hard to stand...
I'm sorry, I was just about to cum myself.
Fuck, I'm being a little too aggressive with her.
Oh... my bad. I spaced out when I got close and it's all I could think about.
Let's fix this.
If you need a second we can take a break.
Nuh uh... sit down.
I'm tingly but I can do this.
You're the best Bailey.
No, you are. This is incredible.
I hope we get to do this more... and try some more things.
All of this feels so right...
I've forgotten what life was like before you.
I'm really happy [mcf]...
I'm happy too Bailey.
Hehe... and you're not completely happy yet. Well... you're about to be.
Ohhhhh....
Damn Bailey... you're even tighter in this position.
Holy shit... it feels like your cock grew even bigger... Mmmmm....
Ahh! Fuck!
Jesus Christ Bailey...
Mmmmm... this position is even better...
I'll start riding in a second... Mmmm...
Your cock keeps growing... Hnnnnmmmmm...
I love how it feels gliding in and out of me...
I love how fucking tight you are...
Do you want to cum for me?
Keep going Bailey... I'm almost there.
Cum for me... Cum anywhere you want. Hmmmm....
Let your load go... give me all of it.... Hnnnggg...
If you don't soon then I'm going to finish again... Hnnnnnmmmm...
Fuck... I can't hold back [mcf]...
I'm so fucking close Bailey.
HNNNGGGGHHH!!!
MMMMNNNN......
I wonder how'd she would react if I...
HNNNNGGG....
Ahhhhh....
I'm cumming too Bailey!
HNNGG!
Fuck Bailey!
Oh my god!
You came inside me!
Fuck... yeah I did.
HNNGG!
Fuck Bailey!
Oh my god!
You came!
Fuck... yeah I did.
That was hot...
This was fucking great Bailey.
It really was... we'll be doing it again right?
Without a doubt. Let me hold you for a minute Bailey.
I'll be honest... I was pretty nervous about this.
But it was everything I was hoping it would be and more.
I'm happy you're happy Bailey...
I'm more than happy. You've turned my life on its head.
I'm excited for what happens with us... I'm excited to become friends with [g1] and Shauna.
I'm excited too. Today would be a good time to spend some time with them.
Yeah, you're right...
How about we get dressed and then I'll go talk to them?
Sounds good to me.
But first.
Mwah!
There... now it was the perfect date.
We still need to go on a proper date.
I'm very happy with how this one went.
Now let's get dressed.
A few moments later
Hmmm...
What is it?
I kind of miss being naked. I definitely miss you being naked.
Ha, yeah I know what you mean.
Will you be free any tomorrow?
I think I can make sure I have some time for you Bailey.
Hehe.
How are you two doing?
Hey Bailey. How's it going?
Not bad at all... just a bit of a busy day.
I'm excited to relax a little.
Well come on in.
Don't mind if I do.
Thanks for having me over by the way.
Of course Bailey. You're always welcome.
Not a bad place at all. Way better than our place.
I don't think we'll be here too much longer.
Oh... that's a bummer.
Where are the other girls at?
They're in the other room.
I was hoping to spend some time with them. I'd like to get to know them better.
Awh, I'm sure they'd like to get to know you too. Want me to get them?
No that's fine. I like spending time with you too.
How are you two doing?
I'm sorry for interrupting...
No baby, you're fine.
We're just finishing up all the laundry. Do you need anything [mcf]?
Have you ate today?
I'm okay babe... thanks for checking.
Hey [g1].
Hey Bailey. How are you?
I'm great... thanks for letting me come over.
You're free to come over any time you want to Bailey.
What about you? Is there anything you need?
Well... I'd actually like to talk to you some more [g1]. We should get to know each other better.
I'd be happy to. It's important for us to have a good relationship. Seeing as you cheer on [mcf] and everything.
Pssst.
[mcf]...
Oh, Liz wants me. I'll be right back ladies.
Hey, how's everything going?
Better... I'm still having issues but things are better.
Good... is everything okay?
Ehh, we need to talk about something [mcf].
I tried to bring it up earlier but [g1] made it hard.
What is it?
It's about my mom... She's probably going to come here.
Hey... it's okay.
Can we talk somewhere else?
Sure... we can talk over by the kitchen.
So... what's so bad about your mom?
[g1] kept you away from her for a reason... she's a lot.
She cares... a little too much.
Our dad used to cheat on her... she went crazy when she found out.
She's never gotten over it... and I told her about you and [g1]'s relationship...
That you've been with other girls...
Elizabeth... Why?
I'm sorry... I was angry and didn't know what else to do.
What did [g1] say about it?
She's just brushing it off.
Did you tell her about what happened between us?
No! I didn't tell her anything specific...
I'm so sorry [mcf]. I wish I could take it back!
I'm so sorry [mcf]. I wish I could take it back!
It's okay Liz. You're both adults now. There's only so much she can do.
I'll never do anything like this again.
I hope not... I just wish you talked to us Liz.
I know...
What are you two doing hiding in the corner?
...
I'm telling him about mom.
Why didn't you tell me babe?
I was going to handle it myself... I didn't want you to worry about it.
[g1]... don't worry about that. I want to know what's going on in your life.
I'm sorry...
It's okay... just no more hiding things because you're afraid I'll worry... okay?
I promise...
Have you talked to her?
No... I've been ignoring her. I don't care what she has to say. I'm happy.
You should talk to her... things will only escalate if you don't.
I can't...
Can I?
What do you mean?
I'll talk to her for you.
Are you sure?
Yes. I'll handle it. Just pretend she's not a problem.
No... we'll call her together.
I'm okay with that. When do you want to?
Tomorrow? I need some time to think about what I'll say.
Sure that works with me.
Can I be on that call too?
What would you say?
... I don't know.
I just want to be there for you two.
Oh... well then sure Liz.
I'm sorry again [g1]...
I know... I just wish we could've worked things out earlier... before this.
You have a fucked up sister... it's my fault...
But is it okay if I talk to [mcf] alone for a bit?
You don't have to ask me... that's up to [mcf].
Yeah, we can talk Liz.
I'll keep Bailey company while you two talk... we'll find another movie to watch.
Thanks baby.
I'm happy to help.
What do you want to talk about?
Can we sit back on the couch?
Sure.
So... what is it?
It's hard to talk about...
You know I'm not going to judge you Liz. We're family. You can tell me anything.
It's about us.
It's just... I've spent so much time thinking about us... if there's anything there.
It's killing me...
Liz... you're [g1]'s sister...
I know we've done things... but it's different now.
[g1] told me that if we were to ever be a thing that you would have to show that you're part of the family...
And you'd have to be okay with me dating other girls.
[mcf]... I've loved you for what feels like my entire life...
I don't care anymore. I just want you.
Liz... I care about you.
[mcf]. If [g1] was okay with it would you date me?
Yes Liz... despite everything we've been through and some of the headaches you've caused...
I love you. You've always been there for me, even if it's not how I would've liked.
I did it for attention [mcf]... your attention.
I know... but if [g1] was okay with it and you showed you're committed to making things work with [g1]. Then yeah... I could see us being together.
I won't let you down this time [mcf]...
Can I talk to [g1] now?
Sure Liz. Is that all you needed to talk about?
Mhmmm...
I'm not saying no forever... it's just that I haven't thought about you like that Liz... Not since [g1] told me you were off limits until you showed you were committed to making things work.
I can't say...
Liz...
I understand.
You're beautiful and I care about you. I'm not closing any doors. It's just not something I can really answer right now.
Can I talk to [g1] now?
Are you okay Liz?
Mhmmm... I just want to talk to [g1].
Okay Liz. I won't keep you.
Mhmmm... bye [mcf].
We'll talk about this again Liz...
Fuck...
I knew that talk was coming...
I need to talk to [g1] and see how she's feeling about that now... things may have changed.
Hmmm... what's left to do today?
There's the talk with Lauren... there was something else I was meant to do though.
What was it?
Oh fuck! I have to call Harp!
Ahh shit, I was meant to hang out with them and celebrate... I feel like an asshole.
I wonder if they still want to...
Ring... Ring...
There you are.
I'm so sorry Harp... some things happened and it slipped my mind that we were meant to hang out.
I assumed so... it's okay though. Natalie fell asleep as soon as she got home. She was tired.
So I'll let you slide this one time. But you're making it up tomorrow.
Absolutely... I'll be there.
Do you still want to go into practice early?
I'm down if you are.
See you there. Goodnight [mcf].
Goodnight Harp.
Phew, I'm lucky she wasn't upset. I fucked up.
I'll make it up to them tomorrow.
While I have my phone out I should check on Rachael... I haven't heard anything from her.
Ring... ring...
Hello? [mcf]?
Is everything okay?
Yeah, I'm just calling to check on you.
Awh that's sweet. I'm doing good. I'll be home later tonight.
Feel free to use my bed. I won't be in it anytime soon.
I'm a little busy though... I'll see you soon okay?
Sure thing Rachael. Have a goodnight.
Goodnight kid.
Hmmm... I should call Lauren as well...
Ring... ring...
[mcf]?
Hey Lauren... are you still coming by tonight?
Uhh... I'm actually outside your place right now... I'm in a bit of a hurry. Can you let me in?
Oh. Yeah I'm on my way.
Knock, Knock
I'm coming!
Hi.
Hey Lauren.
You still wanting to have our little talk?
Yeah, I do. I think it could help me with a few things.
I'm sorry but I can't stay for super long. There's somewhere else I have to be soon.
Should we wait for another day?
No, no. We have enough time to get started with everything.
Okay, let's take a seat then.
Not a fan of her rushing this... but it's better than nothing.
I wonder where she needs to be... none of my business though.
So I'd like to start by getting to know you. I think I know most of what I need to know.
But let's start from scratch.
Well that's where I need the most help. My childhood has given me some issues recently.
Oh wow, let's start there then.
Sit down and tell me.
Do you know my past?
Slightly... I know that [am] isn't your real mother.
Did I hear my name?
Hey mom... you did. Meet Lauren.
It's nice to meet you [am].
I'm from WVM, I'm here to talk to [mcf]. Try to help him with some things... and he's helping me too.
Oh, it's nice to meet you.
If [mcf] is okay with it would you like to join us? We're going to go over his past. You might be able to give some valuable information.
Oh, sure. I can do that. If he wants me to.
What do you say?
Of course she can. I'd actually prefer if she did.
Perfect.
So... run me through your past...
Well... I don't remember much before my father passed away. I'll just tell you everything I know.
A few minutes of explaining later.
Wow...
You didn't need me... you remembered everything I did.
Still... I like having you here.
You didn't say very much about your biological mother. Why is that?
I don't know much... and I don't know how much of what I know is even real.
I've been having dreams about her. I've even been sleep walking in these dreams.
How vivid are the dreams? What happens in them?
They feel real... they play out like I've seen them before. As if they were just memories.
How often?
Every other day?
They scare me... I don't feel like I'm in control...
Have you tried to imagine her or any of the memories?
Not really... I try not to think about it...
You're in a safe place... can you try?
What do I need to do?
Just lay down and close your eyes... try to think of a memory of her.
Everything's okay honey... I'm here for you.
I love you mom.
I love you too.
What can remind me of her?
That lady I tackled... her smell was so familiar.
Her face... everything... focus...
Everything okay honey?
Mom?
Get up sweety. The floor is dirty.
[mcf]? What's happening?
I see her.
She was happy...
You excited?
We had plans... I don't remember for what.
Oh yeah... she used to hug me all the time... like every chance she had.
Always with this huge smile on her face.
She would hold me so tightly against her chest.
Her smell... I could make it out over anything... it's so distinct.
Brubru!
Huh?
I see my sister...
Oh!? What does she look like?
I've never seen her look like this before... She has dark hair now.
She called me brubru... I remember that name.
Have you been good for mom?
I think she's older than me...
Oh, she's a hugger too.
Sounds like a lovely home...
It wasn't... there was something else to this.
They hugged each other a lot too.
You didn't tell me anything about a sister.
I don't know if she's real... or if I'm just imagining her.
We're still going swimming right?
Oh yeah... my mom was so scared of swimming...
It took weeks to convince her to go.
I wasn't used to seeing her be scared.
She really didn't want to get into that pool.
But we made her.
Woo! Good job mom!
She didn't stay in for long... but her trying it for a minute was enough to get us off her back.
These all sound like lovely memories...
I hate to ask but can you think of any of the bad memories?
Hmmm...
I don't know.
Focus on negative emotion... think of pain.
Think of something you don't like... anything.
Oh...
What is it?
My sister is in a hospital bed. She's sleeping.
Oh wow.
My mom is here too.
Oh, that look. I remember it really well.
I hated it... I could tell she was in pain but she was hiding it from me.
She put on a smile but I could still see the pain in her eyes...
It's not the only time that's happened... I remember a time with [am] back when we lived in that mobile home...
It was late night, I woke up because I heard you.
I remember you sitting at that table... I remember saying your name.
I shocked you... but even still you looked at me with makeup running down your face from your tears... and you were smiling.
All you cared about was making sure I wasn't sad or worried...
You were crying because you didn't know how you were going to pay the bills that month.
I never knew how broke we were then until I was older. You never let me know... you hid me from that.
Your hard work and stress is why I am where I am now... but I hated that look.
I don't want others to protect me... I want to protect them.
Honey...
I love you so much.
I love you too mom... I owe you the world.
You don't owe me anything.
That's a very touching story but please focus [mcf]. I think we were close to something.
Right, sorry.
Negative emotions... fear...
There's something...
I see my sister... she seems scared.
Why?
I'm not sure... I think it may be because of my dad.
What is she doing?
She's looking at me... I can't hear her.
What's her name?
I don't know...
Think [mcf].
Hmmm...
She's smiling... she's doing the thing I don't like...
Why couldn't I protect her?
What's her name [mcf]?
Cedey... I called her Cedey.
Cedey?
Who is Cedey?
I don't know... that's all I can remember.
She called me Brubru and I called her Cedey.
Keep going [mcf].
Hmmm...
...
.....
I can't think of anything else Lauren...
Okay, okay. Sit up... Good job [mcf].
How was that?
You did great... that was all you. I just asked some basic questions.
I think I understand you more now.
Your past explains a good bit of why you're so protective of others...
I think you have a lot of flaws [mcf]. But they're not awful flaws... good things come from them.
Like what kind of flaws?
You're scared of people leaving you... more specifically you're afraid of being alone. You're over protective to the point it hurts you.
I'm assuming you have anxiety and you have a hard time telling people no.
[mcf]... are you really worried about people leaving you?
I mean... somewhat.
You know I never would.
I know mom... it's just one of those things that are hard to shake.
This was a really good start... I have to go talk to someone else now but...
Meet me in my office tomorrow? We'll discuss further.
Sure... I'll see you there. Thank you Lauren.
No, thank you. I'll see you later. Goodnight.
I wonder what she's in such a hurry about...
That went well...
So Cedey huh?
Yeah... it's something. I'm not sure exactly what but maybe it will get us somewhere.
I think it will.
*Yawn*.
*Yawn*.
Oh, you're making me yawn.
I'm sorry. I'm sleepy.
I am too mom... I think it's time to lay down.
Rachael said we could use her bed tonight.
Good, because some of the girls already are.
Ha, well let's join them.
You have to stop wearing heels. I'm meant to tower over you.
Ha, I like not breaking my neck to look at you.
I'm going to get changed into my pajamas and then I'll meet you in there.
Yeah... same here.
A few minutes later
Hey there [mcf].
Hey girls... you ready for bed?
Just waiting on you.
Where's Jasmine and Bailey?
Bailey is changing into some pajamas... she's staying tonight.
And Jasmine is in the bathroom over there.
Is she okay?
I think so... can you check on her?
Of course.
Jasmine?
Hmm?
Can I come in?
...
Hey... what do you need?
Are you okay Jasmine?
I'm great... Why wouldn't I be?
Can I come in?
Mhmmm...
What's going on Jasmine? Why are you in the bathroom?
I feel like an idiot... so much wasted time.
Was it really wasted time?
Weren't there good times?
I guess.
Then it wasn't wasted. Focus on those, remember them.
You had good memories, and you learned a lot from the bad ones.
You're a stronger person for going through them. And now you're a beautiful girl with a great personality with the rest of her life in front of her.
You really think so?
I know so.
What am I going to do now? I was living with him [mcf].
You're free to stay with us for as long as you need to.
I'd be asking for way too much [mcf].
Don't worry about that... we want you here Jasmine.
Thank you [mcf]. I don't know what I'd do without you.
I'm sure you'd be okay. You're strong Jasmine.
I'm going to pull my own weight... I'll keep things tidy and I'll help with whatever you need.
You're free to help in any way you want to... but focus on yourself for right now okay?
Deal... but I'll make it up to you.
I believe you Jasmine. Now let's go to sleep.
[mcf]... wait.
I mean it... everything you've done for me and will do for me will be paid back.
I trust that Jasmine... it's not needed though.
I know... but it's going to happen.
That's for later... now is for sleep.
Ha, lead the way.
Is she okay?
Yeah, she's going to be.
Thank you for checking on her baby.
Where's Bailey?
Bailey is changing into some pajamas... she's staying tonight.
Oh, nice.
So, are we ready for bed?
Yep... Rachael said we can use her bed so let's pile up.
Can we all fit?
We can try.
Count us in.
Hey [mcf]... I'm sorry we didn't get to hang out more.
Yeah, so am I. There's always tomorrow though.
Exactly.
If you wake up Stacy then I'll wake up Elizabeth. Then we'll pile up from there.
Sure, let's do that.
Cedey? That's pretty close to Stacy...
Pssst Stacy....
Hmm?
We're going to join you... do you mind standing up for a moment?
Mhmmm...
Okay... who first?
Me!
And second?
I'll take that spot...
I call third!
Oh Shauna... with the news she shared today... that's a dangerous place for her to be.
Who wants next?
I'll go next.
Who wants to be on [g1]'s side?
I will.
Which one of you two left wants to go next?
I will.
That leaves you Jasmine.
Thank you guys.
Goodnight girls.
Goodnight. I love you.
Goodnight [mcf]. I love you too.
Goodnight honey. I love you also.
Goodnight.
Goodnight [mcf].
Goodnight everyone.
Goodnight [mcf].
Another day done... And there's no better way to end a day than laying in bed with 7 beautiful women...
Time to sleep.
That leaves you Stacy.
Mhmmm.
Goodnight girls.
Goodnight. I love you.
Goodnight [mcf]. I love you too.
Goodnight honey. I love you also.
Goodnight.
Goodnight [mcf].
Goodnight everyone.
Another day done... And there's no better way to end a day than laying in bed with 6 beautiful women...
Time to sleep.
Zzzzz....
Hmmm?
Oh... right...
We all went to sleep in Rachael's room.
[am] is here... where is everyone else?
Why didn't anyone wake us up?
Fuck. I hope I'm not late for my workout before practice.
Harper will kill me... especially after I forgot to call her yesterday.
Giggling noises
Hmmm... there's someone in the bathroom.
The giggle sounded a lot like [g1]. They did say they had a surprise planned...
Don't worry... he'll love it.
It feels strange Shauna...
Yeah I know... but it's for him. And we'll get used to it.
It doesn't hurt does it?
No, not really. It's just hard to get comfortable.
Uhh girls? Everything okay in there?
Oh! [mcf]! Come in!
Good morning handsome.
Good morning baby.
Good morning girls. Where is everyone else at?
They're all up and getting ready.
What time is it?
Early, you have plenty of time before you have to go to practice.
Good, so... what's going on in here?
We were working on your surprise.
Is the surprise my two girls bottomless? Because that's honestly not a bad surprise.
Hehe... no, not exactly. There's more than that.
Instead of telling him, let's show him.
Two amazing asses?
Look closer.
Oh... holy shit. When did you get a butt plug [g1]?
We bought them online and had them delivered yesterday. Do you like it?
Yeah, I do.
She's not the only one.
Damn girls... what made you want to get those?
A few reasons. They do more than just sit here too.
What do you mean?
So... what's going on in here?
We were working on your surprise.
Is the surprise my two girls bottomless? Because that's honestly not a bad surprise.
Hehe... no, not exactly. There's more than that.
Instead of telling him, let's show him.
Two amazing asses?
Look closer.
Oh... holy shit. When did you get a butt plug [g1]?
We bought them online and had them delivered yesterday. Do you like it?
Yeah, I do.
She's not the only one.
Damn girls... what made you want to get those?
A few reasons. They do more than just sit here too.
What do you mean?
Well first, we got them because...
We both want to please you in every way we can... And I want to work towards this.
I don't even know what to say... do you like it?
It's different... putting it in wasn't fun but it's fine now. Mine is smaller than Shauna's.
But that's not it... You can control them, they vibrate.
It's through an app. I didn't want to use your phone without your permission so I downloaded it on mine so you can try it out.
All you have to do is open the app and hit the button... You can set how strong the vibration is too.
Go easy on us please... for now.
Oh, she still has this picture as her background...
Heh, I forgot about that night. It was one of our first dates...
Ohhhh! [mcf]! Did you put it on high? That's too much for [g1].... Mmmmm...
Ahhhmmmm!.... [mcf]... that's a lot...
That was the lowest setting. I'll turn it off...
Lowest setting?! We're trying to have a little fun not cause earthquakes!
If that was low... high is going to be crazy.
Should we find out?
Haha! You better not!
You girls are giving me way too much control with this.
That's the point. You'll be able to turn them on whenever you want to... just don't go too crazy with it.
You can control each one seperately. Do you like your surprise?
It's great... we're going to have a lot of fun with these. Are they fine to take in a shower?
Yeah, they'll be fine. Are you wanting to take a shower right now?
Yeah I need one.
Sure baby, we all could use one.
A few minutes later
Are they washing me?
What are you girls doing?
Shhh... just relax.
We told you we were going to start helping in every way we can.
Don't you think this is a little much?
Do you like it?
I mean... yeah. I just don't want you girls to think that you have to do it.
We don't think that. We want to do it.
What she said. It's our way of giving back.
We're just trying to be the best girlfriends that we can be.
You're both doing an amazing job. I love you both.
We love you too.
A few minutes later
I wish we could have some fun this morning... I think the other girls are waiting to get into a bathroom though.
I know. We'll find some time today. Don't worry.
I can't wait, but speaking of time...
Me and Shauna were talking... what if we tried individual dates again today?
Last time we weren't as comfortable with everything as we are now.
If that's what you girls want. I'm fine with anything as long as I get to spend time with both of you.
I think it would be good for both of us... as much as me and Shauna love each other. We could use a little one on one with you.
Is that okay with you [mcf]?
Of course. Do you girls have any plans in mind?
I've been thinking... a dinner date sounds amazing.
Nothing special for me... I just want to cuddle alone with you and talk.
Done and done.
Thank you [mcf].
And... you're meant to workout before practice right?
Yeah.
Can me and [g1] come?
Sure. I'd love for you both to come.
That's great... we just want to keep you company.
Yeah... and we don't want to wait around all morning.
That's fine with me.
Now are you sure you want to have alone time? Last time you wanted [g1] there.
It's different now... I felt guilty not having [g1] there. I may still feel that way a little bit but I want to go on a date.
Sounds great to me. How fancy are you thinking?
Doesn't matter. Take me somewhere and get me some food and spend time with me. That's all I want.
We'll do something more than that. We'll figure out after class.
Okay.
Huh...
What is it [g1]?
Oh nothing... just your mom.
She looked so happy and peaceful when she was sleeping with you... now she looks sad.
Oh wow... she does.
You two are so cute...
She may need some alone time too.
Funny enough we have a date planned already today.
Three dates today? I'm sorry if we're asking too much. Our date can wait until tomorrow if it helps.
Not a chance. I'm looking forward to it.
Now you two finish getting ready. I'm going to go say good morning to everyone else.
Okay baby.
Phew... three dates. That on top of everything else that's planned... Today is going to be fun.
Three days now.
Oh cool.
Good morning Bailey... Stacy.
Oh hey [mcf]. How did you sleep?
I slept really well.
Uhh... can I ask you something?
Sure.
My mom wants to talk to you again... she was upset she had to leave last time.
Would that be okay with you?
Sure... when does she want to?
Sometime at night... that's the only time she can.
Yeah we can make that happen.
Thank you [mcf]... I'm going to go finish getting ready.
Why does she want to talk to me again?
Must just want to ask more questions...
Hey [mcf].
Hey, how did you sleep?
Uhh... not great.
Why? Too crowded?
No... not that. I just had something on my mind.
Oh, what is it?
I have to tell you something...
Now that we're a thing... I don't want to hide anything from you.
So you need to know this.
I'm listening Bailey. I don't want you to hide anything either.
It's about Rainn... Well, both of us.
Damn, a lot is being thrown at me early this morning.
What happened?
It was before I knew you.
I never really had a boyfriend growing up and last year I decided I wanted one.
I found a date but was really worried and Rainn agreed to go.
He was meant to bring a friend for her...
We were supposed to get ice cream. I got really dressed up and was really excited...
But they never showed.
I'm sorry that happened to you Bailey.
No, it's okay. It led to where I am now. But that's not the end of the story...
Rainn was there for me.
I won't lie... it hurt.
But she was there. We were living together at this point.
Not long after the date incident we were watching a show together.
It was one of those silly dating shows. I don't remember exactly how it happened.
I just remember her telling me she had feelings for me.
I didn't know what to do.
So we kissed...
Woah... did you two become a thing after that?
What? No... We kissed but that was it.
Were you not into her?
She's beautiful... but I couldn't be with her. And anyway... I have you now.
Why couldn't you be with her?
My family...
Bailey... you realize me and Shauna became a thing in a really similar way?
I really don't think about it but I'd imagine there's a lot of people that look at my relationships and think it's weird.
You can't care about what other people want. What makes you happy?
You do...
I'm not saying you have to do anything. I'm just saying that if you had feelings for Rainn then that's okay.
You're not trying to break up with me are you?
No, not at all. I mean it would be a little shitty of me to date other girls and tell you that you can't see where things go with your lifelong friend.
And I do mean while you're also dating me. You don't have to pick one.
Really? I don't know [mcf]...
Like I said it's whatever you want to do. I'm not trying to push you a certain way.
Mwah!
I'm so lucky to have you.
I could say the same.
Are you sure you'd be okay with it?
Absolutely...
I don't know still... I have to think about it.
I understand. It's not a simple choice.
Yeah... can we go back to normal now? Want to sit with me for a minute while I wait for a bathroom to open up?
Sure.
So that's why you didn't want me to come up to your room?
I didn't want to hurt her feelings...
I understand. You could've told me then.
I didn't want to freak you out.
It takes more than that to freak me out.
So we're okay?
We're perfect. And we'll continue to be considerate of Rainn. Maybe we can find her someone.
Mwah!
I'm so lucky to have you.
I could say the same.
Want to sit with me for a minute while I wait for a bathroom to open up?
Sure.
I slept pretty good.
Want to sit with me for a minute while I wait for a bathroom to open up?
Sure.
So... are you excited for your first game?
Yeah, I'm eager to see how we'll do. Once the games start they don't really stop.
I know things aren't perfect but they're a lot better than they were at the end of last year.
And with you... who knows what WVM can do?
Hopefully bring a few wins... at least.
Well I'll be cheering you on the entire year.
No one wants to cheer for a losing team though.
I think you'll win. I believe.
Bailey... a bathroom is open.
Good morning Liz.
Hey...
Oh [mcf]. Is it cool if we go with you to practice?
Yeah, I'm going in early though to workout some.
That's fine. Natalie said she would be there early anyway so we can keep her company until practice starts.
Thank you [mcf]. I'll be back soon.
Hmmm... that's everyone but Jasmine. I wonder how she's doing.
Part of me doesn't want to see Damien today. I don't know what I'll end up saying to him.
Oh, I bet Rachael is back. I need to tell her about what happened with Ryker.
Surely she has an idea of what I should do.
Not sure what else to do... I still haven't told [g1] about it.
Though I wouldn't doubt if Shauna told her.
Good morning [mcf].
Oh, good morning Jasmine. How are you doing?
All things considered I'm doing pretty good.
Thank you for letting me stay here...
Damn Jasmine... you're definitely not too shy about wearing small amounts of clothes.
Seen these before? Heh... [g1] let me borrow some clothes.
That's good. But I'll see about getting your clothes for you today.
That would be so helpful... thank you [mcf]... sorry if it's weird I'm talking to you in underwear...
I didn't really think about it...
I've technically seen you in less that day at the pool.
Ha, I guess these do cover more. Good point.
Is it strange that she's showing her butt to me? Or am I just making it out to be something it's not?
You're looking good this morning Jasmine.
Thank you. I'm wearing more makeup than usual... I just needed to feel pretty.
You don't need makeup to look pretty Jasmine. You're great as your natural self.
Awh... you're so sweet.
Hmmm... she's pulling me into her awfully tightly...
I don't think I'm going to class today...
I think that's a good decision. [am] and Rachael will keep you company.
[mcf]... you've been so kind to me ever since we met...
I remember one of the first things you said to me was that I was gorgeous... I've thought about that a lot.
You are Jasmine. On top of being gorgeous I think you're a great person overall.
That's why I hate that you're sad right now... I wish I could make it go away.
I'm not that sad... In some ways I'm happy.
Fuck... she's really pulling me into her now.
I like her a lot... but everything is so muddied right now. She could really use the attention.
At the same time she's fresh off everything with Damien. It would probably be best to wait.
I could say fuck it and go for a kiss... or play it safe.
Jasmine... I really like you.
Oh [mcf]... I like you too.
Mwah!
Oh my god... [mcf]... we just kissed.
Is that okay?
Mmmhmmm....
She's still hugging me... maybe even tighter now.
Is everything okay?
Yeah, yeah.
Jasmine where are you going?
I'll be back...
Jasmine if you weren't okay with that then I'm sorry... I might've misread things.
.....
No [mcf]... I'm happy about it. I didn't want you to see this big goofy smile...
I won't lie... it felt strange. Not because of you, just because of everything I'm going through.
I understand Jasmine. I don't mean to confuse things.
Don't worry about that... I think I need some alone time to think about things.
Sure Jasmine... whatever you need. I'll see you later today?
Mhmm...
Well... that happened. I had no intentions of going after her... not this soon anyway.
But that look she was giving me... I could tell what she wanted.
I wonder how Damien will take the news if he found out. Do I even care?
He had his chances, if he wanted her then it's his own fault.
I still need to find Rachael.
No... it's too soon for that.
I'm happy you're happy. So you're going to spend the day with [am] right?
Mhmm... I'll probably keep to myself for the most part though.
[am] will help you through whatever you need.
Like mother like son?
Exactly... and call if you need anything.
I will... I'll let you get back to getting ready. I'll see you later okay?
Yep, you sure will.
I think she wanted more from that... I may just be thinking crazy though.
I still need to find Rachael.
Just spend time with them. [am] will help you through whatever you need.
Like mother like son?
Exactly... and call if you need anything.
I will... I'll let you get back to getting ready. I'll see you later okay?
Yep, you sure will.
I think she wanted more from that... I may just be thinking crazy though.
I still need to find Rachael.
What to do next?
Oh, I bet Rachael is back. I need to tell her about what happened with Ryker.
Surely she has an idea of what I should do.
Not sure what else to do... I still haven't told [g1] about it.
Though I wouldn't doubt if Shauna told her.
Let's see if I can't find her now.
Oh, she's right there. That's convenient.
Good morning Rachael.
Hey kid. Miss me?
Yeah I did. We need to talk about something.
Yes we do.
You never even asked me where I went.
I don't like to meddle... at least not too much. But where did you go?
You remember that girl I showed you yesterday?
The one I got scolded for looking at?
I have my reasons... I went to pick her up. So she's here today.
When am I supposed to meet her? And where?
We'll talk about that later. I'm not sure yet.
I didn't realize how much I'd miss being around you all.
It's good to be back.
Will you have to leave anymore anytime soon?
Hard to say... I don't think I will though.
My flight was awful... a baby was screaming the entire time and the lady next to me spilt her drink all over my shirt.
I don't see any stain?
That's because I changed... do you take me to be a filthy woman?
Or did you just want a free chance to look at my cleavage?
And if you dare say both then I'm kicking you out.
Haha, I thought about it.
Yeah I could tell. Oh...
I have a surprise for you.
Is it cleavage related?
Afraid not... follow me.
I honestly did miss Rachael... she's witty.
Doesn't hurt to have someone with all her connections around either.
A brand new car!
Oh wow Rachael... it's nice.
It's not bad. It'll get us where we need to go.
I'm giving you the second set of keys... if you wreck it you pay for it.
And you can drive it whenever. I'll only need it sparingly.
Thank you Rachael.
So you park that supercar for good.
Yeah... about that whole thing. We need to talk.
Want to sit in the car first?
Sure.
Comfy in here right?
Yeah... way more room than the other one.
So what's up?
*You explain everything that happened with Kimmy, Damien, and Ryker.*
You left Kimmy there?
Yeah, she had her family. I told her if she suspected anything at all to call me.
And he said he could get you transferred?
Pretty much...
All to stage a bet?
That's what he said.
I'm not buying it... why would he tell you all of that?
To scare me?
I mean yeah... but he could've done a lot more. There's more to this.
I think he's setting you up... he wants you to tell on him.
He hit all the points... breaking rules, to puppeteering his uncle. He gave you all the info that you'd have a hard time proving.
But why?
I'm not sure... all that I am sure of is that he wouldn't tell you all of that if that was really his plan.
What should I do?
Can you get any more information?
I'm meant to hang out with Charles and Damien tonight. I'm sure I could ask about it.
I really don't want to go though.
Yeah... sounds sketchy. But you could learn a lot. I think you should go.
I'll be outside in this car... parked a little bit aways. Just so you have a quick out in case things get weird.
Okay... I'm just worried about something happening to one of the girls.
If he tries anything then he's a dead man walking. I promise.
I'm glad you're here with us Rachael.
Well that's sweet of you. This past week has been a lot funner than the ones before it.
Speaking of funner...
I've always wanted to fuck in a car... but never have.
Do you want to change that?
Damn, she didn't hesitate with that at all.
Rach... out here in the open?
We're in an alley... come on. I'm horny.
Really? You've never had car sex?
Huh, I haven't either.
Nope... but there's plenty of room in the backseat.
Fuck Rach... those tits will always shock me.
They're pretty great...
Hmmm... okay. Fuck it. Let's do it.
Really?
Yeah, I could use this.
Fuck yes...
You have fantastic tits Rachael.
They're pretty great...
This isn't a good idea Rachael...
Why not?
Uhh... I just don't have the time this morning. I'm meant to meet my coach for a workout.
Fuck...
Guess it's a morning with my hand then...
No harsh feelings?
No, we're good.
So... backseat?
Backseat. You climb over first and take your clothes off.
Oh... I'm excited. I've thought about doing this since I started driving.
What stopped you?
Sometimes things just don't happen how you want them to...
Until they do.
Well let's make that dream come true.
You have such a nice cock [mcf]...
And you're already hard for me...
I think you could be harder though.
This isn't a very busy alley is it?
No... not this time of day anyway. We're fine.
I'm just going to make sure you're good and ready for me.
You ever have your dick sucked in the back of a vehicle?
No I haven't...
Oooohhhh.... Can I?
Mhmm.
Mmmmm...
Grrgg... So big...
I was already ready for this... especially after my shower with Shauna and [g1].
But I'm not complaining...
Mmmmm...
I'm fucking soaking wet [mcf].
Fuck me... please. How do you want me?
This is your dream scenario. How do you want to be fucked?
Ooohhh... I have an idea...
Fuck me like this. We don't have too much room.
Stick your cock in me and fuck me [mcf].
I need it...
Fuck... I think I do too.
AHH!! Fuck! Your dick is so fucking thick!
Don't stop! Just fuck me [mcf]... Fuck me senseless!
Not the best position but I'll do what I can.
Fuck! [mcf]! Glide that cock in and out of me!
I need more!
You have to go faster! Please! Fuck me!
She asked for it...
FUCK!!! HNNNNNGGGG!!!
JUST LIKE THAT! FUCK ME! KEEP GOING!!!
Fuck me she's being loud... but this does feel fucking great.
GIVE IT ALL TO ME! MAKE ME YOUR BITCH!
FUCK!!!
We're shaking this vehicle... Next thing you know we're going to fog all the windows
FUCK! Hhmmmmmmnnnn.....
Do you like it? Do you like my tight pussy?
I fucking love it.
OHNNNmmmmm... KEEP GOING!! Fuck!
Right there... right there!!! RIGHT THERE!!!
FUCK!!!
OOOOHHHNNNNGGGGGHHH!!! FUCK!!!
I'M CUMMING! I CAN FEEL YOUR COCK THROBBING! CUM WITH ME!
FUCK!!!
HHHNnnnggg!!
Oh fuck! You did it! You fucking came with me... holy shit...
My body is shaking...
HHHNnnnggg!!
Oh fuck! You did it! You fucking came with me... holy shit...
My body is shaking...
Was it what you wished it would be?
Hold on... let my body catch up to my brain...
Haha. I'll take that as a yes then.
Fuck yes! That was good... really fucking good.
You're impressing me kid.
Mwah!
Phew... we should probably get dressed.
Yeah... I need to be getting to the college also.
Well this was fun... won't be the last time we fool around either.
Definitely not...
A few minutes later.
Wow... that really drained me. I think I'm just going to go lay in bed for a while.
We kept it warm for you.
Oh, I saw.
What a great start to a day...
I have to agree with you there.
So... We'll talk later?
Yep... I'll be back here after class.
I'll be here... though you may have to wake me up.
Am I allowed to do that?
Today, yes. Usually, no.
Ha, fair enough. Do you mind telling the other girls to head out when they're ready?
Sure.
See ya kid.
Bye Rachael.
Oh, before I go. I have a surprise planned for you.
What kind of surprise?
A good one... I'll tell you more when we talk later. Bye kid.
Bye Rach.
I may be a bit late to meeting Harper...
Depends on how long it takes the girls to come out.
It was cool of Rachael to get another form of transportation... though I wish I had my own car.
Baby?
Are you ready to go?
Yep, what do you think about the car?
Rachael already showed me... but it's nice.
Oh. Want to drive it?
Rachael said only you can. We're not allowed to.
Which is fine with me.
I like the interior.
Yeah, I do too.
I like the exterior too.
It's not bad... Oh...
You think you're funny huh?
Says the girl with a huge smile on her face.
Plus after the shower... I'm excited for later.
I am too... I want to experience everything one on one again...
After we cuddle right?
Hehe, yep.
We good to go?
Liz and Bailey are riding too. They asked me this morning.
Oh, cool.
You already seen the car too?
Yeah... she showed all of us already.
Ahh, it's what I get for sleeping in.
You girls sure you're okay keeping me company? You don't have to.
Mwah!
I'm willing to go anywhere with you two... Especially when I get to watch you workout.
What she said.
You girls are awesome. Let's get ready to go.
Yeah, we should. Me and Shauna will ride in the back.
Do you girls still have those plugs in?
Mhmm.
Yep. Just for you... but be gentle today.
I will.
Mwah!
Ooohhh... it smells funny in here.
New car smell?
Something like that.
Ooohhh... it feels weird to crawl with this in.
Yeah... I bet.
Ahh, back to normal vehicles.
Never been a fan of wood trim... but it could be worse.
And there's the other girls... huh, those look like new outfits.
They are. Liz was talking about them last night.
I like them.
Mind if I ride shotgun?
Go for it.
A few minutes later
I swear this place smells different every single day.
Haha... true.
Natalie said she was in the cheer room. So that's where we'll be.
Sounds good. If you need anything you know where to find me.
Bye [mcf].
Bye...
See ya girls.
You two sticking with me right?
Mhmmm...
Going to workout any?
Maybeee... I don't know yet.
Do you girls know where the actual gym is?
I know around where it should be but not exactly.
Follow me then.
Ehh, actually made it on time. Nat is here too so that means Harper is.
So the gym should be open.
A little bit later
Yep, it was open. Harp isn't here yet though.
She must be busy with something else.
Wow, it is a lot like our old gym [mcf].
Told you so. The layout is very similar.
Are those treadmills back there?
Yep, sure are.
Great!
Heh... last time we were in a gym together we still hadn't slept together.
We've changed a lot since then.
Yes we have. It's been a crazy week. But I'm happy we are where we are now.
You have no idea... I was a girl who was afraid of everything. I'm a lot more confident now.
I'm glad... and I can tell.
I don't even recognize that girl anymore.
Ha, I still do. I'll never forget her.
Hehe... where did Shauna go?
She went running towards the treadmills.
What's up Shauna?
I was going to run on this... but I don't know how to work it.
I'll show you. But you should really change out of your school uniform first.
Into what?
There's outfits here still. They stocked up everywhere.
I'll grab us a few.
Thank you [g1].
Where can I change?
Here, no one will bug us. Not this early.
What about your coach?
She won't care. Plus it's a quick change...
Okay...
Here goes nothing...
The fact she's even doing this shows she's more confident too.
Jesus Shauna... you look fucking stunning.
Is that what all of you girls wear under your uniforms?
Huh? Yeah pretty much. Do you like it?
I fucking love it. You look so fucking sexy in it.
It's just some underwear [mcf].
Yeah but its your amazing body in the underwear that's getting to me.
Wow [mcf]... you really do like them.
Yeah I really do. I wouldn't mind if you just wore that around.
I bet you wouldn't.
Yeah... I see it now.
Look at your other girl.
Jesus Christ... you girls are too much for me.
What is it babe?
You two are too fucking sexy.
Let us see the other side [g1].
Fuck me...
I wish we weren't in this gym right now.
It's too risky to try anything since Harp might show at any minute.
[mcf] was telling me how much he liked our underwear.
Yeah I can see that. I think it's the leggings.
They definitely don't hurt.
And you two still have your plugs in under that?
This is too much for me.
Haha, we should get dressed before [mcf] tries something.
I don't think I'll be able to tell him no.
Haha, me neither. Let's get dressed.
Awh man... smart call though.
A few minutes later
How are these?
You girls will look sexy in anything. Though I liked the underwear more.
You'll see us in it again... sooner rather than later.
I hope so... You girls want to start with a run?
Sure... it might be hard with our accessory... but I'll try.
Yeah same.
One cardio workout later.
I want to jump straight into benching... but it's been a bit.
I should start with dumbbells.
A few minutes later
Okay... I'm ready.
I don't have a spotter so I should start lower. For now at least.
It's good I didn't wait too long to do this... I can tell I'm already falling out of my usual condition.
I have to work on that.
Huh? Girls? You finished on the treadmills?
Mhmmm. All done.
Hey [mcf].
What's up?
Can I suck your cock?
What? We can't. Harper will be here any minute.
Nuh uh, she just told me and [g1] that she would be a little bit longer.
You were too busy lifting that bar to notice.
So can I?
It was torture sleeping on your groin last night... all I could think about was pulling your sweatpants down.
But someone would've noticed. I did play with it a little bit...
What do you mean?
I nudged it until you were hard... I rubbed it really slowly... then slept on it.
So please?
I'll be quick. I'll do my best. I promise.
If Harp really said that... then sure Shauna.
Yay! Thank you!
Oh Shauna...
She's lightly biting my dick through my shorts.
Don't tease me Shauna... We'll need to be quick.
What about you [g1]?
Hmm?
Oh, she's into this too.
Babe?
Oh, yes baby?
Do you want to join in?
No... Shauna wanted to do this, I just want to watch.
Well actually...
I want to hold you while she does it...
Heh, if that's what you want...
That's cute of her. She's holding on tight.
I wonder why she only wants Shauna to do anything...
I'm assuming she just doesn't want to do anything in a gym.
Shauna is going at it... you can tell she was waiting for this.
[mcf]... take off your shorts. I don't think she's going to come up for air.
Hah, yeah we don't have time for much teasing Shauna.
I love you [mcf].
I love you too Shauna.
Hehe... so we need to be quick? Should I take off my shirt?
If you want to, yeah.
Bye bye shirt!
What happened to my shy Shauna?
She's still here... I just really want this.
I think you do too...
I absolutely do.
Do you want me to start now?
Mhmmm... be a good girl and start.
Mmmm... fuck Shauna. You're not holding back.
I love how into it she is. She's instantly sucking and flicking her tongue.
There's no other feeling like it.
MMNNNNgg....
Woah. Just like that Shauna, you made him flex.
Fucking hell...
Is she that good baby?
Yes she is.
I can't forget about [g1]... I want her to feel involved even if she sat this one out.
A few grabs where I can should keep her in this.
Ohhh...
OHHH!
Mmmmm...
Fuck me... she's way too good at this. She's not even using her hands anymore.
Oh fuck Shauna...
The way she just goes for it.... fuck...
How does that feel baby?
Like it's exactly what I needed.
She's just getting started.
Mmmm... you think so?
HMMMNNNN.... Jesus...
Hehe, I can feel you tighten up everytime she goes down.
You really like this huh?
Yeah, I really do.
Mmmmm...
I wish I was as good as her at this.
You're great too baby.
HNNNGGMM...
Holy shit I just about came when she did that... I'm so deep in her throat...
Hehe, it's getting hard to hold you back.
Fuck Shauna... keep going just like that.
You're so fucking amazing...
I'm gonna...
AAHHHNNNGGGhhhhh!!!! Fuck!
Oh my god [mcf]! It felt like your entire body just finished... you got so tense.
Phew... fuck...
HMmmnn.... Huh. Shauna isn't moving anymore, she's just holding it...
Shauna?
Mmmmm...
Let her enjoy it baby, she earned it.
Ahhh....
Oh, Shauna. You still have it all in your mouth. Are you going to swallow it?
Nuh uh...
Oh, what are you going to do?
Mmm...
You came a lot [mcf].
Yeah, it definitely felt like I did. That was amazing Shauna.
Hehe... thank you.
So what are you going to do with that?
I'm going to share, [g1] said she hasn't gotten to taste you in a while.
Shauna! I told you...
I know, I know.
You have plans to fix that... but why wait?
You were talking about it too... and you did all the work.
I got plently... He came in my throat [g1].
That's what you wanted right?
Mhmmm.
Can I baby?
That's up to you [g1]. But I don't mind at all. Why would I?
Come on [g1], it tastes really good.
There we go!
See? Tastes really good doesn't it?
Mhmmm...
Mmmmmm...
Damn [g1]. You're not leaving a drop.
Yeah this is definitely different than the last time I was in a gym with her.
You wanted this more than you let on.
Want to see if there's any more in him?
Haha, I'm afraid I'm out for the moment.
You do taste really good baby.
I'm glad you girls think so... I still don't believe it.
I'm shocked by [g1]... I didn't think she'd do it.
I'm not, you're both my good girls.
Hehe...
...
Huh, either I'm looking for something that isn't there or [g1]'s attitude changed...
Maybe she wasn't as into that as we thought.
Let me get dressed and I'll see if anything is bothering her...
Oh!
Shauna? We need to get dressed.
We're pushing our luck.
Mmmm...
You had a little left on the tip.
Couldn't let it go to waste.
Hehe, I think you're good now.
Yeah I think so too. Now come here.
Hey... thank you for letting me do this here. I know I'm being silly but I didn't want to wait until later.
Does this mean you don't want to have any fun after our date today?
No, it means you'll get more than my mouth next time.
Oooh... well it can't come quick enough then.
Hehe.
Yeah [g1] seems out of it. Like she's thinking about something else.
I have a few ideas of what it could be... she just needs to get her mind off of it for a minute.
And I know how to accomplish that.
What are you doing babe?!
AHH!!
Babe!!! You scared me!
Haha, well you shouldn't be such a scaredy cat then.
I'll remember that. I'm going to get you back.
I'd like to see you try.
Heh, you'll see.
I'm sure... so babe. What's on your mind?
What do you mean?
I can tell you're thinking about something.
Oh [mcf], it's nothing. I was just thinking about how different I am now...
I just licked your cum off of Shauna's hand... think about that but put us back into a week ago. It would never happen.
No it wouldn't. But you're happy we are where we are now right?
One hundred percent baby... I'm the happiest I've ever been.
I am too... so why is it on your mind?
It's my mom... I just thought about how much she would hate this all.
Yeah, that's what I thought it was.
Me and you are still going to talk to her. Everything will be okay.
She may not understand but I think she'll accept it when she sees how happy you are. I'll make sure of it.
Really babe?
I promise.
Mwah!
I love you so much.
I love you too. We'll talk more about how we'll handle it later okay?
Mhmm...
It seems really important to [g1] to keep a healthy relationship with her mom... I have to remember that.
Hey babe... you should really get dressed.
Last thing you need is for Harper to walk in on us like this.
Ha, you're not wrong.
A few minutes later.
And the water was cold!
That's not good... the water pressure there isn't great.
Oh [mcf]! Finally.
Good morning Harp.
You too... phew...
Tough morning?
Yeah, you can say that.
Charles is making me run around. A lot of people didn't show up today.
Really? That sucks.
Yep...
I actually have to leave again. I have to bring him some papers from my desk. Then who knows what else.
I just want to sit down for a minute... it's been nonstop since I got here.
I'll take them for you.
No... you need to workout.
Really Harp. I have to talk to Charles anyway.
Are you sure? I'll love you for life if you do this for me.
Ha, yeah I'm sure. I don't mind at all. Where are the papers?
They're in the other room, the one we met in.
You're the best... and watch out. Charles is cranky.
Though he likes you, so you'll be fine.
I'll handle it. I'll be right back.
Thank you again. When you come back we may be on the actual court. We're going to run through some plays today.
Sounds good to me.
I'll be back in a moment girls... I have to run some papers to Charles.
Do you want us to come with you?
No it's fine. I'll only be a moment.
Want us to stay in here or follow Harper?
Follow Harp. I'll be back.
We'll be waiting.
Call if you need anything.
Part of me hopes Charles is too busy to hang out tonight...
I don't feel that that's likely though.
Hey [mcf]... wait a second.
Why do you have to talk to Charles? Is everything okay?
Yeah, I just made a dumb promise to hang out with him and that's tonight. So I need to see if that's still on.
You poor thing.
Ha... I'll be alright.
A few moments later
I wonder who all didn't show today? Lauren?
I'm sure Charles will tell me.
Oh, Willow is here.
That's two mornings she's here early... I wonder if she's meant to talk to Lauren again.
Hey Willow.
...
Willow?
Are you asleep?
Should I wake her? What if she needs to be somewhere?
Doesn't hurt to ask?
Hey Willow...
Wake up...
Huh?
AHHH!!!
Willow, It's me.
Ahh!!
Oh fuck I freaked her out. She kicked herself off the wall.
I've been in this situation before.
I got you!
Ahhhh!!!
Fuck!
You're okay. I got you.
I didn't mean to scare you... I'm going to sit you down.
Are you okay?
...
I'm fine.
I was just trying to check on you... 
Uh huh.
What happened?
Oh, hey. Nothing happened, everything's okay.
Why is she on the floor?
I scared her on accident.
Were you asleep in the hallway again Willow?
Leave me alone Mackenzie.
You can't keep doing this Willow.
...
Whatever.
Where are you going?
...
Willow?
...
She's not going to stop.
I should make sure she's okay... I scared her pretty badly.
So? She shouldn't be sleeping in the halls.
Plus the only thing that way is the teacher lounge and the gym. You're never going to find Willow in a gym so your best bet is the lounge.
Yeah, good point.
What are you doing in the halls anyway?
I could ask you the same thing?
What's that supposed to mean?
That we're both in the hallway doing our own thing.
Listen here... You won't disrespect me like that. I've helped you out way too much for that.
Woah, woah. I didn't mean it like that.
I busted my ass off just to get your name out there!
Mackenzie, I didn't mean to offend. I was just being playful.
I'm bringing some papers to Charles for Harper, that's why I'm here.
Oh, shit...
And thank you for... getting my name out there.
It's what I do. Have you been keeping track of your social media?
Uhh... not really. I've never really been into it.
...
Fuck...
But I'm going to start getting into it. Can't let all your hard work go unnoticed.
Hmm...
Do you really not look at your social media? Don't you care what people are saying?
Not really... it's not like they're going to make me a better player.
So what? You just make posts for me? About what?
I'll show you. Mainly just WVM hype stuff. That's not really what people talk about though.
What do you mean?
You grew fast... really fast. Which made sense at first considering star player in the news and all...
But then I looked at how you were growing. Who do you think are looking at your profile?
Sports fans?
Hah, nope. They're there but it's mainly women age 20-40.
What, why?
They're super into your relationship. It's crazy to me.
But it made my job easy. Which I've been meaning to ask...
How do you want your social media to be? Basic and professional, playful and sarcastic, or feed into the relationship stuff?
Can you explain further?
Basic is well... basic. Pretty much what it is now, boring posts about how you're happy to be here and all that.
Playful would be joking around with other celebrities and brands. Maybe make fun of a hater or two. That sort of thing.
And we could share images of you and your girlfriends to feed the relationship crowd...
This will mainly effect how media will talk to you. Though the relationship one could net you a lot of fangirls.
Have a preference?
Keep it basic... no need to do anything major with it.
Hey that keeps my job easy.
I'll let you deliver those papers... I'll see you around. Check your profile later.
Oh okay. Bye Mackenzie.
Playful sounds okay... I don't want to be too boring.
Hmmm... this will be fun for me.
Is there anything I need to do?
No, I'll handle it all.
I'll let you deliver those papers... I'll see you around. Check your profile later.
Oh okay. Bye Mackenzie.
Fangirls don't sound too bad. Are they a loyal fanbase at least?
Ehh... just don't fuck up. They'll turn on you quick.
So to make this work I'll need pictures with [g1], Shauna, and you.
I'll send you some.
Perfect, this should also increase the amount of girls that show up to your games. Especially if the other two will be there.
They will.
Good, good.
I'll let you deliver those papers... I'll see you around. Check your profile later.
Oh okay. Bye Mackenzie.
So her name Mackenzie... I better not confuse that with Mackey... she has a temper.
I need to remember to check my profile later... I wonder what she has in mind.
Oh well... enough of that for now. I need to check on Willow.
She has to be in here... or she's in the gym with the other girls.
But that's unlikely. So I'll check here first.
I think I hear someone talking in there.
Dev note :)
Emiko had a redesign. All of her previous renders will be remade to her new model in time for the week 1 release. :)
Thank you to everyone in my discord who helped me design her!
It'll be okay Willow...
Emiko??
She's the last one I expected to see in here.
Eek! [mcf]!
I was only in here for a moment! I was just about to leave!
I don't care that you were in here. I'm not going to tell anyone...
Ohhh... what happened to Willow?
I scared her on accident.
Oh... do you need me to stay? I need to get back to practice but I can help if you need me.
No you're fine Emiko. I got this.
Phew... good.
What were you doing in here anyway?
I really like coffee... and Lauren makes incredible coffee.
So I was sneaking in here to get a cup.
Didn't take you to be the kind to sneak into the teacher's lounge.
Love can make people do crazy things.
And you love the coffee?
Mhmmm. I'll see you at practice okay? Thanks for not telling on me.
No problem. See you Emiko.
Oh shit I just noticed she's wearing a different uniform than Bailey and Elizabeth.
That one is a lot more revealing... Emiko has nice legs.
Okay... focus. Willow doesn't like me trying to force my way into her problems...
So instead of trying to do that I'll just make sure she knows I'm here to talk to if she does need it.
Willow... I don't know what's going on in your life. I don't need to.
But I just want you to know you're not alone. If you need anything I'll help in anyway I can.
Ugh....
What is it Willow?
...
You can't help...
I wish you could but you can't...
I'm talking to Lauren... I'm doing everything I can already. You're just stressing me out.
I don't mean to.
Life has gotten weird recently and I can't control it. That's all.
Are you in any danger?
No... I'm not in any danger.
But I do miss Liz. I slept better when she was there
You know you can come over whenever now. We can keep you company.
I don't think they really want me there...
They would tell me if they didn't. Like I said I have no clue what you're going through but you could use some friends to help you get through it.
Can you promise me something?
Awh, she has faint tears in her eyes...
If they ever say they don't want me there... or there's any complaint at all. You'll let me know?
I promise.
Okay... can I ask one more thing?
Could you give me a ride home after your practice?
After practice? What about class?
Did you not hear? Veronica was a no show today. Told Charles she wouldn't be here.
Oh, fuck.
So yeah, I don't have a ride home.
I got you covered Willow. We'll drop all the girls off and then I'll drive you home.
I can give you gas money.
Don't worry about it. It's a friend helping a friend.
Thank you...
Don't mention it.
Oh, that's a tight hug...
Are you going to come over today?
Uhhhh....
Fuck... you can tell she's in a lot of pain.
But all I can do is be here for her.
Is Elizabeth busy today?
No, she should be free.
Then maybe. I don't know yet.
Listen [mcf]... you're being really nice so I don't want to be rude...
Can you leave? I need to be alone right now.
Sure Willow. I'll see you after practice. And if you need me then that's where I'll be.
Okay...
That sucks... but at least there was some progress made.
Sucks about class too... I hope Veronica is okay.
Oh, Emiko. What are you doing here still?
I had to tie my shoe. And since I was already down here I figured I'd wait on you to come out.
Oh, that's nice. You don't need to be at practice yet?
The girls are still trying on some of the new outfits.
Yeah I noticed those.
Oh! How is Willow?
She's better... I have to say though I didn't expect to see you talking to her. After what happened and all.
That's part of the past. You can barely tell I got hit now and even more importantly... She apologized.
She said sorry to you?
No but I didn't do it for me... I did it for [g1]. And I heard Willow apologized to her.
It was about doing what was right. And Willow did what was right.
That's a very mature mindset Emiko. I can't say I would think the same. You're awesome.
Hehe... thanks.
High five!
Haha... okay.
I'm still meant to be the one protecting you.
You'll have your chance eventually I'm sure.
So... do you like the new outfit?
I haven't gotten a great look.
I like this one... It reminds me of the older one.
I like these too. They're a lot more revealing than the ones I saw this morning.
The ones for practice show less. Actual gameday ones look more like this.
Oh, makes sense.
Here... I'll show you what they'll look like in an actual cheer pose.
Wow, they look great on you Emiko. Where's that shy girl that was hiding a few days ago?
She has caffeine now.
Mhmmm... I'm sure that's it.
They really do look great Emiko.
Good... we're voting on our favorites.
I'm assuming you're voting for that one?
Yep... Natalie and Elizabeth don't like them as much. They say it hurts their boobs.
Ha, none of the outfits look very comfortable to begin with, much less for boobs.
It helps to have smaller ones.
I'm sure it does. But I should be getting these papers to Charles.
Oh, okay. I'll see you in practice then? You'll get to see the other outfits.
Sure will. I'll be there in just a moment.
At least Emiko is coming out of her shell to me.
I like her attitude. She can lift people's spirits.
Time to talk to Charles... find out how tonight is going to go.
Just nothing too crazy... please.
Hmmm... he's dressed darker than usual.
*Mumbling to himself*
Charles? Harper sent me here.
Oh! [mcf]...
Jesus... he looks out of it.
Charles... you're not looking so good. Are you okay?
I didn't know you were coming [mcf].
I ran over here for Harper... I have the papers you needed.
Good, thank you. And about why I'm not looking so good... I'm juggling a lot right now.
I didn't sleep much last night.
Why not?
Thinking about how to please everyone. I can never make those kids happy.
I give them an arm and they demand a leg to go with it.
I love them... I do. I just wish they weren't so spoiled.
Then my staff decides it's time for a vacation in the very first week of the school year.
But hey... that's enough moping around from me. Today should be celebrated.
Why's that?
Take a seat.
You haven't heard about the charity game? I assumed someone would've told you by now.
I don't believe so, no. But I assume we're going to be playing a basketball game for charity?
Nope, not basketball... bowling.
Bowling? Why bowling?
Charity game... it's just what you do.
We're going to take the team and cheerleaders down to a local bowling alley... you know, support small businesses and all.
Have a few of my rich friends there... the media side of things too.
We'll stream it. Let everyone see you in a more laid back scenario.
Is that what our plans for hanging out are?
Yeah... I had something else in mind but this will get us in a lot less trouble.
Not to say we can't still have fun at a bowling alley...
Plus this way I might actually stand a chance against you in a sport.
That's no joke... I've only been bowling once.
You might want to head there early and get some practice in. I'd hate to embarrass you in front of all of your fans like that.
I'll pick it up quick. What time do I need to be there?
9 p.m. at the latest. 8 p.m. if you want to get an hour of practice in first.
Phew... it's a good thing we don't have class today. I should have enough time to accomplish everthing today.
And man, I'm happy to hear it's something simple... and in front of a lot of people.
That really eases my mind.
I'll try to be there around 8.
Great... absolutely wonderful.
And speaking of wonderful things...
There's my beautiful niece.
Hi.
Oh shit... I didn't even hear her come in.
Hey Katie.
Go ahead don't be shy [mcf], tell her how beautfiul she is.
Yeah, she's a very attractive young woman.
Awh, thank you [mcf]. It's good to see you again.
Hmmmm...
Keep him company while I go look through the papers darling.
Yes uncle.
Sorry to leave but I have some things to do.
Oh I should really be getting back to practice.
Nonsense, practice doesn't start for another 20 or so minutes.
But I'll see you tonight [mcf].
Yep, you sure will Charles. Take it easy.
I guess I could ask Katie about Ryker...
I'm not sure if she's on his side or not so I shouldn't say too much.
Can I help you? I'm a very busy woman.
Mhmmm... what happened to the nice blushing girl from a moment ago?
When Charles leaves the room so does she.
Last time you were in here I was sitting on the floor.
And now you're a big girl in a big chair?
Ha, exactly. But really, what can I help you with? You would've found an excuse to leave already if you didn't want to chat.
It's about your brother.
Well that's a first... no one ever asks about him, they'd rather pretend he didn't exist.
What do you want to know?
What's his problem?
Other than being a rage filled lonely virgin? Not sure.
Why? Is he giving you trouble? That's just who Ryker is.
Yeah, something like that.
Tell him to fuck off... and don't worry about him.
Well she wasn't much help... or at least she's not going to tell me much.
So are you sticking around? If so...
I could really use a foot massage.
I'm not going to do that Katie.
Ha, keep dreaming. That won't be happening today.
Awh... come on.
Not even after yesterday? I think I'm owed a reward.
Weren't you the one that was stuck on the floor for a while?
Hehe, true.
What was fucked up about that was that a janitor ended up walking in on me while I was getting dressed.
Poor girl was so embarrassed. She wasn't supposed to be down there though.
Oh, what happened after that?
She apologized a ton of times. Then she went on her way.
She said she didn't even know what was down there. But why was she going there then?
I'm not sure? Maybe she's telling the truth.
Maybe. We're going to look into it anyway.
Yeah, that's how I'd handle it too.
So.... you have 20 minutes right?
Katie... now isn't a good time.
I have to go practice. Harper wants me back as soon as possible.
Ugh... why are you so lame?
You said Ryker was causing you trouble and I know you don't like Charles.
And you have the chance to fuck someone close to them to get back at them... and you're just so whatever about it.
It's so boring here, let me be a naughty girl for you.
Hmmm...
I do have a little less than twenty minutes... That's enough time if we're quick.
Fine. You want to be naughty?
Hehe, yes I do. But hmmmm.... But you have to get completely naked first.
Why? Do I have to take everything off?
Mhmm, it's more exciting that way.
Fuck it, I'm already here.
A few moments later
Ahh perfect... I missed this cock.
I'm a little sad you aren't already hard for me this time. But we can fix that.
Mmmm... gghh...
Heh, you really are naughty Katie.
Glll... mhmmm...
I'm growing in her mouth, she's just letting it happen... she's not moving anything but her tongue.
Grrrggghhh... Glll... mmmm....
Mmmm... I'm almost completely hard Katie... keep going.
You have great tits Katie... I like the dress but you should take it off.
Mhmmm...
Oh... I didn't mean that you had to stop.
How else do you expect me to take off my dress?
Good point, but I meant to take it off after you were finished.
Oh I'm finished... that was just to get you hard.
What do you want to do next?
I want you to stick your cock inbetween...
These.
They really are great tits.
I know. And you're a very lucky man since you get to look at them.
Am I the only one that gets to right now?
...
Actually yes... you are.
But don't let that go to your head.
You're handsome with a nice body and a nice cock.
So just enjoy the fun and don't worry about it.
Now take a seat... I'll even let you sit in my chair.
How kind of you.
We don't have a lot of time left by the way.
Well then hurry over here.
I'm surprised you can last as long as you have in the past...
I'm going to try and make you cum as quickly as possible.
Go for it.
KNOCK, KNOCK, KNOCK
Katie? Are you in there?
Is that Ruby? Fuck...
Shhh...
I think I locked the door. She'll go away.
AHH!! [mcf]! What are you doing in here?!
Oh! I uhhh...
I came from a workout and had to talk to Charles.
Fuck... I hope she didn't see Katie.
I also hope she can't tell I'm completely nude.
[mcf]... are you some kind of nudist?
I won't judge you if you are...
What? No... you've just caught me at bad times. I'm sorry.
If you say so... uhh... do you know where Katie is?
I'm meant to talk to her about the charity game tonight. I'm going to help Moon cover it.
Good luck by the way.
Thanks Ruby... uhh... I think I heard she was in the library right now. It's worth a look.
Huh... I wonder why she's there.
I guess I'll go look. Thank you [mcf]. Sorry for walking in on you.
It's okay Ruby... I'll see you tonight.
Bye [mcf].
Phew... thankfully that wasn't anyone else.
Now Katie just has to run over to the library and everything will be okay.
You're not a great liar.
No, I'm really not.
Guess I should run over to the library. We'll continue this later.
See you tonight?
Mhmmm... now get dressed and get to practice.
A few minutes later
Nothing like getting the engine started then going nowhere...
I have a lot planned today so maybe it's best I don't overdo it.
I hope the girls are already in the gym.
Katie... put your feet down. This isn't happening.
Why are you such a weirdo?
If you can't even joke around then why are you still in my office?
I'll see you tonight Katie. Have a good day.
....
A few moments later
I hope the girls are already in the gym.
Oh good they are here.
Yeah I understand that Shauna. A night out is nice but I just want him to hold me for a while.
After everything that's happened this week, I could really use it.
Awh, they're talking about their plans with me later.
That does sound nice... but I really want an actual date.
I want to get dressed up for him, I want him to hold the door for me and pull my chair out.
I just want that whole experience.
Where do you hope he takes you?
He can take me anywhere. It could be fastfood and we eat in the car for all I care.
Any plans for after?
I hope something happens... but I haven't really planned anything.
Heh, neither one has noticed me... and I'm not sure how to jump into this conversation.
Oh nevermind, [g1] knows I'm here.
Maybe he can hold me for a while too... that does sound really nice.
Shhh...
All you would have to do is ask him.
I know. I just hate feeling like I'm asking for too much. He's so busy that I feel bad taking up too much time.
You know he doesn't see it that way.
Yeah... I don't know though. I'll take the date... if anything else happens then they do.
But I won't force it.
If that's what you want to do Shauna. I feel the same way a lot of the time but [mcf] has a weird talent for knowing what we really want.
Yeah, you're not joking. It feels like he somehow hears us talk all the time.
Uhh Shauna...
What?
Haha, look behind you.
Huh?
Ahh! [mcf]!
I had a weird feeling someone needed to be held so I got here as quickly as I could.
Heh! You're such a jerk!
No, no, no. You're the jerk for not telling me what you really want.
Hmmm...
Mwah!
There... we even now?
Hmmm... maybe.
But I'm excited for our date.
That goes for you to [g1]. 
Hehe, I'm excited too. Did you hear about our class being cancelled today?
Yeah I did. I have to give Willow a ride home because of it.
But as soon as I get home from that we'll have our date. Then me and Shauna will go out.
[mcf]! Good morning!
Good morning Skye. Why are you still in that outfit? Did they never give you another one?
Not yet... but it's no big deal. It covers everything it has to cover.
Hey, if it doesn't bother you then it doesn't bother me.
So who are the girls?
These are my girlfriends... [g1] and Shauna.
It's nice to meet you Skye.
It's nice to meet you too.
Wow... you're both his?
Mhmm we are.
Pssst...
Who is she?
Skye is actually a he. He's trangender.
Oh... is he on your team?
Yep, he's our newest teammate.
Oh... wow. There's a lot more people like me here than back home.
Yeah that's true. Although you two are a bit different, I don't think Skye cares about what his body looks like.
I wish I could say the same.
Well you should introduce yourself. Skye is a good friend to have for you.
Hey Skye. It's nice to meet you.
It's nice to meet you too Shauna.
So how long has the love triangle been a thing?
Oh, it's not really a triangle. We're both his girlfriends but we are only friends.
Oh... hey, whatever works.
Hey [mcf]! You ready?
I'm always ready.
How do you feel about running a little triangle offense today?
Heh, I'm down. I've studied the playbook when I can.
Good. I'm going to be a more hands on coach today. Instead of just observing I'm going to start barking a bit.
Bark away coach.
Meet me at half court when you're ready.
I wonder how well the others know the plays...
I also wonder who all will show up today.
I was rusty yesterday. I won't go so easy on you this time.
Ha, good, it felt like I was against a grandpa yesterday... nowhere to go but up though.
Uh huh... I made you sweat.
Ha, yeah I sweat a bit. I'll give it to you.
I'll be over there in a second.
The workout before this was good. I feel energized.
We'll be over here if you need us babe.
We'll be your cheerleaders until the actual ones show up.
I wouldn't mind seeing you two in some cheer outfits actually.
Hmmm... maybe.
And you'll roll off of the screen either into the close corner or you'll take the screen and then run under the basket to the other corner.
Simple enough.
Am I playing shooting guard today? Or are we going to switch up?
We're going to swap you and Damien around at both guard positions, Lee will run some too. Kenji is playing center. The rest will be swapping around as forwards.
Sounds good.
Speaking of some others.
Woo! Let's play some basketball!
How's it going man?
Not bad at all.
Good morning.
Good morning Dubaku.
Another day to improve.
You get any sleep last night?
Yeah, much better. I started studying earlier and went to bed at a decent time.
Good, keep it up Ayden.
Hey...
Did you hear about Damien and Jasmine?
I heard they broke up.
That's none of our business Ayden.
I mean... it is if it effects Damien.
[mcf]!
Woah, Kenji.
I apologize for my disrespect. I'm humbled that I'll be able to learn from you.
Uhh... thanks?
That's strange.
It will be a good year. We will grow as a team. We will all trust each other.
Yeah, that's the plan.
Good, we are on the same page.
He's saying these things but they don't feel genuine.
You want to take the lead [mcf]?
You'll be the one on the court the most.
Yeah, I'll call the plays.
Good... and come here for a second.
fuck... I'm being pulled in every direction.
Before we start... Natalie and I will be at the charity game tonight.
Will you be playing in it?
Nah, I don't think so. But I hope we get some time to talk while we're there.
I'm sure we will.
Can I ask you something else?
Sure.
This will be Natalie's first day cheering in front of the team... you won't let them say anything about her right? Please?
Of course I won't Harp.
Good. And if you can... give her a compliment. It'll mean a lot to her.
I will Harp.
Okay, while we wait on the others go ahead and shoot around a bit. Warm up.
It's good to see everyone focused and into practice for once... even if we don't have everyone still.
Hmm, I haven't seen much of Kenji outside of running to the rim. I wonder if our big man can shoot threes at all.
Yo Kenji.
What is it?
Want to have a little shoot off? Just for fun.
We'll each get a rack and whoever makes the most threes wins.
Why?
Like I said, for fun. I haven't seen you play much outside of the box.
Are you trying to show off?
What? No? It's just a friendly game while we wait.
You really do think you're better than everyone don't you?
I will show you you're not. I accept your game.
What's your problem Kenji?
Hey, hey...
Don't argue, he accepted the game. I'll help you get the basketballs.
But...
Come on. You can't play without them.
Hmmm, okay...
It's not worth it. Kenji is just strange.
I talked to him some yesterday and he doesn't seem like your biggest fan.
Then why did he just apologize to me and say he wants to learn from me right before that?
Like I said, he's strange. Probably just an ego thing, we'll figure it out.
Maybe give him a few shots, let the game be close. You still get to see how he can shoot and you don't kill his confidence.
I guess I can do that. I don't want to feed his ego too much though.
Which is why you should still win... just let him get close.
I got this one... you grab the other one.
Where do you want this by the way?
Not the corners but the sides of the three point line.
I think I know what you mean.
Here you go Kenji. 12 tries, we'll alternate.
I don't shoot many threes.
Just try your best. No one is expecting you to hit all 12.
But you think you will?
I never said that and no, I don't think I will.
Well we will see.
You ready [mcf]?
You got this [mcf]! Hit all of them!
Heh, Ayden has been pretty chill. I should try to hang out with him sometime outside of practice.
To be honest that goes for all of the guys...
Yeah, I'm ready.
Who is going to shoot first?
Kenji can start.
KENJI! YOU GO FIRST!
Let's see what he can do... Harper's watching too so it's his moment to shine.
Damn, nothing but net.
Yes!
You got this [mcf].
My turn...
I should miss this one... let Kenji be ahead for a moment. I'll shoot a little short on this one.
Awh!
Woah [mcf].
I thought that one was going in!
I'm just dialing it in.
Ha, Kenji is staring me down while he's shooting now. Skye sounds right about him having an ego.
And he made it.
Wow! Good job Kenji, keep it up!
Come on [mcf]! You're only down by 2!
I'll miss one more... this time I'll shoot too far.
Oh! So close!
*whispering* not too far ahead [mcf]...
You okay man?
Everyone misses shots Ayden.
I think it's time to start hitting them.
You got this baby!
Score the bucket! Or whatever they say!
Oh, they were watching me miss those. It really is time to start making them.
Still dialing it in?
Yep, I think I have it now.
I trust it.
A few minutes later
Oh! So close Kenji! We'll work on your form.
This is fucking bullshit!
You still have one more shot [mcf]. You're already up by 2. Might as well make it 3.
You got this!
Wooo!
Ayyy! Final score is 9-6.
Phew, I made 9/10 of the ones I actually tried on... a few of them were lucky though.
I can feel myself getting rusty.
Good job [mcf].
Not bad [mcf]. Not bad at all.
Told you, I just had to dial it in.
I believed it.
I just hope this didn't escalate shit with Kenji... I didn't mean for it to.
Oh, Mackey and Lee are here.
Behind you Harp.
Oh! Good morning guys.
Good morning coach. What are we doing today?
We're going to practice our triangle offense. You three can talk for a moment and then we're going to start.
Yes coach.
So [mcf]. You excited to bowl tonight?
It sounds like fun I guess.
I heard they redecorated the bowling place for us. Are you ready for your introduction to the celebrity life?
What do you mean?
They aren't televising this for us... it's all about you.
Just be ready man.
Expect more than one camera pointed at you the entire time.
Anyway... did you hear about Damien and Jasmine?
I don't want to talk about it guys. It's not the time.
Let's just start practice okay?
Oh... yeah. Sure man.
Practice commences.
Practice continues.
Running screens is fun and all but we really should be doing more.
Plant those feet Ayden!
UHhgg!
Oh shit... Skye must not have seen Ayden... or he just decided to run through him.
Ahh!
Are you two okay!?
What happened?
Ha, yeah I think we're good.
Are you sure?
I'm so sorry Ayden! I didn't see you.
Haha, it's okay. It happens.
Not my first time falling down.
Let me help you up.
Help Skye get up first.
Thank you. I'll try to focus better.
We'll get there Skye. We're all still getting used to things.
Are you sure you're both okay?
Yeah we're good. We don't have to stop practice for me.
Are we ready to keep going?
I am.
A few minutes later
Everything has gone pretty smoothly since Skye's accident.
Everyone seems to have it down... even though we're only playing with six and only one side of the court.
But it's a start.
Ayden is going t-
What the fuck?
Ahhgghh!
[mcf]!!!
What the fuck Kenji!
Fuck... I landed weird. Under my shoulder hurts.
Baby!
What are you doing?!
I lost my footing.
You weren't even the one that was supposed to set the screen!
Are you okay???
Are you hurt?!
Just my shoulder... but I'm fine.
[mcf], you have to be hurt.
That looked really bad!
I'm fine girls... I just stretched a muscle.
Can you stand up?
Yeah, thanks Skye.
Are you sure you're okay?
He would tell us if he wasn't coach.
Can you at least check with the nurse? See what she says?
I don't need that coach. I'm fine.
Please? Just check?
Why wasn't Ayden shown this treatment?
We still have practice coach...
We're almost done. It's okay.
Please go see the nurse babe.
We know you'll act all tough guy and we won't know if you're actually hurt.
I'm outnumbered just like last time...
Might as well just go.
Sure girls... I'll go get checked.
Thank you.
Yeah, thank you...
Where are you girls going to be?
We're going with you.
Only two people are allowed there at a time. And I want Skye to take him over there.
Oh... well...
The cheerleaders never came out so we'll go say hey to them I guess. Since we can't come with you.
Come there as soon as you're out okay?
Okay girls... I'll see you two soon.
Bye baby.
Bye babe.
Heh, Shauna called me babe. Has she done that before?
You ready to go?
Yeah I suppose so.
I didn't mean to run into you [mcf].
I believe it Kenji... it's all a part of the game.
Glad you understand.
Thanks for going... it's an important day for you. I don't want you to be hurt on it.
I'll let Natalie know why you aren't here. We'll see you tonight.
See you tonight Harp. I want to talk to you about something later.
Hmmm... Now I'm curious... I look forward to it. Now go get checked.
Yes ma'am.
Time to say hey to the nurse again...
Wait, she works at the middle school... not here. So it's time to meet a new nurse.
a few moments later
Oh fuck, it's bright in here.
Well... here we are. The nurse will be here in just a moment.
How did you know where this place was anyway? Aren't you new here?
I had to see the nurse before I was allowed to try out for the team.
Oh, makes sense. Thanks for helping me up and for talking to Kenji for me by the way.
It's what a teammate does. You helped me up right before that. Now take a seat.
I'm going to head back now okay?
Sure. Thanks for bringing me.
Yep, and I know you're fine but I'll get Kenji back for doing that.
It's fine Skye. It happens.
You didn't see him run full speed straight into you. See you around [mcf].
Don't do anything stupid Skye. I'll see you tonight.
Hmmm, maybe Kenji did have bad intentions.
Or Skye is overreacting... I'm not sure.
All I know is that I'm going to turn down the light in here a little.
There we go.
Guess I'll just lay here until the nurse shows up.
A few minutes later
*Knock, knock*
Oh there she is.
She's definitely a lot younger than the other nurse.
Hey there. How can I help you today?
I had a little fall. My coach wanted me to come get my shoulder checked.
I'm sorry to hear that... and what's your name?
[mcf] [mcl].
Heh, I'm just messing with you. Of course I know who you are, they made me learn all about you.
I'll probably get yelled at for not being here as soon as you arrived.
I won't tell anyone.
Well that's very sweet of you. Would you please take your shirt off and explain what happened?
Uhh sure.
I'm Mabel by the way. It's nice to finally meet you.
It's nice to meet you too.
I just had an awkward fall on my side. I fell on my arm and it stretched out a bit. The muscle under my shoulder is sore.
How bad does it hurt?
Not that bad, just enough to be annoying.
They really are keeping you protected huh?
I know it's not that bad, but they insisted I come.
Well lay on your back... I'll help ease the annoyance with a little rub.
How does that feel?
Great... the pain is already going away.
You just needed a good massage... don't you have girlfriends to do this for you?
Ha, yeah I do.
I'm just teasing... I don't mind at all.
Do you want to know something?
What's up?
I'm your teacher's cousin.
Really? That's cool.
Yeah, she was nervous about you at first but now she only talks about how great you are.
And I heard about your little meeting with Nathan. That was really cool of you.
I hope I get to see him again soon.
I'm sure you will. Well... I think you're all done unless you need something else.
No, I think I'm good. Thank you Mabel.
I'm happy to help.
I want to say I hope to see you soon but that means you'd likely be injured so I won't.
Ha, I'll just visit sometime then.
Well you're welcome whenever.
That's good to know.
AHHHgggg!
Someone's coming and they're hurt.
Oh! What happened?
Kimmy hurt her leg...
It hurts....
I'll help you onto the bed.
What happened?
I was swimming and my leg started to cramp really badly and it won't stop.
Lay her down...
I'm treating both of my superstars in a single morning. It's a special day.
Is it your knee or thigh that hurts?
My thigh.
Lay flat on your back for me.
Huh... why is Penny here in her work uniform?
Pst... Penny.
Oh, hey [mcf].
What are you doing at WVM this early?
I deliver coffee and breakfast to a bunch of people every morning.
I usually deliver and then get ready for class but since it's cancelled today I have to head back to work.
Can you handle Kimmy for me? I need to head out.
Yeah, I can. Do you want me to walk you out to your car?
Heh, if you want to.
I'm going to walk Penny to her car Kimmy. I'll be right back okay?
Mhmmmm....
We'll be here...
I park a good bit away...
That's okay... I could use a walk.
Is it cool if I stop by the locker room and change really quickly?
Sure, that's fine.
A few moments later
So what's up Penny? We haven't talked since we went streaking.
Heh, I know... after that I figured I'd give you some space. I don't want to overstay my welcome.
What do you mean?
You're the superstar and I'm just a random girl that works at a diner. Your time is more important than mine.
And it would be silly for me to think you want to spend that time with me.
Come on Penny, I don't view life like that. You're just as important as me.
Don't say stuff like that.
It's hard not to feel that way...
Girls like me don't end up with guys like you.
Who says? And why did you run away after kissing me?
I shouldn't have done that without asking...
If you asked I would have said yes...
Oh!
...
Nothing to say? Now we've both awkwardly kissed eachother. So we're even.
Mhmm.
Now where's your car?
Who says? Anything could happen and even if it doesn't we could still be really close friends.
There's nothing wrong with you Penny. Don't think that way about yourself.
Thank you [mcf]...
Now where's your car?
Follow me...
I have to say something [mcf].
What is it?
You know how I told you I've read a ton of articles and interviews about you?
They were more than just entertainment... Your story about losing your father and not knowing the rest of your family really pulled me in.
I was fascinated by you and everything you were achieving despite where you started.
I was rooting for you... and everytime you won or lost I was watching and cheering from my room.
How long have you known about me?
Your second year of highschool. When your highlights were being shown everywhere.
When I found out about Shauna I started to like you even more and I got even more invested.
Now you're here walking me to my car. I try not to act star struck but I am.
My legs are wobbly just thinking about it.
So I just want to thank you for being you and giving this random girl motivation for all of these years.
You're welcome Penny. I'm glad I was that for you.
I must sound like a lunatic.
No, I understand.
Oh... we're at my car... please don't make fun of it...
Why would I? There's nothing wrong with it.
You're just saying that... it's old and rusty and barely runs.
Why would I ever make fun of you for that? It's a car and it runs... even if only barely.
I don't know... I'm just not proud of it.
You didn't sound like a lunatic before but now you do.
You're a college student working at a diner. This car is all you need right now.
Yeah... it's just not something to brag about.
If you say so.
Well, I guess It's time for me to go.
Would you like to sit for a minute? And talk?
Don't you have to get back to work?
I can be a little late...
If you're okay with that then sure.
You keep your car very clean huh?
I try to.
It's not easy since I transport so much food and drink in it every single day... but I try.
Ha, yeah I can imagine that being challenging.
Her little confession back there was sweet...
I want to spend a little time with her but I shouldn't take too long. I have to get back to Kimmy and my girls.
Ha, you're a little big for this car.
Yeah a little bit but it's fine.
Thanks for walking me out here... I know it was a long walk.
It's fine Penny... you want to know something?
What is it?
I think you look absolutely beautiful today.
[mcf]... that's nice of you. You're very handsome today yourself.
Do you get so tense everytime someone compliments you?
Pretty much, yeah.
Well you shouldn't... give me your hand.
I'll admit... I have a lot to learn about you. But I like you Penny.
You've been very open and honest with me and I want to be the same with you.
[mcf]...
Let me finish Penny. I could be wrong but I get the feeling that you're an overthinker so I want to lay my feelings out there now.
I think you're a girl with a ton of potential. I'm not sure exactly what you've been through but I think they've made you a little unsure of yourself.
But I wouldn't be in this car right now if I didn't think you were a special person.
I like you a lot and I'd like to pursue something with you... but before that I need to know that you're okay with who I am.
And the type of relationship I have.
I know about it [mcf]. You don't have to explain.
Well... how do you feel?
Can you kiss me again?
Mmmm... it's nice to finally kiss her for real.
She's rubbing her hand on my thigh... we've already been naked together.
I might as well go for a little grab of my own.
Mmmmm... [mcf]...
She likes it and she moved her arm higher up my thigh.
I can't believe this is happening.
We should probably stop before we go too far... we're in public and you need to go back to work.
What? Fuck that... work can wait.
Are you sure?
Absolutely, they'll understand. I'll just tell them about Kimmy and how I had to help.
And no one ever comes this way this early. This parking lot is always empty. I promise.
So if you're okay with it then so am I.
Then I suppose I am too.
Can I... take your shorts off?
Yes you can.
I can't believe this.
Woah Penny...
I've thought about this since I saw all of you the other night.
Mmmm... I can grab it right?
You can do whatever you want to do.
Don't forget... I'm a virgin [mcf].
Go at your own pace Penny.
Don't worry... I'm ready.
Grrrgglll...
Mmmmm... yeah you're definitely ready.
Grrllll...
Damn Penny... there's no way this is your first blowjob. Mmmm.
She knows how to use her mouth but I wonder how deep she can take me.
MMMmmmm fuck... is this really your first Penny?
Grrlll... Mmmmmhmmm...
Well shit, you're a natural. Keep going.
I'm going to take my shirt off.
Grrggll
Fucking hell Penny, keep sucking me just like that.
You're so fucking good at it.
Grrgglllgrr
Mmmmm... She's sucking so fucking hard.
Keep going Penny.
Mmmmm...
She's almost as good as Shauna is. Ha, they actually do have a lot in common.
Mmmmnnnn... ggrrrggll...
I'm sorry... I have to stop for a moment.
Fuck Penny. That was great.
That's harder than it looks.
You didn't make it seem like it.
Was it actually good? I've never done anything other than test myself on a few objects.
Like I said, you're a natural.
Can we keep going?
What do you mean?
Like... can I take my clothes off?
Ha, you absolutely can.
Okay! Just give me a second. This uniform is hard to get out of.
I'm so excited... I'm shaking.
Calm down Penny. Nothing to be shaking about.
Yes it is...
There we go... I'm ready for whatever.
Your body is fucking sexy Penny.
Especially your thighs in those stockings.
Heh, I like how it looks too.
I'm a little lonely over here... is it okay if I come over there?
Yeah, I don't think I mind.
Just be easy with me... at first.
Of course.
I finally have Penny in my arms...
I'm ready [mcf].
Uhh... it's a little crammed. Could you help me?
It is really tight in here.
We can make it work Penny. It's not that bad.
I feel silly.
Do you want to try outside of the car?
Are you okay with that? It would be easier.
If you are I am. If someone shows I'm running though.
I'm pretty fast... I might be gone quicker than you.
Haha, we'll see.
What a fantastic ass.
Hey!
I'm starting to think you're trying to get me into exhibitionism.
Two experiences and both involve being nude in public.
Ehh... it makes it fun.
I won't deny that.
Do you want me to like... lay on the hood?
That could work.
I was calm... but I'm suddenly super nervous again.
Being exposed all around can do that.
Are you nervous?
A little bit.
Well at least I'm not alone. That makes me feel a little better.
It feels a little awkward just to bend over like this.
I'll help.
Woah [mcf]!
I told you I was helping.
[mcf]... I'm scared of heights.
Oh... my bad.
Thank you... at least I'm on the hood now.
Fuck it... here I go.
Mmmm... are you sure you want to start with this?
Mhmmm... please [mcf]. I'm ready. Take me.
Just go slowly at first.
Mmmmm....
Fuck... That's so big... mmmmm...
Slowly [mcf].
It's finally happening...
Are you okay Penny? I'm almost halway into you.
Only half? Holy fuck... Mmmnnnn...
I'm going to keep going slowly.
MMMNNNMMM!
Keep going... a little faster. Go all the way.
Uhh... I'm going to keep going slowly. I can feel her tensing up.
Mmmm... [mcf].
Ahh! [mcf], pull it out... it's starting to feel weird.
Fuck, we were so close. I should've stopped sooner.
I'm sorry... I've never had anything close to as big as you in me before.
It was shooting painful tingles through my legs.
It's fine... thanks for telling me to stop.
I ruined it...
It's fine Penny. It's not like these are pristine conditions. Losing your virginity is already stressful enough.
It's more about the position. I'm used to being on my back or knees. At least that's what I do anytime I've played before.
It's what I find most comfortable... I have a blanket in my trunk. If I lay it down can we try the ground?
Are you sure you're okay with that? It's fine if we just wait until later and try again.
I just want this to happen [mcf]. I don't care where or how. Please.
I mean... yeah, I'm down.
Hehe, okay.
Just give me a second... my trunk is hard to open.
There we go.
Huh, this isn't that bad. We're much more hidden than before.
I promise I'll do better this time.
You've already done great. Just relax and try to enjoy it instead of worry about it.
Mhmm...
It's a pretty thick blanket so it's actually pretty comfortable.
Really now?
Yep... you should find out for yourself.
I think I will.
Let me lay on my stomach first.
Okay, I'm ready for you.
Yeah, I'm ready too. You have such a nice ass and legs.
Just relax... I'll stop whenever you tell me to.
I'm relaxed... I promise. I can handle it now.
Please fuck me [mcf].
Oh fuckkkk... mmmm...
Damn, I'm sliding into her much easier than before.
This is so much better [mcf].
How do I feel?
Fucking perfect...
You can definitely tell she's a virgin by how she's reacting to everything.
She reminds me a lot of Jamie and Shauna's first time.
I'm about as deep as I can go in this position Penny.
You can go deeper?
Yeah, we'd have to change positions though.
What about me on my knees?
That'll be perfect.
Oh my god it feels even better this way.
And it's even easier to slide into her.
Your cock feels so good [mcf]...
I don't really like to go slow. Don't be afraid to go fast.
Are you sure?
I'll start at a moderate pace... nothing crazy.
Mmmmmmhmmmm...
Ahhhmmm... you're so big.
And you're so tight.
Is this a good speed?
Faster [mcf]... mmmm...
As fast as you can go... please.
Mmmm, I can't say no to that... I just have to be ready to stop if she needs me to.
FUCK!!! JUST LIKE THAT!
Fuck Penny...
Hard and fast! Harder!
I didn't think you'd be like this Penny.
HHHnnnngg! Keep going!
Am I good [mcf]?
Fuck yeah.
Mmmm...
That's so fucking good.
I could go faster but I shouldn't overdo it.
Fuck! This feels amazing!
I'm getting close [mcf]!
Hmmmnnnngg... you can cum in me. I'm on the pill.
I'm glad she said that, I really want to cum deep inside of her... and I'm getting close.
I shouldn't try to hold out, me and Penny both need to get on with our day.
I'm about to cum Penny.
Mmmmm... so am I... Don't stop...
HNNNgGhhh...
Oh fuck! I'm so close [mcf]! Don't stop!
AHHHHNNNGGGGGHHH!!
*Heavy breathing* MMmmmm... my body is shaking.
That was amazing.
Yes it was...
You were great...
Did you finish? I was so focused on myself and what it felt like that I couldn't tell.
Yeah, right before you did.
Would you do this again with me?
If we both had time I'd do it again right now.
Hehe... that was one hell of a way to lose my virginity.
Are you happy this happened the way it did?
Of course.
Mwah!
It was totally worth whatever trouble I'll be in with my boss.
Ha, I hope it was. How do you feel?
Tingly... all over. And very happy.
Should we get dressed now? I feel like our luck may run out soon.
Yeah, we probably should.
Especially your thighs in those stockings.
Heh, I like how it looks too.
The other thing there isn't a problem for you right?
I've seen you naked before Penny... it's not a surprise or anything and you know I don't mind.
I know... I just wanted to make sure.
How has Shauna been? Does she still not like having one?
Not really, no. But we're working on it.
She's very lucky to have you. I went through something similar when I first started to transition.
And I had to find who I really was on my own, but even then I'm not so confident in it right now.
What do you mean?
Part of me wishes I didn't have it right now... because of you.
That's nonsense Penny.
I promise I don't mind Penny.
[mcf]! Stop!
What is it?
Have you done anything with Shauna's yet?
Not really...
You should do this with her first... before me.
Okay, I'll stop. I was just trying to prove a point.
Sorry...
It's fine. You're right, I should do that with Shauna first.
Anyway... where were we?
I promise I don't mind.
I believe you.
Anyway... where were we?
I'm a little lonely over here... is it okay if I come over there?
Yeah, I don't think I mind.
Just be easy with me... at first... and there's lube in the glove box.
You carry around lube in your glove box?
Haha, Don't judge me.
I finally have Penny in my arms...
I'm ready [mcf].
Uhh... it's a little crammed. Could you help me?
It is really tight in here.
We can make it work Penny. It's not that bad.
I feel silly...
Do you want to try outside of the car?
Are you okay with that? It would be easier.
If you are I am. If someone shows I'm running though.
I'm pretty fast... I might be gone quicker than you.
Haha, we'll see.
What a fantastic ass.
Hey!
I'm starting to think you're trying to get me into exhibitionism.
Two experiences and both involve being nude in public.
Ehh... it makes it fun.
I won't deny that.
Do you want me to like... lay on the hood?
That could work.
I was calm... but I'm suddenly super nervous again.
Being exposed all around can do that.
Are you nervous?
A little bit.
Well at least I'm not alone. That makes me feel a little better.
It feels a little awkward just to bend over like this.
I'll help.
Woah [mcf]!
I told you I was helping.
[mcf]... I'm scared of heights.
Oh... my bad.
Thank you... at least I'm on the hood now.
Fuck it... here I go.
What a nice little asshole.
Mmmm... are you sure you want to start with this?
Mhmmm... please [mcf]. I'm ready. Take me.
Just go slowly at first.
Mmmmm....
Fuck... That's so big... mmmmm...
Slowly [mcf].
It's finally happening...
Are you okay Penny? I'm almost halway into you.
Her ass is so fucking tight.
Only half? Holy fuck... Mmmnnnn...
I'm going to keep going slowly.
MMMNNNMMM!
Keep going... a little faster. Go all the way.
Uhh... I'm going to keep going slowly. I can feel her tensing up.
Mmmm... [mcf].
Ahh! [mcf], pull it out... it's starting to feel weird.
Fuck, we were so close. I should've stopped sooner.
I'm sorry... I've never had anything close to as big as you in me before.
It was shooting painful tingles through my legs.
It's fine... thanks for telling me to stop.
I ruined it...
It's fine Penny. It's not like these are pristine conditions. Losing your virginity is already stressful enough.
It's more about the position. I'm used to being on my back or knees. At least that's what I do anytime I've played before.
It's what I find most comfortable... I have a blanket in my trunk. If I lay it down can we try the ground?
Are you sure you're okay with that? It's fine if we just wait until later and try again.
I just want this to happen [mcf]. I don't care where or how. Please.
I mean... yeah, I'm down.
Hehe, okay.
Just give me a second... my trunk is hard to open.
There we go.
Huh, this isn't that bad. We're much more hidden than before.
I promise I'll do better this time.
You've already done great. Just relax and try to enjoy it instead of worry about it.
Mhmm...
It's a pretty thick blanket so it's actually pretty comfortable.
Really now?
Yep... you should find out for yourself.
I think I will.
Let me lay on my stomach first.
Okay, I'm ready for you.
Yeah, I'm ready too. You have such a nice ass.
Just relax... I'll stop whenever you tell me to.
I'm relaxed... I promise. I can handle it now. Last time was a fluke.
Please fuck me [mcf].
Oh fuckkkk... mmmm...
Damn, I'm sliding into her much easier than before.
This is so much better [mcf].
How do I feel?
Fucking perfect...
You can definitely tell she's a virgin by how she's reacting to everything.
She reminds me a lot of Jamie and Shauna's first time.
I'm about as deep as I can go in this position Penny.
You can go deeper?
Yeah, we'd have to change positions though.
What about me on my knees?
That'll be perfect.
Oh my god it feels even better this way.
And it's even easier to slide into her.
Your cock feels so good [mcf]...
Hmmmm...
I don't really like to go slow. Don't be afraid to go fast.
Are you sure?
I'll start at a moderate pace... nothing crazy.
Mmmmmmhmmmm...
Here I go...
Ahhhmmm... you're so big.
And you're so tight.
Is this a good speed?
Faster [mcf]... mmmm...
As fast as you can go... please.
Mmmm, I can't say no to that... I just have to be ready to stop if she needs me to.
FUCK!!! JUST LIKE THAT!
Fuck Penny...
Hard and fast! Harder!
I didn't think you'd be like this Penny.
HHHnnnngg! Keep going!
Am I good [mcf]?
Fuck yeah.
Mmmm...
That's so fucking good.
I could go faster but I shouldn't overdo it.
Fuck! This feels amazing!
I'm getting close [mcf]!
Hmmmnnnngg... Cum in my ass [mcf]!
I'm glad she said that, I really want to cum deep inside of her... and I'm getting close.
I shouldn't try to hold out, me and Penny both need to get on with our day.
I'm about to cum Penny.
Mmmmm... so am I... Don't stop...
HNNNgGhhh...
Oh fuck! I'm so close [mcf]! Don't stop!
AHHHHNNNGGGGGHHH!!
*Heavy breathing* MMmmmm... my body is shaking.
That was amazing.
Yes it was...
You were great...
Did you finish? I was so focused on myself and what it felt like that I couldn't tell.
Yeah, right before you did.
Would you do this again with me?
If we both had time I'd do it again right now.
Hehe... that was one hell of a way to lose my virginity.
I've never came from anal by myself before... that was crazy.
Are you happy this happened the way it did?
Of course. Without a doubt.
Mwah!
It was totally worth whatever trouble I'll be in with my boss.
Ha, I hope it was. How do you feel?
Tingly... all over. And very happy.
Should we get dressed now? I feel like our luck may run out soon.
Yeah, we probably should.
I'll get them out of the car.
Thank you.
Woah... take your time Penny.
Are you staring at my ass?
I most definitely am...
*You both get dressed*
Can we lay here for just another minute? I don't want this to end.
It's only beginning Penny. But yes we can.
Come closer.
Is this good... are you comfortable?
Yeah, I am.
What would the younger version of yourself do if you told her that this day would happen?
She would freak out and...
And what?
Probably think about it while masturbating...
Haha, have you done that before? Think about me while masturbating?
Heh, don't make me answer that.
Ha, I won't. But I'll assume it's a yes.
You go ahead and do that.
I'll lay here for a minute and then I have to go.
Sounds good to me.
A few minutes later
Thank you for helping me put the blanket back... and thanks for this.
I'll never forget this morning.
I won't either Penny. I hope we get to do it again soon.
So do I. I'll be watching and rooting for you tonight. Good luck.
Heh, thanks. I'll probably need it. I'll see you soon Penny.
Goodbye [mcf].
Penny was a surprise. Once she got comfortable everything went smoothly...
I bet me and her are going to have a lot of fun together this year...
I should head back and check on Kimmy. She may need someone to help her out when she leaves.
Thanks again for walking me to my car.
No problem Penny.
I'll be watching and rooting for you tonight. Good luck.
Heh, thanks. I'll probably need it. I'll see you soon Penny.
Goodbye [mcf].
Penny is cool... I didn't expect her to tell me about her watching me for years on this walk but that was really sweet.
I really need to go to the diner soon.
I could take Shauna there but I want us to have alone time together.
I should head back and check on Kimmy. She may need someone to help her out when she leaves.
A few minutes later
I hope Kimmy is doing okay...
Mabel is probably doing the same thing for her that she did for me.
I'm almost to the nurse's room.
Oh... yep... same thing she did for me.
I just didn't expect that position.
Is it getting better? My hands are getting tired.
A little.
How's it going you two?
[mcf]... what took you so long?
It was a long walk. How's your thigh?
It hurts.
Do you mind giving me a hand? After your shoulder and now her thigh... my arms are exhausted.
You want me to rub her thigh?
To help with her cramp? Yes.
You have stronger hands, you could probably help more.
Please [mcf].
I mean, I will. I'm not sure what I have to do though.
Just massage her thigh, Get in deep.
You're cool with me touching your thigh Kimmy?
Mhmmm... I just want the pain to stop.
How does that feel?
A little better.
You need to get more force [mcf]. Sit how I was... it helps.
If you say so...
Fuck... I have to be careful like this... I have my hips foward so nothing is touching her except my butt.
Kimmy put her hand over her groin too... so that helps.
How about now?
Mmmmm... mmmhmmm... it's helping.
Hehe... put more body weight into it. Try rocking her leg a bit while you do it.
Why?
Are you questioning the nurse in the room?
Mmmm...
No it's just... okay I'll try it.
Thank you... you're doing a good job. She's really close.
HHHmmmmm....
Damn... this must feel really good for Kimmy. Mabel knows what she's talking about.
Hmmmnnn... hmmm...
Let me try a little harder.
HHHHHNNNGGGGMMMM!!
Woah...
There you go!
Oh my god! I'm sorry!
What happened?
Uhh... I have to go.
Thank you for helping... I feel better.
No problem but what happened?
I'll see you later.
What the fuck just happened?
Do you really not know?
No, I don't.
I'm pretty sure you just made her cum.
What? How? I was just massaging her thigh. And it wasn't even for long.
If you want to believe you made her cum from that then you go ahead.
But I'd bet it's because you were sitting on her hand that was placed over her vagina... and you were rocking back and forth.
You told me to?
I didn't think she'd cum from it. Plus Kimmy is the most tense and strict person I've ever met... she probably needed it.
I didn't mean to do that.
It's fine. It felt good for her and she might be embarassed but it will go away.
Everyone needs a little thigh rub from someone like you every now and then.
Including you?
Heh, I could report you for saying that.
And I could report you for not being here when I got hurt... and what you just had me do with Kimmy.
So I think we're even.
Hmmmm... I don't know about that. I think you should come by again soon and we can talk about it further.
Wow, that actually worked...
I was mainly just teasing her... with all the scandals and stuff I have to be careful with the staff here.
Ha, we'll see about that. Thanks again Mabel.
Anytime, I hope to see you soon big guy.
I guess so...
Don't worry about it... I highly doubt it will be an issue in a few days.
You're probably right. I'll still talk to Kimmy about it.
Hey, that's up to you.
I'm going to head out... thanks again Mabel.
Anytime... I'll see you around.
Well shit... I didn't expect any of that to happen.
I still have to go by the cheerleader room. I'm not sure if the girls will still be there though.
A few minutes later
Oh... it's only Zoe.
Zoe!
About time you showed up.
You were waiting on me?
Yeah, your girlfriends said you would stop by here so someone had to tell you where they are now. They're at the front waiting on you.
They already stopped by the nurse and she told them you were walking Penny to her car and that you were fine.
You know... a note would have worked? Or a text?
Maybe I wanted to talk to you.
Anything specific?
Not really... all of my girls are pretty nervous since they'll be on tv tonight.
Are you nervous?
Yeah, a little.
Not so much for me, I'm nervous for them. I hope they do well.
I'm sure they will. Will you be performing anything or are you just going to be on the side?
Both, we're going to do a little routine to start everything off.
Oh, that's cool.
Anyway... what's up with you?
We had sex and now we've barely talked to eachother.
I've been really busy... and I thought you said you didn't want to be a girlfriend to me?
I don't... I just want a little attention.
No one wants to feel used.
Don't feel that way Zoe. We can talk anytime that you want to.
I'll remember that.
Is a hug all I can get?
What else do you want?
Just a simple kiss.
Mwah!
I think you'll like it.
I can't wait to see it.
Oh... I didn't mean to interrupt anything.
You're fine Emiko.
How's it going Emiko?
I'm worried about tonight... I need to go and get ready.
It's a long time away still.
I know, I just want to make sure I'm ready for it.
We'll head back to our room soon. You can go ahead and go and I'll meet you there okay?
Mhhmmm...
I guess I'll see you tonight then.
Don't worry too much Emiko. I'm sure you're going to do a great job.
Thank you. I hope so too.
I'll see you then.
Bye Emiko.
*Whispering* Thank you for saying that to her.
I mean it, I think she'll do great.
You know... ever since you had your first chat with her about how you'll protect her... I think she's grown a real crush on you.
She told you about that talk?
She tells me everything. All I'm trying to say is that your words of encouragment mean about the most of anybody to her.
I think so too.
I'm a bit shocked you haven't made a comment about the stripper pole.
Why is it in here?
It's great exercise... and our cheer room used to be a generic dance studio.
Can I get a little show?
Hmmmm... perhaps.
Fuck it... sure. I'll even make the show better.
A pole is only as good as the pair of boobs that is swinging on it.
Then that's one fan-fucking-tastic pole.
You think so?
Yep, I sure do.
Heh... now stand back and enjoy the few things I know how to do.
Zoe is really sexy. It's too bad that she doesn't want anything serious.
Or at least that's what she says.
What do you think?
I think I'm jealous.
Of what?
That pole.
Hehe...
I don't know a lot of moves. We mainly joke around on it.
I'm enjoying the show... so don't worry about it.
Heh, I do know one other thing.
It's a real shame that you're wearing panties right now.
Shhhhh... just come here.
How do you feel right now?
Excited.
Yeah, I bet so...
I am too... it's been hard to think about much else since our last time.
I'm a little dissapointed... I don't believe there are any pens nearby to reenact last time.
Don't even think about it!
Hmmm... I think I'm going to slide down a little bit.
Woah... Jesus [mcf].
You're so hard... I can feel you poking me through my panties.
Actually, that's just a really large pen in my pocket.
Haha, we can drop the pen jokes anytime.
There's something else I'd like to drop.
Go for it then... no one's gonna stop you.
Woah [mcf]... you got those off of me way too easily.
Is that an issue?
Ha, no. It was strangely impressive. That skirt isn't easy to get off.
So what happens next?
There's something I want to do.
Ohhh... fuck [mcf].
Mmmmmm...
Eating out Zoe is great, she smells so nice and she honestly tastes great too.
[mcf]... wait.
You're really fucking good at that... but I need to get to my room soon.
You're welcome to do this any other time but...
You're hard as a rock and I'm horny as fuck. So... let's fuck.
That's all you had to say.
You're really fucking hot [mcf].
So are you Zoe.
Are you going to be holding onto that pole this whole time?
Well... I have something else helping keep me up right now.
Ha, yeah I guess you do... I have other plans for that though.
I'm ready [mcf]... I missed your cock.
I'm lined up... Zoe seemed a bit inexperienced last time so I should hold myself back at the start.
AAHHHNNN!!
She just pulled me into her with her legs!
Holy shit Zoe... I wasn't expecting that.
Ohhhhhmmmm... your cock feels so fucking thick in me.
That's exactly what I needed.
If she wants to play like that...
Then I'll just have to play the same way.
You ready Zoe?
Fuck yes.
Mmmmmm!!
Oh fuck!
Is that what you wanted?
Mmmm... oh fuck yes....
Fill my pussy with that huge fucking cock... Fuck...
Mmm... Ohhhhh...
How is sex with someone on a pole?
It's fucking great. Are your arms tired?
Mmmnnn... I can hang here and get fucked like this all day.
Mmmnnnn... Ohhhh...
Just like that [mcf]... I'm going to fucking cum.
Mmmmnnn.... MMMMMM.... MMMMOOhhh...
FUCK! AHHHHNNGGGGHHH!
I can't hold on!
Let go, I've got you.
Holy fucking shit... that was just what I needed.
Can you keep going?
Mhmmm... please keep fucking me.
She's sticking her tongue down my throat while I fuck her.
She's moaning straight into my mouth.
Ohhhhhmmm... Ahhhh...
You're so fucking tight.
Mmmm... you're holding and fucking me like it's nothing.
Fuck... I'm... already about to finish again...
Mnnnnmmm...
I'm about to finish too Zoe.
Mmmmm... hold on. I'm so close.
MMMMMNNNNN.... AHHH FUCK!
HHHNNggggg...
Fuck... that was so fucking good...
MMMMMNNNNN.... AHHH FUCK!
HHHNNggggg...
Fuck... that was so fucking good...
Fuck [mcf].
It's not fair the way your cock feels in me. What else can compare to it?
Ha, so last time was on a desk and this time was hanging from a pole.
How do we one up that?
We'll find a way. I have plenty of ideas.
Ohhh fuck... my legs are weak.
Do I need to pick you back up?
No, it's fine.
I have to get going. Emiko will wonder where I'm at.
Yeah, I need to go too.
Thanks for this... I honestly did need it.
Trust me, anytime Zoe.
Heh... noted.
*Both of you get dressed*
So I'll be seeing you tonight?
Yep.
Cool... see you then.
Woah, where are you going?
What? The locker rooms are right next door. I can be shirtless.
No, not that. I want a goodbye kiss.
Oh...
Sorry... I'm in a hurry. I forgot.
Mwah!
There... now I'll see you later.
Bye Zoe.
Hey... back up for a moment.
What are you about to do?
I'm about to leave. I have to go.
Woah, really?
Hold up.
I really have to go [mcf].
I'm sorry for teasing.
I mean yeah the teasing is a bit fucked up.
I just want a proper bye at least.
Like a goodbye kiss?
Yeah something like that.
Mwah!
There... now I'll see you later.
Bye Zoe.
Well... I hope you know how to bowl.
I roughly do... not great though.
Ha, you better practice. I'd hate to see you suck in front of everyone.
I'll do my best.
Well... I'm going to catch up to Emiko before she gets too far away.
All right Zoe. I'll see you tonight.
Bye [mcf].
Well... there's nothing left to do in here.
Time to go find my girls.
Zoe said they would be at the front... I assume she meant the front of the school.
I've taken enough time, they're probably ready to go.
Oh... what is Bailey doing in the hallway?
She doesn't notice I'm here...
Huh, she still doesn't. Either she's zoned out or she's thinking deep about something.
Pssstt..
Oh my god!
You scared the shit out of me [mcf]!
Haha... my bad. What are you doing waiting in the hall anyway?
I was waiting on you to walk by.
What's up?
Well I just wanted to talk...
And... I thought about what you said about Rainn.
Yeah? And what do you think?
Are you sure it's okay I tell her?
Absolutely Bailey.
Then I think I'm going to tell her that I like her too.
But I'd have to make sure she's okay with a few things.
The most important one being that she'd have to be okay with me dating you.
I'm very glad to hear that.
I think she will be... she seemed to like you.
If she agrees we should all talk about it though.
Yeah, you're right.
And who knows? Maybe you and her could grow closer and we could all have our own little thing?
Well that's up to Rainn. First things first is that you have to tell her how you feel. We'll worry about the rest later.
Yeah, that's the hard part though.
You can do it Bailey.
You know you're the absolute best for letting me do this right?
Yeah, well so are you.
Mwah!
So... what else did you want to talk about?
Well... Just like everyone else I'm nervous about tonight.
You've got nothing to be nervous about... at all.
Just like everyone else I'm nervous about tonight.
You've got nothing to be nervous about... at all.
I thought you might say that. I'm excited for it... but I still feel nervous.
I'll say it again... you have nothing to feel nervous about.
Are you checking me out?
Yes I am. I like the outfit.
Well what's underneath the outfit isn't recovered from last night yet... but that wouldn't stop me from doing it again really soon. Maybe after bowling?
Maybe... It's possible.
Heh, I hope so. I'm going to head home now, I'll text you in a little bit okay?
I'll see you tonight Bailey.
Mwah!
All of the girls I've talked to are nervous for tonight.
I wonder how Natalie is handling it...
Okay... now I'll find my girls.
They should be around here somewhere.
There they are... what are they doing?
She'll be out shortly.
Yeah we'll stay here with you until then.
[mcf]!
Nathan? What are you doing here?
My mom had to talk to someone.
There you are baby... how's your shoulder?
It's fine. It really wasn't bad.
I'm glad. How do you know Nathan?
He's Veronica's nephew. We played basketball the other day.
How have you been buddy?
Good. Are we going to play again soon?
Yeah, we will. Have you been taking care of your mom?
I've been good. I wrote her some letters and I've been trying to help clean more.
Good job buddy, I'm proud of you.
Have you met his mom? He was standing alone up here when we got here and it's been a while since then.
He was getting a little worried so maybe you could find her?
Also I'm glad your shoulder is fine.
I'm fine.
I can wait here. She'll be back.
So when are we going to play again?
Well I'm pretty busy... you'll have to ask these girls if it's okay if I set aside some time to play.
[g1] can [mcf] play with me sometime?
Am I allowed to come and play too?
Sure.
Then anytime. I don't mind.
Shauna... you can come too. Can he play sometime?
Sure he can buddy.
Can [mcf] play sometime?
Huh, Liz must have never introduced herself.
Oh... I'm not... uhhh....
Nathan! Where did you go?
You told me to wait at the front.
I meant in front of where I was. You had me worried sick.
It's okay! [mcf] was here!
Uhh.. It's nice to meet you.
Oh wow... it's nice to meet you too. My name is Vanessa.
Thanks for keeping an eye on Nathan... I didn't notice he wandered off until I was stuck in a conversation.
Come on honey, we have to get you to school.
[mcf] said we were going to play again soon.
Oh wow. Isn't that great? When did you two want to?
Well, I was going to ask you when would be a good time.
It's hard to say right now. Is it okay if I get your number from my sister?
That way I can call and plan something with you?
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Cool, I wish we wouldn't have met when I'm in such a rush.
It's okay, I understand.
I'll see you soon!
Yep, be good in class today and be good for your mom.
I will. I promise.
Bye buddy.
Bye [mcf].
I'm sorry for the wait girls... are we all ready to go?
Yeah, we're ready. Willow is already in the car.
Why is she out there and not in here with you guys?
She said she wanted to be alone...
It was really cute seeing you with Nathan.
I really do think you'll be an amazing father one day.
He's a good kid.
So... about our date.
When are we going to go on it?
Ha, I'm going to drop you girls off and then take Willow home. After I get back we'll go on our date okay?
Heh, good. that gives me enough time to get ready.
Hey [mcf]...
You should try talking Willow into staying with us for a while...
I think it could help her... and I wouldn't mind having her around.
I already talked to [g1] and Shauna about it. They're both okay with it.
I'll see what I can do Liz.
Thank you [mcf]. We should go out there now...
Yeah we should. Let's head home girls.
A while later
I've already dropped off the other girls... it'sjust me and Willow now.
She's been quiet this entire car ride.
I've tried to talk to her a few times but she's stayed silent.
We're not too far from her house now.
I wish I knew what was troubling her so badly.
She says I can't help... but I'd at least like to try.
That's not up to me though... I just have to be here for her when I can be.
Maybe she'll trust me enough to let me know more soon.
The weird thing is she keeps looking over at me...
I feel like she is right now...
Yep.
But everytime I look over she quickly looks away.
I don't want to make her uncomfortable. She probably just wants to get home and relax.
Oh, that's a nice car.
And the girl driving it is cute too... I feel like I've seen her before.
Hmmm... the roads have been pretty empty today.
Come to think of it a quiet drive is exactly what I needed.
This morning hasn't given me any breaks.
This entire week hasn't... tomorrow should slow down some.
I haven't gotten to train much at all this week... and practices haven't been very effective.
I think I'm going to try and get some work in tomorrow.
Uhhh... [mcf].
Oh, what's up Willow?
Uhh...
I'm sorry for ignoring you...
I get it, you're going through some things and sometimes you just don't want to talk.
You don't have to apologize for that.
I should have at least said I didn't want to talk instead of not replying at all.
Yeah, that's true. But it's no big deal.
I'm not one to get too offended by slight issues, especially if I understand why they're happening.
I don't usually go this way... are we close to my home?
Yeah, not far away now. We'll be there in just a moment.
Well... at least she apologized for it.
Time to finish this drive and get her home.
A few minutes later
Thank you for driving me home...
Do you want to come inside for a minute?
Ehh... I really need to get on with my day... but I know how much she didn't want me to leave last time.
Sure, I'll come in for a moment.
Okay...
She won't talk to me but she wants me to stay at her place...
She either likes me or hates being alone... maybe both.
So... what do you want to do?
I don't know... I feel a little weird.
Why?
I don't like being the main attention source. I know you're wondering what the hell is wrong with me...
I just don't want to talk about it but I feel like it's going to happen anyway.
We don't have to if you don't want to Willow. I am here for you though.
We can do something that doesn't involve anything like that.
Hmmmm....
Do you want to watch tv or something?
Sure, we can do that.
Will Ryker flip out if he finds out I was here?
Why would he?
You said you two were dating?
Oh my god... no. I was being a bitch when I said that. It was a lie.
Ryker has always been a creep... especially to me so I figured it would be easy to sell.
I knew you had just hit him and I needed help with something... so I tried to trick you into it.
What the hell Willow? You could have just asked.
I know that now... I'm sorry.
Sit down.
Feel free to sit down.
She seems really nervous.
Is it okay if I sit beside you?
Last time I was here you sat in my lap. Sitting beside me is fine Willow.
Oh, right.
So what do you want to watch?
It doesn't matter to me. I don't watch much tv.
I'll scroll through some channels then.
Anything but the news... well as long as it's not about me then I don't mind.
Give it a second... it always shows that screen when it's turning on.
Good afternoon everyone! My name is Moon and I'm here to catch you up on everything happening at WVM!
Oh no...
I'm sure you've heard about the bowling event tonight! Make sure to tune in and watch our very own star [mcf] and his teammates participate in a bowling tournament for charity!
You can turn the channel Willow.
No, no. I want to hear about this.
In the meantime we've hit the streets and asked around about how excited everyone is for the upcoming basketball season.
Here's a clip from one of those interviews.
Does it get annoying being talked about all the time?
I'm not a huge fan of it.
It's netted you some girlfriends and every girl at school talks about you like you're straight out of a romance novel.
So it must have some positives to it.
Heh, fair point.
You said you were a big fan of the Stars... How excited are you for the upcoming season?
Well I'm more of a fan of [mcf]. I've been following him on social media for a few weeks now and I think he's really hot.
Those girls of his are cute and all but he could use a bigger girl in his life.
Oh wow, they're even airing your fan girls on the news.
I expected nothing less.
I have an interview planned with [mcf]. What do you think I should ask him?
Oh... I'm not sure. I don't really have anything to ask him.
Okay not a question then... what would you like to tell him? I'll pass it on.
Well... that he's hot. And that big girls deserve some love from him too.
I can show him this interview, what's something that can make you stand out from all the other girls?
Uhh... what do you mean?
Why should he consider dating bigger girls?
He's a big boy so he needs someone who can keep up with him.
And we're curvy in all the right places.
What's something that can seperate you from the other big girls?
I can do this.
Oh my god!
Why isn't she wearing shoes?
I think [mcf] will be very impressed.
She's losing her balance!
Oh fuck...
Ahhh!
Cut it! Cut it!
Holy shit! That was amazing!
Haha!
Come on Willow, she might've gotten hurt.
Haha, They wouldn't show it if she got hurt too badly. And no one said she had to do all of that.
And did you see her feet?! That was crazy!
Ha, Yeah? What's so great about your feet Willow?
...
Oh she must have not liked me grabbing her ankle.
Sorry...
I meant that it was funny that she was outside barefoot.
I wasn't making fun of her weight or anything... I wouldn't do that.
What she did was silly though. Don't make me feel bad for laughing at that.
Yeah, it was silly.
Fuck... I made it a little awkward.
I think that's enough tv for me. That's all I needed to see.
Don't leave yet...
What else do you want to do?
I don't know...
There's a volleyball here... do you play?
Oh... uhhh... kind of?
I used to.
Were you any good?
Yeah, I suppose so.
Why'd you quit?
Do you want to play? We can pass it back and forth.
Huh... she dodged the question.
Sure, let's head back outside.
We can pass it in here... I don't mind.
What if we break something?
We won't... and I don't really care if we do.
You hit it first.
I've never actually hit a volleyball before... it can't be that hard.
Here we go!
That felt pretty good.
Jesus [mcf]! Hit it at me not over me!
My bad!
Damn, she hit it back to me even though my pass sucked... that was impressive.
Hopefully this hit is better.
Not bad! Hit it a little harder!
Oops!
Her pass was a little off. But not as bad as mine.
She said to hit it a little harder...
Oh, I fucked that one up.
I got it!
Oh fuck!
Willow!
Ow...
I'm sorry... that was an awful pass.
Haha, you fucking suck at volleyball... stick to basketball.
Now help me up asshole.
Hah, you're okay right?
Yeah, I'm fine.
I shouldn't have went for that.
Your hits need some work.
Ha, Next time we'll play a game of horse and see who is talking at the end of it.
Haha, deal.
I landed on my elbow... it's sore.
Do you want me to take you to an urgent care?
No, it's just sore.
I can take you if you need to go.
It's really not bad. I just said it to make you feel bad... hehe.
Can I get you back?
How?
Let me punch your stomach.
Why?
Come on, you got me hurt now let me make it even.
Just one punch.
Ha, okay. One punch.
No flinching!
Ow!
What the fuck?
That's all you got?
Why is your stomach so hard? Did that not hurt at all?
I'll give it to you, it stung a little.
Ha, then we're even.
Let's sit back down... before we actually break anything.
Shouldn't we clean up the mess we already made?
I'll get it after... don't worry about it.
Same spots... I'll turn on a movie or something.
She seems to be in a way better mood than when we were in the car... but I need to leave.
So what do you want to watch? I'll let you pick...
Willow... I have a lot to do today.
Oh...
Okay...
Fuck. I can't leave with her looking at me like that.
Why don't you just come over to our place?
I will soon. But not today [mcf]...
Okay not a movie. What about a show? only 30 minutes?
Hmmm... okay Willow. I can do that.
A few minutes later
She's sitting really close to me.
I hate seeing her upset like this, especially when it's me leaving that's causing it.
I told Liz I'd try to talk her into staying with us. I don't think that's going to happen today.
I should still offer it... after the show.
around 15 minutes later
We've both gotten cozy. I don't mind that she's leaning on me.
She doesn't seem as upset now. I think she honestly just doesn't want to be home alone.
I feel a little guilty for taking back Liz... I wonder if she was doing better then.
Do you like the show?
It's entertaining... You look sleepy.
I am... but I don't want to fall asleep.
Why?
Because when I wake up you'll be gone.
Well I have to lea-
Shh... just lie to me.
Tell me you'll still be here. Please.
Damn...
Yeah Willow. I'll still be here.
Thank you.
Poor girl... something is really troubling her.
I'll let her fall asleep... and then I have to go.
After getting this comfortable I'm a little sleepy myself.
It might be worth resting for a moment. I still have a ton to do today, I doubt I'll be out for long sitting like this.
A few minutes later
Zzzz...
This way!
Huh?
Where am I?... Fuck, this has to be another dream.
What are you doing?
Is that my sister's voice?
This place looks so familiar... and I don't like it.
I don't think I should be here.
Brubru!
Follow me!
Cedey?
Why does she look like Stacy again?
I can't control anything... I'm following her.
Where are we going?
Woah she switched back... what the fuck?
Why do I feel so... scared?
These dreams make me feel anxious but they never really make me afraid.
What happened here?
I wonder what's in here.
Cedey! Don't mess with that!
She switched again.
We came here to find out what's in this place... it was your idea.
My idea?
Mom doesn't usually nap during the day. We need to hurry.
She'll be really mad if she finds out we snuck out.
Those boxes look new. I wonder if there's anything in them?
Oh no...
I'm going to slide them out.
Cedey no...
Come on, help me brubru. This bottom one is heavy.
CEDEY STOP! MOVE!
AHHH!!
RUN BRUBRU!
How did I not remember this?
But the dog wasn't the bad part?
KEEP RUNNING!
CEDEY! Watch out!
Oh...
I remember all of this now... and it was all my fault.
Cedey didn't get out of the way in time.
The pole falling was enough to scare the dog away though.
AAAAAHHHH!!!
It's all piecing together.
Everything is flooding back to me...
This is what caused my dad to take me and leave.
AHHHHHmmm!
NNmmmm...
Brubru... everything's okay. NNnn..
You need to go get mom okay? Be quick.
How was she able to tell me that? She had to be in so much pain but she was still trying to calm me down...
CEDAR! JACOB! WHERE ARE YOU!?
Cedar... my sister's name was Cedar.
OH MY GOD!
I'M COMING HONEY!
I'm so sorry! Are you okay Cedar?
It hurts mommy...
Jacob come help mommy.
Why is she calling me Jacob?
I'm so sorry.
Be strong for mommy honey, when I lift the pole you have to help pull your sister out okay?
Everything's going to be okay.
OHHHAAA!!
Cedey looks so much like Willow now... what's going on?
Oh my god... wake up [mcf]. I don't want to relive all of that again.
But it all makes sense now.
Oh thank god... it's over.
Willow is still out cold... how long was I asleep?
She seems like she's sleeping a lot better than I did.
Wait a second...
Nnnmmm... no...
Willow?
Don't... do it...
Hmnnmmm... let him go...
Brubru...
Did she just say Brubru??? Or did I just hear that?
There's no way...
She just sat up... did she wake up?
Willow?
Is she sleepwalking like I have been?
Willow!
Mmmmnnmmm.
Willow!
Don't... go...
Cedar!
Brubru...
Holy shit...
I can't believe this.
Cedey stop.
Willow! Stop her [mcf]!
Oh no... not again.
What are you doing here Lauren?
I come by everyday to check on her.
Help me lay her back down.
There we go... poor girl.
That's the second time I've caught her sleepwalking.
Is that what happened when I picked her up that one morning?
What happened in here?
A little volleyball incident.
So... we have to talk [mcf].
You and Willow haven't done anything have you? Like you're not in any sort of relationship right?
No, nothing like that.
Okay good. We should sit down for this.
I already know what she's going to say.
Willow is my sister. She's Cedar... there isn't any part of me that doubts that now. I can feel it.
How could I not tell before? And why didn't she look like herself in my past dreams?
How much do you know [mcf]?
I think I know Lauren. I just realized it.
Hmmm...
I had no clue until we had our own session. Both of you two told me pretty much two sides of the same story.
I couldn't just say that to you though. I had to make sure first.
But I couldn't find anything about when you lived here.
What do you mean when I lived here?
You're from here [mcf]. This is your hometown.
What the fuck...
My head fucking hurts... I haven't even begun to process the fact that she's my sister... now you drop that on me.
I know [mcf]... It's all as crazy as it sounds. But now you know.
You were here for your sister before you even knew.
She's going from being alone to having you as her brother. I think that alone will solve most of her problems.
And I'm happy for both of you guys. It's strange right now but I think this is a really beautiful thing.
I am happy... I'm just mad at myself.
Why?
I was the reason she got hurt as a child.
And there was nothing I could do about it... I just stood there and cried while they had to calm me down... and I wasn't even the one that got hurt.
Hmmm... that's not how she remembers it. But it doesn't matter now. It only matters what you do from this point onwards.
Do you think that's why you try so hard to protect everyone now?
Maybe?
Are we going to tell her?
Yes... I'm going to use her bathroom really quickly, then we'll wake her up and tell her. Okay?
Okay.
Fuck, I'm nervous.
What if she's mad? Or dissapointed?
I should go ahead and straighten this up.
A few moments later
Oh man... my heart is flying.
This feels like more of a dream than the one I just had.
I feel sick... it's my fault all of this happened.
She said she stopped playing volleyball... it had to be because of her injury.
Ugh... I feel awful.
[mcf]...
Oh no...
You didn't leave...
You promised me you wouldn't and you stayed...
You even fixed my kitchen.
You're the best.
Willow...
I didn't think you'd still be here.
I'm pretty hungry. Do you want me to cook us something? I'm not great at it.
Willow...
You made me really happy today [mcf].
This morning was awful but I'm feeling a lot better now.
Fuck... how do I tell her?
You deserve a thank you.
Mwah!
Heh...
Willow please...
Was that a good kiss?
I don't kiss just anyone.
Okay this will be awkward afterwards... Lauren please get out of the bathroom.
I don't want you to think any different! That was a very special kiss from me.
You better not think I'm some kind of easy chick!
Infact I'll let you know that I'm a vir-
Oh my god Cedey stop!
What?!
Oh fuck.
What did you just call me? How do you know that name?
There's no waiting for Lauren now, I have to just tell her.
It's me, Cedey.
Mom was calling me Jacob... I guess that used to be my name. I'll see how she reacts to it.
I'm your brother... I think I used to be named Jacob.
What? How?
Trust me... I know it's crazy. I just realized it myself.
What the fuck?
I don't know what to say... I don't even know what to think.
I had a feeling... but it was too crazy to be true.
You're my fucking brubru!
Oh my god you look so different... I was always taller than you.
I can't believe this!
Me either Cedey.
My memory on us as kids is super foggy.
Then you're lucky.
I have so many questions.
I do too.
Did you tell her?
Yeah, I had to.
Where did you come from Lauren?
I came by to check on you but you were asleep... and I had to use your bathroom.
She's holding me super tight.
I missed you so much. Heh... my brother is a star.
Brubru... never leave me again.
I don't think you two need me to get in your way right now.
Enjoy your day together. Catch up.
But I do think the three of us should talk tomorrow.
Sure Lauren. Thank you.
How do you feel Willow?
I'm so fucking happy.
I'm glad to hear it. I'll see you later okay? I think you're in good hands.
I think I am too. Goodbye Lauren.
Bye [mcf]. Call me tomorrow... or if you need me tonight.
I will. Goodbye Lauren.
I never thought I'd see you again.
Look at me Willow.
No... I'm crying too much and I'm embarassed.
I just realised what I said to you before you told me... oh my god.
Haha, I was trying to get you to stop.
And I don't care if you're crying. I want to see my sister's face.
There we go!
Come on Cedey... look at me.
I'm trying to wipe my tears on your shirt.
Haha, fuck... this is crazy.
I have so much to ask her but I don't want to rush into that.
I know right?!
I must still be dreaming...
Nope... this is real life.
We have so much to talk about.
Let me wipe my tears again first.
Mmm... better.
Uhh brubru?
What is it?
What happened to dad?
Oh, well... he passed away a few years after we moved. He was in a car accident.
I'm sorry...
Oh... it's okay. I hated him anyway... I just wanted to be able to tell him that myself.
So what happened to you?
I was very lucky. A woman named [am] took me in and raised me.
What about you? What happened to mom?
You'd have to ask her...
What do you mean?
Can we sit down again?
Sure.
Oh man... I never thought about the fact that she wouldn't have know about dad's death.
Sit...
I've heard your girlfriends talk about [am]. I'm really glad you had someone like her.
I was worried for you, I stayed up many nights hoping that you were okay.
But what happened to you?
It's not easy to talk about... will I have to tell [am] about it too?
You're going to meet her?
Of course I am. As your sister I want to meet the woman that takes care of you.
Heh, fair. Well then, yes you'll have to tell us both. [am] will flip out when she learns about you.
Really?
Oh yeah, she really wanted me to find you. So I'm excited to tell her.
Call her. Let's go tell her.
I'll go get changed into something nicer and brush my hair. You call her and tell her to meet us somewhere.
And I'll tell you both whatever you want to know.
Deal.
Fuck... my heart is pounding. I'm so overwhelmed with emotions right now.
[mcf] is my brother...
Not only did my brother find me but he's a fucking superstar.
Heh, listen to me. I'm starting to sound like that girl that got interviewed.
I'm happy we found eachother. However it happened... I'm just glad we're here.
I completely agree.
I'll be right back.
Don't you dare fucking leave.
I'm not going anywhere.
[am] really is going to flip. I can't tell her over the phone. I just have to tell her to meet me somewhere for lunch.
*Ringing*
*Ringing, Ringing*
Come on... pick up the phone mom.
[mcf]? Hey honey.
Hey mom. Where are you at right now?
I'm picking up some snacks for the house. Why? Did you need something?
Do you want to go somewhere for lunch?
Just the two of us?
Yep, just us.
Of course I do honey. You don't even have to ask that. Where do you want to go? I'll meet you there.
I'll text it to you okay?
Okay... I'll see you wherever you pick. I'm leaving the store now.
I love you mom.
I love you too. Bye honey.
All right. [am] is going to meet us somwhere, we're going to grab lunch.
Where would you like to go?
My stomach is in knots [mcf].
Yeah, mine is too.
I'll tell her to pick.
That works for me!
Are you almost ready to go?
Yep, just a few more seconds...
What do you think?
I think my sister is gorgeous.
And that dress looks great on you. It goes well with your hair.
I haven't worn a dress in so long. This one actually belongs to mom.
Let me put on my shoes and the we can leave.
A while later
Well, we're here.
And good, this place looks empty.
I'm so nervous...
Don't be. [am] is awesome.
She's really pretty.
Let me talk to her first okay? I'll tell you when to come over.
You got it.
She doesn't know I'm next to her right now...
I'll go ahead and take a seat.
Dang mom... what's she zoned out about?
Mom?
[mcf]! How long were you there?
I just now sat down.
You startled me.
Sorry mom. What were you thinking about?
I was thinking about why you wanted to have lunch.
We've only ever really done this out of nowhere when you had news to tell me.
So what's the news?
Well... sinc-
Wait! Let me guess.
Is [g1] pregnant!?
What?
Me and her have talked about things.
She told me that you two were letting things happen.
It's time for me to help raise another kid. I'm ready to be a grandma.
Mom... no. I mean we are. But that's not it.
It's about a girl that you haven't met yet.
Who?
Uhh, she has many names to me right now. But she goes by Willow.
Willow? Isn't that the girl that said mean things about [g1]?
It is, but she's apologized for it and she explained why she did it.
That's no longer a problem.
Oh my god, she's not pregnant is she?
Ha, I certainly hope not.
Come here Willow.
She's here?
Hi...
What's happening honey? I'm getting worried.
Everything's okay mom. Just hear us out.
Did you tell her?
Not yet. Willow this is [am].
Uhh... it's... it's nice to meet you...
She really is nervous.
It's nice to meet you too Willow.
Now can you two please tell me what's going on?
We do have something to tell you.
I don't want you to go crazy so you have to promise you can handle news right now.
Did you win a free vacation somewhere or something?
Tell me already honey... I promise I can handle news.
I'm just going to say it.
The girl standing next to you right now... she's my sister.
What did you say?
You heard me right mom. Willow is Cedey from my dreams.
Huh? [mcf]!
I promise mom. I wouldn't joke about anything like this.
How do you know?
We've been going through the same thing. And we have the same story as our past.
It's her mom.
Oh my god!
He's my brubru... and thank you for taking care of him.
Come here sweetie.
You have to tell me everything.
She has to tell us both.
Get in here [mcf]!
I can't believe this! You actually found her [mcf]!
I've never been hugged this much before.
Ha, get used to it. We're huggers.
I'm so happy Willow.
I am too.
If you ever need anything then you ask us okay? We're all family now.
You're a very sweet woman [am].
So we're here... what do you want to know?
Hmmm... where to start?
My memory is a little fuzzy from before you left... but I'll answer anything that I have an answer for.
Okay. Start from there. What happened after?
Dad left shortly after my accident... do you remember that?
I do... and I'm so sorry Cedey. That was all my fault.
No, it really wasn't.
But after you two left, mom was really strong for me. I was still recovering and she was there for me through it all.
It took many months to heal. Probably half a year.
She was always by my side. She gave me everything I needed.
She helped me deal with losing my brother too.
And after I recovered we decided to go to the park one day. It's actually the park that's near here.
We were enjoying our day but it was strange.
She cried a lot. But that was sort of normal.
She was telling me how much she'll always love me and how no matter what she'll always be my mom. Things like that.
So when the lady in a suit came to get me... it all made sense.
Mom didn't feel like she could raise me after that. She blamed herself for my injury.
So she gave me to the state.. and I was put in foster care.
I'm so sorry Willow.
Mom was still in my life from time to time. But never anything consistent.
I guess that explains why she never mentioned her to [am].
How did the foster home go?
Not great for me. I had put on a little weight since I was off of my feet for a long time and other kids can be cruel.
I couldn't play like all the other kids could then. My knee was still pretty bad.
I didn't really fit in with anyone so I stuck to myself.
I think that's why I am who I am now.
How did you end up here?
I worked hard. I tried to get the best grades I could... I want to be successful. I never want my kids to go through what we did.
I'm proud of you Cedey. You had it worse than me and you still made it here.
Thank you brubru... That means a fucking ton coming from you.
Language missy.
Heh, you're already getting treated like a kid by [am].
Should I get used to it?
Yes!
Can I ask something a little worse?
Yeah...
Why did dad only take me?
Uhh... I don't know.
I tried not to think about that. But I assume it's just a 'boys stay with the father' kind of thing.
I'm sorry Cedey. I shouldn't have asked.
It's okay. I'm an open book right now.
You can ask anything.
When I gave you a ride home that one morning. What happened before that?
I've been having bad dreams all week. That one was one of the worst and I just woke up outside and I was lost and scared.
I didn't know what had happened to me.
I went through the same exact thing.
Really?
Yeah, it's actually how I met Stacy and it's why I punched Ryker.
I was sleepwalking and everything too.
Wow... if only I told you about mine then...
We could have been here sooner.
I'm just happy we're here now.
Same here...
Should we sit down?
Yeah, we should.
We still have a ton to talk about.
Let's enjoy some time together before we jump back into that.
I agree we should... but first. Cedey.
I think you should come live with us.
Live with you? Like move all my stuff in?
Yeah, you're my sister. I don't want you to be alone.
[mcf], that's her decision to make. But of course she is welcome to.
It is her decision. I'm just saying how I feel about it.
Is there space for me?
Yes there is.
I mean... yeah. If it's okay with everyone.
I'm sorry for the wait guys.
Oh, hey Tia.
I didn't know she worked here.
How's it going? What can I get you guys?
I'll have a water.
That's it?
Yep, that's it.
I don't think my stomach could handle anything else right now.
I'll have a water too.
Same thing for me.
Ha, they must feel the same way I do.
Three waters?
Uhh, I'll take a coffee.
I don't plan on drinking it... but just ordering water seems wrong.
At least it's something.
Would you mind helping me carry all of it?
Uh, sure I guess.
Thank you.
Please don't try anything in here Tia... not in front of my family.
I wasn't expecting to see you today since class was cancelled.
I didn't know you worked here.
I started last week.
So uhh... have you gotten any condoms?
Tia, my mom is right behind us.
I'm being quiet.
No I haven't gotten any.
Why not?
I haven't had the chance to.
Is this your way of getting me to agree to sex without a condom?
Because it's kind of working.
I'll get some condoms Tia. When I can.
If you say so. I'll ask again soon.
So you're not into taking risks?
I never said that.
How much are you willing to risk daddy?
You can have me right now, in the back.
I don't think I'm going to buy any.
Hmmm... Does a little risk excite you daddy?
How much are you willing to risk?
You can have me right now, in the back.
Even though that sounds like fun. I can't try something like that right now.
Not with them here.
Not today Tia.
Damn... I was getting excited.
You're really teasing me up.
All of this will make it better when I do finally 'take you'.
Let's get these to your table... and then I'll see you soon yeah?
Yeah, you will.
It's why I need you to help carry some stuff. I'm not good at carrying more than a few things yet.
Well I'm happy to help.
Hey... uhh...
What happened in the showers the other day?
You don't like me?
You came on a little strong... and I just wasn't feeling it then.
It's nothing against you.
So if I tried again you might say yes?
I'm not sure. I'm here with my mom, that's just not what I'm thinking about right now.
Fair enough... I'll keep that in mind.
Let's get these to your table... and then I'll see you soon yeah?
Yeah, you will.
I hope they didn't hear any of that.
I'm so happy you're part of our family now... I love your brother so much and I'm so happy for you two.
I don't know how to explain it [am]. I don't think I've ever been as happy or hopeful as I am right now.
Hey girls.
Hey.
What do you say we take our drinks and head home?
Yeah? Are we going to tell the other girls about Willow?
We should tell them.
I'm glad you said that. There's no way I could keep this from them.
Didn't you say you were busy today?
Yeah, I actually have a lot planned still. But I can reschedule.
No, keep them. I'd need to get settled in at your place anyway.
And I wouldn't mind some alone time so I can think of everything I want to say to you.
If that's what you want Cedey.
It is.
Let's go home you two.
A few minutes later
How do you want to handle telling them?
Same way as with [am]. You tell them and I stand there.
Haha, sure.
Can I use your restroom first?
Yeah, the bathroom is in the bedroom that's on the left.
Thank you. Don't go anywhere okay?
I'll be in the living room with them.
I'm so proud of you [mcf].
How do you feel?
I feel relieved. It's such a nice feeling to know who she is and have these answers.
Just knowing my sister is safe makes me happy.
You're such a sweetheart.
And thank you for everything you said to her.
I'm sure it's making it easier on her to know that we're all happy she's here.
Of course honey. I haven't told her this yet but since she's your sister then that means she's pretty much my daughter now.
I'll at least treat her that way. I just wish I knew why your other mom didn't tell me about her.
I think I'll ask her about that.
You should... just not today. Let today be about her meeting her brother again. Don't drown her in questions right away, let her get comfortable first.
You're right mom.
Mwah!
Mwah!
Mmm..
Neither of us are pulling away.
Mmmm..
I don't know if she's waiting on me to so I'll just go ahead before it gets weird.
Heh...
Well...
That seems to have flustered her.
I'm going to go put up all of the things I bought earlier okay?
Tell me how it goes with the girls.
I will mom, if you need any help just let me know.
I will.
I hope they're not too upset with me. I'm about an hour and a half late getting home.
Hey girls.
There you are!
[mcf]! Are we still going on our date?
Of course Shauna. I like the dress you chose.
Sit down baby.
Where have you been?
Willow really needed some company so I hung out with her for a while.
Oh, she did seem really sad in the car earlier.
Is she better now?
Oh yeah, I think she's doing great now.
I expect nothing less from you at this point.
Where's the other girls?
Everyone besides Rachael and Elizabeth are out somewhere. I'm not sure where Rachael is but Elizabeth is getting ready for tonight.
Psst..
You could have called or texted us or something you know... Just to let us know you're okay.
You're right. I will next time I'm late. I promise.
Thank you.
And you said you liked my dress?
I think it looks amazing on you Shauna.
I'm glad you think so.
I spent a long time picking it out. Do you mind if I show it off for you right now?
Sure.
I just hope she doesn't go too far since Cedey could walk up any moment.
I really liked the design on it.
I like it too.
Do you want to see the other side?
Absolutely.
I told her that her ass looks amazing in that dress. Doesn't it babe?
Yes it absolutely does.
Hehe... Our date is going to be fun.
[mcf]... there's something I've always wanted to try.
What is it?
A lapdance.
Oh Shauna...
Mmmm... how does that feel babe?
It feels great but...
Later when we have some alone time. I want to give you a real one of these.
I would fucking love that Shauna. But you should stand up before anyone walks in on us.
I'm just sitting on your lap.
It's okay. I don't think anyone here would care too much if they did see us like this.
It's not like we're naked or anything.
So this is what happens here?
Willow! I didn't know you were here!
I guess [mcf] was keeping it a secret.
Is it okay that I'm here?
Yeah, we don't mind at all.
So? what's the plan?
Come sit down.
Okay...
What's happening?
You'll see in a second.
Where do I sit?
You can sit inbetween me and [mcf].
Okay, thank you Shauna.
So, now that you're all here there's something I have to tell you.
[mcf] wait...
Let me do it this time.
Are you sure?
Yeah, I want to.
[g1] and Shauna... Your boyfriend is a great guy. I've felt close to him since I met him... even though I didn't act like it.
When he took me home today I begged him to stay and keep me company because I didn't want to feel lonely and I feel better when he's around.
There's no easy way to say what I'm about to say.
While he was at my house we discovered something... we haven't pieced everything together yet but...
[mcf] is my brother. My dad took him away from me when we were kids and we somehow found eachother again.
[mcf]? Really?
Oh wow!
She's completely serious. Willow is Cedey. She's my sister.
Willow... I had no clue.
None of us did. If [mcf] didn't see me sleepwalk then we may have never known.
I was expecting you to say something totally different. Come here Willow.
Oh wow...
Oh man, I feel so warm right now. It's like a huge hole in my life was just filled.
Me and Cedey need to keep talking about things... but [am] was right when she said I shouldn't overwhelm her.
It's hard not to be tempted to though.
I never took her to be much of a hugger... but she seems to like it.
Must run in the family.
Oh yeah, she likes it... she said earlier that she's never been hugged this much before.
I'm glad she's being show the affection she deserves.
I still feel sick thinking about me causing all of this in the first place... but I should wait and see what Cedey has to say about it.
What am I missing?
Hey Rachael.
Hey kid. What's going on?
Who is the girl with pink hair?
Uhh...
That's my sister.
Haha, very funny.
I'm serious Rachael.
What?? My guys could barely find anything? How did you just straight up find her? How do you know?
Incredible luck. But yeah Rach... she's my sister. We can tell you the same exact story from both of our sides.
It's true. He's my brother. It's nice to meet you. You can call me Cedar or Willow.
Well I just have to get in on this hug now.
Is this what it feels like to be you?
Yeah, pretty much.
Haha, no wonder you're so nice.
Why aren't you in this hug babe?
Come here.
Ahh, that's better.
Is this like my initiation into the family?
You can think of it like that.
I'm happy for you baby. I never imagined you having a sister... and here we are.
It's the perfect thing to end this crazy week with.
I know right? Maybe things will slow down now that we're back as siblings.
Willow, we should show you around.
Yeah? I wouldn't mind a tour.
I'll be happy to give you one.
Thank you [g1].
While all of you do that I need to borrow [mcf] for a bit.
I have to take him somewhere.
What?
Is it cool if I leave Cedey?
I'm not thrilled about it but I have your girls to keep me company and a house to explore.
Just come find me when you have some time. I'm going to think about everything I want to tell you.
I'll do the same.
I love you brubru.
I love you too Cedey.
When I get back from whatever Rachael has to show me we'll go on our date okay?
[mcf]... you just found your sister. Our date can wait.
Wow, that's really sweet of her. But I know how much she's looked forward to this and Cedey already said it was okay.
It's okay Shauna. We'll still be going. Be ready for when I get home okay?
Yes baby, I'll be ready to go.
Mwah!
I love you.
I love you too. Look after Cedey for me okay?
I will.
Good girl. I'll see you soon.
See you baby.
I feel like I'm the only girl around this house that doesn't get kissed on a regular basis.
All you have to do is ask.
Can I have a kiss [mcf]? Pretty please?
Mwah!
Thank you.
Ha, yeah it does happen a lot...
Okay...
So what do you need me for?
We're going to go on a ride. There's a person and a place you have to meet and see.
I don't want to be rude Rachael but could this not wait until later?
It needs to happen right now, trust me. It's for the best.
Okay Rach... are you driving or am I?
I'll drive this time.
I trust Rachael but fuck... bad timing today.
If she says it's important then it likely is...
I wonder who I'm supposed to be meeting?
A few minutes later
Where are we Rachael?
A really nice house.
[mcf]... welcome to our new home.
You've had to move a lot in this week... way more than anyone should have to.
But this house will last a while. I promise.
Really? This is ours?
Fuck... I wasn't paying attention earlier, I didn't see the outside of the house.
Follow me.
Why is she showing me first?
We could have brought everyone.
It's a nice garage.
When we walk in don't go wandering off. Stay by me.
I'm sure you want to see the house... but that's not why we're here right now.
Now I'm going to need you to keep an open mind okay?
I will.
And we'll explore the house when we bring everyone else over here.
Keep following me.
That's a nice table, I wonder how big this place is?
So this door right next to the stairs will always be locked. Only me and you will have a key.
Okay...
So... there's someone living down there. We have the entire house to ourselves besides the basement.
Who is living there?
[mcf]... no one but the two of us can talk about this. Promise?
Not even to [g1] or Shauna. Nobody.
Rachael, they'll be living with us. Shouldn't they know about whoever it is?
It's not about whether they should... it's about the fact that they can't.
I'm putting all of my trust into you kid. If you went and told anyone there was someone down there you'd completely ruin my career as a fixer.
I'm doing this because I think it's the best thing to do. And I trust you.
All we have to do is tell them that this door leads to an unfinished basement and that it should stay locked.
So can you promise me that you'll never talk about who you meet down here?
Okay Rachael. I promise.
I'll go ahead and give you the other key.
Follow me.
I'm nervous. I have no clue what I'm walking into right now.
Woah, this basement is huge.
Talismah! Where'd you go?
I'm over here!
Where?
Behind the block in the middle!
This place is meant for huge people!
Come over here Tali. There's someone I want you to meet.
Coming!
Oh shit... that's the girl Rachael showed me on her phone.
Oh shit... that's the girl Rachael showed me on her phone.
Oh! Hey...
Tali this is [mcf].
It's nice to meet you Talismah.
Don't be shy...
I can talk to him?
Yes. You can talk to him as much as you'd like. You can tell him anything.
He has the other key to this place. So you can trust him just as much as you trust me.
He's really tall...
Ha, yeah... he is.
What the fuck is going on?
It's nice to meet you too.
He doesn't know who you are Tali. Is it okay if I tell him or do you want to?
You mean he doesn't know who I used to be.
You can tell him.
You're talking to a princess.
Like an actual one. She's the daughter of a king.
Wow... okay. Why is she here then?
While you tell him this I'm going to finish what I was doing.
Whew... that's a long story. I'll try to summarize it.
Well first you need to know there are many people like me all over the world. And I know very many of them personally.
Anyway, Talismah is from the other side of the world. And how she ended up here is pretty crazy.
She's the daughter of a very powerful man... a very evil man.
When she was 14 she was promised as a bride. Which she wasn't happy about.
Okay...
And one day where she lived was being attacked. Talismah was able to escape amidst everything.
That's where a friend of mine found her. And to protect her they had to get her out of there.
So she was sent to me. And I've been keeping her safe since. It's been almost 20 years since it happened.
I'll tell you the rest while you walk me out.
You're leaving?
I have to make a few calls. And I want you two to have a chance to talk without a babysitter in the room.
And I don't want Tali to hear what I'm about to say.
Hey Rach... I don't know how I feel about this.
What's wrong?
If she's being looked for... I don't feel comfortable having her around all of the girls.
Come on [mcf]. If I felt there was any chance I'd be endangering any of you. Do you think I'd do it?
Her father passed away 2 years ago. There's still a power struggle over who will take charge over there.
No one is worried about Tali right now. We're just being safe. I've hid her for 20 years, I know what I'm doing.
And we monitor everything. If we hear any word that people are looking for her then we'll take actions necessary to keep everyone safe. Don't worry.
Okay...
Is she the girl in the photos you showed me?
Yes, she doesn't know about that though
So you're setting this up?
Yes... which is strange since she's like a daughter to me.
But her life will finally be starting soon. And she's always talked about wanting a little girl.
Don't you think she should experience a few things before having a kid?
People want what they want [mcf]. Which is why I'm basically giving you my blessing to do whatever you think is right with her.
Be her friend before trying to be anything else. That's my only rule.
I know this is crazy. But you did just randomly find your sister... so maybe this seems normal in comparison.
Now properly introduce yourself. I'll be back in a few minutes, I'll explain more then.
I know this is crazy. But you did just randomly find your sister... so maybe this seems normal in comparison.
Now properly introduce yourself. I'll be back in a few minutes, I'll explain more then.
All I'm asking is for you to be her friend. Spend some time with her when you can.
Okay.
Is she the girl in the photos you showed me?
Yes, she doesn't know about that though
So you're setting this up?
Yes... which is strange since she's like a daughter to me.
But her life will finally be starting soon. And she's always talked about wanting a little girl.
Don't you think she should experience a few things before having a kid?
People want what they want [mcf]. Which is why I'm basically giving you my blessing to do whatever you think is right with her.
Be her friend before trying to be anything else. That's my only rule.
I know this is crazy. But you did just randomly find your sister... so maybe this seems normal in comparison.
Now properly introduce yourself. I'll be back in a few minutes, I'll explain more then.
All I'm asking is for you to be her friend. Spend some time with her when you can.
Okay.
I know this is crazy. But you did just randomly find your sister... so maybe this seems normal in comparison.
Now properly introduce yourself. I'll be back in a few minutes, I'll explain more then.
Somehow today managed to get weirder... I'm going to be living with a princess that stays in my basement.
I used to just play basketball and hang out... shit, it was only a week ago.
She seems nice. I don't mind being her friend at all... it's just everything else about it.
I have no reason to doubt Rachael... but I'm always going to worry for everyone's safety.
So... Talismah.
You can call me Tali.
Want to sit down?
Sure.
Rachael has never left me alone with anyone before.
She must really trust you.
I guess she does. So tell me about yourself Tali.
What do you want to know?
Uhh... what do you do for fun?
Uhmm. Whatever I can. There's a lot more to do here than anywhere I've been before.
I mainly just watch movies. My old place had a treadmill and I'd walk while watching them.
I play video games too.
Nice. We'll need to play sometime then.
If only Shauna could come down here. We could all play together.
How do you feel about living like this? It must suck not being able to live however you want to live.
It's really not that bad. I've always enjoyed being inside and I don't mind being alone.
I could be in a way worse place. I'm happy here.
That's a great attitude to have.
Sure I wish I could live the average life every now and then.
Just for smaller things, like owning a cell phone would be nice.
You don't have one?
No, Rachael said it was too dangerous.
How did Rachael get those pictures then?
How did Rachael get those pictures then?
I don't see many other people. Just Rachael and a few other fixers that have helped move me.
So I'm sorry if talking to me is difficult. I'm not the best at conversing.
You're doing great. I'm just wrapping my head around everything.
What's it like being that tall?
Uhh, it's not bad. It's hard for me to fit in smaller places but other than that it's a good thing.
I wonder how much taller you are than me.
She is pretty short. But I like that.
Stand up please. I want to see.
Okay.
You're the tallest person I've ever seen.
Hehe...
I've always been short. And this place is huge.
I wonder how it all looks to you compared to me.
Want to find out? Climb on my back.
Really?
Sure.
Hehe... don't drop me!
I wouldn't dare.
Oh! I'm as tall as you now!
You're one couch taller than me!
So, you don't need to get on my back then? Now that you can see from my height?
Well I still want to know what's it like to walk around being this tall.
I want to know what all I could reach.
Hah, okay. Hop on.
How?
Wrap your legs around my stomach and lean forward on my back.
Like this?
Yah, that works.
I can see even higher now! I wish it was always like this!
Just make sure you don't lean back. I don't want to drop you.
Okay.
So tell me where to go.
A few minutes later
Okay, I think that's about everything you can try and reach.
I'm going to sit you down on the pool table.
Oh wow. That was fun. What else can we do?
What else do you want to do?
I don't know. What do you usually do for fun?
There's tons of things.
Well, looks like you two are getting along.
Rachael! [mcf] is cool. Why didn't you ever let me hang out with anyone?
Well...
I hadn't known a guy like [mcf] until now.
Guys like him are super rare.
We weren't doing anything by the way. I just gave her a piggy back ride.
I know. I saw you put her down when I walked in.
So... what makes you so rare?
This is the end of the current update!
Thank you everyone for playing! I hope you enjoyed!
And thank you all for supporting me through this down month. I hope this update makes up for it some.
Weeklies start back next week!
Love you guys <3 See you then.
Female
Transgender
You make my everyday
Not yet
Agree to stay out of it
Decline and say you're there for her
There's only one of me
You'll find someone easily
Check her out
Don't check her out
Make it
Miss it
Smack her ass
Just pick her up
Buy Shauna some earrings
Pocket the extra cash
Tell her you have feelings for her
Nicely Tell her you're not interested in her
Accept to explore feelings in secret
Decline saying it would be wrong
Go for two
Speed up
Stop
Make her finish
Cum
Keep going
Yes I'm loyal to her
So far
Agree to have casual sex
It's too risky/immoral
Imagine what she looks like under
Move on
Fuck her
Keep fucking
Finish
Cum inside
Pull out
Yes, I'm interested
No, that's not for me
Have sex with her
Decline
Cum inside of her
Kiss her
Shove the rest in
Yes
No
Yes, send her to me
Send more pictures
Send one more
Yes, send her my way
I can't do it
Cover for Damien
Tell her the truth
Hit on her
'Coach' Harper?
'Mrs.' Harper?
Compliment her smile
There's plenty to smile about
Start thrusting
Try to hold out
Take control
Finish in her mouth
Salad
Chicken
Have sex with Liz
Elizabeth's
Smaller
Have her start
Enjoy it
It's great so far
Still getting used to it
Crack a joke
Reaffirm that it's okay
Sure, I don't mind
I'm going to be fine, there's no need
Try to contact her
Leave it be
Pet the dog
Keep walking
Next position
Start thrusting again
Cum inside her
Yes, of course
Too busy tomorrow
Yeah, set it up
No, not my type
Give her a hug
Help Liz out
Leave her trapped
Compliment her
Move the conversation along
Give her a goodbye kiss
Get hot
Stay cool
Excuse yourself
See where it goes
Talk to Emiko
Message her
Don't message her
Pull her on top of you
Push her down and get on top of her
Do it
Don't do it
Ask her to hang out with you sometime
Keep it friendly
Confront him
Reach out as a friend
Joke around
Be a good teammate
Embarrass him
Go easy on him
Tell her you like her
I'm not
I am
Visit the nurse
Go home
Rachael's
Eden's
Just me
The more the merrier
Agree to make a sex tape with Eden
Don't kiss her
Help Shauna
Don't help Shauna
Avoid the kiss
Ayden
Kenji
Move her foot
Leave it where it is
Dunk on Dubaku
Pass to Ayden
Tell her to come in
Leave
Tell her that wasn't okay
Let it slide
Accept
Don't
Play along
Move along
Go with her
Take a peek
Keep eyes up
Set up a date with Anna
Tell her sometime soon
Text her
Don't text her
Take a peek at her ass
Agree to an interview
Decline the interview
Stay and chat with Penny for a moment
Go get Natalie and head home
yes
no
Yes I am
No, she's not my type
Invite her over
Sorry, we're busy today
Say you've already met
Pretend you're meeting for the first time
Okay, but quick
Not now Katie
No Katie
Ask him a few questions
Get back to basketball
I'm interested in her
Just friends
Take it
Leave it
Call me Daddy
Don't ask her and move on
Choke her
Don't choke her
Tell her you can't answer her
Open the app and turn them on
'It's okay if you like Rainn'
Keep Bailey for yourself
Play it safe
Decline her advances
Basic
Playful
Fangirls
Flirt with her
Move on with your day
Keep fucking her (cum inside)
Tell her you'll get condoms
Tell her you won't get condoms
Kiss [am]
Don't kiss [am]
